Job Title,Job Detail
Software Developer / Senior Software Developer (Full Stack),"As a Software Developer with our company, you’ll work closely with a team of software developers in building, integrating, and delivering software projects over the entire life cycle. The job will also include updating existing systems and integrating improvements to work on the user interfaces already in operation.
This role is an opportunity to level up your career and gain valuable management experience and lead a development team in reaching the business goals. If you’re a technical problem-solver with leadership skills, we would love to meet you, apply today.
Job Description
Design and develop high-volume, low-latency applications for cloud platforms, delivering high availability and performance
Provide support in large-scale system projects, including software development, testing, deployment, and maintenance.
Develop or enhance programs to automate online marketing campaigns
Provide quality deliverables in a fast-paced environments
Learn and evaluate other new technologies/tools as needed.
·
Requirement
Diploma/Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent.
1-3 years of programming experience in ASP.NET, MVC, C#, and AJAX
Experience with JavaScript libraries including JQuery. Knowledge of Angular JS
Able to work independently with minimum supervision
Experience with HTML and CSS with responsive design experience, including cross-browser/cross-device differences
Candidate with knowledge of Cloud computing like Amazon Web Services and Microsoft
Azure will have added advantage
Experience in the online advertising industry is strongly preferred
Experience in Google AdWords API development is a plus
Benefits
salary will be commensurate with skills and experience
Software Developer salary range $5000-$6000
Senior Software Developer salary range: $7000 to $10,000
#hiring #ASP.Net #ajax #googleadwords #webdeveloper #softwareengineer #softwaredeveloper #jobopportunity #job #developer #software #applicationdeveloper #job #career #work #newjob"
Software Developer #JobsThatMatter,"The Software Developer will be part of our service delivery team to serve a diverse group of clients from various industries and countries in the region. He/she will be exposed to work involving diverse technologies.
Hands-on development of existing and new business applications and prototypes
Work closely with the project lead to propose technical solutions
Ensure that solutions are delivered on time and meet required standards
Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science
At least 3 years of working experience in design and development of .Net framework
Ability to understand and implement algorithms
Possess analytical and problem solving skills
Ability to work under pressure of tight delivery deadlines
Possess the following technical background
ASP, .Net framework with C#, VB, HTML5, CSS3, Microsoft Ajax framework, JavaScript, jQuery, AngularJS, and MSSQL
Object oriented programming
NET MVC Framework, Web Forms, Web Services and WCF
Domain expertise in Microsoft Dynamics CRM or Sage CRM will be an advantage"
Senior Software Developer,"Responsibilities:
To develop company’s mission critical software products.
Conduct web-based development from front-end with javascript/jquery to backend C#/ASP.NET, and MSSQL for database.
Conduct user requirement analysis and system design and integrate with other partners systems.
Implementation of development standards and best practices to ensure the quality and testability of code libraries
Documentation of business requirements and technical designs.
Collaborate with team members in the areas of systems development and system support.
Requirements:
Degree in computer science / computer engineering
Minimum 4 year experience in software development (those less than 4 years of experience will be considered for the junior executive role)
Experience in web development
Experience in Microsoft C#/ASP.Net and PL/SQL
Experience in javascript, jquery, bootstrap, scorm
Experience in both Windows and Linux operating system
Good communication skills, analytical skill and able to work independently
Good knowledge with continuous integration
Learning management system background is a plus"
Backend Developer,"Position title : Backend Developer
Location: Ubi Avenue 1
Working Days: 5 Days Work Week
Working hours : Monday- Friday 9am -6pm 
Salary : $3500~$6500 (Depends On Experience)
Interested applicants can also send your resume to Whatapps: +6581514682 (Angel) and allow our Consultant to match you with our Clients. No Charges will be incurred by Candidates for any service rendered.
Job Description:
Develop and maintain a highly scalable and distributed IT system.
Write clear system documentation.
Maintain a close communication with experts and teams from around the world to discuss the - project feasibility, assist in product testing and to provide updates on project progress.
Regularly maintain and monitor software applications for error, health and performance improvement.
Provide production level support to fix urgent issues and bugs.
Research and suggest ideas to improve software application and process.
Requirement:
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Experienced in .NET Core framework preferably C# & web application technologies such as web api, HTML, CSS and etc & relational database and NOSQL database.
Able to write high performance code to handle very high concurrent requests & highly optimized SQL queries to handle very high database requests.
Knowledge in Kubernetes, Docker and microservices are an added advantage.
Eager to research new methodologies and technologies."
APPLICATION DEVELOPER,"Job Description: 
Manage both front-end and back-end website applications and mobile app development.
Development and management of Web and Business Applications – Business Websites, Intranet, in-house applications.
Initiate office automation applications.
Support Project Manager in project implementation.
Service desk (Application)
Maintain version control & release documentation
Other ad-hoc duties as assigned
Job Requirements:
Candidate must possess a Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience with a minimum of 2 years of experience writing code using languages such as (but not limited to) PHP, Java, JavaScript, HTML and MySql is required
Experience with Ionic framework in angular and flutter experience
Experience in Laravel, CodeIgniter, WordPress and Joomla
Familiar with NET
Troubleshoot and upgrade existing software
Good in problem solving and communication skill in both written and verbal
Interested applicants please apply through this link:
https://eleave.cbm.com.sg/TimeSolution/Recruit/JobListing.aspx
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Thank you for applying."
Full Stack Developer (Partner Company),"Please note that this role is with SGInnovate's partner company. For more information you may refer to this link: https://stars.sginnovate.com/viewrole?type=tm&jobid=MKT_2022_POLYBEE_1844
Duties and Responsibilities
Developing and maintaining plant measurement platform.
Designing and developing front end web app architecture for a remote UAV monitoring and control dashboard.
 Designing user interactions and experience on web pages.
Developing and maintaining back-end website applications.
Deploying deep learning models and computer vision stacks in the cloud.
Ensuring responsiveness of applications.
Working alongside engineers and horticulturists for core functionality integration.
Working alongside graphic designers for web design features.
Designing and developing APIs for data management and retrieval.
Designing and developing security and data protection measures.
Writing technical documentation.
Designing and developing unit tests.
Participating in code reviews.
Supporting the company’s future web development initiatives.
Required Skills:
Proficiency with fundamental front-end languages such as HTML, CSS and JavaScript.
Proficiency with AngularJS and familiarity with other JavaScript frameworks such as React.
Proficiency with MySQL and familiarity with other database technologies such as MSSQL, Oracle and MongoDB.
Proficiency with web servers such as IIS and Apache, and UI/UX design.
Proficiency with cloud services such as AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud.
Experience with building efficient and secure web APIs.
Experience in developing security and data protection measures including but not limited to Web Application Firewalls (WAFs) and data encryption.
Experience in software engineering practices, including but not limited to software design and implementation, unit testing, code reviews, continuous integration, source control, and coding standards compliance.
Good-to-Have Skills:
Experience with Git is preferred.
DevOps experience preferred.
Experience with deploying deep learning models in the cloud and web-integration.
Prior experience with Robot Operating System (ROS) and integration of ROS with web apps.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, self-directed, entrepreneurial environment.
Decision-making, problem resolution, and critical thinking skills.
Ability to multi-task activities with shifting priorities."
Analyst Programmer,"Responsibilities:
Reporting to the Project Manager, your responsibilities would be to:
Work with Team Leads of different project teams
Support the day-to-day operation of maintenance projects as part of the development team
Responsible for the Development, Unit Testing and System Integration Testing of Service requests and Defects reported.
Troubleshooting issues raised by customers and providing its resolution
Timely delivery of development work with quality, meeting the internal/external customers’ expectation
Update relevant documents on all executed changes in a timely manner.
Work as part of the team to meet project targets and quality objectives.
Interact effectively with team members at all levels.
Job Requirements & Qualifications:
Good university degree or polytechnic diploma in computer science or equivalent
Have positive attitude to meet new challenges Strong skills in both oral and written communications
Possess at least 5 years of prior programming experience in web development environment. Knowledge in ColdFusion will be an added advantage
Proficiency with HTML/RDBMS concepts and database programming"
Senior / Software Design Engineer,"Design and develop machine control software for automated semiconductor equipment.
Develop new process control software
Integrate software component or OEM equipment into a fully functional software system.
Demonstrate solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts and code comments.
Produce well organized, optimized, testable and efficient code for software released quality assurance.
Develop software solution by studying information needs, conferring with users, studying system flow, data usage and work process, investigating problem areas following the software development life cycle.
Determine operational feasibility by evaluating analysis, problem definition, requirements, solution development and propose sequencing and coding solutions.
Improve equipment performance by conducting system analysis, recommending changes in process/procedures.
Debug existing source codes and refine feature sets
Support on-site installation and field service upgrading works.
Tailor and deploy software tools and processes to resolve customer’s feedback, requirements or issues.
Skills and Qualification
• Minimum Degree in Mechatronics/Computer Science or Engineering.
• At least 3 years’ experience in programming on Windows (XP and above) environment.
• Proficiency with C++, VC++, MFC, SQL and OOP.
• Good knowledge in developing multi-threaded control software, equipment connectivity standard.
• Knowledge in designing GUI and familiarity with SEMI SECS/GEM, C# and WPF programming will be an added advantage.
• Strong analytical, troubleshooting and problem solving skills
• Strong general programming skills, software debugging and execute full lifecycle software development.
• Hardware experience in using Servo, Stepper Motion Controller, Analog Device and High Speed I/O.
• Excellent team player.
MIT Semiconductor Pte Ltd
Blk 5004, Ang Mo Kio Ave 5
#03-12 TECHPlace II
Singapore 569872
Visit us at www.mit.com.sg"
IoT Software Development Engineer,"We are looking for a candidate to be involved in the design, development and management of an IoT sensor platform for advanced Industry 4.0 applications in the water industry. This role requires full stack software development.
Job Scope:  
Determine user requirements in collaboration with product managers and engineers
Architect and develop frontend web applications and backend servers / database engines
System Administration duties such as monitoring, configuration, maintenance, troubleshooting, system recoveries, periodic updates and patches of servers
Requirements:
Diploma / Bachelor's Degree in computer science, engineering, or equivalent.
Experience in developing mobile and web applications, services, and APIs.
Experience in Cloud Architecture deployments in either AWS or Microsoft Azure
Experience in web technologies such as HTML, CSS, Nodejs etc.
Familiar with database technologies such as SQL and MongoDB.
Knowledge of IoT device management and the associated protocols."
Software Engineer - Java (Immediate Position),"We are expanding and we are looking for Java Software Engineers, who are passionate to deal with technical challenges and interested to work closely in a fast pace business environment. 
Key Responsibilities :
Consult with users, clients, and other technology groups on issues, recommend programming solutions and support customer systems 
Analyze applications to identify vulnerabilities and security issues, as well as conduct unit, integration, system and user acceptance testing/debugging 
Identify problems, analyze information, and make evaluative judgements to recommend and implement solutions 
Able to work individually or as part of local/global team to achieve on time delivery of projects 
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle - Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management 
throughout the development life cycle; completing programming using languages and software products; designing and conducting tests.
Able to demonstrate clear communication skills with proven ability to deliver innovative and realistic solutions to solve complex problems
Able to work independently and team player.
To analyze users' requirements; envisioning system features and functionalities
 Job Requirements
Must hold at least Diploma / Bachelor Degree in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or relevant.
Strong experience in Java and Spring Framework.
Agile/Scrum development experience.
Knowledge in developing RESTful APIs.
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting.
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD, CICD.
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets.
Technologies:
Java 8+ (must have)
Spring Framework (primarily Spring Boot)
Web UI Technologies such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript (React/Vue/Angular) - (Good to have)
SQL databases such as MySQL/Oracle/Microsoft SQL Server
CI/CD tools such as Git, Jenkins, Maven, Jira
Deployment tools such Kubernetes/Docker (optional)
Interest candidates, Please indicate on your CV/ Resume :
Your notice period.- Last drawn and expected salary This will enable us to process the application quickly. "
Software Developer,"Job Responsibilities:
Participate in requirements analysis.
Collaborate with development teams to develop software solutions using microservice architecture.
Design, build and maintain software applications and APIs for new and existing backend services.
Produce code following best practices and standard using .NET programming languages.
Test and deploy applications and systems.
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or related discipline.
Knowledge of at least one of the .NET languages (e.g. C#, Visual Basic .NET) and HTML5/CSS3.
Strong knowledge of SQL (MS-SQL / SQL Server).
Prior experience in developing software applications with ASP.Net, API and Microservices.
Understanding of Agile methodologies.
Experience in Cloud Platform & Services is a plus.
Knowledge of the healthcare industry will be an added advantage.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. "
"Software Developer - .Net, C# | Toa Payoh","We are representing our MNC client on the following role. 
Software Developer 
Responsibilities: 
Participate in requirements analysis 
Collaborate with development teams to develop web application and mobile solution using microservice architecture 
Design, build and maintain Web application and APIs for new and existing backend services 
Produce code following best practices and standard using .NET programming languages 
Test and deploy applications and systems 
Requirements: 
Degree in Computer Science/ Information Technology with proficiency in one of the .NET languages (e.g. C#, Visual Basic .NET) and HTML5/ CSS3 
Strong knowledge of SQL (MS-SQL / SQL Server) 
Experience in developing web applications (ASP.Net), API and Microservices 
Understanding of Agile methodologies 
Experience in Cloud Platform & Services is a plus 
EA Personnel Registration No: R1113411 "
Software Engineer,"Job Responsibilities
Involve in analysis, design, documentation, coding and testing of our applications
Performing unit and integration testing
Conducting functional and non-functional testing
Troubleshoots production problems related to software applications
Resolves problems with software and responds to suggestions for improvements and enhancements
Evaluating current applications to update or add new features
Ability to work independently on assigned tasks.
Assist with project plan time estimates and ensure development milestones are met
Performs any additional duties assigned by the immediate supervisor or senior management
 Job Requirements
Candidate must possess at least Diploma and above
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position
Required Skill(s): Well versed in ASP.Net (MVC), Knowledge in Microsoft SQL.
Ability to thrive in fast-paced environment"
Software Developer," Software Developers
Monday – Friday, 9am – 6.30pm 
Salary Range: Up $4200/month 
Location: Kim Yam Road (Fort Canning MRT) 
Job Descriptions: 
·    Develop existing software programs (Microsoft CRM)
·    Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
·    Design and configure application
·    Testing of applications before launch
·    Recommend improvements
·    Full scope from programming à Testing à Launching à Post support
Requirement:
·    Diploma or Degree in IT 
·    Programming language (C & Dot.NET)
Contact : 98254517 Or you may click 'Apply Now' 
Only shortlisted candidates will be informed
Gracelyn Teo Jia En | R21101213
RecruitFirst Pte Ltd | EA13C6342"
Software Engineer,"Job Description
Interface with end-customers to understand system needs.
Translate user requirements into software design.
Document write-up, including design manual, operation manual, test cases and software manual.
Design and develop secure applications, either standalone interfaces or serverside programming.
Work with team members for software development and integration and testing to meet delivery.
Debug and resolve technical issues to ensure application availability.
Continuous enhancements to better meet evolving requirements and changes.
Assist in executing post project support and implementation for the company.
Requirements
Degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Engineering, or related disciplines.
Experience in C/C++ and/or C# software development.
Good working knowledge experience in development tools.
Knowledge in networking, information security and standards is an added advantage.
Lab-based design and development environment with vendor liaison meetings & presentations, and site works.
Able to work with minimum supervision and work on any ad-hoc assignment tasks.
Good documentation practice and well version control on document updates.
Good communication skills, meticulous and organized.
Able to work well with tight deadlines.
A good team member."
Senior Software Developer/ Software Engineer (Up $7000) - JN3,"Job Summary:
Company background: Industrial equipment solutions
Salary range: up to S$7000 (dep on exp) + AWS
5 days, 8:30am- 5:45pm
Working Location: Jurong
Job Responsibilities:
Design, develop and maintain software for in-house designed parking system and /or automation solutions
To provide adhoc remedial repair service as required by customers
Meeting desired Service Level that is expected of from the customers/sites assigned
PC software/system development for parking system / automation solutions
Knowledge in SQL skills and management
Knowledge in coding skills such as C & Python
Strong knowledge and experience in Visual Basic (VB.NET), C#, and/or ASP.NET
Database knowledge such as MS Access, MSSQL
 Responsible for system design, support and recommend improvements and customization to conventional systems
System integrations
Product maintenance and customer services
Microcontroller firmware development
Study customer’s requirements implement new features for products improvement.
Support system and service works on site as required. Choose best approach based on available resources for system development
Brainstorming for ideas on creating or acquiring new resources
Analyze the system symptoms or performance of system and make appropriate recommendations or solutions
Implement or execute solutions to address feedbacks received
Applicants who possess relevant experience for the above responsibilities are most welcome to apply. If you do not possess the above experience, your application will still be considered on individual merits and you may be contacted for other opportunities.
Please submit your updated resume in MS Words format by using the APPLY NOW BUTTON
By submitting your personal data and/or resume, you give consent to collection, use and disclosure of your personal data and/or resume by the company (or its agent) for the purpose of the processing and administration by the company relating to this job application.
**We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.
Yeo Hui Wen (Joan)
Registration Number: R22108956
EA Licence No: 06C2859 (MCI Career Services Pte Ltd)"
Software Engineer,"Job Responsibilities:
Participate in designing solutions and develop end-to-end specifications for solution components.
Perform testing and implementation of the solution.
Participate in impact analysis of encountered issues.
Generate relevant documentations, reports etc.
Contribute to continuous improvement of software development best practices in the areas of coding tools, languages and APIs, as well as software design and development processes.
Participate UX activities such as:- Conduct user research/interviews; Develop user stories, storyboards to articulate current and future concepts; Create wireframes, detailed visual mock ups and interactive prototypes; Create style guides and digital assets for production.
Job Requirements:
Degree in Computing/ Computer Science/ Computer Engineering/ Info Systems / EEE or equivalent
Familiar to software development lifecycle processes.
Strong programming skills and verifiable mastery of at least one of the following languages: Java, JavaScript, Python, C#.
Proficiency in Web Technologies such as HTML, CSS.
Good team player with strong communication and interpersonal skills.
Good analytical and creative problem-solving skills
Interested applicants, please submit your updated resume in MS WORD format via Apply Now for immediate processing. Do include your availability, last drawn & expected salary.
**We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. Thank you.
Ashlynn | R21100397"
Software Engineer / Software Developer [C# | SQL],"• Immediate Position  
• Good Working Environment
• 5 Days Work Week
Interested applicants can send your resume and allow our Consultants to match you with our Clients. No Charges will be incurred by Candidates for any service rendered.
Requirements & Responsibiliti
Computer Science or related degree or equivalent experience
Experience with C#, SQL (React js will be a bonus)
Design, write and maintain high quality code
Able to multitask and take on many different areas of development
Able to work as part of a team
Good communication skills
Responsibilities:
Creating multi-tiered Web applications and Mobile App applications
Familiar with Agile Software Development / Scrum practices
Analyze, design, program, test, troubleshoot, document and maintain IT systems or applications
Perform and manage stages of the SDLC and involvement in systems review with Project Manager
Provide maintenance support to customers (internal and/or external)
Opportunity to involve in various technologies: Signal R, Redis, MongoDB, Reactive Extension (Rx)
Other adhoc duties as assigned
Please include the following in your Resume Document *
(*.DOC/PDF - Files should not exceed 2MB)
  • Name
  • Contact No.
  • Location/Address
  • Expected Salary"
Software Developer (Full Stack),"Title: Software Developer (Full Stack)
Responsibilities:
Contribute to the design of overall architecture of the web application.
Design and build REST APIs for microservices
Coding and review coding of peers
Document code and provide API documentation
Support post production deployment system monitoring
The ideal candidate:
Backend framework experience using Java (Spring Boot), NodeJs
Front end experience work using Javascript Frameworks; ReactJs is a must have
Proficient in details system and database design
Good experience in level 2 and 3 production support
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
Backend Developer/ Software Engineer,"Ubi | 5 Days | 9am - 6pm 
Salary up to $6,500 
Experience in .NET, HTML, CSS, backend development
Career Progression Opportunities
Interested applicants can send your resume to✉ supreme.cyred(gmail.com) and allow our Consultants to match you with our Clients. No Charges will be incurred by Candidates for any service rendered.
Job Description:
Develop and maintain a highly scalable and distributed IT system.
Write clear system documentation.
Maintain a close communication with experts and teams from around the world to discuss the - project feasibility, assist in product testing and to provide updates on project progress.
Regularly maintain and monitor software applications for error, health and performance improvement.
Provide production level support to fix urgent issues and bugs.
Research and suggest ideas to improve software application and process.
Requirement:
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Experienced in .NET Core framework preferably C# & web application technologies such as web api, HTML, CSS and etc & relational database and NOSQL database.
Able to write high performance code to handle very high concurrent requests & highly optimized SQL queries to handle very high database requests.
Knowledge in Kubernetes, Docker and microservices are an added advantage.
Eager to research new methodologies and technologies."
Software Engineer,"This role in our technology squad is embedded in a high caliber, cross functional team that develops and executes our exciting technology strategy to deliver better outcomes for our business and customer. 
As a senior software engineer, you will be working with an agile and innovative team and build on your technical expertise with a myriad of technologies, projects and platforms to deliver our business priorities and conquer technical challenges.  
Responsibilities:
Support the delivery of projects in all aspects of software development life cycle including system analysis, design, development, quality assurance, UAT, maintenance and ongoing support
Contribute to Agile software development lifecycle and be familiar with DevOps processes
Develop pragmatic and fit for purpose solutions of high technical quality
Work with stakeholders to define and clarify functional requirements and scope to deliver robust cost-effective solutions
Maintain software design, engineering processes and quality standards
Identifying and addressing bottlenecks in the application or broader infrastructure
Assist with adhoc duties assigned by manager
Requirements:
Minimally Diploma in Information Technology/Computer Science or related fields
At least 2 years’ experience in full stack software development
Good knowledge in .Net Core and Microservice
Required skills: C#, ASP.NET, Entities Framework, HTML, CSS, Javascript, MSSQL, Github.
Knowledge in DEVOPS, Kubernetes, Docker Container, Cloud Implementation, Secured Webservice will have an added advantage
Highly collaborative team player, detail-oriented and passionate with technology
Ability to thrive in fast-paced, exciting environment
We regret that shortlisted applicants will be notified for a virtual interview.
For more information about company, please visit https://www.alliancehealthcare.com.sg/"
Software Developer JO-230103-301357,"Our Client:
Our client is a leading global quantitative trading company based in Chicago, Austin & Amsterdam. The business develops and implements quantitative trading strategies in exchange-traded financial products, trading exclusively for its own account. The company trades in a variety of asset classes, markets, and geographies.
As a software developer, you will design, engineer, and implement the Firm's trading software in the C++ programming language. You will work in close collaboration with the research, systems, and operations teams to architect, implement and analyze new automated electronic trading algorithms. You will play a key role in designing and constructing the Firm's software infrastructure to support new and existing lines of business. In addition, you will expand the Firm's proprietary research platform to improve performance and support new exchanges, products, and functionality.
The Responsibilities:
Developing and maintaining a large-scale 24-hour automated trading system
Solving technical problems and implementing solutions
Leverage existing infrastructure, extending functionality when necessary
Build a deep understanding of exchange behavior to integrate into the existing trading system
Design, implement and maintain distributed storage system with various performance and reliability requirements
Address performance limitations within own business software, open-source libraries and application
Investigate new technologies to improve stability, scalability, and performance
Implement new trading strategies in collaboration with research and operations teams
Investigate signal issues for trading system
Reconcile differences between trading strategies performance in simulation versus production
Optimize the performance of the live trading system and existing code using lock-free data structures, compiler intrinsic, etc.
The Requirements:
Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
Experience with C++/Java
At least 3 years of experience in the trading industry
Well-versed in the fundamentals of software engineering
Committed to designing and implementing fully automated, scalable, and maintainable solutions with extensive testing
Strong problem solving and communication skills
Experience using Linux operating system
Experience in software analysis for bug fixing and development
What's on Offer:
Competitive salary and benefit package
Working for one of the globally acknowledged company within the industry. A truly established and global leader in the industry
Available avenues to contributes positively for the organization to grow and being recognized for it
Disclaimer: The Company complies with the Tripartite Guidelines on Fair Employment Practices (TGFEP), including the prevailing guidelines on recruitment. All qualified applicants will be considered for the position regardless of their age, race, religion, nationality, marital status, or family responsibilities. A more detailed discussion of the TGFEP is available on the Tripartite Alliance for Fair and Progressive Employment Practices (TAFEP) website at https://www.tal.sg/tafep"
Senior Software Developer ( .Net/ Sitecore/ Sitefinity/ Web Projects ),"√ Industry: Web Solutions
√ Location: Near Kaki Bukit MRT
√ Working Hours: Monday – Friday, Office Hour
√ Basic salary + AWS + Project bonus + AVC
Responsibilities:
Build solutions with emphasis in Microsoft technology-centric solutions (.NET Framework, particularly C#)
Programming Structured Query Language (SQL)
Work closely with Project Managers and Technical Consultants to understand and manage expectations
Participate in the implementation and test effort
Provide business application support which includes new enhancement deployment, conducting end user testing, and bug fixing.
Strong candidates will be able to progress to senior developer, and team lead roles
Job Requirement:
A strong background and interest for Web.
Degree, Diploma, Higher NITEC, NITEC or A/O Level qualifications or equivalent, in Digital Media, Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields
Working knowledge in .NET Framework: ASP.NET, C#
Familiar with Object Oriented Application Design, AJAX
Database skills required: Microsoft SQL Server
Experience in CMS software (e.g DNN Evoq, Sitefinity, Sitecore) will be a plus
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Self-motivated, driven & possess strong initiative
JOBID: X95498Y
All Successful candidates can expect a very competitive remuneration package and a comprehensive range of benefits.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified
People Profilers Pte Ltd
EA Licence Number: 02C4944
Tel: 6950 9755
EA Registration Number: R1872533
EA Personnel: Lim Jing Yee, Lena"
Software Engineer," Responsibilities:
Provide SAP Techno-functional Support in FI/CO or SD/MM/PM modules.
Involve in analysis, design, coding / configuration and testing of SAP System.
Work with business users to understand their business requirements
Develop interfaces between SAP with external systems.
Requirements:
Degree/Diploma in Computer Science / Information Technology or equivalent.
1 – 2 years of working experience in ABAP.
Good interpersonal, analytical and problem-solving skills."
Senior Software Developer (C# .NET) (Up to 5500 + AWS + VB) ID: 569467,"Responsibilities:
Developing applications
Maintaining existing system and modules
Requirements:
Diploma in Information Technology and above
At least 6 years of relevant working experience
Experience in MS SQL, MY SQL server, Visual Studio, DotNet framework, C#, ASP.Net, Windows Communication Foundation (Webservice), Visual Source Safe / Team Foundation Server, Java Script, Crystal Report 8/10, SQL Reporting Services and MVC etc 
Possess development skills in client / server or web-based applications
Added advantage for those experienced or have knowledge in web designing (GUI designing) and CMS
Interested candidates, who wish to apply for the advertised position, please submit the job application with an updated copy of your resume.
EA Licence No: 01C4394 
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Job Code: WEIT
By sending us your personal data and curriculum vitae (CV), you are deemed to consent to PERSOLKELLY Singapore Pte Ltd and overseas subsidiaries and affiliates collecting, using, and disclosing your personal data to prospective employers/companies based in any country for purposes of evaluating suitability for employment, conducting reference checks, administering employment related services and such other purposes stated in our privacy policy. Our full privacy policy is available at www.persolkelly.com.sg. If you wish to withdraw your consent, please drop us an email to let us know. Please feel free to contact us if you have any queries."
Software Engineer (Angular),"Job Description
We are seeking a Software Developer with experience and good communication skills. The role will combine elements of design, development, implementation and support, as part of a agile team.
Job Requirements
5+ years of relevant programming experience
TypeScript, JavaScript and Angular
Experience working closely with Designers and Engineers
Experience developing reusable, scalable UI components
Strong problem-solving skills
Good knowledge of styling (SCSS, CSS-in-JS, flexbox, grid etc.)
Unit, integration, and end-to-end testing
Familiarity with usability testing
Experience following industry standard best practices when building UI, including accessibility, internationalization, performance optimization, caching, cross-browser considerations, responsive web design etc."
Senior Software Engineer,"The Eutech Group
Eutech Cybernetic is a wholly owned subsidiary of the Eutech Group that develops & implements proprietary software solutions for workplace management, asset & facility management, airports, smart buildings, smart cities & hospital management.
We’ve been building & powering smart hospital systems for the past 30 years. Our systems are designed to be smarter, simpler & more efficient.
What we do
We've been building software for hospitals, clinics, smart buildings, and cities for over three decades. Our products power pharmacies, A&Es, clinics and talk to 100s of different kinds of devices and equipment from extra low voltage devices to IP Camera systems to IoT devices to large-scale fire alarm and chiller systems. We're headquartered in Singapore but have offices all over Asia and in more.
The Job
Supporting existing and new issues identified by customers or internal test teams, & working with the team to resolve them
Guiding workflow design, completing advanced build & unit and integration testing of the system
Take advanced issues that arise during complex tasks related to system configuration, testing & administration.
You will also have the opportunity to develop new processes for the system
The Person
The candidate should be a Singapore citizen
Minimum of 4+ years of experience building web applications using ASP.NET MVC and .NET platform.
Good knowledge and experience in Microsoft .NET/.NET Core, C#, ASP.NET/ASP.NET Core, MVC.
Should have strong UI development skills using HTML, CSS/JavaScript frameworks, TypeScript a plus.
Proficient with Oracle / SQL Server (or comparable relational database) development, including database/schema design and performance tuning and of Oracle database administration
Experience in architecting and designing web applications and services.
Good understanding of IIS configuration.
Self-motivated individuals who are able to work independently and in a team environment.
Critical thinking and willingness to see things in an open-minded way and examine an idea or concept from as many angles as possible.
Seeking, examining logically and interpreting data from different sources to determine the cause of the problem and develop a cause of action."
Software Developer,"Our client a global asset management firm, that invests in multiple asset classes and strategies worldwide. Resting on more than a quarter-century of investing experience.
 Your Key Responsibilities includes:
Building of tools on a next generation technology platform to facilitate rapid understanding of performance and risk for portfolio managers, senior management, risk managers and analysts.
Develop quantitative understanding of risk to anticipate the requirements for the team.
Solve complex and challenging problems through the application of creative and unique solutions using the latest technology.
 Requirements:
Experience in technologies including C#, Python, NodeJS/React and SQL
Minimum 2 - 4 years of experience as a Software Developer in the HFT / Quantitative industry
Alternatively, you may call +65 9004 5401 for a quick discussion.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.
Chan Chin How, Javier
Associate Consultant
Reg. No: R1989608
Stellar- Link Partners Pte Ltd (EA License: 21S0698)"
Software Engineer,"D’Crypt is a high-value design and development house. We work with our customers to deliver state-of-the-art cryptographic technology and components that become an integral part of our customer's information security appliances, systems, and applications.
We have openings for Software Engineers to join our highly talented R&D team. The candidate will work on software and firmware development for security products in D’Crypt.
Responsibilities
Responsible for the conceptualization, architecture, design, development, test, and qualification of real-time, embedded systems
Interact with internal and external stakeholders to understand the needs and formulate these requirements into technical specification and design
Participate in the testing of software at the modular level and as an entire system
Develop user manuals and technical documentation 
Requirements
Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Computer Engineering or any related discipline
Keen interest in software/firmware development in embedded systems
Highly skilled in C programming. Skills in other programming languages will be considered favorably
Good understanding of software/hardware interface requirements
Familiarity using Linux for software development
Familiarity with software life cycle development methodologies and secure coding principles
Knowledge of the following will be advantageous
- network protocols, network switching/routing, network segmentation
- electronics hardware
- processor architecture
- assembly language
- Operating systems
- Linux Driver development
A team player with strong problem solving skills to accomplish tasks
Self-starter, systematic, analytical and able to initiate changes and improvements
Good written, verbal communication skills in English"
Software Engineer,"xSQUARE is a pioneer in intelligent warehouse automation solutions. We are providing intelligent solutions for interoperability and optimization, allowing warehouse operators to overcome the challenges in automation through advanced robotics and AI algorithms. As part of the software development team, you will be working in areas like orchestration, fleet management, task execution and optimization and many more challenging and exciting features.
Job Requirements:
Minimum Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Technology, or equivalent practical experience.
Knowledge in C/C++ and Python
Operations Research
Experience in optimization mathematics such as linear programming and nonlinear optimization
Experience with optimization problems, e.g. Vehicle Routing Problem
Highly motivated and creative, thinking “out of the box”
Strong team mentality, interpersonal and communications skills
Optional Knowledge:
Experience with libraries like Google OR-tools, CPLEX, Local Solver
Experience in multi-agent systems development
Experience in high-loaded client-server applications development"
"Software Engineer / Java Developer ( MNC , Semiconductor , JAVA ) - URGENT HIRING!!!","Responsibilities:
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Responsible for documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate, and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error or cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirements:
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent fields with minimum 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions would be considered
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is an added advantage
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd      
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Jia Cheng
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110254"
Software Developer (Java) J39802,"Software development opportunity using Java technologies on several projects such as payment gateway, microservices, Fintech application, etc:
Salary package up to $7,500 + AWS + VB
Developing back-end services Java application with latest technologies 
5 days work week & encouraging work life balance (Allow to work from home in Singapore)
Supportive colleague with monthly team bonding activities
Working location: Central (5 mins walking distance from MRT station) 
Responsibilities:
Develop, test, deploy and maintain software applications & systems integrations using Java technologies
Collaborate with other software engineers, business analyst and software architects to plan, design, develop, test & maintain business application
Deploy systems to production & provide post-implementation support
Write high-quality, clean & maintainable code using engineering best practices
Collaborate with cross functional team in development process under Agile environment
Requirements:
min. Degree in Computer Science or any relevant discipline
min. 3 years working experience in software development using Java programming
Familiar with Spring Framework, J2EE, JSP, SOAP, etc
If you are interest in this opportunity, submit your application now to spvn(at)scientecpersonnel.com by indicating Job ID J39802 to fasten the process.
Ng Kee Hung (Vickus) - R2091423
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd – 11C5781"
Software Engineer (Angular/Flutter),"Job Description
We are seeking a Software Developer with experience and good communication skills. The role will combine elements of design, development, implementation and support, as part of a agile team.
Job Requirements
4+ years of relevant programming experience
Flutter, TypeScript, JavaScript and Angular
Experience working closely with Designers and Engineers
Experience developing reusable, scalable UI components
Strong problem-solving skills
Good knowledge of styling (SCSS, CSS-in-JS, flexbox, grid etc.)
Unit, integration, and end-to-end testing
Familiarity with usability testing
Experience following industry standard best practices when building UI, including accessibility, internationalization, performance optimization, caching, cross-browser considerations, responsive web design etc."
Software Maintenance Engineer,"Role Responsibilities:
·       Provide a detailed level of technical assistance to the customers
·       Support customers by responding within the designated SLA
·       Investigate and troubleshoot issues, developing solutions for customers while understanding their needs
·       Perform impact analysis and coordinate implementation
·       Monitor and improve the system
·       Carry out routine maintenance work
·       Proactively update customers on the work progress to ensure the expectations are met
·       Enhance applications based on customer request or by identifying opportunities for improvement, making recommendations, designing, and implementing systems
Education and Experience:
·       Bachelor’s degree or higher in Computer Science/ Information Technology/ Engineering
·       Minimum of 3 years of experience in software programming languages including React.js and Node.js
·       Experience in various Operating Systems such as Windows, Linux, and Ubuntu
·       Experience in AWS platform and Docker Engineer is added advantage
·       Knowledge in databases such as MS SQL
·       Ability to manage and grow existing customer relationships by delivering high-quality support
·       Solid software engineering experience
·       Advanced troubleshooting and debugging skills, with a passion for problem solving and investigation
·       Able to support 24x7 within team rotation arrangement will be added advantage"
Software Engineer (ReactJS.Net/ C#/ Xamarin),"Responsibilities:
Execute full software development life cycle (SDLC)
Produce specifications and determine operational feasibility
Develop software verification plans and follow quality assurance procedures
Assist with troubleshooting, debugging and upgrading of existing systems
Requirements
Diploma in Computer Science/ Information Technology/ Information System
Minimum 1 year of related working experience in designing & development of cross platform applications or systems software
Candidates with knowledge in C#, C++, VB.net ASP.net, HTML, Microsoft SQL, Xamarin and ReactJS.net is an advantage
Requires strong software troubleshooting and problem analytic skill
We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. Thank you.
Ong Xue Lian, Evangeline (R1326988)
We Got This Pte Ltd
Lic No: 18C9521"
Software Programmer (C++/ Visual C#/ Beckhoff TwinCAT),"Job Responsibilities:
Involve in design and development of software programs for full line automation systems from concept to on-site installation.
Handle machine setups and troubleshooting.
Provide field support of automation machines.
Any other adhoc tasks as assigned by supervisors
Job Requirements:
Minimum a Diploma or Degree in Electrical/Electronics/Mechatronics Engineering or equivalent
At least 1 year of relevant experience in machine control software design and development.
Proficient in Visual C#/C++ programming.
Knowledge of Beckhoff TwinCAT programming, Computer Vision and Image Processing or SECS/GEM will be an added advantage.
Good experience in working with PLC types such as AB, Omron and Beckhoff.
We regret to inform you that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. Thank you.
Ong Xue Lian, Evangeline (R1326988)
We Got This Pte Ltd
Lic No: 18C9251"
Full stack developer,"Title: Full stack developer
Responsibilities:
Strong development skills in C# dotnet core, MVC patterns, Web API frameworks.
Good experience using databases (MS SQL/Oracle)
Proficient in developing Python scripts
Conduct debugging, source code management, source code scanning and penetration vulnerability resolution
The ideal candidate:
Strong technical with hands on frontend technology implementation experience
Proficient details system and database design
Solid hands-on coding skill and vast experience in C# dotnet core, ASP.NET, VB.NET and Restful API
Good experience in level 2 and 3 production support
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
Software Engineer ( Techops ),"Industry: Manufacturing/ Production
Location: West
Working Hours: Monday - Friday, Office Hour
Basic Salary + AWS + VB
Responsibilities:
·        Serve as a “trusted advisor,” and the primary point of contact to business line executives and managers for the business initiative assigned
·        Technology Champion and SPOC for all technology related requirements for the assigned functional initiative or project
·        Identify, screen, and evaluate new solution opportunities to address unmet (internal and external) customer needs
·        Responsible for developing and building sustainable and secure IT solutions
Install and configure solutions, implement reusable components, translate technical requirements, assist with all stages of test data, develop interface stubs and simulators and perform script maintenance and updates):
§ Update processes and design new processes as needed;
§ Deploy updates as required while implementing integrations when they arise;
§ Automate operational processes as needed, with accuracy and in compliance with security requirements;
§ Specifying, documenting, and developing new product features, and writing automating scripts;
§ Establish TechOps team best practices;
§ Manage code deployments, fixes, updates, and related processes;
§ Work with open-source technologies as needed.
Deploy new modules and upgrades and complete fixes within the production environment
Routine application maintenance tasks are an ongoing responsibility until it is “Operationalized”:
§ Develop and maintain procedures for carrying out routine maintenance
·        End-to-End responsibility for new technology introduction and development
Idea to execution, Proof of Value, Business-case & TCO analysis and justification
Perform business analysis and prepare recommendations and business plans as needed
Create and analyze relevant information and develop recommendations that they present to senior management
Job Requirements:
·        Degree in Information Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or equivalent
·        At least 5 years of relevant working experience in Front-End and Back-end Web Development
·        Must have skills:
§ Microsoft PowerApps
§ JavaScript, TypeScript
§ React.JS
§ MobX, Redux
§ .NET / C#
§ Basic Linux and Docker
·        Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate information with attention to detail and accuracy
·        Possess strong business and commercial acumen
·        Good interpersonal, communication, and presentation skills
·        Good analytical, problem-solving, and solution-building skills
·        Strong aptitude to learn and become adept in new programming languages
·        Proactive and anticipatory in thinking, with Solution Mindset
All Successful candidates can expect a very competitive remuneration package and a comprehensive range of benefits.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified
EA Personnel: Lim Jing Yee, Lena
EA Registration No.: R1872533
People Profilers Pte Ltd
50 Raffles Place, #19-12, Singapore Land Tower, Singapore 048623
EA Licence Number: 02C4944
Tel: 6950 9755
JOBID: L93Y9W56"
Software Developer [5 days],"Highlight:
Basic up to $10000
5-days
Job Scope:
Involve in full software development life cycle
Development of new features and capabilities in existing code base
Troubleshooting and performing root cause analysis for correction of software errors
Design, build and maintain efficient codes
Provide Technical support to Project Teams and Customers.
Job Requirement:
Diploma/Degree in computer science/software engineering or equivalent
Proven development skills in C++ or any other programming languages
Experience with Google OR-tools, CPLEX, Local Solver is an added advantage
Please submit your updated resume in MS word format by using the APPLY NOW BUTTON.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Staffking Pte Ltd (20C0358) | Teo Yong Han (R22110013)"
C# Programmer,"Considerable development experience in C# is a must;
Proficient in WinForms, WebApi, ASP.Net Core, MySQL, JavaScrip, CSS and other Software App;
Prior hands-on practical experience in Web Crawler will be advantageous;
Autonomous, self-motivated, independent contributor, and excellent team player;
Possess a Diploma or Degree in Computing/ IT
With Work Experience of more than 2 to 5 years in the same line of work scope/ industry
Proficient communication skills in Mandarin. Must be able to speak, write, and read reports in the Simplified Chinese language in order to liaise with mandarin-speaking customers and counterparts.
Singaporean only.
We will contact you via email if you have been shortlisted for the role. Please check your emails and make a habit of checking your spam folder."
Process and Software Engineer,"Job Responsibilities:
Contribute to the development of functional strategy.
Assist Management in defining application roadmap.
Develop models and structure changes needed to meet the evolving application strategies.
Align application architecture priorities with longer term roadmaps for the technology landscape.
Advise the creation of security standards from application development perspective.
Support the evaluation and introduction of new technologies, platforms, products or vendors.
Perform user acceptance and system integration testing for quality assurance.
Provide operational support and ongoing maintenance and enhancement after implementation.
Determine user requirements based on business needs.
Identify alternatives where multiple solutions to requirements exist.
Oversee the preparation of design specifications.
Prepare project and other relevant documentation.
Perform assessment, software integration and software verification and validation on product to ensure that the software functions meet user need.
Oversee the integration of applications with back-end services.
Maintain proper documentation and communication with internal and external stakeholders.
Ensure that application meets user requirements.
Review application performance to identify improvement opportunities.
Provide recommendations to improve application services.
Any other ad-hoc duties assigned by the manager.
Job Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering or equivalent.
Candidates with relevant software development experience and programming certifications are preferred (e.g. C#, ASP.NET, .NET Core, REACT, Entities Framework, Flutter, HTML, CSS, Javascript, MSSQL, MongoDB, Github, DEVOPS, Kubernetes, Microservice, Docker Container, Cloud Implementation, Secured API Webservice).
At least 3 years in software development experiences in full stack application development.
Experience in OWASP top 10 secure coding will be advantageous.
Experience in Programming, MS Windows environment & application support.
Experience in Artificial Intelligence projects.
Experience in healthcare industry will be advantageous.
Strong analytical skills, ability to work independently, and team player.
Demonstrates strong interpersonal skills. Able to work with different groups and levels of stakeholders.
Good communication and negotiation skills.
An eye for detail and a high level of initiative.
Service oriented and customer focused.
Able to multi-task, work under tight deadlines and meet deliverables."
Software Engineer," Job Designation: Software Engineer
Job Responsibilities:
Analyze, design, develop/code and carry out testing of web and mobile applications
Support and maintain cloud based web server, websites and applications.
Carry out system and user documentation
Work with the rest of the team to resolve any technical issues and bugs
·        Do R&D to keep abreast with new technologies
Job Requirements:
Degree in computer related studies
Technically competent in PHP, HTML5, CSS, Javascript, Node.js, Pixi.js, Angular and Python
Good working knowledge of Ubuntu, Apache web server and Mysql
Practical knowledge of Agile Practices, WordPress, 2D games development and AI would be advantageous
Experience in developing the frontend to backend of both mobile and web applications
Team player with good analytical skill and communication skills
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Full Stack Developer (Agile),"Be part of an Agile team to carry out full-stack development to deliver and maintain large-scale enterprise web application systems.
Work with customers in user story elaboration and effort estimation.
Implement microservices with container related technologies (e.g. Docker, Kubernetes).
Develop automated unit tests.
Assist to set up continuous integration and continuous delivery (CI/CD) automation.
Pre-requisites:
At lest 3-5 years experience in Java Programming.
A proven track record of successful project/product implementation with minimal of 2 years of experience in agile projects or completion of at least 1 Agile Cycle.
Strong proficiency in Java programming language.
Proficiency in one or more frontend framework (HTML5 / Angular / React).
Experience developing on both web and cloud platforms 
Toppan Ecquaria is an equal opportunity employer and values diversity within our company. We welcome all interested candidates to apply for this position, however, we regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted by us for an interview. 
Find us at www.topppanecquaria.com or www.linkedin.com/company/toppan-ecquaria
For more career opportunities, please visit our career site at:- https://toppanecquaria.com/careers/job-openings?utm_source=Jobstreet&utm_medium=Page&utm_campaign=2020
(Please copy & paste the above link onto your browser)"
Application Software Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Perform customer requirements gathering and Concept of Operation analysis to craft the software architecture & design
Document software design and development
Lead team of software developers to perform Software System integration and validation
Perform validation and verification of Software System on-site
Design and architect software components for product and services
Performs Software System setup and product demonstration to customers
Responsible for software development life cycle and support to production
Requirements:
BEng/Msc in Electrical/Electronics/Computer Engineering/Science
Proficiency in C and C++ programming languages is required
Knowledge of QML, QT, ROS and LAMP of WAMP stack is preferred
Strong understanding of electrical and electronics circuit diagrams
Knowledge of implementing Nvidia’s Deepstream SDK and Multimedia API into ARM and x86 platforms is added advantage
Excellent knowledge of IP protocols and hardware interfaces
Experience in hands-on development and troubleshooting Systems-of-Systems
Experience in configuring and optimising Operating Systems (Windows and Linux) as Kiosks
Candidates with at least 2 years of experience and in leading development team will be considered for senior position
Entry level candidates with relevant experience and interest are welcome to apply"
.Net Software Developer,"Responsibilities:
Develops and designs new software products
Maintains and supports existing software products
Performs technical edits of documentation
Maintains high quality standards while still developing software on schedule
Provides expertise on specific technical areas
Requirements:
Diploma or Degree in Computer Science and Information Technology or equivalent
Excellent knowledge and experience in web-based application development.
Excellent knowledge and experience in Microsoft .Net (asp.net and C#), Microsoft SQL, Crystal Reports.
Familiarity with SQL Server Reporting Services is highly regarded
Experience reading and translating specifications and technical documents
Ability to meet multiple deadlines and adapt to changing priorities.
Interested candidates please click on APPLY button.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Full Stack .NET Consultant,"Strengthen your skills with our dynamic team. Join us and Experience Excellence with Fusionex.
Responsibilities :
To be involved in designing, coding, testing and deployment of modern applications/software based on business and technical requirements.
Assist in application architecture design and technical solutions, and make relevant recommendations to the project team/clients.
Produce project estimates and attend client meetings.
Ensure timely completion of assigned deliverables.
Work closely with Project Managers and other members of the project team.
Opportunity to lead and manage project team members in full software development life cycle.
Requirements:
Advance Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Professional Degree, Master's Degree in IT/Computer Science/Computer engineering/Information System or any IT related fields.
Solid hands-on working experience using Microsoft technologies, which include the .NET Framework, C#/VB.NET, ASP.NET/Angular/NodeJS, SQL Server, Web Services and XML.
Familiar with HTML, CSS and JQuery.
Experience in OO Programming, 3-tier development and SQL are preferred.
Passionate about technology and enjoys software development, mobile development riding on the latest Microsoft technologies.
Able to work with minimal supervision and provide regular updates on tasks assigned.
Good English communication skills in both verbal and written.
Priority will be given for Singaporean. 
Entry Level are encouraged to apply.
Added advantage:
Able to start work immediately.
Willing to work on overseas projects.
Although we'd love to get to know all you unique talents out there, we are still bound by the laws of time- we shall be in contact with those who are shortlisted. If you do not hear from us, do keep in touch and watch this space for the next opportunity with us."
"React, Lead Full Stack Software Engineer","Responsibilities
·        Developing and implementing web apps and cross-platform mobile apps with emphasis on ReactJs,React Native, nodeJS, and noSQL
·        Lead & assist in providing technical guidance and architecture solutions to the team
·        Conducting system testing to ensure applications conform to user requirements
·        Provide ongoing maintenance, support and enhancements in existing systems and platforms.
·        Working closely with e-business team members, designers, and vendors to meet business requirements & transpose user needs into technical programming
·        Provide standard, best practices and architecture recommendation
·        Supporting the operations team for potential post-implementation issues
Requirements
·        Degree in Computer Science, Software engineering or similar disciplines
·        At least 5 years of working experience in managing medium to large scale internet or cross-platform mobile app facing application project from beginning to end, with skills in requirement study and functional/detail design, QA, testing, and software change/version control management is advantageous preferably in retail or ecommerce environments
·        Strong communication to collaborate with stakeholders in all levels – (business, product, design, and development)
·        Extensive knowledge in one of the following frameworks, and its related libraries
React Native
React.js
Node.js
·        Strong understanding in Web Fundamental, HTML, CSS
·        Proficient in JavaScript , object-oriented programming (OOP), modern web application architecture
·        Experience in cloud computing, especially AWS will be an added advantage
·        Experience in E-Commerce, retail, customer facing apps will be an added advantage
·        Knowledge of APIs and services using REST
·        Excellent command in speaking and writing in English (fluent in speaking and writing in Chinese is an added advantage in order to liaise/handle Chinese speaking associate/documentation)
·        Passionate about learning
·        Possess a good and positive attitude"
Full stack Developer,"Title: Full stack Javascript Developer
Responsibilities:
Develop and enhancing existing and new implementations and projects
Strong and adequate understanding frontend UX behaviour in order to design and implement corresponding API to support business processes
Work in an Agile environment using Scrum
Conduct debugging, source code management, source code scanning and penetration vulnerability resolution
The ideal candidate:
Experience working with HTML, CSS and Javascript
Proficient in details system and database design
Good knowledge in developing and integrating services using AJAX, RESTful APIs
Good experience in level 2 and 3 production support
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
Senior Application Developer (PHP MVC),"We are looking for an experienced PHP Full Stack Application Developer with minimum 5 years of solid experience in web application development using PHP MVC framework technologies. It is a great opportunity to join a multi-cultural team in the fast-growing Largest Real Estate Company.
Responsibilities:
Critically analyze business needs and translate into fully functional system.
Develop scalable, secured and high-performance web application systems.
Leverage on new technologies to create a seamless experience for our users.
Provide technical support on issues that emerge from time to time.
Involve in both front end and backend development.
Write complex stored procedures and SQL queries.
Involve in unit-testing, deployment and migration.
Write Restful APIs and integrate with various systems.
Create innovative solutions to meet our company’s technical needs.
Modernise the way digital applications and services are developed, deployed and maintained.
Perform other related duties as assigned.
Requirements:
Degree in Information Systems, Computer Science or equivalent.
Minimum 5 years of working experience in PHP full stack development using CodeIgniter or Laravel.
Good knowledge and experience in web application architecture.
Experience in MSSQL database and TSQL, good working knowledge of relational database.
Familiar with object-oriented programming concept and MVC designs
Good knowledge in JavaScript, jQuery, HTML, CSS and responsive design.
Experience with Web API, security and versioning.
High level of SQL scripting skill is mandatory for this role.
Excellent problem solving and logical thinking skills.
High commitment and ability to work under a fast-paced work environment.
Ability to start within short notice would be highly advantageous.
Other Information
Working Location: Toa Payoh
Five (5) day work week, Monday and Friday : 9.00am to 6.00pm
Job Benefits
Great Career Progression
Annual Leave up to 21 days
Extra 3 days of Festive Leave
Birthday Leave and Birthday voucher
Flexi Benefit & Insurance Benefit
Overseas Staff Outing
Work From Home Entitlement – 12 days per year
Interested candidates who are physically present in Singapore to attend interview are invited to submit a comprehensive resume, stating the current and expected salary, date of availability via APPLY NOW button.
We regret that only shortlisted applicants will be notified."
Full Stack Developer,"Title: Full Stack Developer (Java)
My client is looking to add to their team of java developers. If you are keen on a career where you can create a real impact, click on the link below to apply now!
Responsibilities:
Assist team leader to produce detail system design and documentation
Strong and adequate understanding frontend UX behaviour
Oversee and manage project task assigned by team leader
Conduct debugging, source code management, source code scanning
Post production deployment system monitoring
The ideal candidate:
Creating Web and Mobile applications
Proficient in Agile Software Development / Scrum practices
Have managed all stages of the SDLC and conduct systems review
Good experience in level 2 and 3 production support
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
Software Engineer (.NET),"The role is primarily in development and application support for our software product and systems. You will be responsible for the application platforms, 3rd party data integration, data API, backend systems or working with monitoring tools and infrastructure.
The Software Engineer should be formally in development or application support team, and highly familiar in the project methodologies. You will be exposed to advanced technologies such as Video Analytics, Artificial Intelligence and Robot Technologies etc
Responsibilities:
Engage in the development, application support testing and implementation of new systems, change request and solutions;
Work with software architect to understand the overall technical architecture and how each feature is implemented. To design, develop, and implement secure, reliable and efficient enterprise web applications
Perform design, implementation and maintenance of single product modules/sub-systems or on lower level issues of multiple products;
Responsible for executing defined processes and solutions, such as compliance to escalation procedures and customer support processes;
Retrofit code fixes for base issues into customer environment;
Utilize creative problem-solving skills to assist in technical troubleshooting and analysis for customer reported issues;
Work effectively in an Agile environment;
Establishes technical proficiency in design, implementation and unit testing.
Requirements:
Having knowledge of .Net Core technologies, SQL server, tracing and understanding of the logs;
A strong understanding of web fundamentals, including HTML/CCS
Experience with web programming and scripting languages, including JavaScript, ReactJS, Java etc
Must be hands-on and enjoys programming
Solid experience with DevOps skills such as CI/CD, Docker, Kubernetes etc
Good to have experience in IOS/ Android Kotlin Mobile Development
A broad technical curiosity and proven technical understanding;
Database/datastore experience: RDBMS (e,g., SQL Server, MySQL, Postgresql), cache store (e.g., redis, memcached)
Microservice Architecture
Experience working on the Cloud
AWS stack: rds, sns/sqs, redis/memcached, ec2, codebuild
Familiar with performance tuning of Web Server, Massive concurrency handling and caching mechanism
Knowledge of H264/H265 & MPEG4 video standards;
Ability to work independently and as a team member;
Must have experience with .NET, C# programming, Angular 4+, ASP.Net Core, MVC, Web API, Entity Framework, JQuery, CSS/CSS3, GIT.
Diploma/Bachelor’s degree in computer science or relevant field."
"Junior Application Developer (Sharepoint and .NET) ,Up to $4.500, Perm","The Company
Our client is a fast-growing IT Solutions Provider offering various digital technology services to clients across all sectors. Due to high demand in the market, they are looking for experienced and self-motivated web developer to join their team. The right candidate will be able to participate in wide range of digital projects in various industries
The Role
Develop, design, code, modify, and evaluate Microsoft.NET and SharePoint solutions in support of the Client's strategic objectives
Devises logic and technical procedures
Performs coding and tests / debugs applications and programs
Develops conversion and system implementation plans
Prepares and obtains approval of system and programming documentation
Performs Full Systems Life Cycle, (plan, design, develop, test, implement, and maintain effectively
Your Profile
At least 4+ years of experience in .NET web application development
At least 3 years’ experience in SharePoint Online & Migration tools
Experience using .NET framework 4.5+, Visual studio 2013 and above
Experience in developing ASP.NET applications
Proficient knowledge in MSSQL
Apply Today
To apply online please click the 'Apply' button below with your resume in word format. Please note that only short-listed candidates will be contacted.
Pathos Consultancy Pte. Ltd. | Co. Registration No.: 202220795D | EA License No.: 22C1271 | Audrey Teo Wei Shan |  EA Registration No.: R21101086."
Full Stack Developer,"Title: Full Stack Developer (.NET, ReactJS)
My client is in the manufacturing industry. If you are keen on a career in this industry where you can create a real impact, click on the link below to apply now!
Responsibilities:
Work with various stakeholder such as project leads, developers and operations. 
Provide software support and maintenance for deployed products.
Liaise closely with project management and experience design team for project delivery success 
Conduct debugging, source code management, penetration vulnerability resolution
Support post production deployment system monitoring
The ideal candidate:
Good hands-on experience on C#, .Net
Experience in details system and database design
Good knowledge of languages such as Java or NodeJS
Good experience in level 2 and 3 production support
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
Full Stack Developer,"Who we are:
Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success, we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail and supply chain.
We are currently looking to hire Full Stack Developer who has proven track record in IT Industry. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Job Description
• Design, develop, implement, and maintain end-to-end enterprise web applications.
• Conduct software analysis, programming, testing, and code debugging, as well as assists in identifying and resolving product problems.
• Proficient in MERN stack at building microservices and REST APIs for applications.
• Perform unit and system testing of application code, as well as resolve issues to meet customer functional and non-functional requirements.
Requirements
• At least 3 years of experience in full stack development for enterprise applications.
• Hands-on in JavaScript, and proficient in at least NodeJS, ReactJS, ExpressJS frameworks.
• Be able to write clean and maintainable code, as well as comfortable in debugging/resolving complex problems.
• Able to understand integration with heterogeneous systems/applications
• Understand Agile methodology and DevSecOps, while being able to apply in full SDLC.
• Lateral thinking, passionate, innovative, and creative.
• A highly motivated self-starter who possess positive mindset, a doer mentality, proactive and good communication skills.
• Will be a plus if have experience in Java
WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online or email your UPDATED CV in Microsoft Word format. Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.
CONSULTANT DETAILS:
Consultant Name : Anamika Mukerji
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy."
Software Engineer,"Execute full software development life cycle (SDLC).
Develop flowcharts, layouts and documentation to identify requirements and solutions.
Produce specifications and determine operational feasibility.
Integrate software components into a fully functional software system.
Develop software verification plans and quality assurance procedures.
Troubleshoot, debug and upgrade existing systems.
Provide technical support to customers and sales for customized software development projects.
Research, plan and execute with a team of software engineer(s) for software development platform upgrade, knowledge base upgrade and new technology support.
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science / Information Technology / Information System or equivalent.
Minimum 3 - 5 years of related working experience in I.T project management.
Knowledge in C#, C++, VB.net ASP.net, HTML, Microsoft SQL
Candidates with customer-facing experience will be an added advantage."
Lead/ Senior Application Consultant (.Net),"As trustee of the nation’s retirement savings, the Central Provident Fund (CPF) Board helps 4 million CPF members save for their retirement, healthcare and housing needs. Every CPF Ambassador plays a vital role in helping Singaporeans save for a secure retirement. So long as you have the passion and commitment to serve the public, you will find your niche in our big family.
Information Technology
IT systems form the backbone of our operations. We are looking for individuals with passion and IT expertise, to help us improve the delivery of our systems and services. The Board’s IT systems support a high daily volume of financial transactions for CPF members. In addition to keeping the lights on, the Board also keeps pace with the external environment through innovation in its IT systems.
Responsibilities
You will be involved in the software development lifecycle activities such as analysis, design, development, implementation and maintenance of a variety of mission-critical web applications using Microsoft technologies.
Requirements
Relevant web application experience
Technically competent in one or more of the following languages, tools and technologies:
Frontend/full-stack development experience using Microsoft Azure development platform such as .Net core, Logic Apps, App Services, Azure Data Factor, SQL database,
Others such as Angular, NodeJS, CSS, HTML, Javascript, etc
Micro-services and container technologies eg. Kubernetes, Restful API, OAUTH 2 and 2 Way SSL
Experience in building secure and resilient applications
 Experience in the following will be an added advantage:
  UI/UX design
  Adobe technologies eg. Adobe Experience Manager (Sites/Forms), Adobe Analytics, Adobe Target, Adobe Launch, Adobe Campaign, Adobe Audience Manager 
Azure DevOps   
GitHub   
Agile software development tools and standards eg. SCRUM
Proven experiences in implementing, troubleshooting, performance tuning of web applications
What you can expect
A challenging and rewarding career
A variety of formal and informal training where you can hone your skills in the evolving technology landscape
Promotion opportunities through your capability and on the job performance
A friendly work environment with like-minded colleagues to co-create and collaborate together
A flexible schedule where work is not constrained to the office and 9-to-6 workdays
A productive yet growth-oriented workplace with flexible dress code where you are empowered to decide your appropriate outfit for the day
Comprehensive rewards package
Annual leave and pro-family leave
Medical and dental benefits
Access to recreational activities
Position is on 2-year full time contract directly under the payroll of CPF Board with potential for emplacement into permanent position"
Software Developer,"Job Description
We are looking for someone to embrace a broad range of tasks associated with developing application and systems solutions to address business challenges. Sitting in this position will help expand your knowledge, strengthen your expertise and introduce you to the inner workings of our business alongside a team of seasoned, diversely-skilled technology professionals.
You are accountable for developing RESTful APIs, Front-end applications and Batch processes as well as integrations with third party application. As a Senior full stack software developer of this team, you will play a critical role in development efforts to support overall goal of the business. You will work with our team of talented software engineers to design and build applications in a hybrid environment encompassing on-prem and cloud hosted applications.
Here's some of what you may be asked to perform
Work as a Software Engineer to design, develop, and deliver complex requirements to accomplish business goals.
Build integration with third party application using REST API
Build business application using Angular, C#/.NET, SQL Server developers while being fully hands-on with design and development work.
Provide technical guidance to another department.
Lead the creation of a comprehensive end-to-end detailed solution with overall accountability for the technical design and delivery of the System.
Conduct code reviews to address quality, standards compliance, reusability and ease of maintenance, Operational Readiness Reviews, and support gating and review signoffs for solution design.
Provide technical support to promptly resolve escalated incidents/outages.
Aim for defect-free programming, create, and maintain quality code, provide support during testing cycles and post-production deployment, engage in peer code reviews.
Job Requirements
Share your credentials, but your relevant experience and knowledge can just as likely to get our attention. It helps if you have:
Prefer 5+ years of experience in software design & development, including a clear understanding of data structures, algorithms, software design and object-oriented programming concepts.
Hands on experience in developing solutions with Angular, C#/.NET and Relational Database technologies
Experience with Microsoft Dynamics Business Central (Navision) and programming in C/AL is a plus
Solid database experiences on MS SQL Server 2016 or higher
Nice to have programming experience with .NET, specifically with SSIS script task components
Experience with cloud deployment is plus.
You love the challenges and are confident in your ability to bring clarity and direction to ambiguous problem space.
You work well in fast paced environment while deeply investing in long term quality and efficiency.
B.S or higher degree in Computer Science (or equivalent work experience)."
Software Developer | System Based,"5 Days role | $3500 - $5000
Office at MacPherson
System Integrator Service
Traffic Monitoring, Security, Digital Signage Display
Interested applicants can send your resume to ✉ What#App: +65 8358 9434 (Catherine) and allow our Consultants to match you with our Clients.
Diploma + 3 Years as Software Engineer in system background
Job Scopes:
Prepare IT Status report
Maintain and perform code change, where necessary 
Attend to client’s request on software and application related request 
Modify interfaces to exchange data between various third-party systems 
Provide support and maintenance of existing software application 
Respond to users in a timely manner 
Work with customers and partners
Tech Stack Requirements : .Net Framework, Balazor, ASP.NET, C#, MySQL, Core Java, Multi-threading, Swing, ActiveMQ, CORBA Visibroker, Oracle ASM Database, Apache Ant, Maven"
Senior Full Stack Engineer (.Net) - MD,"Senior Full Stack Engineer (.Net) - MD
Our client, a leading company in its industry, is looking for a Senior Full Stack Engineer (.Net) to join the team and be responsible for the end to end development of the Web & Mobile Application.
Responsibilities 
Responsible for end to end application solutions development: from requirement analysis, software design, development, implementation, testing and production support.
Provide technical expertise and support on the assigned projects, ensure the quality of the project delivery.
Work closely with business users/stakeholders and other teams in the organization through change management and application update/maintenance.
Identify, analyze performance of applications and enhance the application.
Provide advice and direction to management on development issues.
Ability to conduct high quality code reviews and optimize application/Web API performance.
Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science or related field.
Minimum 5-7 years of hands-on experience in .Net software application development for web applications.
Proficient in C#, ASP.NET, exposure to .Net Core will be preferred. Experience in Javascript, JQuery, BootStrap, HTML, CSS, Angular is a good plus.
Knowledge and experience in cloud-native application development, Azure Devops, CI/CD Pipeline will be a good plus
Good communication and interpersonal skills, able to articulate complex technical issues using simple and clear language.
Team player; Can work independently on work assignment, self-motivated and open to new technologies.
2 Positions Available
Location : Central
Kindly indicate your current/last salary details and your notice period
Interested candidates kindly forward your CV to Michelle (Michelle Dai Yiying, Reg No: R1982577). Feel free to forward this great opportunity to someone who would be a great fit for this role.
All information will be kept strictly confidential. We regret to inform that only successful applicants will be contacted.
PeopleSearch Pte Ltd
EA License No: 16S8057"
".NET Developer ( Project consultant, C#, Azure, Checkmarx)","Responsibilities
Consultant will learn and understand the needs of the client and be the go-to person for the assigned SAST product - Checkmarx
Leads the SAST project with various Development teams of the client
Instils the right security mindset and culture across the Development team of the client
Reviews the security vulnerabilities found on the project along with the relevant development team of the client
Assists with vulnerability remediation, clarify questions, review work performed
Understands applications from a technical architecture and business goals perspective to apply Security best practices
Works on multiple tasks and support one or more project teams simultaneously
Requirements
Prior experience in application security, Azure pipeline integration and secure coding practices
Knowledge / experience with Source code review and SAST technologies e.g., Checkmarx
Proficient with programming language e.g., C#, .NET, Java, etc.
Preferably possess Threat Modelling Knowledge and understand DevOps Integration
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please click on “Apply Now”. We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Ong Darlene Day Ibasco
EA Personnel Reg No: R22105561"
Assistant Software Engineering Manager,"Role
Assist to lead, develop and grow the Engineering team into a high-performing team
Translate business requirements and product roadmap into practical software architectures and requirements
Design and implement solutions
Guide and train team on coding related matters
Plan sprints and ensure quality code is delivered on time
Work on mission-critical systems with high requirements on availability, reliability and performance
Monitor reliability and performance of systems to suggest improvements
Collaborate with DevOps team to improve processes
Requirements
Degree/Diploma in an Engineering, Computer Science or other technical field
At least 5 years of experience in software development/engineering
At least 1 year of experience managing a team of at least 5 engineers
Experience with Java Spring Boot, SQL and NoSQL (ideally Redis and Cassandra) databases, and message queues"
"Backend Software Engineer, Application Security","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
The security team at ByteDance is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve large-scale distributed software
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables
Qualifications
BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with work experience
Excellent programming, debugging, and optimization skills in general purpose programming languages
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
Experience working with two or more from the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, mobile application development, distributed and parallel systems, developing large software systems, and/or security software development"
Web / Mobile Developer (OutSystems),"Responsibilities
Planning and Collaboration:
Participate in the discovery, conceptualization, process re-engineering, articulation, and implementation of scalable software developments;
Work closely with the application development manager, project manager, solution architect, application support team and third-party technology partners to ensure that the developed solutions fulfill business requirements.
Solution, Development and Operation:
Translate functional requirements into technical specifications;
Clearly articulate options and solutions; communicate pros and cons and participate in the decision-making process related to the solution architecture;
Focus on code quality and reusability; follow and contribute to the development of best practices and standards;
Develop prototypes, minimum viable products and full-fledged operational solutions.
Design, develop and enhance web and/or mobile applications using OutSystems low-code development platform.
Work closely with internal IT staff and/or outsource IT providers to ensure delivery of services, solutions and resolutions of incidents problem within the agreed timelines;
Develop release notes and implementation procedures;
Support the configuration of productivity tools and development environments;
Oversee overall support and maintenance services of applications developed;
Support in planning of test, training and deployment of programs;
Employ the appropriate tool sets to enhance third party applications and develop reports, workflows, forms and/or new small applications;
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or other related disciplines.
At least 3 years of experience as a software developer or development lead, having completed at least 1 full software development lifecycle for a non-trivial web or mobile application.
At least 6 months of OutSystems development experience is required.
Experience in Web development using .Net or J2EE.
Mobile app development using native development tools, e.g. Swift, Objective-C, Android SDK.
Strong knowledge in working with Web services and API technologies (RESTful and SOAP) connecting to payment gateway, social media, email, ecommerce.
Good understanding of data models and RDMS.
Experience working with Agile Methodologies and Scrum.
Excellent troubleshooting abilities.
Strong analytical, problem solving and decision-making skills
Strong focus on business outcomes.
Good written and oral communication skills."
Software Developer [Android/ Up to $5000],"[Order Number:2107-58379]
Responsibilities
Attached to Research & Development Unit.
Construct and build internet based application software and web-based system software for new IoT products.
Develop and design iOS apps with Swift and Android apps with Java using Android Studio.
Maintain and update iOS/Android apps
Take charge to deploy latest iOS apps and Android apps
Conduct Functional and Reliability Tests of software.
Participate in brainstorming sessions with team members to develop web and mobile applications.
Continuously refine and improve new and existing IoT products with other R&D team members to meet functionality, reliability performances and cost requirements.
Requirements
At least 2 years of working experience as an application software developer
Proficiency in Java
Knowledge in Android Studio
To Apply, please kindly email your updated resume to yicheng(at)goodjobcreations.com.sg
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
However, rest assured that all applications will be updated to our resume bank for future opportunities.
EA Personnel Name: Tan Yi Cheng
EA Personnel Registration Number: R22109865
EA Licence No.: 07C5771"
Front End Development Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Apply web development methodologies and programming standards to ensure efficient program logic, data manipulation, and information presentation
Design, code, test, debug and document web app
Ensure security feature is included in the web app
Work with cross functional teams to develop web app and troubleshoot issues
Ensure timely release of project/initiatives
Analyze, diagnose and resolve errors related to the web app
Provide ad hoc reporting and impact analysis as required
Investigate operational or systematic problems and user queries as required
Improve user experience and meet performance requirements through technical means
Take initiative to propose enhancements/features
Strong ability to effectively work with a team of developers
Identify options for potential solutions and assess them for technical and business suitability
Requirements:
At least 2 year of experience in web app development
Experience working with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON
Experience in mobile friendly web development, HTML and CSS
Experience on JS development such as React JS and UI framework such as Material UI
A good understanding of AJAX and WebSocket
Excellent working attitude, problem-solving, critical thinking and communication skills
Knowledge on other server programming language such as Java, Python or PHP will be an advantage
Understand on how html animations work and the rendering mechanism of browsers
Proficient in using browser performance debugging tools and strong mobile browser compatibility skills"
Software Engineer,"Job Description:
· Software development/design for automation system.
· Project improvements for existing and new products releases.
Requirements:
· Degree in Computer Science or relevant discipline.
· Experience in any programming language related to application/automation software.
· Experience in Industrial Standard Communication Protocol.
· Able to support released program/software in the field or create from scratch.
· Job experience in Machine Programming will be an advantage.
· Knowledge of PLC Programming will be an added plus."
Software Developer (Java Spring Boot) - Junior to Team Lead,"Software Engineer(Junior to Team lead roles)
Skills Tech Stack
SQL database
Java 8+
Spring Framework
Spring Boot
Spring Integration
Hibernate
RESTful API development and Integration
We are looking for passionate developers to be part of our growing development team.
Responsible for designing, implementing and testing the application to achieve project goals and objectives
Responsible to write efficient, testable and maintainable code
Perform peer code reviews
Participate in regular tech-sharing sessions and team retrospectives
Responsible for documentation update
Work closely with internal teams or cross-functional teams when necessary
Able to adopt the latest software development trends and industry best practices
To deliver output in a fast-paced and result-driven environment
Involved in application support and with internal teams to facilitate root cause analysis of application issues to meet the required SLA
Required skills
Diploma or Bachelor’s degree in computer science (related) or higher
At least 2 years of experience of hands-on development experience or in a similar role
Team player with good communication skills in English
Proficient in Java 8 and above
Proficient in Spring Framework, Spring Boot, Spring Integration, Hibernate and RESTful APIs implementation
Experience in SQL database
Knowledge of design pattern
Good problem-solving skills and ability to think outside the box
Senior developers with team leadership experience will be considered for senior roles
Good to have
Full-stack experience or other experiences with open-source technologies
Secure software development
Distributed application using message queue
Agile practice or Scrum knowledge
Experience in using JIRA
If you have most of the tech stack requirements, especially Java Spring boot, we would love to speak to you to join our close-knitted and exciting family."
Software Engineers (OOP Knowledge - No Core Layer Programming)- Entry Level Welcome,"No core layer programming.
$6,000 - $9,500 + Bonus + Comprehensive Benefits
Permanent positions
Responsibilities:
Development/implementation of new systems and enhancements to existing systems
Involved in various stages of the SDLC.
Support the team in defining project requirements, tracking and documentation.
What you need to have:
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent.
Knowledge in Object-oriented programming (OOP) or another programming language
Candidates without prior working experience are welcome to apply
Keen Learner and good interpersonal skills
Salary will be commensurate according to Candidates’ Work Experience & Qualifications
All Successful candidates can expect a competitive remuneration package and a comprehensive range of benefits.
Please include the following information in your resume:
Reasons for leaving each past & current employment
Salary drawn for each past & current employment
Expected Salary
Earliest availability date
We regret that only short-listed candidates will be contacted shortly.
EA License No. | 14C7092
EA Registration No.| R1879269
EA Personnel| Nicholas Tan"
Lead Developer _C++ (electrical engineering MUST),"We are currently looking to hire R&D Software Engineer (C/C++ expert) who has proven track record in IT Industry. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.
Role: R&D Software Engineer
Job Type: Permanent
Location: Singapore (Outside applicants must be willing to relocate to Singapore)
MUST HAVE:
BS/MS/PhD in Electrical Engineering
Strong C++ coding experience
Experience working with High Speed serial standards (USB, PCIe, etc.) and Memory Standards (DDR, HBM, etc.)
Must know - Capacitor, Inductor, serdes standards (Serializer/Deserializer)
·Experience in a technically leading team
The essential requirements of the job include:
· 5+yrs of hands on experience in complex C/C++ software development in a role such as a software architect or senior software engineer
· Expert working knowledge of C++ and OOP
· Experience in modeling of signal and power delivery channels, and/or experience working on developing Analog EDA software tools
· Experience in analysis of high-speed serial and/or DDR channels
· Great team player and willing to take on a variety of projects, customer issues, and quality fixes
· Solid understanding of Jenkins CI/CD development flows and impact of DevOps on architecture
WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online or email your UPDATED CV in Microsoft Word format to seema at aven-sys.com Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.
CONSULTANT DETAILS:
Consultant Name : Seema Verma
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy."
"Backend Software Engineer, Infrastructure Engineering #Immediate","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
Our Infrastructure Engineering team supports the company's fast growth by building and operating hyperscale datacenters, managing the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud resources and create various cloud solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).
The platform team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.
Responsibilities:
Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large-scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.
Qualifications:
BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems."
Senior iOS Developer,"We are seeking a skilled Senior iOS Developer to help with the development and maintenance of native iOS mobile applications.
The Senior iOS Developer will be based in Singapore, reporting to iOS Team Lead.
ROLE AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Build a secure and scalable infrastructure (clear, well-documented and easy to maintain code)
Able to produce performant and secure applications
Agile development using Scrum with code versioning using Git 
Collaborate with various teams for gathering requirements on design/ enhancement of in-house solutions
Troubleshoot and provide solutions to complex problems in backend infrastructure
Integrate the UI created with server-side logic
REQUIREMENTS
4 to 5 years of relevant iOS Development experience
Degree in Software Engineering
Highly familiar with native iOS Development
Strong knowledge of REST/GraphQL APIs
Proven experience in developing secure, performant and user-friendly apps
Be disciplined, produce results without being constantly reminded
Attention to details
Good knowledge of best practices in agile software development and trends
Strong interpersonal, communication and problem-solving skills
Team player who is self-driven and proactive in learning new technologies and skills
Familiar with Agile development, Git workflow, unit testing
Knowledge of blockchain technology and development highly advantageous
Prior experience in developing payment applications highly advantageous
Able to adapt by picking up and maintaining code developed by previous developers
Ability to support when needed out of office hours
TECHNICAL SKILLS
Proficient in Swift/Objective C"
Full Stack Developer,"Job Scope
Design, develop, implement, and maintain end-to-end enterprise web applications.
Conduct software analysis, programming, testing, and code debugging, as well as assists in identifying and resolving product problems.
Proficient in MERN stack at building microservices and REST APIs for applications.
Perform unit and system testing of application code, as well as resolve issues to meet customer functional and non-functional requirements.
Required
At least 3 years of experience in full stack development for enterprise applications.
Hands-on in JavaScript, and proficient in at least NodeJS, ReactJS, ExpressJS frameworks.
Be able to write clean and maintainable code, as well as comfortable in debugging/resolving complex problems.
Able to understand integration with heterogeneous systems/applications
Understand Agile methodology and DevSecOps, while being able to apply in full SDLC.
Lateral thinking, passionate, innovative, and creative.
A highly motivated self-starter who possess positive mindset, a doer mentality, proactive and good communication skills.
Will be a plus if have experience in Java."
"Java Developer (Perm, Logistics MNC, Jurong, Good Benefits)","Job Details
Perm role with comprehensive benefits (14 days Annual leaves, AWS,Bonus, birthday voucher, medical, dental optical etc)
Monday to Friday,Office hours 
5-7 min walking distance from JE MRT station / Company Transport provided from JE MRT 
Listed Company
Reporting to Senior IT Manager
Responsibilities
Transforming legacy systems from .NET to Java technologies.
Upgrade existing functionalities and create new functionalities using data-driven insights.
Implement and delivery Supply Chain Management project development according to business requirement.
Involvement in all phases of the development cycle.
Implement new features according to business specifications.
Write unit/functional or integration tests and perform unit testing
Technical skill summary :
Architecture: MSA
Java Web: Spring Framework, Sprint Boot
Web Frond End: Vue.js or React.js
DevOps: Docker, Jenkins, Gitea, DC/OS, etc
DB : MS SQL, MySQL, MyBatis, Redis
Requirements:
Min 2 years experience in designing and implementing Java-based (Java 8, Spring, Spring Boot) backed Restful applications
Analyse, design and develop microservices applications using tools such as Docker, Kubernetes, OpenShift, etc.
Worked on enterprise-scale projects using Java, .NET, Spring Boot, Angular, React.js, Vue.js, Jenkins, Git
Be proficient in the technology stacks or tools such as Azure, AWS, Redis, Elastic Search & Kibana (ELK) and Grafana, Prometheus (Monitoring/alerts)
Proficient skills with tools used in software development lifecycle, such as Eclipse, IntelliJIDEA, Git, Gradle, Maven, and other CI/CD tools
Familiarity with debugging and performance tuning along with a good understanding of deploying, maintaining and monitoring complex Java applications
Solid Object-Oriented analysis and design skills, understanding of design patterns and concepts
How to Apply:
Interested candidates, please submit your updated resume in MSWORD format by using Apply Now button or email to melissa(at)alignrecruitment.com.sg 
Align Recruitment Pte Ltd (20C0253)
Tee Siew Mei (Reg No: R1219651)"
Senior Django/Python Web Application Developer,"Job Description:
1. Responsible for data collection and cleaning;
2. Responsible for database design and architecture;
3. Responsible for code refactoring and data maintenance of core modules;
4. Responsible for the development of new business functions.Job
Requirements:
1. Bachelor degree or above, minimum 4 years work experience;
2. Familiar with Python development, proficient in web framework, such as Django REST Framework;
3. Familiar with Mysql and Redis;
4. Familiar with Linux system, familiar with network programming, multi-thread programming technology;
5. Familiar with Git;
6. Knowledge and experience in Docker and K8s is a plus;
7. Knowledge and experience in Channel/Celery/Websocket is a plus;
8. Have good coding habits and cross-team communication and collaboration skills;
9. Adaptable to new technologies.
10. Can speak Mandarin (to cooperate with our China offices)"
Asst Prin Engr,"Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and develop technology solutions based on customer requirements.
Identify and apply innovative technologies to update existing application software.
Design the architecture for web front end development and implementing it along with the team.
Create and maintain documentation for software installations, changes and upgrades.
Conduct testing and evaluation for designs, prototypes and products
Design and develop desktop and tablet based GIS web applications
Collaborate with back-end developers and web designers to improve usability
Get feedback from, and build solutions for, users and customers
Write functional requirement documents and guides
Create quality mockups and prototypes
Stay up-to-date on emerging technologies
Key Requirements:
Degree in EE/EEE/ME/Computer Science/Computer Engineering or related field
5+ years of experience in a similar role and have work experience in at least one full software development cycle
In-depth understanding of the entire web development process (design, development and deployment)
Proficiency with HTML, CSS, Javascript and React framework.
Familiarity with browser testing and debugging
Knowledge in Web Development and visualization (WebGL) technologies
Knowledge in GIS Systems
Good understanding of backend services development in C#
Knowledge in Network Communication and configuration
Knowledge in SQL databases would be advantageous
Knowledge in GUI design methodology would be advantageous
Ability to work under pressure and attention to detail
Ability to work in a team and individually
Possess organizational skills with the capability of working towards tight deadlines
Familiarity with geospatial data visualization, military data visualization and data science is a big plus"
Senior Backend Developer,"Your new company
They are one of the largest game developers worldwide and are focusing on developing high-quality content and entertaining gamers globally.

Your new role
As a Senior Backend Developer, you will cooperate with performance testing, security auditing and focus on implementation indicators.
Research, develop and implement blockchain and smart contract related technologies.
Analyze business trends, system design and provide technical solutions.

What you'll need to succeed
3+ years of experience in backend development
Excellent knowledge of Java preferred. But open to strong candidate with a domain knowledge in the area with exposure in relevant languages such as Python, Golang or C++…etc.
Familiar with data structure, understanding of redis, MySQL and other databases
Interest in smart contract, able to learn blockchain, web3.0 related technical knowledge by self-drive
What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or call us now.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.
**Due to lack of work pass quota, only Singaporean and Singapore PR will be considered**"
Mobile Game Developer Programmer (RPG Dev Studio),"Mobile Game Developer Programmer (RPG Dev Studio)
Full time/Permanent role
Comes with 13-mth Annual Wage Supplement
Free office snacks & drinks
Company provides Group Health & Surgical/Outpatient Medical Benefits
Location: Pasir Panjang (nearby MRT station)
Mobile Game Development Company
Mon to Fri, 10am to 7pm
3 days work from home, 2 days work from office arrangement (as of now)
Job Description:
XII Braves is currently looking for a Game Developer / Programmer to assist with developing awesome mobile RPG games or do live-opn maintenance. This position will be a multifaceted role with various functions ranging from user interface(UI) development, gameplay implementation to graphics programming.
The candidate will be working closely with our team of engineers, game designers and artists to craft enjoyable experiences for millions of players.
Job Requirements:
At least 1 to 6 years of relevant client engineer / game developer / software developer relevant and related experience
Able to work overtime (OT) as and when needed due to business requirements
Possess Computer Science or related Diploma / Degree or equivalent experience
Strong understanding of CS fundamentals and current development methodologies, patterns and best practices
Experience with Unity Engine and C#
Design, write and maintain high quality code
Able to test, debug and optimise existing code base and game features
Able to multitask and take on many different areas of development
Able to work as part of a team
Good communication skills
Passion for making and playing mobile games
Pluses
Previous experience shipping and supporting mobile game titles
Development experience for iOS and Android
Experience with version control systems
Familiar with implementing client / server architecture"
"Software Developer (.Net, ASP.net, C#) | In-house | Up to S$6k","Key Roles
Develops software solutions by studying information needs; conferring with internal users; studying systems flow, data usage, and work processes; investigating problem areas; following the software development lifecycle.
Determines operational feasibility by evaluating analysis, problem definition, requirements, solution development, and proposed solutions.
Documents and demonstrates solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts, layouts, diagrams, charts, code comments and clear code.
Prepares and installs solutions by determining and designing system specifications, standards, and programming. (e. g. enhancements to existing applications, design new applications, fix urgent issues and bugs)
Participates continuous improvement in job knowledge by studying latest development tools, programming techniques, and computing equipment.
Protects operations by keeping information confidential.
Provide daily support to our in-house system and support other duties and responsibilities that may be assigned to you by the management from time to time, within your category of employment in the organization.
Who are we looking for?
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree in Information Technology/Computer Science or related field.
Preferable with 2 to 4 years of working experience with strong knowledge of backend development.
Strong in programming: ASP.Net, C#
Deep expertise and hands on experience:
Microsoft.Net 3.5/4.0 Framework
Microsoft SQL (MSSQL)
Javascript, HTML, CSS, XML, Crystal report
Strong understanding and interest in Internet technologies.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills in English.
Perks and Benefits
Attractive Remuneration
Performance Incentives
Work 5 days a week
Medical Insurance
Flexi-benefits
Annual Leave
Work Life balance
World class workspaces
Be part of MNC Company"
Software Developer,"·      Opportunity to work in an Asian MNC
·      Passionate, energetic and innovative work culture
·      Attractive Remuneration Package & Employee Benefits
Job Responsibilities:
Produce fully functional web and mobile applications and write clean code
Development, implementation, configuration, support, maintenance and security of IT software and applications
Design and develop high-volume, low-latency applications for mission-critical systems and deliver high-availability and performance
Contributing in all phases of the development lifecycle
Write well designed, testable, efficient code and improve the quality of the code
Conduct software analysis, programming, testing and debugging
Enforce best practices in code quality and release/deployment process to achieve near-zero production incidents
Design and work with REST APIs, Spring Framework, Angular, Google GWT, JSP, Struts1.3, Java Android, or IOS
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or a related field or a combination of related experience and education
At least 1- 2 years of proven working experience in Java development
Experience in software implementation, requirements gathering, systems analysis and functional design
Hands-on experience in designing and developing applications using Java or J2EE or Java Web Applications or Angular, Spring Boot, Spring Framework, Google GWT, Struts1\
Preferably with technical knowledge in Microservices, MSSQL, Oracle, TypeScript, JavaScript, CSS, HTML5; and interactive debuggers effectively
Full analytical capability based on a good understanding of technical architecture and familiar with query tools such as Eclipse, Git, Maven and Gradle
Good communication, analytical & troubleshooting skills
Ability to quickly grasp concepts relating to customization"
Senior Full Stack Developer,"About the Company
US MNC focusing on providing IOT cloud solution in both web and mobile applications.

About the Job
This person will work independently and as a part of a team to develop user interface web applications built for a variety of platforms (desktop, computers, mobile andcloud). This position includes design and architecture of software features, working with designers and product managers to understand the features, and implementation of both the client-side (front-end) and server-side (back-end).
You will implements features within our application in cooperation with other team members.
Maintains up-to-date knowledge of current tools and techniques.
Contributes to the overall quality of the organization in the development of all applications.Ensures high performance on a variety of platforms.
Creates self-contained, reusable and testable modules and components.
Skills & Experiences Required
You will need min degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related discipline with 3 years of proven experience in building and shipping professional software.
Deep understanding of the complexities in writing web applications.
Front-End experience with Web-Components, Angular, React web-framework.
Back-end experience primarily with NodeJS web service frameworks and RESTful resource implementation.
Experience in Golang and Python knowledge is a PLUS.
Experience with relational databases (SQLite, PostgreSQL).
Experience with revision control systems.
Proficiency with both adaptive and responsive designs.
To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may send your CV to steve at steve.ling(@)randstad.com.sg
(EA: 94C3609/ R1332781)
Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Java Backend Developer [ Tai Seng // 5 days // Spring Boot // Java // Back-End Development ],"Tai Seng
5 days work
Salary: $ 6000 - $ 8000
Working Hours: 9:30am - 6:30pm
Requirements:
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma or Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering (Computer / Telecommunication) or equivalent
Required skill(s): Java
Expertise in Spring Boot is advantageous
Minimum 3 year of working experience in back-end development
Responsibilities:
Be a senior member of the product development team
Design and optimize existing security product's algorithm
Research & develop new innovative security products
Guide junior member of the product development team
Learn how to work independently and in a team
The Supreme HR Advisory Pte Ltd
Reg No: R22107450
EA No: 14C7279"
Junior Django/Python Web Application Developer,"Job Description:
1. Responsible for data collection and cleaning;
2. Responsible for database design and architecture;
3. Responsible for code refactoring and data maintenance of core modules;
4. Responsible for the development of new business functions.
Job Requirements:
1. Bachelor degree or above, minimum 1 years work experience;
2. Familiar with Python development, proficient in web framework, such as Django REST Framework;
3. Familiar with Mysql and Redis;
4. Familiar with Linux system;
5. Familiar with Git;
6. Have good coding habits and cross-team communication and collaboration skills."
Backend Developer #Urgent,"Roles & Responsibilities
About Us:
IBM’s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that progress is made through progressive thinking, progressive leadership, progressive policy and progressive action. IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition. Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are the largest technology and consulting employer in the world, with more than 380,000 IBMers serving clients in 170 countries.
At IBM, work is more than a job — it's a calling. To build. To design. To code. To consult. To think along with clients and sell. To make markets. To invent. To collaborate. Not just to do something better, but to attempt things you've never thought possible. To lead in this new era of technology and solve some of the world's most challenging problems.
Let's put smart to work.
About the Job:
As a Backend Developer in IBM, You will have below:
Requirement Gathering
Preparing Design Document
Application entity design and Data modelling
Program Specification and Code Review
Java, J2ee, Spring boot, NodeJS and Elastic Search program development, Unit testing
Tracking deployments and defects
SIT and UAT support
About you:
Expert level of experience in design and development of Web Applications, distributed systems and banking applications.
Should have experience in development skills using latest technologies including Spring Boot, Microservices, Elastic search
Exposure in Java Application Servers like Websphere, Web Logic, GlassFish, Jboss, Pramati and Apache Web Server.
Should have exposure in Oracle, DB2 databases and PL/SQL development.
Comprehensive knowledge of physical and logical data modelling, performance tuning.
Should possess excellent communication, presentation and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work collaboratively and productively with globally dispersed teams
Desired Background:
Experienced in NodeJS, Java, Elasticsearch, Spring, and Spring Boot
Familiar with Domain-driven design, microservices design pattern.
Design, develop, test, and maintain scalable REST APIs
Develop unit testing using JUnit and Mockito
Experience working with relational and non-relational databases, query optimization, and designing schema
Shall have at least a diploma in Computer Science, Computing, Electrical Engineering, IT or equivalent with Java training or certification with at least one (2) year experience in system analysis, design, and programming
Your Life at IBM
What matters to you when you’re looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world? What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities – where you can truly discover your passion? Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust – where everyone has a voice? What about all of these? If so, then IBM could be your next career challenge. Join us, not to do something better, but to attempt things you never thought possible.
Impact. Inclusion. Infinite Experiences. Do your best work ever.
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, pregnancy, disability, age, veteran status, or other characteristics. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.
#TESA #CLT"
Embedded Software Engineer (Linux),"Roles & Responsibilities
Responsibilities:
· Software development on Embedded Linux platform
· Design documentations
Requirements:
· Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (electronics, electrical or related fields)
· must have Embedded software programming skills ( C/C++)
· must have a working experience with Linux on ARM and/or MIPS and/or X86 with a good understanding of embedded Linux system architecture.
· must have working experience in developing u-boot, and Linux device drivers(including creation or reconfiguration of device tree) with the peripherals.
· Familiar/experience with Petalinux or Xilinx platform working experience is an added advantage.
· Familiar/experience with AI (Deep Learning) is a plus.
· should be a team player with an orientated mindset.
Kindly forward your resume in Word format to apply(at)tekvillage.com and pratima(at)tekvillage.com
EA Licence No: 18C9120"
"Senior Software Engineer / Developer (In house,.NET, Jurong MRT, MNC, Good benefits!)","Job Details
Perm role with comprehensive benefits (14 days Annual leaves, AWS,Bonus, birthday voucher, medical, dental optical etc)
Monday to Friday,Office hours 
5-7 min walking distance from the MRT station / Transport provided from MRT 
Listed Company
Reporting to Senior IT Manager
Responsibilities
Daily Support for AilisXe & nSolution
 Develop new application using Microsoft platform (vb.net or c#) for WMS(Warehouse Management System) and TMS(Transportation Management System)
EDI Development between Customer System and in-house System
Provide daily support for in-house system
Implement and delivery SCM project development with Open Source
Transforming legacy system from .Net to Java technologies
Liaise with business analysts for clarification and understanding of requirements
Requirements:
Min 4-5 years of working experience in .NET technology (ASP.NET, C#, C#.Net, MVC, VB.NET, ASP, IIS, web service etc.)
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
Experience in Microsoft SQL Server, hands on experience in writing Stored Procedures, Functions, etc.
Knowledge of HTML / CSS / AJAX / JQuery and other client or server-based web tools
Good working knowledge of MSSQL (Store Procedure, Complex reporting Query)
Experienced in full software development lifecycle; requirements analysis, design, development, testing, implementation
How to Apply:
Interested applicants, please send your resume to melissa(at)alignrecruitment.com.sg or press ""apply now""
Align Recruitment Pte Ltd (20C0253)
Tee Siew Mei (Reg No: R1219651)"
Software Developer (AXS Core),"Roles & Responsibilities
Job Description:
Be part of AXS Settlement system & inhouse application backend development team.
Develop backend settlement reporting and/or in-house application in a full SDLC environment by writing clean, efficient and reusable codes.
Working closely with Project Manager and Business Development team to ensure quality project deliverables and meeting all requirements.
Providing internal support and maintenance of applications deployed.
Produce / maintaining / updating of documentation (flow charts, specifications) for software developed.
Job Requirements:
Minimally a Diploma in Computer Engineering / Computer Science / Information Technology or any other related fields.
Proficient in : PHP7+, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, MySQL.
Possess good troubleshooting, communication skills and able to work in a team-based environment.
Detail-oriented.
Good to have : Knowledge on shell scripting, Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC process knowledge), experience with handling web responsive web page development.
0 to 3 years of software development working experience. Entry-level candidates are welcomed."
Software Development Engineer,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
We are now looking for talented individuals to join us in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.
About the TikTok Engineering Team
We are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues a healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users on enjoying their time on TikTok, earn trust on privacy protection, and more.
Participate in the development of automated testing tools/frameworks, design and execution of automated test cases, automatically building test environments, and continuous integration.
Responsible for the entire process of advertising system testing, including requirements analysis, design review, formulating test plans, designing and executing test cases, conducting defect tracking and software quality analysis, etc.
Understand the tools and techniques used in developing new products and work with cross-functionality teams to establish and refine dashboards and metrics to facilitate our data-driven approach.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or related major is preferred.
Familiar with at least one programming language (Python/Java).
Solid computer basics (network/database/algorithm).
Proactive, self-driving, and in-depth understanding of the business; capability of communicating with cross-functional teams and taking charge of a business independently.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiar with golang/c++ is a plus.
Familiar with API test platform, pytest, diff tools is a plus.
Experience in continuous integration is preferred."
Embedded Software Engineer,"Job Responsibilities
● Work in a team to develop wireless communication module for IOT products
● Design and develop embedded devices firmware
● Provide software support for QA and production process
● Maintain existing code base and provide bug fixes
● Code review with internal team and 3rd party vendor
● Analyse, monitor and improve efficiency, stability of the system
● Involve in schematic and PCB design process
● Work with a variety of microcontroller, SDK and communication protocol
● Work closely with team members to ensure the project is delivered on time
Job Requirements
● 3 to 5 years of experience in embedded software engineering
● Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electronic Engineering or its equivalent
● Proficient in C, C++ programming
● Able to read schematics and datasheets
● Familiar with Git software version control
● Strong verbal communication and writing skills in English and Mandarin
● Experience in developing and troubleshooting on embedded products
● Experience with wireless network stack such as Wi-Fi, Bluetooth, BLE, Zigbee, Cellular"
Software Engineer,"Responsibilities:
As an experienced software developer in our component inspection development team,
You will be part of an international Scrum team that uses agile standard methodologies to build stable and maintainable software.
You will work with the latest techniques in C++ and C# development and understand the importance of crafting unit tests and integration tests while working in software stacks close to machine control.
You will have the opportunity to occasionally travel to customers and discover new places and cultures along the way.
From on the edge software development, designing advanced machines, defining, and implementing image processing algorithms or crafting new ways to do optical inspections, we do it all, and we need your talent to keep going one step beyond!
Qualifications:
Minimum a MS degree in engineering with at least 5 years of experience or similar through experience.
Experience with modern C++ software development.
Knowledge of object-oriented design, design patterns, and UML.
An affinity to automation.
Knowledge of C#, WPF, Python, GIT and Scrum are a plus.
Strong communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills.
Proficient in English."
"Software Engineer, Speech & Audio #Urgent","Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
About The Team
Our team provides industry-leading ML algorithm capabilities and complete voice product solutions for all business lines, including toB business as well. We empower businesses in the fields of audio understanding, audio creation, music retrieval and generation, song synthesis, ML education, etc., and solve basic problems such as human-computer voice interaction, audio and video content understanding and creation, and education intelligence.
Responsibilities
Architect, design and implement large scale distributed system
Serve ML/Deep Learning models as online services
Work with internal/external customers to design and implement elegant APIs
Deploy, monitor and troubleshoot production systems
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or equivalent practical experience
Proficient in at least one programming languages (C/C++/Go/Python/Java)
Experience in large scale databases including both SQL and NoSQL
Knowledge of Linux/Networks administration and troubleshooting
Solid knowledge in distributed systems, algorithms, and networks
Track record in ACM/NOI/IOI/TopCoder is a plus
ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Quant Developer,"Our client a global asset management firm, that invests in multiple asset classes and strategies worldwide. Resting on more than a quarter-century of investing experience.
 Your Key Responsibilities includes:
Building of tools on a next generation technology platform to facilitate rapid understanding of performance and risk for portfolio managers, senior management, risk managers and analysts.
Develop quantitative understanding of risk to anticipate the requirements for the team.
Solve complex and challenging problems through the application of creative and unique solutions using the latest technology.
 Requirements:
Experience in technologies including C#, Python, NodeJS/React and SQL
Minimum 2 - 4 years of experience as a Software Developer in the HFT / Quantitative industry
Alternatively, you may call +65 9004 5401 for a quick discussion.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.
Chan Chin How, Javier
Associate Consultant
Reg. No: R1989608
Stellar- Link Partners Pte Ltd (EA License: 21S0698)"
Lead Application Developer,"Job Summary
In this exciting opportunity, you will assist in coaching a team of web-developers to meet the needs of our growing e-Commerce business through continuous enhancements. You will be the front-line IT support to the e-business team members in ensuring all critical issues are resolved timely.
Primary Relationships
The position reports directly to the Development Manager and indirectly to the Head of IT. Within the organization, this position has primary working relationships with the e-business team members and designers at TWG Tea headquarters. Outside the organization, the position coordinates primarily with overseas developers and platform vendors.
Responsibilities:
Develop and enhance existing e-Commerce/ m-Commerce platform
Transpose user needs into technical programming
Working closely with e-business team members, designers, overseas developers and vendors to meet business requirements
Enforce Source Code and version control across multiple parties
Develop test plans and cases, as well as, the technical and functional documentations according to the adopted methodologies
Updated with the latest web technologies
Requirements:
Degree (or Diploma) in Computer Science, Software engineering or similar disciplines
Ability to work independently and in teams
Minimum 3 to 5 years’ programming experience in designing and developing web application using C#.Net, ASP.Net(MVC), Razor View, and Web API
Experience in e-Commerce and CMS development with Shopify or Sitefinity or related
Experienced in front-end development using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Bootstraps, JQuery, and experience with React will be an advantage
Experienced in working with MSSQL database
Experience in cloud hosting and architecture
Experience with development tools such as Visual Studio, Jira, Git, Bitbucket and CI/CD tools
Good understanding of UX/UI, SEO principles and cross-browser compatibility issues
Strong project coordination and people liaison skills with good communication abilities
Prior experience in integration to ERP, CRM, Payment and logistics gateways will be a bonus
Prior experienced in developing cross-platform mobile application such as Xamarin or React Native or related will be a bonus
Applicants must be fluent in written and spoken
Only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Please apply with a detailed resume indicating reasons for leaving, last drawn salary, expected salary and date of availability."
Backend Developer [Software],"Attractive Salary
UBI
Career Progression Opportunities
Interested applicants can send your resume to jsjunlim0212-hotmail.com and allow our Consultants to match you with our Clients. No Charges will be incurred by Candidates for any service rendered.
Job Description:
Develop and maintain a highly scalable and distributed IT system.
Write clear system documentation.
Maintain a close communication with experts and teams from around the world to discuss the - project feasibility, assist in product testing and to provide updates on project progress.
Regularly maintain and monitor software applications for error, health and performance improvement.
Provide production level support to fix urgent issues and bugs.
Research and suggest ideas to improve software application and process.
Requirement:
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Experienced in .NET Core framework preferably C# & web application technologies such as web api, HTML, CSS and etc & relational database and NOSQL database.
Able to write high performance code to handle very high concurrent requests & highly optimized SQL queries to handle very high database requests.
Knowledge in Kubernetes, Docker and microservices are an added advantage.
Eager to research new methodologies and technologies.
Interested applicants may choose to apply / Contact me your updated resume for our consultant to find you a suitable oppurtunities
Contact Number : +65 90839650
R22104301 14C7279"
Senior Software Engineer (Backend) - Data Technologies Infrastructure - Singapore,"Bloomberg is foremost a data company. Data is at the heart of everything we do; we collect it, cleanse it, enrich it, validate it, and make it available to our clients. This data is vast, varied, and critical not only to our success, but to that of our diverse, global client base, and we continually challenge ourselves to do this better and faster.
What's the role?
Bloomberg’s Data Technologies (DT) department is responsible for building tools and infrastructure to get this data into the company from the outside world. The DT Infrastructure team lays the foundations for this work by providing compute platforms for other teams to build upon.
Our responsibilities fall into two core areas:
Building and maintaining BAIT, a low code in-house platform that allows our counterparts in the Data and Engineering departments to extract, transform, and load the data to the downstream databases
Building and maintaining Asia specific data processing applications in collaboration with the wider DT Engineering community
Our low code platform is used by many of our Data Analysts as well as Software Engineers across the firm.
We'll trust you to:
Develop backend services for our low code platform using Python
Design and implement our distributed data processing platform
Work with the team to design the low code abstraction that gives our users power to solve their additional use cases such as new table transformation operations and new source file types
Interact with our users directly and address questions, and if any enhancements are needed, realize them in a coherent manner that serve our wider user groups in both Data and Engineering departments
Own the entire development lifecycle, from planning to deployment
You'll need to have:
Minimum 2+ years of software engineering experience
Demonstrated experience programming with Python
Demonstrated experience with system design
Demonstrated experience with various file formats frequently used in data disclosures and how to interface with them programmatically (CSV, JSON, XML, XBRL, SDMX, FWF, DBF, excel, docx, odf, turtle etc)
Fluency in both written and spoken English
Demonstrated continuous career growth within an organisation
Demonstrated exposure to all phases of the software development life cycle
Demonstrated experience successfully managing multiple projects to meet required deliverables, including communicating progress and outcomes to relevant stakeholders
We’d love to see:
Fluency in Python data processing stack (numpy, pandas)
Distributed Data processing platforms (Hadoop, Spark), and JVM languages (Java, Scala) to interface with those platforms
Familiarity with schema specifications (jsonschema, json type definition, avro, xsd)
If this sounds like you:
Apply if you think we're a good match. We'll get in touch to let you know what the next steps are, but in the meantime feel free to have a look at this:
http://www.bloomberg.com/engineering
techatbloomberg.com
Bloomberg is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, ancestry, color, gender identity or expression, genetic predisposition or carrier status, marital status, national or ethnic origin, race, religion or belief, sex, sexual orientation, sexual and other reproductive health decisions, parental or caring status, physical or mental disability, pregnancy or maternity/parental leave, protected veteran status, status as a victim of domestic violence, or any other classification protected by applicable law.
Bloomberg is a disability inclusive employer. Please let us know if you require any reasonable adjustments to be made for the recruitment process. If you would prefer to discuss this confidentially, please email us."
Backend Software Engineer - Infrastructure Engineering #Urgent,"Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
Our Infrastructure Engineering team supports the company's fast growth by building and operating hyperscale datacenters, managing the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud resources and create various cloud solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).
The platform team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.
Responsibilities:
Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.
Qualifications:
BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiarity with the whole web stack, including protocols and web server optimization techniques.
Experience of troubleshooting in a fast pace and production environment.
Strong sense of web design and attuned to the fundamentals of user experience."
Software System Engineer,"• Pasir Panjang – Singapore
• 5 days work 
• Career Progression Opportunities!
Interested applicants can also send your resume and allow our Consultant to match you with our Clients.
Responsibilities:
System Administration and Installation of UNIX/LINUX/WINDOWS Servers & Workstations 
Software Configuration Management using Rational Clear Case and RCS 
Basic Network Setup (routers, switchers, IP addresses) 
Database Modeling and Parameterization (Oracle) 
Scripting using Java Scripts, Perl, ksh, csh, bsh, bash
Software Development using C, C++, Pascal, SQL, Java, HTML, XML, etc 
Functional and Integration Testing 
Site Commissioning of delivered SCADA/'DMS/EMS systems 
Warranty support and maintenance for delivered projects 
Requirements:
Diploma / Degree in Computer Science/Computer Engineering 
With experience in SCADA/EMS/DMS systems or Real Time software development in a UNIX/LINUX environment will have added advantages
Willing to travel for overseas assignments.
Possession of team spirit, good communication and organizing skills"
Junior .Net developer,"Main Responsibilities & Duties
Interact closely with project teams for the development of responsive apps using .Net, .Net Core & other front end frameworks (Bootstrap, JQuery...)
Work alongside senior devs and leads to contribute in architecture / design discussions, participate in system impact analysis and effort estimations.
Translate design ideas into clean and reliable code that is easy to comprehend
Enjoy problem solving - Ensuring an ""efficient support & maintenance"" of applications in production - analyze and resolve issues as they arise, improve & refactor!
Strong accountability & ownership with an ability to deliver the highest quality of work meeting business requirements.
If you are looking for a career where you can grow and meet the following criteria
Qualifications
A Bachelor’s or Postgraduate degree from a recognized university.
0 - 3 yrs of work experience in development of C# .Net and Microsoft technologies.
Exceptional analytical abilities, critical thinking and problem–solving aptitude, intellectual curiosity and interest in finding new ways to do things
A global mindset combined with strong written and verbal communication skills in English language.
Self-starter with outstanding qualities such as leadership, resilience, adaptability, integrity, strong organizational skills and the ability to work well with a diverse group of people, as shown in your participation in varsity, extracurricular, social activities."
Software Engineer (Entry level candidates welcome),"Responsibilities: • Develop, maintain, and enhance software application systems with complex functional requirements and high performance and availability requirements• Perform system analysis and design and define technical solutions for software change requests and enhancements• Perform software integration test and support system integration test and performance test• Perform troubleshooting and production support• Maintain and update software documentation 
Requirements: • Diploma/Degree in Computer Science / Information Technology / Software Engineering• Experience in software development and full SDLC • Knowledge in Java, J2EE, Spring, Hibernate, JVM, WebLogic, Oracle DB, SQL Server• Experience of developing software application using in-memory data grid such as Oracle Coherence or similar products• Familiar in OOAD and UML• Familiar in software unit test• Familiar in various software development tools• Familiar in Docker and Kubernetes• Strong troubleshooting skills and analytical mind with problem-solving aptitude
• Familiarity with various operating systems (Linux, Windows) and server administration
• Basic knowledge on network and is interested in systems configuration and troubleshooting• Entry level candidates are welcome to apply  Candidates with more years of experience can be considered for senior roles."
Senior Python Developer,"Responsibilities:
- Design, write, document, and deliver software to improve product availability, scalability, and performance
- Maintain and enhance large scale API system
- Converse directly with end users to quickly automate processes and translate domain-specific business logic to working tools
- Contribute to analysis, design and development of systems, business processes, data and interfaces
- Build scalable systems, including owning architecture, design, and critical-path coding for services
- Launch, support, and improve backend service
- Collaborate with other developers, product analysts, solution architect and testers as part of the wider team
- Mentoring junior members of the team in both technical and functional aspects
Requirements:
- Experience in programming in Python and/or R
- Hands-on experience using front office tools (Excel 2016, Access, VBA)
- Experience with visualization tools, such as PowerBI
- Good knowledge of relational databases (SQL Server, Oracle, etc.)
- Knowledge of at least one core software development language (.Net, C#, VB, Java etc.)
EA License Number: 11C3017 EA Personnel Number: R1982007"
"Backend Software Engineer, TikTok e-Commerce","Responsibilities
The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.
You will:
Architect and develop efficient, highly scalable and secured services that power e-Commerce products.
Optimise backend systems and services for data security, modularity, computational efficiency and scalability.
Design and develop data pipelines and analytics platforms for e-Commerce applications.
Develop best-in-class user privacy and data security engineering practices across all product engineering disciplines.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
Experience in developing highly scalable backend services and systems using at least one of Java/Golang/Python/Scala/C++. Qualified fresh graduates would also be considered.
Strong software programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style.
Deep understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and highly scalable systems design.
In depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka etc.
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
"Fullstack Software Engineer, Traffic Infrastructure - Infrastructure Engineering #Urgent","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
Our Traffic Infrastructure Engineering team build and operate hyper-scale datacenters, manage the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud/edge resources and create various cloud/edge solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).
The team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.
Responsibilities:
Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large-scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.
Qualifications:
BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience in a frontend development role, with solid JavaScript/HTML/CSS skills.
Experience with one or more web frameworks (Vue/React/Angular).
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiarity with the whole web stack, including protocols and web server optimization techniques.
Experience of troubleshooting in a fast pace and production environment.
Strong sense of web design and attuned to the fundamentals of user experience."
Frontend Developer (React),"Skillset (Must have)
Experience in SPA framework to combine multiple frameworks on the same page without refreshing the page ideally using React.
Experience in multiple single-page application living at different URLs using NPM or Bower components for shared functionality.
Experience in different approaches like Micro-frontend.
Proficient using Component Libraries depending on the stack of the main application for different components and app sections.
Experience in aligning modularization with domains (Domain Driven Design).
Proficient in Micro-services modules like Service Registry, Service Discovery, Composition/ Orchestration/ Transformation, Monitoring, Load Balancing and Scaling, High Availability and Failover, Governance.
Proficient in Object oriented typescript and Frontend frameworks like Facade, Mediator, etc.
Proficient in AWS CloudFront/Docker.
Skillsets (Good to have)
Python"
"Software Engineer $3,500 - $6,000 (East)","Location: East (Near Kembangan & Bedok MRT)
Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain AccessMatrix product suite to provide strong authentication, Single Sign-On (SSO), and authorization solution to enterprises
Provide training for professional service team on AccessMatrix product features
Third level support to assist customer service and professional service teams to troubleshoot and solve customer issues
Requirements
Proficient in Java programming with 2 years of related working experience
Entry Level with Degree in IT/Computer or equivalent are welcome to apply.
Possessing deep understanding in object oriented programming
Possessing deep understanding in database (RDBMS) design
Experience in developing web app by using Java technology (e.g. Servlet, JDBC)
Experience in developing concurrent server side app with Java
Possessing knowledge of enterprise servers, e.g. Websphere, Weblogic, Tomcat
Possessing knowledge of directory server, e.g. ActiveDirectory
Possessing knowledge of enterprise communication protocol, e.g. SOAP, XMLRPC and Restful API
Possessing knowledge of security concept, or identity and access management, or cryptography protocol
Knowing security-related standards, e.g. SAML, OAuth, OpenID Connect, OATH, is a plus
Knowing GWT/AngularJS framework is a plus
Knowing DDD pattern is a plus
Having some working experience with .NET is a plus
Tan Li Lian
EA 01C3135
Reg R1100465"
Backend Software Engineer - Application Security #WorkNow,"Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
The security team at ByteDance is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve large-scale distributed software
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables
Qualifications:
BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with 3+ year of work experience
Excellent programming, debugging, and optimization skills in general purpose programming languages
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
Experience working with two or more from the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, mobile application development, distributed and parallel systems, developing large software systems, and/or security software development
Preferred Requirements:
Master/PhD degree, further education or 3-4 plus years of working experience preferred in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, C#, Objective C, Python, JavaScript, or Go
Experience dealing with production issues at scale"
URGENT / Software Engineer (Fab Support) (Java / Manufacturing Industry / CIM / MES),"Job Description:
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error / cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirement:
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent fields with at least 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is a plus
Successful candidate will have opportunity to work in our new facility and to be trained and worked overseas for a period of time
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please click on send your latest resume in MS WORD format to ref19(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Lim Dick Sern (Dick Sern)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22106832"
Senior Software Engineer (embedded C++),"My client is a Global Leader in the Semiconductor industry. They are currently looking to expand the Singapore office and would like to bring in talented Senior Software Engineers.
You will be working on the software design, development and requirement analysis of semiconductor equipment. You will also be interacting closely with other engineering functions to enable system level performance meeting product requirement specification.
Requirements
Min Bachelor in Electrical Engineering/Computer Science.
Min 3 years of hands-on development experience
Proficient in C++
Good knowledge in RTOS and OOP
Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Hudson's personal information and privacy policy. Please submit your application using the appropriate link below or email your CV in Microsoft Word format to shayna.chan@hudson.com.
Shayna Chan Sheng Hui
Reg. #: R1980684
Hudson Global Resources (Singapore) Pte Ltd
EA Licence #: 18S9265"
Software Engineer (Global Network) - Global Payments,"Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for all our international product lines, such as TikTok, Helo, Games, Education, etc.
The Global Network team in Global Payments ensures a stable, professional and efficient overseas payment solution, helping businesses to unblock payment channels and effectively assisting overseas business and product expansion. This includes tasks such as building general service capabilities, payment instruction orchestration engine, etc.
Responsibilities:
Develop high-quality software design and architecture;
Identify, prioritise and execute tasks in the software development life cycle;
Develop tools and applications by producing clean, efficient code;
Automate tasks through appropriate tools and scripting;
Review and debug code; Perform validation and verification testing;
Collaborate with internal teams and external vendors to fix and improve our products;
Document development phases and monitor systems;
Ensure software is up-to-date with latest technologies
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline, or equivalent practical experience;
At least 3 years of working experience;
Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages, such as Java/Go/C++/C#/Python;
Excellent proficiency in backend server development and expertise in relational database;
Strong analytical thinking and exceptional attention to details.
ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Operations Engineer (Database Administrator),"Do you have a strong passion for solving technical problems? Join us and be part of the family that believes in good software design, delivering quality well tested solutions. Help establish Ufinity as the trusted partner by constantly achieving a pinnacle of excellence in our ideas, solutions and services.
Role Responsibilities: 
Responsible for implementation and performance of Cloud databases 
Investigate, analyse, and resolve Cloud database related issues 
Work closely with application support team, and system administrator to ensure appropriate and efficient running of Cloud databases 
Performance tuning of database queries, and database configuration for optimal performance and resource utilization 
Administer and upkeep Cloud databases to keep them up to date with latest updates / patches 
Performing SQL data patches, upgrading, and migration 
Role Requirements: 
Possess good analytical and problem-solving skills 
Experience in administration of MySQL / PostgreSQL / Oracle SQL Database (Cloud or on-premises) 
Experience with database performance tuning and optimization, database errors diagnostic and troubleshooting, and database access management. 
Experience with AWS Cloud Architecture is a bonus 
A team player who takes ownership 
Ability to work under pressure and meet tight deadlines 
Able to work in projects independently as well as with teams 
Must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Post Graduate Diploma/ Professional Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent."
Senior Software Engineer (Python),"Responsibilities:
Design, build and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable Python code
Building and maintaining applications and APIs primarily using Flask and Django frameworks
Understand requirements to deliver solutions against existing standards and practices
Help maintain code quality, organization, and automatization
Work closely with other Developers and QA’s to verify functionality and use of systems
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical discipline
2 years of development experience with Python
Experience with at least one web framework such as Django or Flask
Experience in designing and implementing REST APIs
Comprehensive understanding of continuous integration and continuous delivery (CI/CD) tools and systems
Familiar with any relational databases (SQL queries, migrations, optimization)
EA License Number: 11C3017
EA Personnel Number: R1982007"
Software Engineer (TikTok Engineering Event Hiring) #Immediate,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
TikTok is one of the fastest-growing apps in the world, and we are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues a healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users enjoy their time on TikTok, earn trust in privacy protection, and more.
You will:
Plan and lead large-scale technical projects to lay the foundation for the iterative development and scale of early products
Develop robust, efficient technology products that serve 1 billion users
Contribute to engineering strategy, tooling, processes, and culture
Research and apply cutting-edge domain and technical knowledge into products
Qualifications:
BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major with minimum 2 years of experience
Experience in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications will be advantageous
Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
Deep understanding of computer architecture, data structures and algorithms In depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka
Able to work closely with diverse stakeholders and have good communication skills
Self-driven, positive, cooperative and willing to keep learning enthusiasm at all times
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Software Engineer (C#/ .NET/ Oil&Gas),"Software Engineer 
Location: Benoi
Industry : Oil & Gas
Company Transport Provided (Boon Lay)
Salary Up to $7000 depending on experience
AWS + VB
Responsibilities:
Design and develop C# code for acquisition and control software applications on Windows 10.
Test software modules or components following prescribed methods.
Troubleshooting and root cause analysis.
Collaboration with other development teams.
Learn Well Service domain knowledge and provide support to field operation
Draft user manual
Requirements:
Bachelor’s and/or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or Electrical Engineering.
Experienced with C#, .NET, Windows Presentation Foundation (WPF)
Experience with source control (Git and/or VS TFS)
Experience with Siemens/NI PLC.
Knowledge of networking and communication protocols
Knowledge of acquisition, control and automation
If you possess relevant skillsets, do apply with an updated CV in word format.
We shall contact shortlisted candidates.
Apple Lim Pey Chyi
Personnel Reg No: R2090579
EA Licence No: 02C3423"
Technical Lead,"About the company
We are the leading robotics and automation company that was founded by a team of senior level executives from Fortune 500 companies. We built and commercialized the robotic solutions and used by clients in the F&B industry.

About the job
You main objective is to scale the team and software business unit. As the Head of Development, you will be responsible for all internet related platforms including web, mobile and app development according to business requirements. Our core digital products include our custom CMS, ERP platform, digital ordering touchpoints like consumer facing apps, mini apps, H5, Ordering Kiosks and POS system etc.

About the manager/team
You will be required to lead a team and reporting into the CEO

Skills and experience required
You will need to have min bachelor's degree in computer science or related fields. Other requirements are as follow:
High proficiency in MS Azure and it's various offerings
Understanding of both serverless and traditional full-stack architectures
Advanced level (knowledge and experience) of programming languages and methodologies
Advanced level of working understanding of HTML5 and CSS3 as well as previous iterations of these languages
Experience developing .NET Core APIs
Strong experience in building products and applications covering responsive front end to robust backend
Strong experience in building RESTFul APIs.
Strong proficiency with SQL and its variation among popular databases (MS SQL)
Experience with various CMS, CRM, ERP, integrations with Payment Gateways
To apply online please use the 'apply' function, alternatively you may send your CV to steve at steve.ling(@)randstad.com.sg
(EA: 94C3609/ R1332781 )
Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
"Software Engineer (Distributed KV / Caching System), Cloud Infrastructure #Urgent","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.
Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!
Responsibilities:
Responsible for the R&D of Redis, self-developed KV (with extremely high availability and strong consistency two areas), and self-developed cache system to ensure that the system is stable, low latency, high availability, and easy to scale under extremely high concurrent access scenarios;
In-depth understanding of the storage requirements of business scenarios, responsible for the transformation and optimisation of middleware, and complete the platform of services;
Responsible for the R&D of K8s Operator and related platforms for Cloud Native and Cloud Based Scenarios.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's/Master's Degree in Computer Science or related major;
Familiar with Linux operating system principles, familiar with common network, multi-threading, IO system development;
Seasoned software development skill in at least one general purpose programming language on Linux, such as C/C++/Go/Python;
Familiar with Memcache, Redis, Scylladb, Leveldb/Rocksdb, Cassandra, WiredTiger, TiKV, etc.;
Experience with reading relevant code implementations and contributing to relevant open source projects is preferred;
Good sense of responsibility, team work and communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in kernel and operating system development;
Experience in Large-scale platform development using C ++/Golang;
Experience in virtualization, Openstack, K8S and other related systems' R&D."
"Software Developer(.NET), Pasir Ris (Ref: JL30)","MNC
Entry Level role
5 Days Work Week
Responsibilities:
Designs, modifies, develops, writes and implements software programming applications and components.
Supports and/or installs software applications and components.
Works from written specifications and pre-established guidelines to perform the functions of the job
Maintains documentation of process flow.
Utilize established development tools, guidelines and conventions including but not limited to 
Visual Studio, ASP.NET, SQL Server, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and C#/VB.NET
Create and deliver data-driven reports
Design, code and test software applications
Enhance existing systems by analysing business objectives, preparing an action plan and identifying areas for modification and improvement
Maintain existing software systems by identifying and correcting software defects
Investigate and develop skills in new technologies
Create technical specifications and test plans
Create new and extend existing operational documentation
Work closely with the management related to projects and tasks
Other ad-hoc duties as assigned
Requirements:
Hands on experience with Visual Studio, ASP.NET, SQL Server, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and C#/VB.NET
5 days’ work week (Monday to Friday, 8.30am-6pm)
Salary: up to $3000
Able to start work immediately or on short notice
How to apply:
Interested applicants kindly state your Expected salary, Last drawn salary and Starting date.
*We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
EA Personnel: Joanna Leow Jiayi
EA Reg ID: R1871786
EA Licence No.:19C9603"
Software Engineer,"SENIOR / SOFTWARE ENGINEER (Machine Vision/Semiconductor/ Image Processing) 
Our client is a leading organisation specialised in developing Semiconductor machines and Machine Vision. One of their divisions currently has opening for Senior / Software Engineer (Vision Department)
Responsibilities
Design and develop PC based automated vision inspection system for automation machines. Develop image processing algorithms.
Continuous improvements on existing and new products
Support fieldwork to upgrade and resolve customer issues
Requirements
Masters/Bachelor Degree in Electrical and Electronic Engineering or Computer Science
1-5 years relevant Computer Vision and Image processing experience.
Experience in 3D Vision techniques, GUI design and Computer Graphic would be a distinct advantage
Proficient in C++ Programming Language and Windows programming skill
A good team player with good interpersonal communication skills
Senior position is available for candidates with more years of experiences.
Interested candidates, please e-mail resume in Word document (indicating your current salary and expected salary) to:
Joey
Recruitment Manager
FA Search Pte. Ltd.
120 Robinson Road #15-01 Singapore 068913
Reg : R1103523
Licencee No: 07C4794"
"Software Engineer, Recommendation Architecture #Urgent","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About The Team
Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.
Responsibilities - What You'll Do
Build and maintain high performance online services for recommendation system；
Build extremely efficient and reliable data pipelines for candidates generation, profile generation, training examples generation, realtime online training, etc;
Build globalized large-scale recommendation system;
Design and develop high performance computing frameworks and storage systems.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields,
Experience building scalable system;
Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang;
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive;
Experience in at least one area of the following areas: personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks is a plus.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Backend Software Engineer, Machine Learning Systems","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
Join the Dynamic Team!
As part of the machine learning system team, you will build up the advanced system, combining high performance compute, networking, and storage into the powerful computing cluster. Our mission is to provide ML system and platform to help the research scientists and engineers improve our products and experiences.
Develop and maintain the machine learning system and platform, including training, inference, pipeline orchestration, to support core products;
Build the large scale systems for ML integrating with GPU, RDMA network and storage system;
Enrich the end to end machine learning experience, and provide machine learning resources for all the products of TikTok and its affiliates.
Qualifications
To be successful in this role, you have
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, Engineering or related fields.
Programming experience with at least one modern language such as C/C++, Golang, Python
Experience contributing to the large scale distributed systems, multi-tenant systems (architecture, reliability and scaling)
Experience contributing to Kubernetes / Kubeflow / YARN / Mesos orchestrations
Strong analytical abilities and problem solving
Good communication, self-motivation, engineering practice, documentation, etc.
Preferred
Familiar with GPU architecture, GPU cluster
Familiar with at least one deep learning framework (TensorFlow, PyTorch, MXNet, or other)
Familiar with the back-end technologies, such as Django / Flask, etc.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Mobile Tech Lead (iOS/Android), TikTok Live #WorkNow","Responsibilities
TikTok is a true phenomenal app in the world. Our mission is to help live streamers connect users and inspire user interaction in real-time around the world. We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build up and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming at TikTok. We will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features, and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for live streamers and viewers.
We are looking for tech leads with experience in user interfaces, infrastructure, and/or tools supporting applications on the mobile platform including iOS and Android devices.
You will:
Work closely with our product and design teams to build new and innovative application experiences for mobile platforms
Lead complex technical or product efforts involving many engineers
Provide technical guidance and mentorship to peers
Improve engineering architecture, processes, frameworks and tools to increase team & developer effectiveness
Qualifications:
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with 6+ years of working experience in mobile development (iOS/Android).
Proficient in Java or Kotlin on Android, or Objective-C or Swift on iOS
Past experience of leading an agile developer team, with a great track record of delivering key technologies facilitating the growth of a sizable business.
Have critical thoughts about the business, be able to abstract business problems and propose technical development directions and technical propositions.
Strong ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Backend Software Engineer, TikTok Content Discovery (Location)","Responsibilities
TikTok is one of the fastest growing apps in the world, and we are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users enjoy their time on TikTok, earn trust in privacy protection, and more.
TikTok Location Team's goal is to deliver user-facing products based on the location that connects people with places, localized content, and service in the real world around the globe.
Develop large-scale software systems that power TikTok app.
Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the product.
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high quality work in rapid product development.
Qualifications
BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Have good team communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer / Developer (In house,.NET, Jurong MRT, MNC, Good benefits!)","ob Details
Perm role with comprehensive benefits (14 days of Annual leaves, AWS, Bonus, birthday voucher, medical, dental optical etc)
Monday to Friday, Office hours
5-7 min walking distance from the MRT station / Transport provided -pick up at JE MRT
Listed Company
Reporting to Senior IT Manager
Responsibilities
Daily Support for AilisXe & nSolution
Develop new application using Microsoft platform (vb.net or c#) for WMS(Warehouse Management System) and TMS(Transportation Management System)
EDI Development between Customer System and in-house System
Provide daily support for in-house system
Implement and deliver SCM project development with Open Source
Transforming legacy systems from .Net to Java technologies
Liaise with business analysts for clarification and understanding of requirements
Requirements:
Min 2-3 years of working experience in .NET technology (ASP.NET, C#, C#.Net, MVC, VB.NET, ASP, IIS, web service etc.)
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
Experience in Microsoft SQL Server, hands-on experience in writing Stored Procedures, Functions, etc.
Knowledge of HTML / CSS / AJAX / JQuery and other client or server-based web tools
Good working knowledge of MSSQL (Store Procedure, Complex reporting Query)
Experienced in full software development lifecycle; requirements analysis, design, development, testing, implementation
How to Apply:
Interested candidates, please submit your updated resume in MSWORD format by using Apply Now button or email
to melissa(at)alignrecruitment.com.sg
Align Recruitment Pte Ltd (20C0253)
Tee Siew Mei (Reg No: R1219651)"
System Analyst,"Reporting to the IT Manager, you will be part of a team of passionate professionals working to provide an excellent and innovative IT environment for our businesses.
Responsibilities:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to support new business initiatives
Involve in the software development life cycle
Provide application support to end users
Enhance existing applications/systems
Prepare technical documentation and training materials for reference
Requirements:
Degree/ Diploma in Computer Science or equivalent
At least 3 years' experience preferred
Good knowledge in web development using ASP.NET, javascript, HTML, CSS and Web API, MVC framework or other web design framework
Experience in relational database
Expertise in programming and debugging
Experience in web security will be added advantage
Effective verbal and written communication skills
Employment Perks
Flexible Work Arrangements
Flexible Benefits (Dental, Optical, Health Screening etc)
Flexi leave (Family Care Leave, Birthday Leave etc)
Group Insurances"
Hardware/Software Engineer (Product Testing),"You are our product validator. You will work closely with our product design team to ensure that our software and/or hardware products meet their specifications in terms of functionality, performance and quality.
If the product behaves unexpectedly, you will analyse and troubleshoot the failures. As our products are deeply embedded, you may find yourself challenged to work in situations with minimal observability and control.
Responsibilities
Work with the product design team to determine product test parameters
Prepare test plans and create test cases for the product(s), including performance tests
Design and write test programs in C/C++
Define system requirements for in-house test jigs, where applicable
Troubleshoot and analyse product failures, and streamline testing procedures
Conduct quality assurance testing
Build and run automated tests using automated test tools
Prepare test procedures for technicians to follow
Train technicians to follow test procedures and provide technical support when needed
Ensure all tests and procedures meet company and industry standards
Write test reports for submission to management / and or customer
Liaise with external vendors for externally conducted tests such as EMI / EMC, environmental tests
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in electrical engineering, software engineering, computer science, or computer engineering
At least 1 year work experience as a test engineer, testing hardware and/or software
Familiarity with hardware/and or software testing tools
Skilled in C/C++ programming or other programming language
Extensive knowledge of engineering and testing procedures
Good problem-solving skills, with attention to detail
Keen to find bugs
Willingness to perform repeated tests when necessary
 Ability to troubleshoot and think out of the box
 Ability to work independently and with a team
High-level technical writing skills
Advantageous to have
Knowledge and experience in product development and/or software development life cycles
Familiarity using Linux for software development
Experience in test automation tools"
"Senior/Software Engineer (Central, up to 5k)","Your Role
We are looking for a passionate Software Engineer to design, develop and install software solutions. SINGAPOREAN only may apply.
What Will You Do
Work with a small team of developers to deliver the modules to develop web-based application systems.
Manage the user-requirements gathering process.
Participate in the design and development of web applications based on company’s product (J2EE-based).
Assist in the user acceptance testing process.
Implement, customize, test, document, and maintain software applications.
Ensure that the modules delivered are according to the specifications and are of high quality.
What Do We Want
A Degree/Diploma in Computer Science.
Technical skills include proven object-oriented programming experience with Java and C++ together with extensive RDBMS through JDBC.
Experience in J2EE, Web Services, and XML will be advantageous.
Experience in Elixir reporting solutions will be advantageous.
Knowledge in SQL.
Good interpersonal & communication skills
What Will You Get In Return
You will be given exposure to a hold a key position in a growing organization with attractive rewards and a wide range of benefits. You will entitle a Gross salary up to S$5000 + attractive perks."
Application Developer,"Job Requirements
· At least 2+ years of experience in web and software application development
· Experience using .NET framework 4.5+, Visual studio 2013 and above
· Strong knowledge in MVC 5.2 and above
· Experience in developing ASP.NET MVC applications
· Experience in developing .NET Windows application
· Proficient knowledge in MSSQL and Oracle 11g & 12c
· Familiarity with DevOps is a plus
· Experience in using Continuous Integration tools and Source controls is added advantage
· Writing scripts in PowerShell, VB Script and Macro are added advantage
· Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively"
"Software Engineer, Ads Infrastructure #Immediate","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
TikTok is one of the fastest growing apps in the world, and wer're looking for Software Engineers to join our Ads Infra team. The Ads Infra team uses state-of-the-art ads delivery architectures and cutting-edge machine learning algorithms to optimize every impression on TikTok platform for both our users and advertisers.
What You'll Do:
Build delivery services for TikTok Ads, including ads targeting, indexing, recall, click and convert prediction, bidding, auction, mixed ranking of ads and organic results, etc.
Build deep learning solutions for TikTok ads ranking, including building training examples, realtime online training, deep models inference, model based retrieval, etc.
Build service frameworks with highest performance and availability.
Build globalized ads system across multiple data centers intercontinental.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields.
Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang.
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experienced in at least one area of the following areas: Ads delivery, personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks."
Principal Product Owner,"Role & Responsibilities
Overlook multiple product scrum teams and be a mentor to junior product owners
Responsible for and drive strategy and direction of digital products
Lead and guide a SCRUM team of UI/UX Designers, Development Engineers, and QA Engineers to groom a comprehensive backlog of features and user stories throughout the product development life cycle
Understand our customers’ or internal users' needs and goals and then translate them into product roadmaps, including definition and prioritization of requirements, features, and functionality
Question and challenge assumptions to ensure that we’re solving the right problems
Job Requirements
More than 4 years of Product Owner or related experience (Product Management, project management, vendor management)
Experience in Agile (Scrum) methodology
Bilingual in English and Mandarin to speak to internal and external stakeholders
Experience in software development full cycle
Familiar with design principles of Mobile or Web applications
Familiar with scrum and agile methodologies, and can lead teams to follow the agile principles
Strong leadership characterization, and can lead the product direction and lead the team
Strong ownership characterization, and can proactively take responsibilities
Strong stress resistance capability, and can hold the position when facing the challenges
Humble, and open to constructive and proactive feedback to continuously improve the products
Strong coordination, skills and be able to communicate effectively and comfortably with team members
Strong analytical, detail-oriented, and solid problem-solving skills
Fast learner and passion for new technologies
Advantageous if the successful candidate has:
Experience in the Internet of Things
Experience in Artificial Intelligence
Experience in JIRA and Confluence
Bachelor Degree in Business, Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields"
"Software Engineer (RPC Framework / Service Mesh), Cloud Infrastructure #Urgent","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Microservice Framework team focuses on in-depth research on programming languages, RPC frameworks, and high-performance middleware. We provide the company with research and development frameworks, high-performance middleware, service mesh, and unified SOA Governance platforms. Among them, the Golang framework (KiteX) has been applied to tens of thousands of services carrying over billions of QPS in total and is at the forefront of the industry in terms of performance and scalability. Service Mesh and our traffic management platforms cover most of the company's businesses.
Responsibilities:
Design and develop microservice RPC frameworks for Golang/Java/Python/Rust;
Design and develop our Service Mesh system;
Design and develop our traffic management platforms.
Qualifications:
Proficient in one or more programming languages such as Golang/Java/Python/Rust;
Strong interest in technologies such as RPC frameworks/Service Mesh/traffic management systems;
In-depth understanding of RPC principles and frameworks such as gRPC/bRPC/dubbo/thrift;
In-depth understanding of the key areas of microservice governance and its implementation.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in contributing to open source projects;
Practical experience with Service Mesh systems."
Software Engineer (Java),"At Worldline, our technology addresses persistent challenges of the payment world. We design and operate leading digital payment and transactional solutions that enable sustainable economic growth and reinforce trust and security in our societies. If you are a highly skilled software engineer then get ready to join our company!
We have many hardworking and dedicated peers that would love for you to work with them. We are committed to continuous improvement. We are always looking for new and innovative ways to improve quality, reduce costs, build excellent solutions, and grow customer happiness. We would like to welcome an organized, innovative and process driven colleague to our team.
Job Responsibilities:
Understand customer requirements and provide the corresponding solutions
Collaborate designers to iterate on the design and implementation of product
Build efficient and reusable front-end systems and abstractions
Responsible for development and maintenance of key system features
Able to work in team to investigate design approaches, new technology prototypes and evaluate technical feasibility
Willing to take on additional responsibility to ensure team success and quality solutions.
Have initiative and leadership to lead the project to run within timeline
Ensure software quality by writing the automated unit test
Coordinate and execute pilots, prototypes and POCs while validating business enhancements
Ability to multitask across different projects
Job Requirements:
Able to learn and pick up all GPL (General Purpose Language) such as Java, Kotlin, Typescript/Javascript.
Good in Functional Reactive Programming model
Good knowledge in HTTP Web Application Development and Batch Program Development
Proficiency in Web Application Frameworks such as Spring, Spring Boot.
Proficiency in Batch Program Framework such as Spring Batch
Familiar with most of the application/transportation protocol such as REST, SOAP, JMS, gRPC and TCP Familiar with Single Page Application Framework such as Angular, React or VueJS
Able to adapt to Agile Development methodology with good practical skill in Test-Driven Development Familiar with Security Knowledge Framework such as OWASP
Familiar with implementation of Authentication/Authorization (OAuth2, Stateful, Stateless, Single-Sign-On)
Familiar with reporting tool like JasperReport
Minimum 2 years of development experience
More reasons to join us
What’s more, we really value Innovation, Cooperation, Excellence and Empowerment. These values are reflected on our daily work. This is the core of our organization. At Worldline our top priority is to engage, encourage and develop you to help you improve your potential. In fact, we have comprehensive training and development programs in place demonstrating our dedication to developing your career.
Our success comes from strong skills, new insights, diverse points of view and the energy of all Worldliners. Not only do they represent the Heart and Face of our company, they are also key players in our success. We make leading our talents a major asset in the success of our business."
"Frontend Software Engineer, TikTok","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Singapore, Beijing, Shanghai, Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.
About the Team:
The TikTok Fundamental team will focus on frontend development. We will also focus on understanding our users, identifying opportunity areas, prioritizing the problems we must solve, and rapidly creating innovative user experience solutions. We are looking for experienced frontend engineers to develop web/hybrid applications.
Responsibilities:
Responsible for the frontend development of the TikTok fundamentals business, including but not limited to the product for users, our middle platform and operating platform
Responsible for the development of various client scenarios in TikTok, including but not limited to WebApp, Hybrid dynamic scenarios, etc.
Realize with high-quality design and code to create the ultimate user experience for TikTok.
Take the lead on the exploration of new and efficient front-end development models to ensure R&D efficiency and delivery quality.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
3+ years experience in developing frontend web applications, with proven experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
Experience in solving browser compatibility issues and optimizing front-end performance.
Good understanding of business, technical abstraction and system module design.
Great to have hybrid development experience.
Great to have large-scale website architecture experience."
"Software Engineer / Full Stack Developer ( WFH | C#, SQL, React JS | Agile Software | up to $6K )","Working days: 5days
Working hours: 9.30am-6.30pm
Salary: $3500-$6000
Location: Pasir Panjang (Office) | WFH Basis
Software Engineer / Software Developer / Full Stack Developer / Frontend Developer / IT Engineer / Software Designer / Project Engineer 
Requirements:
Relevant working experience.
Responsibilities:
Creating multi-tiered Web applications and Mobile App applications
Familiar with Agile Software Development / Scrum practices
Analyze, design, program, test, troubleshoot, document and maintain IT systems or applications
Perform and manage stages of the SDLC and involvement in systems review with Project Manager
Provide maintenance support to customers (internal and/or external)
Opportunity to involve in various technologies: Signal R, Redis, MongoDB, Reactive Extension (Rx)
Other adhoc duties as assigned"
Senior/Junior Product Consultant,"Business Profile Description
This department will support the sales team to support new applications, recommending products and solutions to customer's enquiries, conduct any necessary proof-of-concept evaluation and orgainze the result to convince the customer to use our solution.
This group of engineers will interface between the customers and internal R&D teams to work out an optimized solution for the customer's application.
Job Description
Provide recommendation and consultation to Akribis sales team and customers for Akribis’ core products, including motors, controllers and drives, encoders and sensors, modules and stages, vision systems, etc.
Conduct evaluation and proof of concept for customers, whenever necessary.
Prepare and conduct product/application demo, visit customers and answering any technical questions they may have.
Provide training to customer.
Review and guide the development of product manual and application notes for new products/applications
Overseas travel is required with a short notice period.
Qualifications
Degree in Mechanical/Electrical/Mechatronic Engineering with at least 2 years of relevant experience.
Having control related work experience or education background.
At least 2 year(s) of working experience in selling and supporting motion control products like motors, encoders, controller, drivers and stages.
Strong interest in motion control and factory automation applications, robotics, etc.
Deep involvement in Singapore Robotics Games or other international robotics games can be considered as relevant working experience.
Other Information
Skillset(s) Requirement:
Possess a strong interest in using motion control and/or factory automation products.
Able to continuously learn new products, understanding their advantages and disadvantages in detail, to provide sound recommendations to customers.
Good interpersonal skills and able to interface with all levels, internally and externally, in a professional and responsive manner.
Attributes:
Independent learner
Good communicator
Systematic and organized
Job Highlights:
AWS
OT Pay
Flexi Benefits
5-days work week (8.30am to 6pm)"
"Frontend Software Engineer, TikTok e-Commerce #Immediate","Responsibilities
The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.
You will:
Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications for e-Commerce products.
Code optimisation to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications.
Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
Experience in frontend engineering experience, with demonstrable experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility.
Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process.
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
IT Software Engineer,"Duties and responsibilities
• Work with project team members to design algorithms and flowcharts
• Troubleshoot, debug and upgrade existing software
• Support applications in production – analyse and resolve issues as they arise
• Write well designed, testable, efficient code by using best software development practices
• Integrate data from various back-end services and databases
• Gather and refine specifications and requirements based on technical needs
• Create and maintain software documentation
Qualifications
• At least 2 years or relevant experience in Web Application Development
• Candidate must possess at least a Diploma in Software Engineering or equivalent to be considered
• Familiarity with programming languages using NodeJS & Angular/JS, HTML5, CSS and JavaScript consuming RESTful APIs and Json
• Good software tools experience e.g. GitHub, Docker
• LINUX and Windows operating systems development experience
• Familiarity with Azure, AWS
Monday - Friday: 8.30am to 6.15pm"
Big Data Software Engineer - Singapore,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
With the enormous growth of live streaming in recent years, our mission is to inspire real-time interactions and help live streamers connect to people from all corners of the globe.
We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming in TikTok. You will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for all live streamers and audience alike.
Responsibilities
Work with product managers and data analysts to design data-related products.
Communicate with stakeholders to collect data requirements and drive related projects.
Design the architecture for systems, services and pipelines to ensure high stability, reliability and data consistency.
Work closely with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high quality work in rapid product development.
Qualifications
BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
Experienced working with big data technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Spark, etc.
Familar with common SQL/NoSQL databases such as MySQL, Redis, etc.
Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Have good team communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
NLP Engineer - AI Lab #Urgent,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About The Team
Our NLP team focuses on solving language barriers and promoting information flowing all over the world. We invite researchers and engineers in machine learning and natural language processing at all levels. We aim at pushing the limits of machine intelligence.
Responsibilities:
Responsible for development of NLP technologies in our products
Participate in and support the incubation of new NLP technologies
Participate in research on NLP technologies
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields
Rich experiences and strong skills in development of technologies in some of the following areas:
Natural language understanding
Natural language generation
Knowledge and reasoning
Recommendation and search
Reinforcement learning
Deep learning and representation learning
Machine Translation
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong computer science and coding skills (e.g. Python/Java/Go/C/C++);
Work and collaborate well with team members;
Senior candidates have the ability to organize and lead teams and projects.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Software Engineer - Creator Platform #WorkNow,"Software Engineer - Creator Platform
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The TikTok Account team provides identity and access related services to TikTok and TikTok ecosystem businesses (Ecommerce, Business, Music, Live). We are building Account as a foundation service to empower business innovations.
As a product and platform team, we build robust and reliable systems to facilitate the company's various directions, also proactively facilitate user account access growth and security. We are facing engineering challenges across scalability, reliability, security and system performance, as well as a wide variety of business challenges.
On this team, you're a big-picture thinker and strategic team-player with a passion for doing what’s right.
Responsibilities:
Design, test, deploy and maintain backend services and core components of distributed systems.
Conduct system designs and code reviews.
Collaborate with other engineering teams to elevate technology and consistently apply best practices.
Constantly evaluate and improve efficiency, scalability, and stability of our systems.
Qualifications:
BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related areas.
3+ years experience in one or more programming languages such as Go, Java, C++, Python etc.
Abilities to quickly ramp up on new technologies, tools and domain knowledge.
Experience in backend server development and database solutions.
Good problem-solving, analytical thinking capabilities and exceptional attention to details.
Good communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer (Global Distributed Table Storage), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.
You will be responsible for the technical research and development of our self-developed global distributed table system (ByteTable) and open source HBase products. We are committed to building a globalized, high-performance, low-cost, and cloud native distributed table system to provide rich features for our applications.
Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!
Responsibilities
Responsible for the design, development, performance tuning, new technology research, etc. of the distributed table system;
According to the needs of the business, design and improve the form system in terms of stability, function, performance, etc.;
Formulate development goals according to the project schedule, write detailed design documents and be responsible for module implementation, performance tuning, and functional testing;
Provide timely technical support for our online applications, extract potential needs and points of optimization from it, and continuously optimize the system.
Qualifications
Bachelor's/Master's Degree in Computer Science or related major;
Familiar with C++/Java program development (at least one), pursue high-quality code and focused on code engineering quality;
Solid knowledge of Linux system, proficient in multi-threading, network programming, and distributed development in any language;
In-depth understanding of database principles, proficient in key technologies of distributed storage and computing, and have practical experience with them;
Good at independent thinking, able to find problems proactively, and have systematic problem analysis and problem solving skills.
Preferred Qualifications
- Active contributors to the open source community are preferred;
- Familiarity with open source code such as RocksDB, HBase, TiDB, CockroachDB, ClickHouse, ScyllaDB, etc. is preferred;
- Familiar with consistency protocols such as Paxos and Raft is preferred;
- Learning, exploration and research capabilities in lesser known fields is preferred."
"Software Engineer (Global Network), Global Payments","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
Why Join Us
At ByteDance, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for millions of users across all of our products. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at ByteDance.
The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for all our international product lines, such as TikTok, Helo, Games, Education, etc.
The Global Network team in Global Payments ensures a stable, professional and efficient overseas payment solution, helping businesses to unblock payment channels and effectively assisting overseas business and product expansion. This includes tasks such as building general service capabilities, payment instruction orchestration engine, etc.
Responsibilities:
Develop high-quality software design and architecture;
Identify, prioritise and execute tasks in the software development life cycle;
Develop tools and applications by producing clean, efficient code;
Automate tasks through appropriate tools and scripting;
Collaborate with internal teams and external vendors to fix and improve our products;
Document development phases and monitor systems;
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline, or equivalent practical experience;
Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages, such as Java/Go/C++/C#/Python;
Excellent proficiency in backend server development and expertise in relational database;
Strong analytical thinking and exceptional attention to details.
ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.
#LI-KL5"
R&D EDA Software Engineer(Electrical/ C++),"Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail, and supply chain.
We are currently looking to hire for R&D Engineer (EDA/ C++). This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.
Job Responsibilities:
·       Research, design, and implement EDA software for Signal Integrity applications
·       Technically lead teams to deliver quality products on time following the Agile software development process.
·       Be the technical lead for a fully Agile software development team in a geographically distributed organization
·       Collaborate with multi-functional product development teams to deliver solutions that enhance and complement our overall Signal Integrity EDA flow.
·       Lead by example and help grow a high-performance team and nurture a culture in software organization of quality, ownership, collaboration, continuous improvement, and data-driven decision making.
·       Provide technical support to key customers
·       Make technical presentation to senior management
·       Research problems discovered by QA or Customers and provide products fixes
·       Work independently with minimal supervision and may take on some planning and mentoring responsibilities.
·       Perform complex development activities, including the design, implementation, maintenance, testing and documentation of software modules and sub-systems
Experience:
·       BS/MS/PhD in or EE
·       4+yrs of hands-on experience in complex C/C++ software development in a role such as a software architect or senior software engineer
·       Expert working knowledge of C++ and OOP
·       Excellent oral and verbal communication skills
·       Experience in modeling of signal and power delivery channels, and/or experience working on developing Analog EDA software tools
·       Experience in analysis of high-speed serial and/or DDR channels
·       Great team player and willing to take on a variety of projects, customer issues, and quality fixes
·       Solid understanding of Jenkins CI/CD development flows and impact of DevOps on architecture
·       Passion for crafting efficient and reusable code
WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online. Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.
CONSULTANT DETAILS
Consultant Name: Prathiksha Shetty
Reg No: R1765546 
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy."
"Frontend Developer(ReactJs),Trading","Frontend Developer (ReactJs), Trading Application

Description

My client is one of the world largest trading and mining company. They are looking for a frontend engineer to be part of the digital application team and build commodities trading application.

Responsibilities

You will be involved in the entire software development lifecycle, from conception to completion. You will be responsible to build efficient, reusable and high-quality front-end systems for trading and risk management. You will be able to translate user requirements into high-quality code. You will be building reusable components and front-end libraries for future.

Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of solid experience in ReactJS and experience in React workflows (Flux/Redux)
Familiarity with RESTful APIs/GraphQL APIs
Experienced in using and configure CI/CD pipelines is a plus
Possess strong attention to detail and take pride in delivering high-quality work in a timely manner
To Apply

For interested candidates, please send your CV to ya@kerryconsulting.com. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Registration No: R1988390

Licence No: 16S8060"
Software Engineer (C# & VB.net),"Job Description
Responsibilities:
·         Develop new application using Microsoft platform (vb.net or c#)
·         Develop and support new / existing applications using .NET and SQL
·         Update processes and documentation
·         To gather and analyze users / business requirements
·         Perform change request at existing application to meet customer's requirements
·         Assist in new project development management and existing system maintenance management
Requirements:
·         Diploma in Computer Science/ Information Technology or equivalent
·         Min 3 years of relevant working experience
·         Keen in logistics IT system development
·         Experienced in software product development
·         Strong knowledge in Programming skills in ASP.Net, VB.Net, C#.Net,
Advanced SQL scripting
Location: Jurong East
HOW TO APPLY :
Interested candidates, please submit your resume by clicking on “Apply Now” or aliceyap(a)hkmsvs.com
All applications will be treated in the strictest confidence and only shortlisted candidates will be notified
Yap Lay Choo
EA Licence No. 03C5391 | Registration No. R1987101"
Urgent / Software Engineer/ Developer (Java/ .net / HTML/ web development),"Duties and responsibilities
Write, modify, and debug web applications using JSP, JavaScript, JQuery, REST, SOAP, JSON, HTML and CSS
Develop new features, enhance existing features, and implement bug fixes in existing code
Participate in all aspects project development including implementation and deployment
Manage and optimise web applications for performance and scalability
Ability to collaborate effectively with the team and solve problems proactively
Any other duties as assigned
Qualifications and skills
Diploma / Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or engineering
Knowledge of web technologies and completed at least one full SDLC experience
Java programming Experience with Struts, Spring framework and MYSQL will be advantageous
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Good interpersonal skills
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please click send your revised resume to ref27(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd    
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448"
IT Software Executive- SQL & PHP ($2500 to $3400 + Bonuses),"Information
$2500 to $3400 + Bonuses
Office Hours
Candidates who are versed in PHP & SQL but do not have working experience in PHP or SQL WILL BE Considered
Training provided
Responsibilities
Provide support for SQL & PHP-related applications, including data rectification, data synchronization, and incident resolution.
Monitor and respond to all system alerts and provide daily technical support in terms of troubleshooting, diagnosing, and resolving issues.
Perform incident investigation and resolution, root cause analysis, and problem resolution, ensuring high availability of applications users.
Perform any administrative tasks associated with related applications, such as user account management, log reviews, etc.
Monitor incident and problem tickets and provide appropriate resolutions on a timely basis.
Document and update application configuration and architecture diagrams.
Requirements
Diploma in Information Technology, Computer Engineering, or equivalent
Versed in SQL and PHP programming
EA: 17C8660
CEI: R1104442 (Wong Zi Ming Shawn)
www.sourcesolutionshr.com"
R&D Engineer (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning),"R&D Engineer (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning)
Let’s keep it real: You want to work with other highly competent software engineers in an environment where there is no hype, drama and prima donnas. A place like LRD where you’re given the opportunity to learn, grow and apply your skills, and get well rewarded above market rate for your technical contributions too.
We are a Singapore-based technology company that creates breakthrough Artificial Intelligence (AI) technologies backed by a global leader in the energy sector. We are hiring from the best and brightest scientists and engineers to conduct applied R&D and solve the most challenging problems in high-stakes projects.
Responsibilities
The R&D team comprises subject matter experts in the fields such as Artificial Intelligence, Deep Learning, Data Science/Engineering, High-Performance Computing, Applied Mathematics and Physics.
As a member of the R&D team, you will be:
Conducting applied R&D on core technologies of the company.
Designing and developing software libraries running on the company’s HPC infrastructure.
Applying your skills and knowledge to affect high-profile engineering projects that result in critical real world impacts.
Why Join LRD?
LRD offers a conducive work environment in a company culture that values authenticity, integrity, technical skills, teamwork and results. Here are some of the opportunities offered by the position:
You are always presented with new challenges to solve intellectually stimulating problems. The work never gets stale, mundane or boring.
Continuous learning opportunities to develop your technical expertise in many subfields of AI, ML, HPC, geoscience, engineering, etc.
Have your work recognised with publication opportunities in top scientific conferences and journals.
Be rewarded for your contributions with high performance bonuses well above market rate.
Who Should Join LRD?
The many opportunities offered by the position come with matching expectations. To succeed in this role, you must be a hardworking person who proactively does what it takes to obtain the results on time and on target. You must also be intellectually curious, thorough in your work and strive for excellence.
Requirements
BSc/MSc in Computing, Science or Engineering (with a GPA of at least 4.0, please send transcript in application).
Minimum 2 to 3 years of relevant software development and/or data science experience (work attachments or internships can be included)
Strong programming skills in Python/NumPy, C or C++.
Proficiency in development tools such as git, Linux Shell Scripting, vim/emacs, etc.
Excellent analytical skills and enjoy solving complex technical problems.
Strongly Desired
Outstanding academic background in Science, Math, Physics or Mechanics.
Experience in AI, ML, data engineering, scientific computing, signal processing, computer vision and/or Natural Language Processing (NLP).
Major contributions to technical projects including R&D or open source projects.
Publications in scientific journals and conferences will be highly valued.
Interested candidates may apply with your resume. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Site Reliability Engineer,"Introduction
At IBM, work is more than a job – it’s a calling: To build. To design. To code. To consult. To think along with clients and sell. To make markets. To invent. To collaborate. Not just to do something better, but to attempt things you’ve never thought possible. Are you ready to lead in this new era of technology and solve some of the world’s most challenging problems? If so, lets talk.
Your Role and Responsibilities
As a Site Reliability Engineer for the CIO Hybrid Cloud Z Platform & Strategy Team, you will maintain, support, and help to enhance multiple aspects of the Z environment including, z/OS Storage Management, z/OS Performance, Capacity, and Networking tools. Must be enthusiastic about modernizing systems to be cloud optimized and a passion for looking to improve processed with more automation, reduction of toil and visibility (data) into system insights.
Provide technical support using problem determination and problem source identification skills.
Utilize technical and discovery skills in collaboration with other support operations/organizations to prioritize and diagnose problems to resolution.
Recommend and implement optimization and automation to existing technical support tools, procedures, and processes and implement new tools.
Provide training for and mentor others on the team.
Comfortable in an environment where communication and collaborative solutioning in foundational to the culture
Willingness and desire to learn modern technologies and ways of executing service delivery
Required Technical and Professional Expertise:
6+ years in z/OS systems programming
Demonstrate substantial knowledge of z/OS environments
Be able to solve problems and have living experience in installation, configuration, high availability, root cause analysis, performance tuning, and security & compliance activities
Demonstrated competency at setting up, configuring, and supporting mainframe software
Effective communication, teamwork, interest in learning innovative technologies
Experience in collaborating with global teams, with people from multiple locations
Fluent in English, both written and spoken
Preferred Technical and Professional Experience:
Knowledge of Z hardware, software and/or network technologies
Advanced understanding of z/OS and its subsystems
Experience in automation and execution of tests; automation of new workloads
Experience with various programming languages is preferred"
Full Stack Software Developer (Java Framework),"Responsibilities:
Code, modify, test, correct and document new and existing programs using assigned languages, tools and coding conventions;
Prepare and document test data;
Prepare and set up testing and production environment;
Prepare and maintain program and system documentation;
Assist in establishing file structures and processing logic requirements;
Produce deliverables according to group standards and procedures;
Assist Project Leaders in the study and design of application systems and work coordination, project management and user training work;
Troubleshooting and supporting end-users in the implementation and maintenance of application systems;
Requirements:
Diploma or Degree in Computer Science and Information Technology or equivalent
Relevant working experience in software application development such as Java/J2EE/Pega/.Net
Working knowledge of Agile, Scrum, Web Services, Spring MVC or Struts; Knowledge of Hibernate will be advantageous
Ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment
Interested candidates who wish to apply for the advertised position, please click APPLY to submit your resume.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Software Engineer/ Developer (JavaScript/ HTML/ web development),"Job Responsibilities
Write, modify, and debug web applications using JSP, JavaScript, JQuery, REST, SOAP, JSON, HTML and CSS
Develop new features, enhance existing features, and implement bug fixes in existing code
Participate in all aspects project development including implementation and deployment
Manage and optimise web applications for performance and scalability
Ability to collaborate effectively with the team and solve problems proactively
Any other duties as assigned
Job Qualifications
Diploma / Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or engineering
Knowledge of web technologies and completed at least one full SDLC experience
Java programming Experience with Struts, Spring framework and MYSQL will be advantageous
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Good interpersonal skills
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, kindly send your resume in MS WORD format to ref30#trustrecruit.com.sg or please click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note:
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Chan Sin Yee (Joey)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110985"
Mobile Application Developer,"Our mission is to improve workplace productivity through customisation of software and innovative solution. The speed of Mobile Apps and the capabilities of Cloud Technologies allow us to offer a range of solution for companies looking to digitalise their daily operation work. The Future of Workplace aims for work to be completed efficiently at any time.
We are looking for developers with a goal towards becoming a full-stack developer. That means he/she is confident and able to code for both frontend and backend (serverless) development. If you have a passion for building your own apps and wanting to spend more time in this field, we welcome you to join and grow with us as we aim to expand our list of in-house products.
Responsibilities:
Take charge of multiple iOS or Android projects.
Bug fix and improve existing projects whenever requirement comes in.
Write reusable code that can be shared across all projects.
Qualifications:
Dip / B.S in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
2+ years’ experience in software development.
Strong programming background and proficient in at least one programming language (Java / node.js / Objective-C / Swift / C / C++).
Good knowledge in iOS or Android programming, hardware and OS features.
Experience with using AWS Cloud Services is a plus."
"Research Associate, - (Software Engineer) (R00005333)","School of Mechanical Aerospace Engineering (MAE) invites applications for the position of Research Associate.  Key Responsibilities: 
Responsible for the integration of various system components such as sensors, tracking system, crane control system, etc with ROS and ROS 2
Simulation of Robotic Tower Crane in Gazebo
Design and conduct field test and troubleshooting of the autonomous hoisting system
Job Requirements: 
Master's in Mechanical/Mechatronics, Electrical Electronics Engineering, Computer Science or a related field and/or equivalent industry experience
Experience with software testing/continuous integration on robotics projects in Linux
Fluent in C/C++ and at least one scripting langu such as Python
Experience in ROS/ Gazebo/ Moveit, Wifi communication will be an advant
Possess good communication skills and ability to work well in a team environment

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. "
Programmer,"BE INSPIRED & INSPIRE OTHERS
Join US!
Founded in 2002, Mind Stretcher is the market-leading Tuition & Enrichment chain in Singapore, with 23 centres islandwide and an annual enrolment of 22,000 courses. As Educators with a Difference, we seek to inspire & stretch the potential of all students, regardless of their individual ability. We welcome like-minded talents who care deeply about nurturing & educating our future generation.
The Programmer and Scratch Robotics Trainer is primarily responsible for preparing and conducting programming lessons to young learners aged 7 to 12 years old. The incumbent will also be tasked to execute the day-to-day tasks relating to IT system support and enhancements at Mind Stretcher Education group.
What You'll Do:
To write the curriculum and teach Scratch and App Inventor to young learners;
Produce the SOW (Scheme of Work) for the programming courses and develop the lesson plans and activity sheets;
Participate in project enhancements and proof-of-concept trials;
Perform system administration functions such as creation/deletion of user accounts, resetting of passwords, generation of reports and monitoring of system health;
Monitor batch jobs to ensure that they run smoothly during certain times of the month/year;
Identify and resolve system bugs;
Participate in system analysis and design for software enhancements.
What You Must Possess:
Diploma/Degree in Information Technology/Computer Studies or relevant fields of study;
Prior experience in writing the curriculum and teaching Scratch, App Inventor and Robotics to young learners;
Minimum 1-2 years experience in development support for websites with 3-tier architecture, able to program in object-oriented programming language like C++/Java, basic understanding of mvc (model-view-control) design principles;
Knowledge in Excel and/or Salesforce CRM will be an added advantage;
Possesses good communication skills and passionate about working with children;
Able to deliver lessons in a fun and engaging manner.
What You'll Get:
Energetic, positive, and passionate working environment
Job security with a permanent full-time role
Staff Benefits
Medical and Dental Benefits
Internal mobility within the organisation
To start the ball rolling, please submit your resume via the “Apply Now” option.
Thank you for your submission. If you are shortlisted, you will most definitely be hearing from us soon!"
"Software Engineer (Distributed Storage System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
We are looking for a Distributed Storage System Software Engineer who is experienced in designing and developing several software systems described below.
Object Storage Service: Store objects like pictures, videos, documents, etc. (Requires object storage design and development experience).
HDFS: As a traditional storage product in the BigData area, we re-design and implement HDFS with C++. So far, it's supporting not only Data Platform, but also Advertisement, Machine Learning, and Search services. (Requires a solid technical foundation in distributed storage systems. Big Data experience will be a plus.)
ByteStore: A shared storage system, the underlying platform of our storage systems, supports applications such as object, block, table, file, etc.
Responsibilities
Design and develop innovative distributed storage systems, including but not limited to Object Storage, HDFS, ByteStore;
Continuously improve the storage system in terms of stability, scalability, functionality and performance according to business requirement;
Formulate development goals according to the project schedule, write detailed design documents and be responsible for module implementation, performance tuning, and functional testing;
Provide timely technical support for online applications, extract potential needs and points of optimization from it, and continuously optimize the system.
Qualifications
Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields;
Familiar with C++/Golang/Java/Python program development (at least one), pursue high-quality code and focus on code engineering quality;
Familiar with Linux system, with high proficiency in multi-threading, network programming, and distributed development in any programming language;
Strong understanding of database principles, proficient in key technologies of distributed storage and computing, and possess practical experience with them;
Good at independent thinking, able to find problems proactively, and have systematic problem analysis and problem solving skills.
Preferred Qualifications
Familiar with large-scale distributed storage system design and implementation, such as HDFS/Ceph/S3/OSS/EBS;
Contributor/Committer of the open-source community is a plus."
Software Engineer (C/C++ / Semiconductor/ $9k x13 mths + bonus),"to succeed in this role, you should have:
Min 2 years of experience in C/C++ (Windows OS) within a Semiconductor/Manufacturing environment
Degree in Computer Engineering/Science or equivalent
about the job:
Develop and implement features improvment on softwares & modules of machines
Render on-site support and troubleshoot to software issues of machines
Identifying areas for modification in existing programs and subsequently developing these modifications
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and design new features
Responsible for software feature development and enhancement based on customer requirements

Interested candidates, please click 'APPLY' or send your CV (in MS Word) to xylon.chian(@)randstad.com.sg

EA: 94C3609 | R1984287 | Xylon Chian

Applicants must be fully vaccinated or have a valid exemption in accordance with MOM's regulations to allow them to enter the workplace. Applicants may be required to share verifiable COVID-19 vaccination documents or proof of a valid exemption at the point of offer. Randstad Pte. Limited and/or the Client reserves the right to withdraw an offer if the applicant fails to provide verifiable COVID-19 vaccination and/or proof of exemption documents."
Software Support Assistant,"Under direction of Management, to provide computer support to end users across the company for routine computer hardware, software, other technology equipment, and business related applications. Troubleshoot and diagnose basic problems related to computer/information technology. Escalate complex issues to ensure timely resolution. Perform routine work with minimal supervision.
Duties and Responsibilities
1.       Provide technical telephone support for internal end users on routine hardware and software problems including operating system support, application support, system access problems and database support
2.       Troubleshoot and diagnose basic problems with computer equipment. Perform minor maintenance and repair on equipment, as necessary. Refer problems to lead worker or management if unable to resolve
3.       Provide technical support to users-in-person, via email, chat and/or phone regarding various computer related issues and problems
4.       Help identify and troubleshoot account and access related issues, including password changes, identity verification and support for alternate access
5.       Assist users with the basic operation of legacy and new application software, including but not limited to word processing, spreadsheet, presentation and communication software, web applications, anti-virus and company business application on varied platforms and operating systems
6.       Keep current with rapidly changing technologies, computer utilities and tools
7.       Contribute to departmental projects as assigned
8.       Perform other related duties as assigned
Requirements
·      Diploma or equivalent in Computer Technology with at least two years of working experience
·      Knowledge in:
-Personal computer and network technologies, printers and peripherals (mobile phones (iOS and Android), CD/DVD drives, etc.)
-A variety of software applications (e.g. word processing, spreadsheet, email, intranet, web browsers, and image manipulation software)
-Common internet protocols such as email, zoom, teams, secure file transfer (SFTP/FTP), and World Wide Web/HTTP
-Configuring network devices like network switches, routers and other network related devices
-Customer service principles
·      Skill in:
-Working with diverse academic, cultural and ethnic backgrounds of community
-Explaining terms, concepts and technology in plain language
-Maintaining goodwill, cooperation and productive relationships with customers
·      Able to:
-Troubleshoot browser and plug-in based problems on Windows, Mac OS operating systems
-Troubleshoot, diagnose and repair computer, hardware and software problems in a complex network environment
-Plan, organize and document complex network activities and configure systems for consistency with institutional policies and procedures
-Effectively prioritize work requests and work occasionally long hours
-Learn, understand and apply applicable company policy and federal, state and local rules/regulations
-Provide assistance and problem solves a variety of basic computer related issues; enforce policies and procedures and maintain a positive customer service environment
-Keep accurate records and maintain confidentiality
-Learn new software and effectively communicate verbally and in writing
-Multi-task and effectively use time management skills
Work Environment and Physical Requirements
·      Able to lift and work on equipment that may be tight and poorly lighted spaces such as under desks, in closets, etc.
·      Able to lift and move out computer components and peripherals weighing up to 20kg is sometimes required"
"Software Engineer (App Engine / PaaS), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
Relying on the cloud native environment, PaaS team creates a simple and easy-to-use service hosting platform for developers, improving research and development efficiency whilst reducing service maintenance costs. PaaS comes from a service perspective, connecting developers with the cloud native environment, shielding developers from the learning costs of kubernetes, and providing functions such as service hosting, code release, capacity adjustment, as well as operation and maintenance governance.
PaaS has been integrated into our development ecosystem, helping to build service discovery, quota management, access control, monitoring, alarm, and log transmission. At present, our PaaS platform has hosted most of the company's online services and is in a leading position in the industry in terms of the number of services and cluster size. We look forward to those who are interested in challenging tasks and are willing to embrace cloud native computing.
Responsibilities
Design and develop application engines serving billions of requests;
Design TikTok and its affiliates' business-oriented architecture, and construct an efficient online/offline service hosting platform;
Provide solutions for internal product lines, and integrate with business-oriented frameworks;
Design and develop key components of PaaS.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or a related field;
Good programming habits and proficiency in Go/Python;
Practical experience with large-scale distributed system development and maintenance;
Excellent modeling and problem solving skills;
Familiarity with microservice architecture and microservice governance;
Familiarity with the best practices of R&D process.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with cloud computing development;
Familiarity with Docker, Kubernetes, GAE, SAE, etc.;
Experience with full stack development and private cloud platform components."
IOS Software Engineer - TikTok - Singapore,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
We are the messaging team on TikTok. Our team's mission is to facilitate meaningful user connections through TikTok's messaging experience, which is still in its infancy. We achieve our mission by building and shipping tools that help our users more easily connect and share the things they care about.
We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us and help contribute to our aim of helping users explore and discover the world's creativity, knowledge and moments that matter in everyday life, all while empowering everyone to be a creator directly from their smartphones.
Responsibilities:
Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
Analyse and optimize iOS applications for efficiency and performance.
Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
Qualifications:
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with experience in native iOS development.
Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities and limitations of iOS platform.
Proficiency in Objective-C or Swift.
Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
Good team communication and collaboration skills.
Passion and experience building consumer-facing products is a huge plus; We would love to hear about apps you've developed!
Preferred Qualification:
Minimum 3 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Senior CIM Engineer (Wafer Map System, C#)","Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail, and supply chain.
We are currently looking to hire for a Senior CIM Engineer. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.
Job Responsibilities:
·       Aspire to be strong technical contributor to the Smart Factory Automation team to develop and implement Factory Information system(s) plant wide.
·       Lead Wafer map system projects under a faced paced dynamic environment, with hands on in development and support for conversion, validation, merging of wafer maps in txt, XML-G85 and Binary format(s).
·       Establish high quality programming standards, best practices and agile development process with proper SLDC processes and in accordance with CIM practices to meet Manufacturing
Operations requirements.
·       Collaborate with Site CIM team to deliver Standard Corporate system solution.
·       Work closely with Manufacturing users to support CIM requirements.
·       Support CIM system 24x7 to ensure no downtime affecting production.
·       Design, Develop and implement Manufacturing Process control involving CIM and Wafer Map system In charge of Wafer map conversion, validation, merging in Txt, G85, Binary format to support Production requirements.
·       Work closely with Manufacturing Operation(s) and CIM team to meet daily Production requirements
·       Discuss with Users and negotiate project priority.
Self-disciplined to deliver committed tasks on time
Experience:
·       BS in Computer Science or related field.
·       3+ years of relevant industry experience
·       Strong Programming knowledge in Microsoft development tools. Eg, C#,VB.Net, ASP.Net, Web scripting, REST architecture, Oracle PL/SQL, MS SQL, Stored Procedures.
·       Completed several software development application projects.
·       Able to support CIM & Wafer Map system 24x7.
·       More than 3 years of working experience in .NET programming.
·       Minimum 2 years in Semiconductor manufacturing environment.
·       Demonstrate capability to lead discussion and problem solving to arrive solution and implementation
·       Willing to support the team members during technical challenges to meet business expectations.
Strong technical skills in application Development with C#.NET, VB.NET, ASP.NET, MSSQL & Oracle databases, Webservices & RESTful architecture.
·       Good knowledge in Semiconductor manufacturing Process control and Automation solutions
·       Skilled in machine interfaces via SECS/GEM, GPIB and other standard communication protocols
·       Knowledge in Industrial 4.0 and Digital Transformation technologies
·       Align and meet Manufacturing Operation Smart Factory Automation requirements
·       Strong leadership and interpersonal skills to lead and manage the teams
Effective presentation and communication skills
WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality.
CONSULTANT DETAILS
Consultant Name: Prathiksha Shetty
Reg No: R1765546 
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy."
Software Engineer - Application Security #Immediate,"Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
The security team at ByteDance is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.
Responsibilities:
Design and develop cloud-native security services and infrastructure such as Identity, Access Management, and Key Management System as a foundation for production infrastructure security.
Design and build large-scale detection and classification systems such as email spam classification systems, or risk-based authentication systems.
Design and develop security and cryptographic systems using advanced protection technology such as Intel SGX or AMD SEV.
Design and develop systems or frameworks (e.g., static code analysis) to achieve security-by-default and defense-in-depth in certain areas.
Identify areas of security weakness and find ways to minimize security risks. Conduct penetration testing and build automation to find security vulnerabilities.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or other relevant majors.
Strong experience as a developer with one or more general-purpose programming languages such as Go, Rust, Python, C/C++, or Java.
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s or Ph.D. degree (or Bachelor's degree with 3+ years of experience) in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or other relevant majors.
Experienced in the design and implementation of security solutions, systems, and mechanisms, including, but not limited to, data security, application security, cryptography, systems security, and network security.
Creative problem-solving skills and excellent troubleshooting and debugging skills.
Strong written/verbal communication and excellent teamwork skills; flexible and be a self-starter."
Senior / Software Engineer (Ref 25121),"Responsibilities
- Collaborate with the product/project manager/team on requirements.
- Collaborate with cross-functional team members to build enterprise-level platform (PaaS) that serves both internal and external teams.
- Develop and Enhance microservices using Cloud Native technologies like Kubernetes, gRPC, REST, Postgres, Containers, etc
- Expand our integrated messaging platform by designing and developing new RESTful APIs and backend microservices with C#.
- Optimize and constantly improve the performance of the platform.
- Ensure the highest quality with unit tests. Participate in integration test design.
- Perform code reviews.
- Comply with project designs and industry standards
- Develop and direct software system testing and validation procedures, programming, and documentation
- Participate in innovation forum that crosses technical areas
- Evaluate and test new technologies. 
Requirements
- Degree in Computer Science / Computer Engineering / Information Technology or related qualification
- 5+ years of professional software development experience
- Strong problem-solving, troubleshooting and communication skill.
- Independently driven, proactive, accountable, and reliable team player.
- Experience in Web programming
- Good knowledge of JAVA and/or .Net framework and Core
Licence No: 12C6060"
"Software Engineer, Application Security #Urgent","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
The security team at ByteDance is missioned to build infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to support cross-functional teams to protect our users, products and infrastructures. In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and secure-by-design systems and solutions. Our challenges are not your regular day-to-day technical problems; you'll be part of a team that's developing new solutions to new challenges of a kind not previously addressed by big tech. It's working fast, at scale, and we're making a difference.
Responsibilities:
Design and develop cloud-native security services and infrastructure such as Identity, Access Management, and Key Management System as a foundation for production infrastructure security.
Design and build large-scale detection and classification systems such as email spam classification systems, or risk-based authentication systems.
Design and develop security and cryptographic systems using advanced protection technology such as Intel SGX or AMD SEV.
Design and develop systems or frameworks (e.g., static code analysis) to achieve security-by-default and defense-in-depth in certain areas.
Identify areas of security weakness and find ways to minimize security risks. Conduct penetration testing and build automation to find security vulnerabilities.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or other relevant majors.
Strong experience as a developer with one or more general-purpose programming languages such as Go, Rust, Python, C/C++, or Java.
Experienced in the design and implementation of security solutions, systems, and mechanisms, including, but not limited to, data security, application security, cryptography, systems security, and network security.
Creative problem-solving skills and excellent troubleshooting and debugging skills.
Strong written/verbal communication and excellent teamwork skills; flexible and be a self-starter."
Backend Web Developer,"Company Introduction
EL Connect Pte Ltd is a software, technology, and mobile development company based in Singapore's Central Region. Our company was founded in 2020 to develop new systems and technologies to disrupt the current market in cross-industry.
Job Description
We are looking for an analytical, results-driven backend web developer who has outstanding programming skills and a great passion for developing applications or improving existing ones, we would like to meet you. As a backend web developer, you’ll work closely with our project coordinator to ensure system consistency and improve current backend applications and processes.
Ultimately, you should be able to develop and maintain functional and stable web applications to meet your company’s needs.
Responsibilities
To succeed as a backend web developer, you will be responsible for the server side of our web applications and writing the web services and APIs used by front-end developers and mobile application developers. You should be knowledgeable, collaborative, and motivated.
·        Be involved and participate in the overall application lifecycle
·        Main focus on coding and debugging
·        Collaborate with Front-end developers and other team members to establish objectives
·        Build high-quality reusable code and libraries that can be used in the future
·        Write clean code to develop functional and sustainable web applications
·        Liaise with developers, designers, and system administrators to identify new features
·        Optimization of the application for maximum speed and scalability
·        Troubleshoot and debug applications
·        Stay up to date with current best practices
·        Manage cutting-edge technologies to improve legacy applications
·        Perform UI tests to optimize performance
Requirements and Qualifications
·        Fluency or understanding of specific languages, such as Node.js, Laravel, or Python, and operating systems may be required
·        Familiarity with front-end languages such as HTML, JavaScript, and CSS
·        Proficient understanding of code versioning tools, such as Git
·        Strong understanding of the web development cycle and programming techniques and tools
·        Focus on efficiency, user experience, and process improvement
·        Ability to work independently or with a team
·        Good organizational and time-management skills
·        Teamwork skills with a problem-solving attitude
·        Bachelor’s degree in computer programming, computer science, or a related field
Company Benefits
·        Training Provided
·        Annual / Medical Leave
·        Medical Claim
·        Insurance Coverage
·        Young and Energetic Team to work with
·        Career Progression
·        Performance Bonus"
Assistant Software Engineer (PLC & Robot),"Job Description
Design and development of PLC software and interfaces.
Industrial robot programing
Perform system integration, testing and commissioning of advanced control systems for factory automation system
Requirements
Diploma / Bachelor in Automation/Electronics/Computer Engineering.
Some experience in Allen Bradley PLC programming and motion control is preferred
Basic knowledge in industrial robot programming (ABB, Kuka, Yaskawa etc.)
Good problem solving skills
Passionate about automation
Please apply online if you are interested. We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Thank you, and stay safe & health!"
Software Engineer (Consumables Manufacturing) - (32211-JOB),"Position Summary:
This position works closely with the Enterprise System Architect and Network Support group. The group develops, maintains, and troubleshoots the technology and applications that drives the Manufacturing/ Equipment Engineering reporting and operation needs. He/She is also responsible for identifying problems within programs, creating, and implementing solutions and keeping the technical architecture running as smoothly and effectively as possible.
Responsibilities:
• Able to plan activities of allocated project scope with guidance and prioritization of daily activities/assignments to supporting team members while maintaining project schedule
• Execution of small to medium scale project scope, including ownership of all deliverables, with guidance
• Providing recommendations for risk mitigation in area of responsibility and at critical interfaces to other teams
• Able to research potential vendors and suggest opportunities
• Understands the relationship of project work to departmental goals
• Can prioritize own work effectively
• Maintain awareness of industry trends and evaluate applicability of new software technologies to platform development efforts
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.
Requirements:
• Ability to work independently as well as collaboratively as part of a highly skilled team
• Excellent communication skills possess logical and analytical skills with attention to detail
• High level of discipline and integrity
• Willing to undertake multiple tasks
• Possess a positive attitude and sense of urgency
• Meticulous, keen attention to details and organized
• Demonstrated success in collaborating in a fast-paced team environment and delivering high-quality software product
• Strong team player and able to effectively collaborate on ideas and designs with the team
All listed requirements are deemed as essential functions to this position; however, business conditions may require reasonable accommodations for additional task and responsibilities.
Experience/Education:
• Diploma/Degree in Computer Science or related discipline preferred
• Should have at least 4 years technical roles in software development preferably in web and having completed at least 3 software development life cycle
• Good background in C# web development but not restricted to using Microsoft .NET / ASP.NET / MVC / WCF / AJAX. JavaScript / JQuery client-side scripting and Bootstrap / JQuery UI for components and styling.
• Experience in API communication standards using XML and/or JSON
• Database design in Microsoft SQL with ability to write and optimized queries or stored procedures
• Experience with Version Management tool such as Microsoft Visual SourceSafe
• Ability to develop mobile apps for phones / tablets would be advantageous
• Knowledge of data processing, hardware platform and enterprise software applications
\n
Illumina believes that everyone has the ability to make an impact, and we are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information."
Research Associate (Programming/Software Development),"undefined
The School of Computer Science and Engineering (SCSE) invites applications for the position of Research Associate. 
Key Responsibilities: 
Understand the projects and work context as a technical and liaison officer in the team.
Conduct project-related research.
Facilitate technical development, testing and refinements of projects.
Promote collaborative and translational research work.
Documenting research plans and progress, and writing reports.
Job Requirements: 
Master’s Degree in Computer Science and Engineering or related fields.
Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in programming and/or software development.
Ability to develop new skills and try different projects, possess great aptitude for translational research work.
Willingness to take on various project-related tasks outside of programming/software development when necessary
Highly motivated, independent and able to work as a team.
Effective communication and report writing skills.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
 "
Systems Analyst,"Mandai Wildlife Group is dedicated to caring for the planet and protecting animals and nature. Conservation education is intrinsic in all interactions with the Group, to inspire action for a healthier world.
Mandai Wildlife Group is the steward of Mandai Wildlife Reserve, a unique wildlife and nature destination in Singapore that is home to world-renown wildlife parks which connect visitors to the fascinating world of wildlife. The Group is driving an exciting rejuvenation plan at Mandai Wildlife Reserve, adjacent to Singapore’s Central Catchment Nature Reserve, that will integrate five wildlife parks with distinctive nature-based experiences, green public spaces and an eco-friendly resort.
Mandai Wildlife Group advocates for biodiversity, contributes leading wildlife research, develops innovative solutions to promote living sustainably, and collaborates with conservation partners in Singapore and Southeast Asia.
The Group provides funding and in-kind support to Mandai Nature for conservation work across Southeast Asia.
Mandai Global, an entity that is part of the Group, will establish and operate new lines of business anchored on creating positive outcomes for nature and wildlife.
We are seeking a highly driven and analytical individual to be part of our IT Team, as the Systems Analyst to support the Senior Systems Manager and HR in managing our Company’s HR applications – primarily SAP HR and SuccessFactors HCM. The successful candidate is expected to understand the HR technology landscape and will be responsible to ensure that all HR-related applications are update-to-date and may include new project initialization, evaluation, planning, design, implementation and the management, and enhancement of HR applications in compliance with our IT governance framework and regulations. 
 
Job Responsibilities
·       Manage, including administrative and performing maintenance for the HR IT Applications – including upkeeping of all documentation, procedures, managing promptly resolutions of issues and incidents, delivering change requests, testing, training, deployment, etc.
·       Support HR and staff on day-to-day activities and operations related to the Applications and HR processes.
·       Assist in HR Applications and enhancements, process improvement, and available HR technologies in the market
·       Facilitate business requirements to functional requirements and deliver desired business outcome within the agreed timeline and budget
·       Facilitate in activities such as project initialization, requirements gathering, procurement, design and prototype, development, testing, training, go-live and post-production support, including identifying and mitigating risks, managing promptly issue and incident resolution while communicating status and update to all stakeholders.
Job Requirements
•        Degree in Information Technology or any related discipline
•        At least 3 years of HRIS experience
•        Technical proficiency and hands-on exposure in SAP HCM and SAP SuccessFactors (Employee Central, Payroll, and Recruiting modules)
•        Ability to understand HR functional processes and priorities
•        Ability to understand business requirements, manage multiple priorities, meet deadlines and work with minimal supervision
•        Strong verbal and written communication skills
•        Strong interpersonal skills, ability to work with all levels of end-users to provide technical/functional support
•        Analytical and Meticulous"
"Backend Software Engineer, TikTok Live (Data Platform) - Singapore","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
With the enormous growth of live streaming in recent years, our mission is to inspire real-time interactions and help live streamers connect to people from all corners of the globe.
We are looking for passionate and talented engineers to join us to build and optimize a real-time, high-performance, large-scale distributed infrastructure for live streaming in TikTok. You will be deeply involved in the developmental lifecycle of critical product features and collaborate closely with product managers to deliver the best live streaming experience for all live streamers and audience alike.
TikTok Live Data Platform team is a fast-growing team in TikTok engineering family. We are building solid data capabilities and enhancing the robust data ecosystem for TikTok Live, and aiming to maximize data value to benefit our hosts & users and power TikTok.
You will:
Plan and lead large-scale technical projects to lay the foundation for the iterative development and scale of early products
Develop robust, efficient technology products that serve 1 billion users
Contribute to engineering strategy, tooling, processes, and culture
Research and apply cutting-edge domain and technical knowledge into products
Qualifications:
As a world-class engineer, you have rich working experience in scalable, highly available, distributed and mission-critical systems.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Able to work closely with diverse stakeholders and have good communication skills
Self-driven, positive, cooperative and willing to keep learning enthusiasm at all times
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Data Engineer | New Projects,"Scope of work:
Able to extract, transform and load data into databases.
Able to generate analytics results from the data collected to answer questions from customers' business use cases.
Familiar with DotNetCore Framework and MSSQL.
Knowledge of NGINX and REACT JS is an advantage.
Able to interpret and write technical documents.
What is needed:
Minimum Degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science and Electronics Engineering or its equivalent.
Strong C++ and C# programming skills with at least 1-2 years as a data engineer.
Possess good understanding of software development life cycles.
Working experience in handling projects involving Data Analytics related work is a plus
Attained Agile-related certification such as Certified Scrum Master is a plus"
Testing Software Engineer - TikTok e-Commerce #Urgent,"Responsibilities
The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.
In this role, you will:
Be responsible for developing platforms, tools and quality engineering processes to ensure quality and security of e-commerce products.
Be responsible for entire testing lifecycle, including requirements analysis, design review, formulating test plans, designing and executing test cases, conducting defect tracking and software quality analysis, etc.
Participate in the development of automated testing tools/frameworks, design and execution of automated test cases, automatically building test environments, and continuous integration.
Ensure the quality of the system under test, and strive to improve the quality and efficiency of R&D through test process and method innovation.
Qualifications:
BSc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
Experience in software development testing, with demonstrable experience in manual and automated testing.
Familiar with software testing methodology, proficient in the usage of testing tools to debug and analyze software bugs and performance issues.
Strong background in computer science and proficient in at least one programming language (Java/C/C++/Python etc.).
Good knowledge of Android and iOS hardware and OS features.
Experience with data/web security testing and continuous integration/development is an advantage.
Experience in troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.
Ideal Candidate:
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about quality engineering and delivering great mobile and web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment.
Strong product sense or understanding."
"Software Engineer (DBA), Cloud Infrastructure #Immediate","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The DBA (Database Administrator) team is committed to the construction and management of database services. Our team provides online storage service support for TikTok and its affiliates' entire line of products (TikTok, Douyin, Toutiao, etc) and manages the industry-leading database cluster with multiple single clusters that store data exceeding trillions. At present, the DBA team focuses on the construction of ultra-large-scale database operation and maintenance systems as well as the landing of intelligent databases.
Responsibilities:
Manage day-to-day operations, such as monitoring, backup, performance tuning, and failure handling of database systems;
Participate in schema design, implementation, and data migration over large MySQL databases;
Help build end-to-end solutions over MySQL and MongoDB infrastructure, with a focus on performance, high availability, and growth needs of our customers;
Create tools and automation to improve database administration and management efficiency;
Responsible for database middleware testing, maintenance, and management;
Participate in regular on-call duties.
Qualifications:
Bachelor or above degree in Computer Science or a related technical discipline with 2-3+ years of experience in MySQL management;
Familiar with MySQL architecture and design;
Familiar with popular database storage engines and master-slave replication principles and practices;
Familiar with Unix/Linux operating systems and networking;
Experience programming in one or more of the following: C, C++, Java, Python, Go, etc.;
Experience in designing, analyzing, and supporting large-scale distributed systems is preferred;
Experience with NoSQL like Redis and MongoDB is preferred;
Good communication and coordination skills and able to work efficiently under pressure."
SOFTWARE ENGINEER,"Responsibilities:
To be part of airport & logistics project team and responsible for delivery of automation computer control software solutions and projects;
Design, development, installation and configuration, in-house and on-site testing and commissioning for computer control software products;
Traveling for on-site meeting, installation, testing and commissioning of oversea projects.
Requirement:
2~3 years' experience in SCADA application development using platforms like iFix, WinCC, etc.;
Experience in Java, DOTNET and C# application development - standalone applications, web services and database;
Good knowledge and experience in SQL Server database, HTTP5, network communication protocols and application development, OOAD and use of Design Patterns;
Degree/Diploma in Computer Science or related field;
Solution-oriented and adaptable to overcome technical and project challenges;
Committed and good team player with the ability to work independently."
Project Integration System Specialist,"Title: Project Integration System Analyst
My client is in the insurance offering life and medical insurance, general insurance. If you are keen on a career in this industry where you can create a real impact, click on the link below to apply now!
Responsibilities:
Assist team leader to produce detail system design and documentation
Strong and adequate understanding frontend UX behaviour in order to design and implement corresponding API to support business processes
Oversee and manage project task assigned by team leader from development, SIT, UAT and Preprod to production deployment
Conduct debugging, source code management, source code scanning and penetration vulnerability resolution
Support post production deployment system monitoring
The ideal candidate:
Strong technical with hands on frontend technology implementation experience with proven track records (more than 8 years of hands-on implementation experience)
Experience in details system and database design
Solid hands-on coding skill and vast experience in java and java frameworks such as Java, SpringBoot, JBOSS and Restful API
Good experience in level 2 and 3 production support
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
"Software Engineer (Graph Computing / Mining System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.
Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!
Responsibilities
Participate in the research and development of large-scale graph processing/mining systems, and be responsible for the maintenance of existing distributed graph processing system;
Support graph computing related application scenarios, including but not limited to recommendation, search, advertising, risk control, etc.;
Explore the future development of graph computing areas and build a new generation of distributed graph computing/mining systems.
Qualifications
Familiar with C/C ++ development under Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming and other technologies;
Familiar with distributed computing, high performance computing, non-volatile memory storage, and relevant development experiences;
Strong self-learning ability, familiar with SOTA research works in the graph computing community;
Possess good communication skills, teamwork, and a strong ability for research."
"IT BUSINESS SYSTEM APPLICATION DEVELOPER - UP TO SGD $ 5,000.00 to $ 6,000.00 + AWS + VB / WEST AREA","Our client, a Local MNC is seeking for an IT BUSINESS SYSTEM APPLICATION DEVELOPER - UP TO SGD $ 5,000.00 to $ 6,000.00 + AWS + VB / WEST AREA
Requirements
Diploma or Degree in IT, Computer or Business Information System or relevant
Min 3 year working experience in handling full System / Application development
Experience in writing of Business Requirements Document, Functional Requirements Document and System Integration Testing or Users Acceptance Testing (SIT/UAT) plans.
Knowledge of SQL, Java, JavaScript, HTML, CSS, C, C#, C++, .Net
Good interpersonal skill
Others
Salary up to SGD $ 6,000.00 + AWS + Variable Bonuses
5 days work week
West Area (Company transport provided at Choa Chu Kang, Jurong East, Tampines and Punggol MRT station)
Interested candidate can send in your resume (word format prefer) to grayson.su thetalentnetwork.com.sg"
Software Engineer - Recommendation Architecture #Urgent,"Responsibilities:
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About The Team
Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.
Responsibilities - What You'll Do
Build and maintain high performance online services for recommendation system；
Build extremely efficient and reliable data pipelines for candidates generation, profile generation, training examples generation, real time online training, etc.;
Build globalized large-scale recommendation system;
Design and develop high performance computing frameworks and storage systems.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields,
Experience building scalable system;
Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang;
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive;
Experience in at least one area of the following areas: personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks is a plus.
At least 3 years of relevant experience
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Backend Engineer (Go Lang, RF202206)","Job Description
· Responsible for the back-end support system architecture planning and design of the company's strategic products
· Responsible for the capability development, testing, deployment, and upgrade of core modules
· Ensure project schedule and quality
· Ensure effective solutions to user problems and satisfy customer needs Responsible for the implementation of forward-looking technical research and solutions
Job Requirements
· More than two years of Go development experience, familiar with distributed systematic design.
· Proficiency in Go programming, with experience writing high-performance and high-availability programs.
· Familiar with network programming under Linux/Unix.
· Familiar with network protocols such as HTTP/TCP.
· Familiar with MySQL, Redis, and message-oriented middleware. 
· Familiar with microservice architecture and container technology (Docker, Kubernetes).
· C/C++, PHP, and java project experience is a plus.
· Hands-on experience in back-end architecture and performance optimization of large-scale websites is preferred."
"Fullstack Software Engineer (Traffic Infrastructure), Infrastructure Engineering","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
Our Traffic Infrastructure Engineering team build and operate hyper-scale datacenters, manage the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud/edge resources and create various cloud/edge solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).
The team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.
Responsibilities
Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.
Qualifications
BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience in a frontend development role, with solid JavaScript/HTML/CSS skills.
Experience with one or more web frameworks (Vue/React/Angular).
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems"
"Fullstack Software Engineer (Traffic Infrastructure), Infrastructure Engineering","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
Our Traffic Infrastructure Engineering team build and operate hyper-scale datacenters, manage the life cycle of server fleet, allocate cloud/edge resources and create various cloud/edge solutions, and provide infrastructure services including widely distributed Content Distribution Networks (CDNs).
The team build and leverage various platforms to manage and interact with our infrastructures and services. To support the fast growth and improve operation efficiency, these platforms need to be feature rich, easy to use, scalable, agile and compliant to with policies and procedures.
Responsibilities
Build platforms, systems and services for internal and external teams to interact with the large scale production systems.
Build tools and platforms to improve engineering productivity.
Design, develop, test, deploy, maintain and improve software.
Bring new ideas and technologies into our platform, innovate and iterate.
Qualifications
BS degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study or equivalent practical experience.
Experience in a frontend development role, with solid JavaScript/HTML/CSS skills.
Experience with one or more web frameworks (Vue/React/Angular).
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, Python, or Go.
Experience working with two or more of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, networking systems, developing large software systems."
"Software Engineer (Serverless Computing / FaaS), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The FaaS team is committed to creating a highly available and easily expandable universal serverless computing platform, following the concept of service functionalization. The platform supports creating and deploying application functionalities with one click, shields resources and maintenance details, and greatly reduces developers’ development costs. At the same time, the lightweight and fast start-up capabilities of FaaS allow the platform to automatically expand and shrink the capacity of the functions and optimize the resource cost. At present, the serverless computing platform carries tens of millions of requests per second.
We look forward to those who are energetic, innovative, and experienced in the design of highly available systems to explore and practice together with our team.
Responsibilities
Design and develop our FaaS, building a highly available and easily expandable serverless computing platform;
Design and develop FaaS worker Wasm and v8 runtime;
Design high performance, low overhead data plane forwarding and optimization for cold start;
Explore stateful Serverless Computing.
Qualifications
Excellent programming abilities and solid foundations in data structure and algorithms;
Practical experience with large-scale distributed systems and complex problem solving skills;
Proven experience with one or more languages such as Go, Python, Java, Node.js, Rust.
Preferred Qualifications
In-depth understanding of serverless computing and related fields;
Experience with open source projects such as Firecracker, KVM, Kubernetes, OpenFaaS, Knative;
Familiar with AWS Lambda, Google Function, Azure Function and other products."
Senior Software Engineer,"Job Highlights
·        5 Bonuses payout yearly (Year End & Quarterly Bonus)
·        Flexible working arrangement and incentives.
·        Up to 80% work from home plus incentives for good performers.
Job Description
Looking for an opportunity to work on full stack, mobile apps or just want to focus on front end or just back end development? How about working on low code platform and integration with cloud services like Google firebase and Azure cognitive services? Be part of our big regional IT team of 40+ staff, delighting our 2000 users and millions of customers. Click Apply Now and tell us how good you are and how we can make you even better..
Responsibilities:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop and support business applications, adhering to company and industry best practices.
Actively participates in analysis, design, coding and testing phase.
 Perform maintenance and troubleshooting of issues in existing solutions.
Participates in R&D efforts on new and exciting technologies.
Communicate task priorities and progress frequently to all stakeholders.    
Requirements:
Diploma or Degree in Computer Science
Minimum 2 years of hands-on experience in Web Applications development preferred.
Solid working experience in C#, ASP.Net, .Net Core, MS SQL, Angular, Jquery, Outsystems, Flutter.
Experience in mobile app development (Flutter) is an added advantage.
Attention to details, committed and responsible with strong working ethic, able to work on tight deadlines.
Self-motivated individuals with the ability to learn and develop independently in a fast paced environment.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills and good team player with good communications skills."
Mobile Application Developer,"Responsibilities:
Design, build, and test cloud-based mobile apps for both iOS and Android platforms that adopt the latest technologies.
Help modernize company’s platform services by deploying existing mobile applications to/in cloud infra.  
Ensure written codes are of high quality, maintainable, and adherent to best practices and proper change management procedures.
Ensure that applications being developed follows the set requirement specifications.
Work individually and within teams effectively as may be required.
Requirements:
Minimum Degree in Information Technology or related discipline
Minimum 2 years relevant experience in Mobile Application (Android and iOS) development.
Experience in developing enterprise level scalable web applications on cloud (AWS, Azure).
Understanding of IT Architecture, DevOps, Application and System Integration, and Platform Solutions Design.
Experience in Python, Powershell, or Linux will be an added advantage.
Interested candidates who wish to apply for the advertised position, please click APPLY to submit your resume.
EA License No: 13C6305
Reg. No.: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use, or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Senior Software Developer,"Singapore Based
Attractive Salary Package
Company Benefits & Incentives
Career Progression Opportunities
Interested applicants can also send your resume to Sheena at +65 89117628 and allow our consultant to match you with our Clients.
The Supreme HR Advisory Pte Ltd
Reg No: R22111014
EA No: 14C7279
Working days & hours: 5 days, Mon-Fri, 9am-6pm
Salary: $7,000 - $9,000
Location: Clarke Quay
Responsibilities:
Enhance, develop, and maintain our current financial systems (web and mobile based) in accordance with the predefined rules and regulations.
Ability to identify and critically analyze business needs and product requirements.
Ability to translate those final requirements into fully functional system.
Assists in the development of architecture & design of Microservices; including but not limited to, finding areas of improvements, identifying potential bottlenecks and risk during the implementation.
Fluent in crafting reusable, testable, efficient codes, and components.
Sound understanding and thorough implementation of data/application security and data protection.
Ability to design and implement low-latency, high-availability, and high performance applications.
Energetic team player who works hand-in-hand with support teams in resolving operational and performance-related issues.
Design and develop website layout and UI with prevailing HTML/CSS practices.
Prior experience in data integration with various back end distributed services and databases."
Urgent / Software Engineer (Senior Role) - C# / .Net / Java / SDLC,"Responsibilities
Consultant will learn and understand the needs of the client and be the go-to person for the assigned SAST product - Checkmarx
Leads the SAST project with various Development teams of the client
Instils the right security mindset and culture across the Development team of the client
Reviews the security vulnerabilities found on the project along with the relevant development team of the client
Assists with vulnerability remediation, clarify questions, review work performed
Understands applications from a technical architecture and business goals perspective to apply Security best practices
Works on multiple tasks and support one or more project teams simultaneously
Requirements
Proficient with programming language e.g., C#, .NET, Java, etc.
Preferably possess Threat Modelling Knowledge and understand DevOps Integration
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please send your latest resume in MS WORD format to ref27(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd    
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448"
System Analyst,"Our client, in the Semiconductor Industry located in the West has openings for System Analyst
Responsibilities:
Liaising with end-users, business partner and software vendor to define user requirements and system design specification.
Designing, developing, testing and deploy new software to support business requirements.
Providing application support and change management for existing application.
Participate in innovation and implementing emerging technologies in the various application platforms.
Reviewing software design architecture and updating technical documents. Server/database administration and maintenance.
Requirements:
Experience in Application Development with MS SQL and C#.
Experience in K2 and SharePoint will be value-add.
Good understanding and experience in standard Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Ability to convert of business requirements into system requirement; able to produce comprehensive functional specification into technical system design specification.
Ability to define and analyze system issues; able to design and test standards and solutions.
Possess critical thinking and ability to breakdown a problem into manageable pieces.
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Qualified or interested candidates, kindly apply to us in
the FOLLOWING FORMAT to facilitate the short-listing process.
Attachment of CV’s in MSWORD FORMAT
Resumes please INCLUDE:
Personal Particulars
Education background
Work experiences in point forms
All Reasons for leaving
Current and Expected salary
Date of availability / Notice Period
**We regret that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.
Your Profile will be kept in our database for more career opportunities.
We wish you all the best in your job search.
KC Chan
Reg No: R22110671
EA No: 19C9570"
System Analyst (Windows Based Application Developer) | Perm,"Job Refr ID: XW45YY
Responsibilities:
Report to the Senior Systems Analyst, Application Development, you will be responsible for the following:
Design, maintain and enhance existing and new software systems to support business requirements
Liaising with end-users, stakeholders to define user requirement and design specifications
Exploring and enhancing application in new and emerging technologies
Conducting system testing to ensure applications conform to user requirements
Reviewing software design architecture and updating technical documents
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or equivalent
1 to 3 years experience in Web based application design, development and testing using Microsoft Visual Studio platform.
Experience in object-oriented analysis and design, SDLC, Team Foundation Server
Experience in software development using C#, WPF & WCF, Web Service, Database Design & SQL Scripting with MS SQL
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Good communication and presentation skills
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Interested applicants kindly click on ""apply now"" and please send in your updated resume to stephanie.t[at]peopleprofilers.com
T Stephanie
Registration Number: R1548888
EA License Number: 10C3804
People Profilers Pte Ltd
20 Cecil St, #08-09, PLUS Building, Singapore 049705
http://www.peopleprofilers.com"
Frontend Software Engineer - Customer Service Platform #Urgent,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
The Customer Service Platform (CSP) is a team that integrate the product technology resources of the company's internal customer service system. Our mission is to provide users with efficient self-service solutions and provide agents with convenient tools so as to improve customer service experience.
Responsibilities:
Design and implement large-scale cross platform web-based features, user interfaces and Node.js based services for customer service platforms
Responsible for optimising scalability, reliability and responsiveness of web-based application pages, and to deliver compelling end user experience
Architect efficient and reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications
Keep at the forefront of emerging web-based technologies and trends, research and evaluate latest web development frameworks, apply new technologies to drive iterative product improvements
Qualifications:
BSc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions
5+ years experience in developing frontend web applications, with demonstrable expertise in deep optimisation of end user experience, stability & scalability, code modularity and rendering latency
Strong JavaScript/HTML/CSS frontend engineering experience and strong familiarity with key concepts including asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility and accessibility
Deep understanding of the underlying design philosophy and implementation of common web frameworks, including React/Vue/Angular
Deep familiarity and experience with common web compilation and bundling frameworks, including Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp
Good understanding of frontend - backend multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process
Experience in development of no-code/low-code platforms is highly advantageous
Experience in mobile/hybrid app development is a plus
IDEAL CANDIDATE
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver
Passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications
Passionate about writing elegant and high quality code
Nurture and drive team towards technical excellency via mentoring, coaching, sharing .etc
Ability to perform independent research to solve complex technical problems
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Operations Engineer (System Administrator),"Do you have a strong passion for solving technical problems? Join us and be part of the family that believes in good software design, delivering quality well tested solutions. Help establish Ufinity as the trusted partner by constantly achieving a pinnacle of excellence in our ideas, solutions and services.
Role Responsibilities: 
Provide professional technical support to Cloud system infrastructure and operation system during the maintenance phase solutions deployed by Ufinity 
Identify, analyse, and devise solutions to Cloud infrastructure system problems and performance optimization 
Administer and upkeep Cloud infrastructure components to keep them up to date with latest updates / patches 
Periodic maintenance /deployment and housekeeping activities to keep infrastructure components optimal 
Ensure that managed systems and configurations meet expectation, quality standards, and within service levels 
Effectively documenting issues and providing regular status and progress towards project milestones 
Role Requirements: 
Possess good analytical and problem-solving skills 
Experience in administration of Linux Servers / AWS Linux, Tomcat, Apache HTTP 
Solid scripting skills in Shell, PHP, Perl or Python 
Experience in Amazon Web Services such as EC2, CloudWatch, CloudFront, ELB/ ALB, Route53, S3 etc. 
DevOps automation: Gitlab, Ansible, Terraform, Dockers, Cloud Init, Puppet 
Patch management and related information security functions (authentication, encryption, iptables, SSL, Ciphers, etc.) 
A team player who takes ownership 
Ability to work under pressure and meet tight deadlines 
Able to work in projects independently as well as with teams 
Must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Post Graduate Diploma/ Professional Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent."
Software Engineer (MNC / Manufacturing / MES) #Urgent,"The company is a global leader in development and manufacturing of advanced mask blanks for the semiconductor manufacturing. They are now looking for talented and passionate individuals to join the team in Singapore where they will provide opportunities for professional development.
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Manufacturing Execution Systems (MES) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 1 & 2 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new applications requested by different departments.
Responsible for documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate, and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
 Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error or cost reductions and other improvement projects
Help in IT-related operations upon instruction from superior
Any other administrative duties as and when assigned
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent fields with minimum 3 years of working experience in Production System Software development would be considered.
Experience in C++, PHP, Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or PLC is an added advantage
Japanese speaking is an added advantage.
How to Apply:
Qualified or interested candidates, please submit your updated resume by using the Apply Now Button
**We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified. **
Lee Yuh Shiuan
Registration Number: R21101101
EA License Number: 18C9027"
"Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting - Associate #JobsThatMatter #Worknow #UrgentHire","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an accomplished Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done."
"Backend Tech Lead, TikTok Live (Fund Safety)","Responsibilities
Key Responsibilities:
Set up a new engineering team from scratch and support it on career development.
Provide technical support for engineers in team.
Align with product and org objectives, coordinate with cross functional teams on delivering key results.
Define long term technical roadmap for team.
Contribute to technical decisions on projects among the product.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
5+ years experience developing highly scalable backend services and systems using at least one of Java/Golang/Python/Scala/C++.
2+ years on managing or tech-leading a software engineer team.
Strong software programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style.
Deep understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and highly scalable systems design.
In depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka etc.
Experience in payment or transaction systems is a plus
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Ability to lead independent research to solve complex technical problems.
Empathetic and results oriented leader and mentor.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment.
Professional level proficiency in written and spoken English."
"Solution Architect (Digital Core Banking, Java, Microservices, API) - perm in SG","Our Client is an International Firm building a green field in-house Fintech Digital Bank and are looking for Fintech Solution Architect to build & deliver software from scratch.
As a Solution Architect, it’s your job to ascertain that envisaged solutions become reality. Taking this internal stakeholder-facing role, you are equally comfortable in deep-dive technical workshops and in board-level Leadership (CTO etc) presentations. Having earned your stripes in designing web-based architectures, you have no problem finding the scope in large-scale, complex projects. To the development team, you are the vital mainstay during processes of implementation. To Project Sponsors and partners, you are the expert liaison with a keen feel for their needs. So besides being a great technician, you are also a considerate companion who delivers remarkable results on a continuous basis.
Company Culture:        The Department is made up of a bunch of fun, hardworking and results-oriented individuals. We value teamwork, and we champion a respectful, open and trusting work environment.
Solution Architect (Digital Core Banking, Java, Microservices, API) - perm in SG
You will work closely with the Lead architect and Chief Technology Officer to manage all solution designs. You will be given business requirements or technical challenges, from there you will need to clarify the problem statements and come up with options and rationales on the recommended option.
Accountable for the solution designs (UML)
Interface with bank governance, core systems, and security teams
Manage architecture as code
Run architecture and design reviews
Work in a highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
In return for this excellent career opportunity, we ask that you have the following:
Tertiary Education in a reputable Institution
Relevant Digital Core Banking solutioning experiences in Micro-Services Architecture for Portal/Web/Mobile, Integration Platforms, API Gateway
Best practices experience on Architectural frameworks, Enterprise Integration Patterns & architectural patterns, such as Microservices, CQRS, event sourcing;
Broad, operational knowledge of application servers, databases, load balancers and other infrastructure components required to deploy web applications in a highly available and scalable environment
Prior experience Solutioning in complex, cross-functional technology-related projects in digital banking
Prior experience in Java server-side development with demonstrated implementation of core design patterns
Established experience with SCRUM, different variants of AGILE techniques, along with familiarity with code management and Continuous Integration/Delivery Implementation (CI/DI).
Robust stakeholder management skills and good interpersonal skills
Ability to demonstrate conceptual thinking skills
Can work confidently and collaboratively with cross-functional stakeholders of varying seniority
Organized with a natural inclination for planning strategy and tactics
Thrive in a fast-paced environment and can adapt to various demands in a diverse culture
Has ability to multi-task and meet multiple deadlines
Other requirements:
Knowledge of GIT, branching strategies, build and deployment pipelines, DevSecOps
Experience with SQL and NoSQL databases
Knowledge of Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge of API gateways
Knowledge of OAuth and OIDC
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP/terraform)
If this speaks to you and you are ready for a new challenge, please send your Resume in MS word format to ""Apply Now""
Even if you are not interested, you can still park your CV with us for other Banking IT positions or forward this Advertisement to your counterparts with the relevant Banking IT experiences I am looking for.
We Seek to:Understand your personal circumstances, needs and ideals
Present your credentials to our clients only with your permission
Strategize and consult with you
Your application will be kept with the strictest of confidence.
EA License No. 09C5803
Registration No. R1114115 "
Project Officer (Software Developer) - R00012414,"The Rehabilitation Research Institute of Singapore (RRIS) invites applications for the position of Project Officer. 
Key Responsibilities: 
The successful candidate will work on a research project to improve the existing data-driven markerless motion capture system.
This includes the development of algorithms related to markerless motion capture system.
The specific requirements will be assigned based on the stage of development at that moment.
The possible features to design may include multi-subject triangulation strategy, robust post-processing algorithm to clean the motion capture results from neural network output, inverse dynamics, etc.
The work also includes the implementation of graphical user interface extension for the new features that has been developed. Some possible features may include a flexible report generation module, 3D visualization enhancement, 2D information overlay enhancement, better plot generation, etc.
Job Requirements:
Degree (MS or BS) in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical/Electronic Engineering, engineering, Applied Mathematics, or equivalent industry experience.
Python programming
Experience in Graphical User Interface design
Experience in 3D visualization library such as OpenGL, PyOpenGL, or Vispy will be an advantage.
Basic understanding of camera and digital image processing. Experience in OpenCV will be an advantage.
Interest and basic understanding in machine learning will be an advantage.  
Experience in motion capture system, biomechanics analysis, or mathematics for 3D animation will be an advantage.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Hiring Institution: NTU"
"VP, Lead Java Software Developer, Liquidity Technology #Urgent #Seekbetter","Job Description
Our Global Liquidity Technology team is seeking a Lead Java Software Developer to join us on this journey. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform Liquidity management and treasury functions in the firm.
You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. Development will be predominantly done by building micro services with Java/ Springboot/ SQL and building UI with Angular/ HTML/ JavaScript and adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience in Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Junit, Mockito
Advanced experience in building cloud native microservice applications with Spring Boot and Spring Cloud
Advanced experience with one or more database technologies (e.g. Oracle)
Advanced experience in building REST APIs
Experience of working in Containerization technology and platform – Dockers, Kubernetes and good knowledge in DevOps practices.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Strong understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse).
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka"
"IOS Software Engineer, TikTok","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
We are the messaging team on TikTok. Our team's mission is to facilitate meaningful user connections through TikTok's messaging experience, which is still in its infancy. We achieve our mission by building and shipping tools that help our users more easily connect and share the things they care about.
We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us and help contribute to our aim of helping users explore and discover the world's creativity, knowledge and moments that matter in everyday life, all while empowering everyone to be a creator directly from their smartphones.
Responsibilities:
Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
Analyse and optimize iOS applications for efficiency and performance.
Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
Qualifications
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with experience in native iOS development.
Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities and limitations of iOS platform.
Proficiency in Objective-C or Swift.
Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
Good team communication and collaboration skills.
Passion and experience building consumer-facing products is a huge plus; We would love to hear about apps you've developed!"
IOS Developer,"We are hiring under Recruit Express headcount and you will be deployed to:
Location: Central
Pay: $4200 - $5800
Working Hours: Office hours
Responsibilities:
Design and architect the app with modern iOS best-practices
Involved in the full life cycle of iOS application development
Requirements:
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma/Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent
At least 2 years’ experience in development using Swift and Objective-C
Experience with handling of RESTFUL web services and JSON API’s
Interested applicants, please Email , and attention to:
Millie Goh Wei Zhen
R2199918
Recruit Express Pte Ltd
EA License No. 99C4599
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted."
C++ Developer,"Job Description
Our client, a emerging hedge fund firm headquartered in Asia, The firm's investment strategy is mainly quantitative trading using high-frequency trading strategies with a focus on domestic and overseas markets.
Your Key Responsibilities includes:
Developing, Upgrading and designing of trading infrastructure.
Ensure Trading system is running efficiently and properly by developing automation tools.
Ensuring success in the market by collaborating with other quants.
Optimizing of system performance and solving of issues.
Requirements:
Minimum a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Knowledge in C++ on Linux system is required
Alternatively, you may call +65 9004 5401 for a quick discussion.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.
Chan Chin How, Javier
Associate Consultant
Reg. No: R1989608
Stellar- Link Partners Pte Ltd (EA License: 21S0698)"
CIM Engineer (Wafer fab) _Semiconductor domain,"Job Description
Avensys is a reputed global IT professional services company headquartered in Singapore. Our service spectrum includes enterprise solution consulting, business intelligence, business process automation and managed services. Given our decade of success, we have evolved to become one of the top trusted providers in Singapore and service a client base across banking and financial services, insurance, information technology, healthcare, retail and supply chain.
We are currently looking to hire Senior CIM Engineer (Wafer Map System)_Semicon  who has proven track record in IT Industry. This is an exciting opportunity to expand your skill set, achieve job satisfaction and work-life balance. More details as below.
Senior CIM Engineer (Wafer Map System)_Semiconductor background 
Requirements:
 3+ years of semiconductor experience, with good knowledge in handling/processing wafer maps in Bump/Sort/Assy,
Having good exposure to CIM domain.
The candidate must be capable to be a Technical lead to manage overall Wafer Map System.
.Net development background
Responsibilities:
Design, Develop and implement Manufacturing Process control involving CIM and Wafer Map system In charge of Wafer map conversion, validation, merging in Txt, G85, Binary format to support Production requirements.
Work closely with Manufacturing Operation(s) and CIM team to meet daily Production requirements
Demonstrate capability to lead discussion and problem solving to arrive solution and implementation
Willing to support the team members during technical challenges to meet business expectations.
Strong technical skills in application Development with C#.NET, VB.NET, ASP.NET, MSSQL & Oracle databases, Webservices & RESTful architecture.
Good knowledge in Semiconductor manufacturing Process control and Automation solutions
Skilled in machine interfaces via SECS/GEM, GPIB and other standard communication protocols
Knowledge in Industrial 4.0 and Digital Transformation technologies
Align and meet Manufacturing Operation Smart Factory Automation requirements
WHAT’S ON OFFER
You will be remunerated with an excellent base salary and entitled to attractive company benefits. Additionally, you will get the opportunity to enjoy a fun and collaborative work environment, alongside a strong career progression.
To submit your application, please apply online or email your UPDATED CV in Microsoft Word format to seema at aven-sys.com Your interest will be treated with strict confidentiality. 
CONSULTANT DETAILS:
Consultant Name : Seema Verma
Avensys Consulting Pte Ltd
EA Licence 12C5759
Privacy Statement: Data collected will be used for recruitment purposes only. Personal data provided will be used strictly in accordance with the relevant data protection law and Avensys' privacy policy.  "
Software Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Development of embedded software for Renesas microcontrollers and microprocessors.
Testing in-house application.
Create technical documentation.
Requirements:
Degree in Computer/Electronics/Electrical Engineering or Diploma with relevant experience.
Experience in embedded tools and solutions.
Experience in C/C++, oXygen XML and AH XSL formatter.
A team player who is self-motivated, resourceful and proactive.
Strong interpersonal, communication and organizing skills.
Entry level candidates are welcome to apply as well."
Active Advisory Fullstack Developer - Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #JPM #Worknow,"The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
Senior Software Developer (Web),"Visier is the leader in people analytics. We are passionate about a 'people first' approach to business strategy and our addictive technology is transforming the way that organisations make decisions. Recently closing a hugely successful funding round and a landmark $1b valuation, Visier is embarking on an incredible phase of its 12 year growth Journey.
What you'll be doing...
Gather requirements and design new software features
Use standard computer science algorithms and data structures to solve technical problems
Understand business requirements and author technical design for features in a product
Debug own code and existing code base, and develop and document how to test a feature in a test plan
Design high performing cloud based applications with strong fundamentals in client and server architecture
Provide task breakdown, dependencies and time estimates in technical design document
Collaborate with stakeholders in other departments and fellow developers
Mentor to our junior software developers
You will be working with a variety of frontend technologies: Angular, NgRx, Play Framework.
You will be creating interactive and insightful data visualizations that power our analytic solutions
You will be a core member of a talented engineering team that continuously ships new features.
What you'll bring to the table...
A Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics or similar field with an excellent academic record in Computer Science courses
Excellent coding skills in at least one relevant programming language (i.e. JavaScript, Typescript)
Personal projects and/or contribution to projects on open source
Ability to work quickly to meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Commitment to disciplined and top quality software development – we write only high quality code and tests that ship rapidly into production
Experience with web technologies (REST, JSON, Angular, CSS, JavaScript, JQuery, VegaD3 and/or RXJS, Clarity)
Most importantly, you share our values...
You roll up your sleeves
You make it easy
You are proud
You never stop learning
You play to win
Health & Safety at Visier
Visier is committed to creating a safe and healthy environment for our employees, customers and community. As part of this commitment, we require all employees to be fully vaccinated for COVID-19 or qualify for an exemption.
See the #VisierLife in action
Instagram
LinkedIn
Hear What It's Like To Work Visier Here
Visier Candidate Privacy Notice and Recruiter Policy"
Sr. Application Developer -- [21361752] #Immediate#Urgent,"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family Group:
Technology
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family:
Applications Development
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type:
------------------------------------------------------
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi."
AVP -- Senior C# Developer #Urgent #UrgentHire #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities:
• Each developer is involved in the complete project lifecycle from requirements gathering, task estimation and implementation
• Closely work with FX Options desk in understanding the requirements and translating into simple and efficient design
• Enhance the existing Product suite by adding new Products as requested by Business
• Design Develop and Test new features in the Trading applications
• Improve the stability and performance of existing applications
• 3rd line support of the production system (dedicated 24h support teams handle 1st / 2nd line).
Qualifications:
Essential:
The successful candidate will:
At least have 5 years of in-depth commercial C# or Java development experience with interest to work on C# as the primary language.
At least 2 years of experience in writing and supporting high performing applications with expertise in Multithreading, Async communication, Reactive Extensions etc.
Experience developing and supporting mission critical applications.
Experience in Middleware technologies like EMS, Solace, Kafka etc.
Strong Object Oriented programming skills
Desirable:
Knowledge of FX derivatives is a plus with an appreciation of product structure and lifecycle.
Experience working on a mature development in a large collaborative environment."
AVP -- Senior C# Developer #Urgent',"Responsibilities:
• Each developer is involved in the complete project lifecycle from requirements gathering, task estimation and implementation
• Closely work with FX Options desk in understanding the requirements and translating into simple and efficient design
• Enhance the existing Product suite by adding new Products as requested by Business
• Design Develop and Test new features in the Trading applications
• Improve the stability and performance of existing applications
• 3rd line support of the production system (dedicated 24h support teams handle 1st / 2nd line).
Qualifications:
Essential:
The successful candidate will:
At least have 5 years of in-depth commercial C# or Java development experience with interest to work on C# as the primary language.
At least 2 years of experience in writing and supporting high performing applications with expertise in Multithreading, Async communication, Reactive Extensions etc.
Experience developing and supporting mission critical applications.
Experience in Middleware technologies like EMS, Solace, Kafka etc.
Strong Object Oriented programming skills
Desirable:
Knowledge of FX derivatives is a plus with an appreciation of product structure and lifecycle.
Experience working on a mature development in a large collaborative environment."
"Mobile App Developer (5500, MNC, AWS+High Bonuses)","• Promising career prospects
• Conducive work culture
• Attractive salary package
Responsibilities:
Reporting to the Project Manager
Key member of the development team
Participate in the end-to-end mobile application development cycle
Concept and design stage 
Development, testing, deployment, and maintenance for Mobile Application
Requirements:
Diploma/degree qualification
2-4 years of experience
Software/applications development and user interface design
Knowledgeable on the general mobile UI, architectures, trends, and emerging technologies
Analytical skills
*** Sincere & Interested applicants, kindly forward your *Updated resume (word doc format) to allan(at)prestigeprofessions.com.sg and CC: Allan (R1223894) ***"
Firmware Engineer,"Responsibilities
Design, develop and perform system / software verification & validation on embedded systems
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
Develop system on gateways and embedded controllers system communicating over wire and wireless channels
Conduct design review, bug fix and update / create design documentation
Work with other teams to implement and test on various devices for interconnectivity.
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Computer Science / Information Technology, Engineering (Computer / Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical / Electronic) or equivalent.
At least 2 year(s) of working experience in firmware development
Extensive experience in Embedded Programming using C / C++ in Embedded Linux and MCU
Good experience with various communication interface (peripherals) and protocols (especially SPI, I2C, UART, MODBUS TCP/IP and RS232/RS485)
Experience in wireless communication system / protocols eg. Bluetooth, Zigbee, Wi-Fi, Lora will be an advantage
Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively
Flexible and willing to accept a change in priorities as necessary
Good interpersonal communication and documentation / presentation skills"
Sr. Application Developer -- [21361752] #Immediate#Seekbetter#WorkNow,"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family Group:
Technology
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family:
Applications Development
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type:
------------------------------------------------------
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi."
Operations Assistant,"Job Responsibilities and Duties
Ensure every order are checked and picked precisely for identity, batch number and expiry with reference to picklist.
Ensure that labelling of customer address and zoning are legible and concise with reference to respective picklist.
Be alert of any amendments to order details and translating the amendments accurately to the respective orders.
Be able to identity and rectify discrepancies in order picking and double ordering for picklist generation.
Ensure every order is packed appropriately in accordance with Good Distribution Practice guideline to protect the quality and integrity of products distributed. (Liquid based products to be double bagged & packed in carton boxes, ensuring air cushioning for fragile goods and to reduce internal stock movement leading to breakages).
Clear segregation of picked and packed orders for following day deliveries according to well demarcated delivery zones.
Maintain cleanliness and tidiness of picking and packing area at all times.
Ensuring that storage shelves are neat and tidy after every picking activity.
Ensure accuracy during replenishment from bulk to active picking under the guidance of location codes.
Ensure FIFO and/or FEFO of stocks during the replenishment process.
Ensure that all goods left on the floor are cleared by the end of the working day.
Ensure housekeeping of storage locations done during the replenishment process.
Job Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Primary/Secondary/O Level
At least 1 year of working experience in related field
Prior experience in the pharmaceutical industry
Good team player"
"Digital Post-Trade, - Full Stack Developer #Worknow,","Job Description
As a Full Stack Developer of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems.
1 year working in Software Development 
Knowledge in one or more of the following technologies:
Core Java Fundamentals, Java 8+, Spring, Spring Boot, REST Web Services and testing frameworks such as Junit, Cucumber, etc
Demonstrable ability to build applications in React, and have understanding of the core Javascript language, up to the current ECMAScript spec. Able to write useful tests using industry-standard frameworks like jest and react-testing-library
CSS and HTML: semantic HTML, CSS optimization and, preferably, Javascript-based styling solutions (e.g., material-ui styles)
Microservices and Cloud, containers with Kubernetes orchestration
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle, MySQL and NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, MongoDB, etc
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Understanding of architecture and design principles
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Preferred skills/experience:
BPM and Workflow Engines experience is a plus"
"R&D Engineer ( React Native, Flutter, Android, IOS)","Responsibilities
Write high-quality, clean and maintainable code
Provide effective technical support for the project’s best practices
Use Flutter, Android, and iOS technologies
Familiar with professional mobile development knowledge
Responsible for assisting with the development of the mobile application (iOS or Android)
Requirements
At least 2 years of programming experience in Android or iOS application development
Experience in mobile application development
Familiar with data structures and algorithms
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please click on “Apply Now”. We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Ong Darlene Day Ibasco
EA Personnel Reg No: R22105561"
Backend Developer | Website Developer,"Job Description:
Develop and maintain a highly scalable and distributed IT system.
Write clear system documentation.
Maintain a close communication with experts and teams from around the world to discuss the - project feasibility, assist in product testing and to provide updates on project progress.
Regularly maintain and monitor software applications for error, health and performance improvement.
Provide production level support to fix urgent issues and bugs.
Research and suggest ideas to improve software application and process.
Requirement:
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Experienced in .NET Core framework preferably C# & web application technologies such as web api, HTML, CSS and etc & relational database and NOSQL database.
Able to write high performance code to handle very high concurrent requests & highly optimized SQL queries to handle very high database requests.
Knowledge in Kubernetes, Docker and microservices are an added advantage.
Eager to research new methodologies and technologies."
Software Engineer / Senior Software Engineer,"Roles & Responsibilities
As a Senior Software Engineer, you are required to be highly skilled in the technical aspects of:
C#.
Dotnet version 4.5 and above.
Entity Framework.
Restful API.
Microsoft SQL.
Messages Queues.
Microsoft Windows Server 2016 and above.
Json Format.
You are responsible for :
Setting up, developing, maintaining and deploying the Microsoft SQL server databases.
Setting up, developing, maintaining and deploying the Entity Framework.
Setting up, developing, maintaining and deploying server Web Services.
Setting up, developing, maintaining and deploying Swagger.
Setting up, developing, maintaining and deploying server ActiveMQ services.
Setting up, developing, maintaining and deploying Keylock security module on the backend server.
Creating, developing, maintaining and deploying the administration module written in WPF.
Setup, maintaining and deploying of Microsoft Windows Server environment.
Creating and maintaining any application-related documentations to be in sync with the current version of the system.
You are expected to :
Display professional conduct and independence during your term of service.
Possess initiative to get assigned tasks done.
Be a cohesive team member and participate in team discussions and actively contribute in system planning, designing and troubleshooting.
Be productive and deliver quality tasks on time.
Provide technical guidance and assistance to the rest of the team to your best capabilities.
Be able to manage work stress, tight schedules and over-time.
You maybe tasked to :
Take up additional roles, provide additional technical assistance and/or pick up new skills outside of your existing technical expertise which are deemed to be beneficial to the development, maintenance, deployment and planning of the system that the company is undertaking.
Travel and perform on-site troubleshooting when the need arises.
Perform local or overseas deployment of the system when the need arises."
Senior Software Developer - #Urgent #WorkNow,"Position Overview
Our team is currently building a scalable and frictionless account/identity experience for the entire Autodesk product and all of its users around the world.
If you have a passion to work at scale and looking for an environment to get the right things done right, this is the perfect role for you.
Our platform is built on cloud, the team is mostly self-sufficient, and we’re taking ownership of our services end-to-end. So, open communication, independence, and initiatives are part of our daily life.
Services we are building will impact all Autodesk products and millions of our users. Expect to have each day as a unique experience.
Responsibilities
Write and maintain effective and testable code, mostly in Go. Some portion of our system are written in other languages but we’re in the process of streamlining our codebase to Go
Contribute to all aspects of service development, mainly back-end services, and ensure everything is properly tested/validated
Collaborate with the whole team in running the overall production services, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them into elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement within the area of scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Get things done; that include end-to-end service ownership such as debug complex technical issues involving multiple systems & components
Minimum Qualifications
4+ years of experience as a software engineer
Solid experience in building backend system for web applications or API services
Exposure to Go. We are also open for a candidate who is strong in OOP with its implementation in any relevant programming language (such Java, C++, C#, Python, or others) and willing + capable to leap into Go swiftly. We’ll help you to make the jump and landing properly
Strong foundation of data structures, algorithm, and practical database usage
System/software performance metrics, especially in web application
Good experience in cloud-native application development and building the infrastructure as a code
Ability to convey complex message in an understandable form (written/spoken)
Preferred Qualifications
You will differentiate yourself from the rest of the candidates with any of the following qualifications:
Good sense of system design and engineering expertise in Go
Consistently aiming for a high bar in testing best practices and CI/CD
Experience working with web front-end, especially React
Working in Agile environment
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Software Engineer, Central Product Platform","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Central Product Platform team provides centralised platforms and services for our products. We are building end-to-end solutions that highly impact the core components of the product, including but not limited to: Identity & Access Platform, Notification Platform, Geolocation Platform, Social Platform, Middle Platform Infrastructure. All platforms need to handle information at a massive scale and extend well beyond business scenes.
We are building large-scale general shared technology platforms, supporting various products with the capability to do rapid iteration and quick exploration. At the same time, we are also working on engineering challenges across scalability, reliability, security and system performance, as well as a wide variety of business challenges.
On this team, you will be a big-picture thinker and strategic team-player with a passion for doing what is right.
Responsibilities:
Design, test, deploy and maintain backend services and core components of distributed systems.
Collaborate with other engineering teams to elevate technology and consistently apply best practices.
Constantly evaluate and improve efficiency, scalability, and stability of our systems.
Qualifications
BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related areas.
Abilities to quickly ramp up on new technologies, tools and domain knowledge.
Experience in backend server development and database solutions.
Good problem-solving, analytical thinking capabilities and exceptional attention to details.
Good communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Software Engineer - Central Product Platform,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Central Product Platform team provides centralised platforms and services for our products. We are building end-to-end solutions that highly impact the core components of the product, including but not limited to: Identity & Access Platform, Notification Platform, Geolocation Platform, Social Platform, Middle Platform Infrastructure. All platforms need to handle information at a massive scale and extend well beyond business scenes.
We are building large-scale general shared technology platforms, supporting various products with the capability to do rapid iteration and quick exploration. At the same time, we are also working on engineering challenges across scalability, reliability, security and system performance, as well as a wide variety of business challenges.
On this team, you will be a big-picture thinker and strategic team-player with a passion for doing what is right.
Responsibilities:
Design, test, deploy and maintain backend services and core components of distributed systems.
Conduct system designs and code reviews.
Collaborate with other engineering teams to elevate technology and consistently apply best practices.
Constantly evaluate and improve efficiency, scalability, and stability of our systems.
Qualifications
BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related areas.
3+ years experience in one or more programming languages such as Go, Java, C++, Python etc.
Abilities to quickly ramp up on new technologies, tools and domain knowledge.
Experience in backend server development and database solutions.
Good problem-solving, analytical thinking capabilities and exceptional attention to details.
Good communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
React Developer,"Responsibilities:
Participate in discovery sessions with product owners to analyse and provide solution for business requirement, with professional knowledge, experience and technical expertise.
Bridging the gap between technical and business to determine requirements and deliver recommendations.
Identifying, planning and prioritizing technical and functional requirements from business to be delivered in different sprint cycle.
Work and track closely the deliverables from software partners and delivery partners on enhancements and fixes.
Provide ongoing maintenance, support and enhancements in existing systems and platforms.
Collaborate cross-functionally with data scientists, business users, project managers and other engineers to achieve elegant solutions.
Provide recommendations for continuous improvement and increase efficiencies.
Work alongside other engineers on the team to elevate technology and consistently apply best practices.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Systems/Engineering/related field or relevant experience
Experience implementing APIs and Microservices and integration with external systems.
Must have knowledge of React Native, Redux, Fetch, Redux Thunk
Must have knowledge of modern frontend development tools like Typescript, Node, npm, yarn, etc.
Working knowledge of Bitrise CI/CD, GitLab CI, Microsoft App Center CodePush
Knowledge of Leanplum is a plus
Working knowledge of Atlassian Tools (JIRA and Confluence)
Interested candidates please click APPLY button.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Sr. Application Developer - [21361752] #Immediate #WorkNow#'.,"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family Group:
Technology
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family:
Applications Development
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type:
------------------------------------------------------
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi."
Front-end Software Developer,"Roles & Responsibilities
Duties and Responsibilities
Build, test, document and maintain web applications for our customers and internal employees
Build, test, document and maintain back-end services to power our applications
Work with the team to help drive out technical requirements
Work in a collaborative environment with other software developers to deliver on the business goals
Collaborate with other teams to build high-performing application
Working with Project Manager, Project Coordinator, Front-end developers and other team members to complete objectives
Taking lead on projects if needed
Database design and implementation
Design cohesive codes to enhance the user experience
Job Holder’s Attributes
At least 1 year of frontend backend development experience with framework (e.g. Vuejs and etc.)
Solid experience with HTML, CSS processors (SASS/SCSS) and UI framework (e.g., Bootstrap)
Able to take lead in finding solutions and be a self-starter who enjoys problem solving
Familiar with Agile and Scrum methodologies
Degree in computer programming, computer science
Fluency or understanding of MYSQL or related databases
Strong time management skills
Strong problem solving, critical thinking and communication skills
Fluent in English and Mandarin to liaise with Mandarin speaking clients and associates"
"Software Engineer (DevOps Platform), Cloud Infrastructure #Immediate","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The DevOps team is responsible for building an industry-leading R&D platform to promote the implementation and landing of DevOps integration in TikTok and its affiliates.
Responsibilities:
Responsible for the development of a company-level DevOps engineering efficiency platform;
Improve the quality and efficiency of the R&D through the construction of frameworks, platforms, tools and processes;
Including but not limited to these tasks: internal CI/CD construction, automation of integrated compilation, test and release, promotion of engineering practices based on DevOps concepts in business lines, exploration of open-source tools.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or a related field (or equivalent practical experience);
Proficient in any programming language and its common framework;
Familiar with common data structures and algorithms, database, network, cache, middleware, operation and maintenance;
Understand the design of high concurrency and high availability;
Possesses a certain understanding of application architectures such as microservices, serverless, and dynamic configuration.
Preferred Qualifications:
In-depth understanding of the internet and software R&D processes;
Keen on engineering efficiency optimization and pays attention to cutting-edge software engineering technology;
Familiar with R&D full-process tools and frameworks. Experienced with optimization and integration such as requirements, code, build, test, release, operation, maintenance, as well as other management tools;
Experienced in developing efficiency tools and private cloud platform tools."
Sr. Application Developer -- [21361752] #Immediate##Seekbetter,"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family Group:
Technology
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family:
Applications Development
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type:
------------------------------------------------------
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi."
Pega Developer,"esponsibilities
Perform Level 2 and 3 of production support
To perform problem investigation – problem identification, root cause analysis, solution definition, development and implementation
To understand the system design and provide impact analysis to any changes
To perform enhancement and defect fixing at Pega code level
To manage system risks and conjure improvements to mitigate and manage risks
To provides all tiers of Production Support to the users and this includes defect triage, data maintenance, and quality assurance functions
To provide Pega application support, defect fixing and minor enhancement for applications 
Working knowledge in AVM engagement with exposure to KPI & Metrics will be an advantage
Requirement
Certified Pega SA with 3-4 years of expr in Pega application support/development
PEGA based application experience is mandatory
Good experience in Pega applications development (Pega V7.x and V8.x)
Experience providing support for Pega applications due to having been a hands-on builder of the Pega system in production
Develop individual team member plans and monitor the quality and correctness of teams output 
Conduct reviews and track issues to closure 
Capture agreed metrics throughout the project 
Ensure compliance to standards and processes  
Knowledge on Windows Server and MS SQL database"
"AVP, - Senior C# Developer (Hybrid)' #Seekbetter","The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
• Each developer is involved in the complete project lifecycle from requirements gathering, task estimation and implementation
• Closely work with FX Options desk in understanding the requirements and translating into simple and efficient design
• Enhance the existing Product suite by adding new Products as requested by Business
• Design Develop and Test new features in the Trading applications
• Improve the stability and performance of existing applications
• 3rd line support of the production system (dedicated 24h support teams handle 1st / 2nd line).
Qualifications:
Essential:
The successful candidate will:
At least have 5 years of in-depth commercial C# or Java development experience with interest to work on C# as the primary language.
At least 2 years of experience in writing and supporting high performing applications with expertise in Multithreading, Async communication, Reactive Extensions etc.
Experience developing and supporting mission critical applications.
Experience in Middleware technologies like EMS, Solace, Kafka etc.
Strong Object Oriented programming skills
Desirable:
Knowledge of FX derivatives is a plus with an appreciation of product structure and lifecycle.
Experience working on a mature development in a large collaborative environment."
AVP - Senior C# Developer (Hybrid)',"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
• Each developer is involved in the complete project lifecycle from requirements gathering, task estimation and implementation
• Closely work with FX Options desk in understanding the requirements and translating into simple and efficient design
• Enhance the existing Product suite by adding new Products as requested by Business
• Design Develop and Test new features in the Trading applications
• Improve the stability and performance of existing applications
• 3rd line support of the production system (dedicated 24h support teams handle 1st / 2nd line).
Qualifications:
Essential:
The successful candidate will:
At least have 5 years of in-depth commercial C# or Java development experience with interest to work on C# as the primary language.
At least 2 years of experience in writing and supporting high performing applications with expertise in Multithreading, Async communication, Reactive Extensions etc.
Experience developing and supporting mission critical applications.
Experience in Middleware technologies like EMS, Solace, Kafka etc.
Strong Object Oriented programming skills
Desirable:
Knowledge of FX derivatives is a plus with an appreciation of product structure and lifecycle.
Experience working on a mature development in a large collaborative environment."
Senior Software Developer - #Urgent#WorkNow #UrgentHire #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
Our team is currently building a scalable and frictionless account/identity experience for the entire Autodesk product and all of its users around the world.
If you have a passion to work at scale and looking for an environment to get the right things done right, this is the perfect role for you.
Our platform is built on cloud, the team is mostly self-sufficient, and we’re taking ownership of our services end-to-end. So, open communication, independence, and initiatives are part of our daily life.
Services we are building will impact all Autodesk products and millions of our users. Expect to have each day as a unique experience.
Responsibilities
Write and maintain effective and testable code, mostly in Go. Some portion of our system are written in other languages but we’re in the process of streamlining our codebase to Go
Contribute to all aspects of service development, mainly back-end services, and ensure everything is properly tested/validated
Collaborate with the whole team in running the overall production services, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them into elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement within the area of scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Get things done; that include end-to-end service ownership such as debug complex technical issues involving multiple systems & components
Minimum Qualifications
4+ years of experience as a software engineer
Solid experience in building backend system for web applications or API services
Exposure to Go. We are also open for a candidate who is strong in OOP with its implementation in any relevant programming language (such Java, C++, C#, Python, or others) and willing + capable to leap into Go swiftly. We’ll help you to make the jump and landing properly
Strong foundation of data structures, algorithm, and practical database usage
System/software performance metrics, especially in web application
Good experience in cloud-native application development and building the infrastructure as a code
Ability to convey complex message in an understandable form (written/spoken)
Preferred Qualifications
You will differentiate yourself from the rest of the candidates with any of the following qualifications:
Good sense of system design and engineering expertise in Go
Consistently aiming for a high bar in testing best practices and CI/CD
Experience working with web front-end, especially React
Working in Agile environment
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Senior Software Developer - #Urgent #WorkNow #UrgentHire #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
Our team is currently building a scalable and frictionless account/identity experience for the entire Autodesk product and all of its users around the world.
If you have a passion to work at scale and looking for an environment to get the right things done right, this is the perfect role for you.
Our platform is built on cloud, the team is mostly self-sufficient, and we’re taking ownership of our services end-to-end. So, open communication, independence, and initiatives are part of our daily life.
Services we are building will impact all Autodesk products and millions of our users. Expect to have each day as a unique experience.
Responsibilities
Write and maintain effective and testable code, mostly in Go. Some portion of our system are written in other languages but we’re in the process of streamlining our codebase to Go
Contribute to all aspects of service development, mainly back-end services, and ensure everything is properly tested/validated
Collaborate with the whole team in running the overall production services, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them into elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement within the area of scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Get things done; that include end-to-end service ownership such as debug complex technical issues involving multiple systems & components
Minimum Qualifications
4+ years of experience as a software engineer
Solid experience in building backend system for web applications or API services
Exposure to Go. We are also open for a candidate who is strong in OOP with its implementation in any relevant programming language (such Java, C++, C#, Python, or others) and willing + capable to leap into Go swiftly. We’ll help you to make the jump and landing properly
Strong foundation of data structures, algorithm, and practical database usage
System/software performance metrics, especially in web application
Good experience in cloud-native application development and building the infrastructure as a code
Ability to convey complex message in an understandable form (written/spoken)
Preferred Qualifications
You will differentiate yourself from the rest of the candidates with any of the following qualifications:
Good sense of system design and engineering expertise in Go
Consistently aiming for a high bar in testing best practices and CI/CD
Experience working with web front-end, especially React
Working in Agile environment
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Junior Developer C# or Java (Hybrid). #workNow #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Intermediate Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize knowledge of applications development procedures and concepts, and basic knowledge of other technical areas to identify and define necessary system enhancements, including using script tools and analyzing/interpreting code
Consult with users, clients, and other technology groups on issues, and recommend programming solutions, install, and support customer exposure systems
Apply fundamental knowledge of programming languages for design specifications.
Analyze applications to identify vulnerabilities and security issues, as well as conduct testing and debugging
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Identify problems, analyze information, and make evaluative judgements to recommend and implement solutions
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
2-5 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Intermediate level experience in Applications Development role
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Software Developer, C++","Job details
Salary
$30 - $35 an hour
Job Type
Full-time
Contract
Full Job Description
Position Overview
Lumina is offering a rare opportunity for someone who is already an outstanding software engineer and wants to expand their skills further. You will find this an intellectually stimulating job. You will be a key contributor to a fascinating and important project to develop the next generation of our acclaimed analytics software.
Our Analytica language has a unique combination of features in the space of programming languages: It is a functional language with automatic dependency maintenance, intelligent arrays, uncertainty, and visual programming based on influence diagrams. You will help design and implement the next generation of language and user interface software. You will work with and be mentored by a truly outstanding and accomplished software developer and computer scientist, who is also an unusually easy person to work with.
We are looking for someone who is versatile, a fast learner, and a natural problem solver.
While getting started, you will need to work several hours a day with our California team in Pacific Time (UTC-8). Eventually, you will need to overlap just a few hours per week.
Job Requirements
At least 5 years of experience in software design and development
Solid VC++ development skills
Demonstrated technological breadths, such as experience with multiple programming languages and technologies
Example applications or code you can share with us
Good English communication skills
Bachelor’s or graduate degree in computer science or a related field
Nice to have
Cloud server experience (GCP, AWS or Azure, Kubernetes). DevOps exposure
Computer language design and implementation
Flow architectures / reactive programming
Differential programming
Data analysis, optimization, machine learning
Statistics, decision analysis, probabilistic models, and Bayesian inference
JavaScript, HTML, CSS, web development
Enthusiasm for building software tools to help move our planet onto a more sustainable path
This is a full-time contract position, 40+ hours per week; initial rate offer range is at $30 -35 per hour (with regular performance review and wage increase).
About Lumina
Lumina is a small, growing software and consulting company, and creator of the Analytica modeling software. Lumina provides consulting and advanced analytics software to help organizations make challenging decisions in energy, environment, transport, finance, healthcare, and more. Lumina’s clients range from clean-tech start-ups to Fortune 50 companies, utilities, the National Renewable Energy Laboratory, the Department of Energy, and the World Bank.
For those who enjoy decision science, analytics, or software development, Lumina is a great place to apply your talents to interesting and important problems. We are passionate about helping find a path to the future that is environmentally and economically sustainable.
Lumina provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.
Applicants from underrepresented groups such as minorities, veterans, or individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply."
FullStack Developer- Wealth Management- Associate #Seekbetter,"The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering
Minimum 3 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
"Senior Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, Associate #Worknow #JobsThatMatter #Worknow #Immediate","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"AVP - Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst, - Hybrid","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Job Purpose:
Citi’s FXLM technology group supports the front office technology operations of one of the world’s largest capital market businesses. Our talented technology group is looking for a hands-on, java analyst developer to work in a Singapore-based development team which will be developing next generation FX Trade booking gateway - a strategic FX Trading gateway for all ECN and API clients to deal with CITI.
Responsibilities:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
To acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain and FX electronic trading
Use of latest Java technologies
Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / Engineering, or equivalent certification
5 years of technical experience in Server-side development
Strong core java 8/11, Spring and Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles, Unix / Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase are good to have but not mandatory
Excellent communication skills as there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing
Passion for technology, especially Java
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving workflow
Understanding of financial concepts and ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Additional Information:
Knowledge of FX is an advantage
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of eTrading or ecommerce application is an advantage"
EFX/Commodities Application Support #Seekbetter,"Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
Full Stack Engineer | Software Engineer,"5 Day, 9:30 am - 6:30pm
One Week Orientation at Pasir Panjang Office
WFH | 5 Days
IT Solutions Industry
Interested applicants can send your resume to 91355698 (George) and allow our Consultants to match you with our Clients. No Charges will be incurred by Candidates for any service rendered.
Full Stack Developer & Backend Developer C#, SQL
(React js will be a bonus)
Job Scopes - Full Stack Developer
Creating multi-tiered Web applications and Mobile App applications
Familiar with Agile Software Development / Scrum practices
Analyze, design, program, test, troubleshoot, document and maintain IT systems or applications
Perform and manage stages of the SDLC and involvement in systems review with Project Manager
Provide maintenance support to customers (internal and/or external)
Opportunity to involve in various technologies: Signal R, Redis, MongoDB, Reactive Extension (Rx)
Other adhoc duties as assigned"
"Java Software Developer, - Payment Technology, Associate #Worknow,'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development, such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing Microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Support Analyst (Payment),"Job Responsibilities
For Product:
Development of software products / solutions including design, coding and testing conforming to standard development methodology and programming standards.
Documentation of design specifications, program specifications, test specifications, test data and test results.
Preparation of product manuals and training materials.
Customer & product support for existing customers
Onsite implementation of customer projects
Travelling is necessary.
For In-house application:
Provide regional Support to other APAC offices on query & month-end process
Maintain & support email for any ad-hoc request
Develop & enhance existing application
Maintain documentation for related
Specific Skills Requirements
Technical Skill :
COBOL / C on Tandem (HP Nonstop)
Open Platform, Java
Visual Basic, ASP, VB Scripts, Web-based development tool
Application Knowledge :
ATM / POS device knowledge; Visa & MasterCard online system
Electronic Banking system / Online Transaction Switching/Processing
Payment processing system / Card processing system
New technology on various e-payments initiatives, e.g. mobile payment, internet payment, QR payment, or any other contactless payment, etc."
Full Stack Developer (Visualisation),"Job description:
Design and develop a visualisation platform, comprising of user interface, data ingestion tools and visualisation aids, to visualise data generated in real-time and non-real time from digital twins of ocean going platforms and maritime systems.
Maintain system configuration, interface specifications and user documentation for each development cycle.
Engage stakeholders (hydrodynamics and structural engineers) to refine and prioritize requirements for system enhancements.
Any other duties as assigned by supervisor.
Requirements:
Qualification & Field of Study:
Bachelor/Masters in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or equivalent. 
Work Experience:
At least 3 years of relevant working experience in UX design, data visualisation or Augmented Reality/Virtual Reality.
Proven track record in designing data structures, algorithmic programming, data visualisation, virtual or augmented reality, and database management.
Proficient with C++, Matlab, Python, database technologies, and visualisation using game engines such as Unity 3D.
Experience in MPI-based parallelisation and GPU computation is an advantage.
Other Requirements:
Good interpersonal and communications skills.
Good organization skills and ability to adapt and work effectively as team player.
Curious, resourceful, and self-driven with a high degree of professional integrity. 
The above eligibility criteria are not exhaustive. A*STAR may include additional selection criteria based on its prevailing recruitment policies. These policies may be amended from time to time without notice. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Order Fulfilment Assistant (Night Shift),"Roles and Responsibilities:
·  Responsible for taking orders from customers and clients:
(a)  Mobile Application
(b)  Phone Call
(c)  Email
(d)  Salesman
·  Process order into AX system, print job card distribute to respective production department
·  Co-ordinatate and work closely with the production and logistic department
·  Responsible for running the shipping document’s DO & Invoice from system
·  Process order according to delivery route, print & sort DO/Invoice to Logistic for respective route.
Requirements
·  Posesses a minimum of an O level educational qualification
·  Able to use computer efficiently
·  Working Hours: 5pm – 2am (night shift)
·  5.5days work week
·  Able to work extra 2 Sundays in a month (paid extra)
·  Good communication skills"
"Java Developer, Fintech","Senior Java Developer - Fintech Payments

Description

Our client is a high-growth payment fintech company backed by large banks and state holding companies, that aims to disrupt the traditional cross-border payment and serve the world's leading financial institutions through blockchain technology.

You will implement the cross-border payment platform, build key features around privacy solution, and be at the forefront of technology innovation.

Requirement

With a bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field, with 5-10 years of development experience (i.e. Java, Go, Javascript). You should have strong knowledge of data structures, common algorithms, and design patterns. Experienced in building microservices structures and knowledge of cloud services is a plus.

To Apply

For interested candidates, please send your CV to ya@kerryconsulting.com. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Registration No: R1988390

Licence No: 16S806"
Software Engineer - Live Streaming Infrastructure #Immediate,"Responsibilities
Live Streaming Infrastructure is a world-leading live streaming platform that provides end to end solutions for TikTok and also our external partners. We are building the next generation live streaming platform including live streaming ingestion, processing and delivery, to provide the best live streaming experience for our billions of users around the world. By joining us, you will have the opportunity to not only tackle the challenges of large scale distributed system across multi regions which generates huge amount of data from billions of users, but also the unique challenges from live streaming to provide low latency and high quality videos for different types of network connectivity even when the live event can go viral anytime to generate huge amount of traffic.
Responsibilities:
Design, build and maintain a global scale, multi-regional live streaming platform.
Design, implement and operate our critical and scalable services - ranging from video delivery services, live scheduling services, and core persistence layer.
Build live streaming platforms, systems, and infrastructure with knowledge in network and distributed systems.
Ensure service & system quality by building testing framework and creating automation tests.
Participate in design reviews and code reviews for the live streaming infrastructure team.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, Java, Python, or Go.
Familiar with Unix/Linux operating systems.
Experience with SQL, NoSQL databases, Memcache/Redis.
Experience with container technology, cloud-native infrastructure, and video processing technology will be considered as a bonus.
Expertise in designing, analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems."
Junior Developer C# or Java (Hybrid). - #workNow#,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Intermediate Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize knowledge of applications development procedures and concepts, and basic knowledge of other technical areas to identify and define necessary system enhancements, including using script tools and analyzing/interpreting code
Consult with users, clients, and other technology groups on issues, and recommend programming solutions, install, and support customer exposure systems
Apply fundamental knowledge of programming languages for design specifications.
Analyze applications to identify vulnerabilities and security issues, as well as conduct testing and debugging
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Identify problems, analyze information, and make evaluative judgements to recommend and implement solutions
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
2-5 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Intermediate level experience in Applications Development role
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Senior Engineer 1 / Full Stack Developer,"Job Description & Responsibilities
The candidate will be attached to the Digital Health Solutions department. He/she will lead the technical software development. In this position, the candidate will gain exposure to the product development life cycle of software as medical device (SaMD), and breadth of medical device projects based on various technologies and disease states.
The job activities include but not limited to the list below:
Align and work together with Project Manager and Solution architect for the Software development.
Plan and provide inputs to the overall project plan and deliverables.
Responsible for the software development and technical validation.
Build responsive performant web frontends for cross-platform browsers.
Build highly scalable backends using modern server side frameworks.
Design and develop robust APIs, web services, and databases.
Envision the software requirements to create solutions from scratch.
Collaboratively take part in all aspects of software delivery.
Job Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology / Computer Science / Engineering or equivalent.
 Work Experience
Minimum 3 years of experience in full stack software development.
 Technical Skills
Experience in building client-side applications using React, Angular, Flutter, Firebase, etc.
Experience in building server-side applications using Node.js, Express, Python, .NET, etc.
Experience in working with SQL and NoSQL databases such as MongoDB, Redis, Firestore, MySQL.
Experience in designing and developing REST APIs and working with OAuth and OpenID Connect.
Experience in working with cloud providers such as AWS, GCP, Azure, and serverless services.
Experience in working with FHIR, EHR systems, medical software, or digital health apps is a plus.
Soft Skills
Strong communication and collaborative skills to work closely with varied teams and partners.
Abilities/Aptitudes
Highly motivated and results driven.
Proactive and takes ownership of the projects.
Adaptable to work exigencies.
Works well as part of a team, yet able to work independently.
Prioritises assigned tasks and manages time accordingly.
Self-learner.
The above eligibility criteria are not exhaustive. A*STAR may include additional selection criteria based on its prevailing recruitment policies. These policies may be amended from time to time without notice. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Purple Team Engineer,"We're working with a Global E-commerce Unicorn to seek a Purple Team Engineer.
This is a newly created Global role, and you will be part of a fresh team responsible for the following: 
Work on threat models with Global E-commerce business partners 
Use of open-source pen testing tools, hacking systems 
Be responsive to violations in security systems 
Maintain 0 day exploits on the relevant tech stakes 
Work alongside technical and non-technical stakeholders 
Requirements: 
Degree in CS, CIS, Engineering, Cybersecurity 
5 years experience with IT and Cloud Security systems 
Experienced in investigations and rectification
APT, VA/PT, Forensics, threat emulation, APT TTP
Interest & Application
To further consult on this role, please send your updated Word format resume to ""Apply Now""
Personnel Registration No R22111334
EA license No. 09C5803"
"Backend Java Software Engineer, - Payment Technology - Associate #Immediate #Urgent","About Team
J.P. Morgan Payment Technology is looking for a Backend Java Software Developer to join our global team for a Greenfield development project. You will be part of the pioneer team in Singapore as we build our payment digital capabilities in the region.
In this role, you will be working with state of the art technologies to design and develop a cloud based platform for external and internal development teams to integrate efficiently with the Payments API Ecosystem
Primary Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable, well thought and defect free solutions.
Participate in Agile ceremonies - standups, retrospective, sprint planning and backlog refinement.
Write enterprise grade code with production stability and resiliency in mind.
Develop deep technical understanding of all the interfaces and communication protocol in the platform.
Build and maintain automated monitoring tools.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Manage hygiene of the application (code smells, vulnerabilities, code coverage).
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the project and product teams.
Experience and Skills Required
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related disciplines.
Minimum 3 years of Java development expertise is a must.
Hands-on with Relational Databases, Spring Boot, REST APIs, Junit, Mockito, JPA
Experience working on large enterprise applications with micro service based architecture. Cloud knowledge and Kubernetes is preferred.
Past understanding of working in and managing production environment is preferred.
Should be detail-oriented, strong analytical and good communication skills are a must.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams across the globe.
Pro-actively participate in designing/solution of the feature/platform
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
Business Advisory Senior Associates,"About Us
We are associated with one of the world's leading accounting firms, with a wide network of 547 offices in over 113 jurisdictions.
We have vacancies within our Business Advisory division for motivated professionals.
We offer opportunities for individuals of all backgrounds to harvest their full potential during their tenure with us through a continuous learning journey. We place emphasis on our training program as the core towards our principle of building technical competency in all of our professional staff. More importantly your career path with be customised to your individual specific needs. The firm will be on the same page as what is to be based on your personal needs and aspirations. We look forward to having you onboard and start building this exceptional experience with us.
Responsibilities:
Provides a range of business advisory services to a portfolio of clients which includes but not limited to the followings:-
Handle full sets of books/ accounts and financial reporting, ensuring compliance with Singapore Financial Reporting Standards and regulatory requirements as well as adherence to Company’s policies and procedures
Prepare and submit GST returns
Prepare yearly financial reports in XBRL format for Annual Return submission
Process monthly payroll computations and generate payroll reports, including process yearly IR8A/IR8E reports
Prepare individual and corporate tax computations
Requirements:
Degree or Diploma in Accountancy or equivalent
Minimum 3 to 4 years of relevant experience, including audit experience
Equip with knowledge of Singapore Financial Reporting Standards, IRAS legislation, Employment Act and CPF Act
Experience with XERO is preferred
Proficient in MS Office (MS Excel and MS Word)
Interested applicants should send in their detailed resume stating why they are suitable for the role; their notice period; and expected salary."
"Software Engineer (R&D System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The R&D system team is responsible for the engineering efficiency of TikTok and its affiliates, and is committed to building an advanced and standardized R&D infrastructure, accelerating R&D efficiency and improving the quality of our engineer team. Our products include R&D collaboration platform, continuous integration/continuous release system, Cloud IDE, etc.
Responsibilities
Build advanced and standardized R&D tools and platforms to accelerate R&D efficiency, improving the efficiency and quality of our engineer team;
Be responsible for high-quality design, coding, and tackling highly challenging and technical problems;
Cooperate with product manager, participate in product requirement discussion, function definition, etc.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field (or equivalent practical experience);
Good taste and passion for coding, and the ability to design and write high-quality codes;
Proficiency with development technologies such as Go/Python, protocol, architecture, storage, cache, etc., and familiarity with web security;
Have good product awareness, and use product effects as the most important driving factor;
Experience in code management, CI/CD, DevOps, and other related fields is preferred."
"Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, - Associate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Worknow","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an accomplished Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done."
Senior Software Developer - #Urgent #WorkNow #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
Our team is currently building a scalable and frictionless account/identity experience for the entire Autodesk product and all of its users around the world.
If you have a passion to work at scale and looking for an environment to get the right things done right, this is the perfect role for you.
Our platform is built on cloud, the team is mostly self-sufficient, and we’re taking ownership of our services end-to-end. So, open communication, independence, and initiatives are part of our daily life.
Services we are building will impact all Autodesk products and millions of our users. Expect to have each day as a unique experience.
Responsibilities
Write and maintain effective and testable code, mostly in Go. Some portion of our system are written in other languages but we’re in the process of streamlining our codebase to Go
Contribute to all aspects of service development, mainly back-end services, and ensure everything is properly tested/validated
Collaborate with the whole team in running the overall production services, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them into elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement within the area of scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Get things done; that include end-to-end service ownership such as debug complex technical issues involving multiple systems & components
Minimum Qualifications
4+ years of experience as a software engineer
Solid experience in building backend system for web applications or API services
Exposure to Go. We are also open for a candidate who is strong in OOP with its implementation in any relevant programming language (such Java, C++, C#, Python, or others) and willing + capable to leap into Go swiftly. We’ll help you to make the jump and landing properly
Strong foundation of data structures, algorithm, and practical database usage
System/software performance metrics, especially in web application
Good experience in cloud-native application development and building the infrastructure as a code
Ability to convey complex message in an understandable form (written/spoken)
Preferred Qualifications
You will differentiate yourself from the rest of the candidates with any of the following qualifications:
Good sense of system design and engineering expertise in Go
Consistently aiming for a high bar in testing best practices and CI/CD
Experience working with web front-end, especially React
Working in Agile environment
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Cyber Security Software Engineer (Must have C, Python or Java exp) based in Changi","THE FUTURE IS WHAT WE MAKE IT
Advanced Cyber Security Architect / Engineer
Singapore
At Honeywell, we make a lot of incredible things. But most importantly, we make the future, and are looking for people to join our team global team of future shapers. When you join Honeywell, you become a member of our performance culture comprised of diverse leaders, thinkers, innovators, dreamers and doers who are changing the future. Our people are committed to each other and to the realisation of our vision through their unique job functions. Our businesses embrace the challenges of innovation so that we define the future. And our global opportunities are endless for you to grow and get recognised for your passion to perform.
We are seeking a creative and forward-thinking cybersecurity engineer to develop and enhance cyber security solutions to address unique security challenges in critical infrastructure and industrial businesses. The Cybersecurity engineer will be working closely with other engineers in the Singapore Cybersecurity CoE engineers to understand new and existing cyber related problems, design and develop solutions, evaluate internal and third-party solutions, and support or participate on customer projects.
Key Responsibilities:
·        Contribute to the development of the Cyber Security services portfolio
·        Research solutions to challenging industrial cyber security problems
·        Regularly engage with account managers, business development managers, solution architects, and customers to develop and deliver technical presentation on Honeywell industrial cyber security products and services.
·        Ability to write / craft clear, understandable documentation that translates complicated technical processes to a target audience. Deliverables include technical publications; industry conference presentations; course development and delivery; and prototype tools and techniques.
·        Understanding of networking fundamentals, including network hardware, systems, protocols, and network management applications and tools.
·        Responsible for co-managing cybersecurity CoE infrastructure ensuring systems are well-maintained and available, as business requires.
·        Perform Application and System administration tasks required to keep the Cyber Lab operational at industry standard level
·        Minimum travel required for customer meetings, training, conferences, etc.
Key Experience & Capabilities:
Bachelor’s degree in a computer related field such as Computer Science, Computer information systems, electronics or in lieu of degree
At least 3-5 years of directly related experience.
Hands on experience with one or more of the following programming and scripting languages:
PowerShell
Java
C/C++/C#
Python
JavaScript
Experience with virtualization, networking, open source and Microsoft
Troubleshooting skills to resolve basic network and application or system integration issues.
·        Experience in networking technologies.
·        Experience with Cyber Security Technologies
Preferred Qualifications: (at least one below certification)
CISCO Certified Network Associate
CISSP or GICSP or equivalent
Microsoft Certified Systems Engineer
IT Knowledge:
Experience in LAN architectures & related diagnostic tools
LAN networking principles and protocols including Ethernet, hubs, switches, Routers, TCP/IP, VLAN, Next Generation Firewall, DMZ, VPN, IDS, IPS
TCP/IP protocols – SMTP, SNMP, SCP, SSL, HTTP, SSH, SSL
Experience Network Security – Firewall, ACL, IDS, IPS
Microsoft – Active Directory, DNS, WSUS, Terminal Server, PowerShell
Experience with anti-virus systems, backup & restore solutions, system management
Competencies:
Result oriented
Confident – ability to work with minimal supervision
Open minded- Integrative thinker
Effective communicator
Customer service orientated
Self-motivated
About Us
The world is changing. And it’s a familiar story at Honeywell. Our $36 billion business was founded on a legacy of firsts spanning 130 years. We’re building a safer, smarter, and more sustainable world through our technology and software across each of our 930 sites globally. Our impact is seen in every shape and size around the world. Our solutions are felt daily in aerospace, buildings and cities, retail, chemicals and materials, safety, industrial and manufacturing, safety, and supply chains.
Discover More
We’ve been innovating for more than 100 years and now we’re creating what’s next. There’s a lot more available for you to discover. Our solutions, our case studies, our #futureshapers, and so much more. Learn more at careers.honeywell.com/us/en/
If you believe what happens tomorrow is determined by what we do today, you’ll love working at Honeywell.
The future is what we make it. So join us and let’s do this together."
"Senior Backend Software Engineer, Video Arch","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Popular video products of Tiktok are all empowered by our cutting-edge cloud technologies. Working in this team, you will have the opportunity to tackle challenges of large-scale networks all over the world, while leveraging your expertise in coding, algorithms, complexity analysis, and large-scale system design.
Responsibilities
Implement and integrate next generation computing platform for multimedia processing, including severless / faas, heterogeneous computing, video intelligence.
Design, build and maintain a global scale, multi-regional video infrastructure system.
Design, implement and operate our critical and scalable services, including video delivery services, upload services, and core persistence layer.
Build live streaming platforms, systems, and infrastructure with knowledge in network and distributed systems.
Participate in design reviews and code reviews for the video infrastructure team.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical background involving software/system engineering, or equivalent working experience.
Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: C, C++, Java, Python, or Go.
Expertise in designing, analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.
Experience with network software, e.g. TCP/IP, IP Tables, NAT, Deep Packet Inspection, IPV4, IPV6, routing protocols, etc.
Experience with CDN, Multimedia, Live Streaming, and WebRTC.
Familiar with Unix/Linux operating systems.
Experienced in implementing and integrating next generation computing platform for multimedia processing, including severless / faas, heterogeneous computing, video intelligence."
"Java Software Engineer, - Regulatory Reporting - Vice President #Urgent #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #WorkNow'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Software Engineer, Senior Associate #JobsThaMatter #Seekbetterer #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 6 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
Site Reliability Engineer - Applied Machine Learning #Urgent,"Responsibilities
[About Tiktok]
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
[About the Role]
Site Reliability Engineering (SRE) of Applied Machine Learning (AML) team combines system engineering and the art of machine learning to develop and run massively distributed AI/recommendation system around the world.
On the SRE team, you'll have the opportunity to sharpen your expertise in coding, performance analysis and large system operation, and get heavily involved in the process of hardware/capacity decision-making.
SRE ensures that the very centric machine learning services at ByteDance have the highest level of availability, as well as creating highly automated systems and pipelines.
Qualifications
[Minimum Qualifications]
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 3+yrs relevant experience.
Proven experience in analyzing and troubleshooting distributed systems.
Prior experience designing and maintaining large-scale systems.
Experience programming in at least one of the following languages: Python or C/C++.
[Preferred Qualifications]
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment.
Strong understanding of code optimizing and routine tasks automation.
Proficiency in at least one machine learning framework: TensorFlow, PyTorch, MXNet or PaddlePaddle.
Solid background of algorithms and data structures."
"Software Engineer (Pega Developer), Associate, Singapore. #Immediate'","Job Description
The Cyber security organization’s objective is to ensure that JPMC is able to effectively detect, prevent, and respond to cyber threats against our technology infrastructure. The scope of Cyber security comprises detection and monitoring of threats and vulnerabilities, managing security incidents, and evolving our preventive infrastructure to keep ahead of the threat. We accomplish this through strong information security leadership and active collaboration with line of business information risk managers to provide high quality security solutions and services that are focused on improving the Firm's risk posture.
Specific responsibilities will include:
Analyze, design, develop, debug, test, document, deploy and provide production support applications using primary skills in Java, J2EE, Pega PRPC (Pega Rules Process Commander), and BPM, Oracle.
Work with product owner and Cyber security operations on agreeing on refining business requirements and acceptance criteria.
Understand business workflow requirements from Cyber Operations team/Business Analysts and implement those requirements in Java/J2EE and Pega Rules Process Commander platform as part of a distributed agile team.
Implement test-driven development, Continuous Deployment and Continuous Integration practices and adhere to JPMC software development process. 
Assist team in supporting the application in QA and production environments    
Identify opportunities for process and tool improvements; drive them from concept to design to implementation
Keep abreast with the latest development practices and road map of Pega
Interact with business and cross block teams, identifying application impacts, interface design and technical specification design documentation 
Project scoping, release management, build planning, technical documentation and status reporting  
Lead the project team, technical training and mentoring for implementation of solutions and roll outs  
Ensure all quality standards are followed for the deliverables through code metrics checks, code reviews, unit and regression testing. Support quality assurance, performance and business user acceptance testing phases
Lead the team on Tech Refresh initiatives to revamp the underlying technology and application infrastructure to make it compliant with enterprise wide controls and policies.
Qualification
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of hands-on experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture    
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems  
Working proficiency in developmental tool-sets 
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices 
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational  goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture 
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages: Java/J2EE, Object Oriented
Proficiency in UI frameworks such as Java Script, React/Angular
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement    
Oracle SQL experience
Proven hands-on application development experience in large enterprise  class environment
Excellent understanding of integration with third party APIs (Web services, JSON, REST, XML etc.)
Proficiency in cloud and devops implementation
Good understanding on database design and query optimization
Experience with progressive development practices and tools (e.g. unit testing, static code analysis, continuous integration, etc.)
Strong interpersonal and communication skills; capable of writing documentation, training users in complex topics
Ability to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment while remaining productive and professional; exercise patience and ability to multi task  
Agile experience"
Senior KDB Developer. #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,"Overview of Citi:
Citi, the world leading global bank, has approximately 200 million customer accounts and a presence in more than 160 countries and jurisdictions worldwide. Citi provides consumers, corporations, governments and institutions with a broad range of financial products and services, including consumer banking and credit, corporate and investment banking, securities brokerage, transaction services, and wealth management. Citi enables clients to achieve their strategic financial objectives by providing them with cutting-edge ideas, best-in-class products and solutions, and unparalleled access to capital and liquidity.
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Implementation of Engineering/Architecture standards and programs
Project management of key components
Follow SDLC and Engineering standards
Utilize knowledge of applications development procedures and concepts, and basic knowledge of other technical areas to
identify and define necessary system enhancements, including using script tools and analyzing/interpreting code
Consult with users, clients, and other technology groups on issues, and recommend programming solutions, install, and support
Analyze applications to identify vulnerabilities and security issues, as well as conduct testing and debugging
Skills:
Experience within the technology or banking industry
Experience of developing or supporting q/KDB+ solutions
Experience of developing Java solutions is a plus.
Scripting (Shell)
Unix (preferably Linux)
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent work experience"
Software Engineer J39793,"We are looking for Software Engineer to join IT software company!
Working Hours: Monday to Friday
Working Location: Tanjong Pagar
Basic Salary: Up to S$ 6,500 + AWS + VB (Permanent Roles)
Fintech Project Exposure, Regional Project and AWS Cloud Platform
Responsibilities
Design and develop user interfaces using ReactJS best practices 
Adapt user interfaces for modern internet applications using the latest front-end technologies 
Write codes using JavaScript, CSS and HTML 
Develop e-application codes and unit tests in ReactJS/NextJS 
Consume Rest APIs to power applications 
Introduce and adapt new technologies to the team based on suitability to deliver a solution 
Ensure high code quality and best practices 
Proactive approach to improving current web pages and work processes 
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Possess good experience developing web application, Web Forms and Enterprise Workflows
Experience in JavaScript, HTML5, CSS3, Bootstrap and JQuery.
Experience in backend language, like Java, Python, Ruby
Thorough understanding of React.js and its core principles
Familiarity with RESTful APIs
Knowledge of UI/UX design principles
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have agreed & consented to us collecting, using, retaining & disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration. Please refer to ScienTec’s Privacy Policy https://www.scientecconsulting.com/privacy-policy for full details. If you wish to withdraw your consent, please write to us at dpo(at)scientecconsulting.com.
(Note: Any resumes of job applications sent to this mailbox will not be attended as it is solely for the purpose of personal data protection-related matters.)
Kris Ang
Recruitment Consultant
Ang Wen Hao (Kris) – R2090523
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd - 11C5781"
Web developer,"Full Job Description
We are looking for a skilled web developer who will be responsible for developing and/or designing websites for our company. You will be working alongside a team of other developers in creating, maintaining, and updating our websites.
In order for you to succeed in this role, you will need to be proficient in JavaScript, HTML, CSS, and have solid knowledge and experience in programming applications.
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $2,223.10 - $7,062.15 per month
Benefits:
Company car
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Food provided
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental pay types:
Commission pay
Overtime pay
Performance bonus"
"Senior Software Engineer, Java, Payments Technology, #urgent #Immediate,'","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
You will be working for a global team with members in Singapore, India and North America. The team is responsible for building low value and real time payments systems for our corporate customers. As a full stack developer, you will be working on high throughput, low latency micro services. There is a huge opportunity to learn the payments domain.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, MySQL and Cassandra
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of one or more IMDG technologies, e.g. Gemfire, Hazelcast
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Strong technical leadership
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT"
URGENT !! / Software Engineer / System Analyst (Java / SQL / C / .net),"Permanent job opportunity
Great remuneration and benefits
Great career progression
5 Days / MNC
Job Description
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Responsible for documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate, and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error or cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related fields
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent fields with minimum 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions would be considered
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is an added advantage
Successful candidate will have opportunity to work in our new facility and to be trained and worked overseas for a periods
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please send your latest resume to ref27(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
 Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd    
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448"
TTS Full Stack Senior Programmer Analyst - (AVP).,"Responsibilities
The position sits within the Operations technology team that is responsible for the engineering, infrastructure management and
implementation aspects of various automation solutions in TTS group within Citi
The successful candidate must have below expertise, apart from decent knowledge Microsoft Stack (C#, ASP.Net, MVC, Web API’s, SQL Server, ADO.Net, Entity Framework, Angular JS, JQuery).
Understanding business requirement and prepare solution design/diagram
Creating, implementing timelines and roadmaps processes for developing and improving the product.
Interfacing with operations to ensure that the desired operational KPI’s are met throughout the lifecycle of a product.
Guiding the success of our product and communicating with the cross-technology team that is responsible for improving it
l Strong knowledge in Imaging and Workflow domain
Job Background / Context
A full stack developer who is expert in building scalable applications.
The successful candidate is expected to be talented software
professional and will be responsible for the success and timely delivery of software components and solutions.
The appropriate candidate will clearly demonstrate his ability to improve Continuous integration and provide process improvement areas.
Candidate will work independently and is highly self-motivated. Also has to oversee a team of personnel on technical issues, including development, releases and engineering tasks.
Design, development, testing and implementation of software solutions.
Scope for influencing design and architecture.
Collaborate with the rest of the engineering team to design and launch new features.
Proactively notify Development Project Manager of risks, bottlenecks, problems, issues, and concerns.
Compliance with Citi's System Development Lifecycle and Information Security requirements.
Will work closely with Quality Control teams to deliver quality software to agreed project schedules.
Work with Product owner and understand all functional and technical requirements of the project.
Providing second line production support including root cause analysis for the developed software solutions.
Key Responsibilities:
Involved in end to end development with WEB API using C# with MVC Architecture.
Partners with Project Manager during project delivery to provide any design clarity, Coordinates development planning across multiple projects, including release planning.
Provides mentoring and guidance to developers.
Creates development standards and promotes modularization and reuse of code
Contributes to creation of standard approaches and techniques
Develops rapid prototypes and Proofs of Concepts
Out of the box thinking, to identify and work around process design
Any Agile certification, Microsoft Azure would be added advantage
Hands-off knowledge on OCR, Automation, Digitization tool is preferred
Skills:
Strong background of banking domain (preferably Document digitization and automation)
Deep understanding of technology and architecture concepts in .NET technologies
Previous hands on experience in development in Microsoft technologies such, C#, WEB API, MVC, Angular JS, SQL server & ADO.NET
Hands on experience with unit testing tools like VS Testing framework, NUNIT etc.
Decent problem solving, analysis, and design skills
Excellent communication skills with the ability to present technical concepts to a non-technical audience
Experience in troubleshooting production problems and working with a team to resolve issues
Experience with test-driven, agile development and a continuous integration build environment.
Knowledge/Experience:
More than 10 years of experience in Software Design and Development with hands on development experience in. NET background.
Simultaneously work on multiple deliverables
Ability to thrive in a team-oriented, fast-paced environment"
"Senior Java Software Developer, - Regulatory Reporting, Associate #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Senior Java Software Developer, - Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #Worknow #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Senior Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #Worknow #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Senior Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, Associate - #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #Worknow #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Senior Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #Worknow","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Applications Developer Sr. Analyst #WorkNow#Urgent',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with Program Trading Technology Team on application development/enhancements for Equities Trading
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower-level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Core Java, Unix/scripting
Preferably knowledge of FIX protocol
Knowledge Sybase/Oracle is an added advantage
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Sr. Java Software Engineer - Wealth Management - Associate #Seekbetter #UrgentHire,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Key Responsibilities:
Review of epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts and turning those into technical designs and development
Utilize Agile methodology and adhere to coding standards, procedures and techniques while contributing to the technical code documentation
Provide high quality technology solutions that address business needs developing applications within mature technology environments
Design, develop, code, test, debug and document code, build, deploy, and support app environments
Review design and functional specification prepared by other team members
Coordinate with end users during User Acceptance Testing
Analyze and document problems, recommend solutions, and initiate corrective action
Support production rollouts of the functionality on-site by partnering closely with the Operate team
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering
5 years of Software Development experience
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Proficiency in multiple modern architectures based on micro services, REST APIs, and event-based architecture will be key.
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, Apache Flink etc.
Knowledge of CI/CD, DevOps tool chain, and a test-driven approach to agile delivery is expected.
Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Experience with JavaScript libraries (ReactJS, React-Redux, BackboneJS/ Angular)
Experience with full-stack Web application development, including REST Web services in Java 7/8, Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle or Sybase
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g., subversion, git), build automation (e.g., Maven), continuous integration (e.g., Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g., cucumber), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Self-motivated team player. Must possess the ability to research and resolve issues independently while working across teams to acquire needed information
Ability to organize/manage multiple priorities and projects coupled with the flexibility to adapt to changes in a fast-paced environment"
"Java Software Engineer, - Regulatory Reporting - Vice President #Urgent #Immediate #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter #Immediate","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer, - Vice President #Urgent #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
Dot Net Developer (Up to 5500 + AWS) ID: 569331,"Summary:
The IT department develops, maintains and manages the products and technologies to drive various CRM and Loyalty solutions for its clients. Currently, we have requirements in the IT department for experienced Software Application Developer to be responsible for web application development
Responsibilities:
Reporting to Project Manager, the successful candidate will be involved in all phases of the software development life cycle – from requirements analysis, development, testing and implementation to on-going management and maintenance of the solutions, which include
Analyze requirements based on specification
Design and develop applications and web portals
Develop and manage reports, back office administrative tools
Work with technical team to diagnose and resolve technical issues
Manage change requests, integration with other external applications and databases
Develop and code custom web-based applications using .NET Framework and SQL server on the backend
Demonstrates flexible and efficient time management
Able to work under pre-agreed timeline and maintaining high-quality standards
Continually maintains knowledge of best practices in Web Development
Works from written specifications and pre-established guidelines to perform the functions of the job and maintains documentation of process flow
Requirements:
Degree in MIS, Computer Science, related field or equivalent experience.
Good understanding of the .Net Framework, object-oriented programming, and multi-tier architectures
Proficient in developing applications using Microsoft .NET Framework, ASP.NET, C#, SQL Server, HTML, CSS and JavaScript frameworks
Knowledge in mobile app programming (iOS or Android) and support, especially in backend services and various mobile notifications.
Knowledge of Web API programming is advantageous
Design, code and test web applications and supporting web services for apps.
MSSQL Reporting Services / Enterprise Reporting experience will be an advantage
Minimum 3 years of related work experience is a must
Interested candidates, who wish to apply for the advertised position, please submit the job application with an updated copy of your resume.
EA Licence No: 01C4394 
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Job Code: WEIT
By sending us your personal data and curriculum vitae (CV), you are deemed to consent to PERSOLKELLY Singapore Pte Ltd and overseas subsidiaries and affiliates collecting, using, and disclosing your personal data to prospective employers/companies based in any country for purposes of evaluating suitability for employment, conducting reference checks, administering employment related services and such other purposes stated in our privacy policy. Our full privacy policy is available at www.persolkelly.com.sg. If you wish to withdraw your consent, please drop us an email to let us know. Please feel free to contact us if you have any queries."
IT Senior Engineer/ Engineer (Workflow/ K2),"Job Duties:
Managing Workflow and Custom Applications
Knowledge in Software Development Life Cycle Process and project management
Design & develop workflow applications according to requirement define by end users
Analyze and implement improvement opportunity to enhance workflow Processes system in support of business strategy
Second level functional support for users and investigate cause of failures
Drive continuous improvement in work processes and environment to achieve assigned section/department and/or company KPI
Provide cross-functional leadership and vendor interaction to troubleshoot, analyze and develop solution for problem involving integrated systems
Provide training to enable 1st line support equipped with appropriate knowledge/skill to provide frontline operation support for production
Develop technical or training material as needed
Requirements:
>2 year in low code automation development with K2
>3 years in application development in process automation
Experienced in analytical & problem-solving
Knowledge on RPA development is a plus
Technically competent in VB.NET, PHP, Apache, ASP.NET, Javascripts, HTML, MS SQL database, My SQL, Ajax, Web Services, Stored Procedure, .NET framework 4.0 and Delphi
Required skills: VB.NET, ASP.NET, Javascripts, HTML, MS SQL database, Ajax, Web Services, Stored Procedure, .NET framework 4.0 and Delphi"
Firmware Developer ( Embedded C / Global MNC ] JN,"Our client is a well known Global Engineering software development center with HQ in Europe.
This role is based in Singapore.
Job Scope :
• Understand customer function, hardware design or system design requirements and create or update software requirement specification accordingly
• Design innovative and robust software that meets Software requirement specification.
• Implement software modules under guidelines of automotive embedded Software and Software Coding & Design Rules.
• Validate software design, module interface and module functionality on Test Bench and fill up test reports
• Organize and hold design peer reviews or architecture reviews with Software Architects.
• Communication and cooperation with team members to identify and implement development improvement activities.
• Support engineering team with implementation of test software according to their needs.
• Support System engineering team on the performance of functional tests on System Bench.
• Analyze Software Work packages from Software Technical Project Leaders and give commitment to work packages in terms of quality, time and cost.
• Attend and participate in regular software project meetings to give status update of work package.
• Participate in requirement and test specification reviews with Requirement Engineers, Software Technical Project Leaders and Test Engineers.
• Budgets Responsible for Software Work package on quality, timing and cost.
Requirement :
• Knowledge and experience on Embedded C Programming required
• Knowledge on Software Development Process and Software configuration management system (CM synergy, MKS…) preferred
• Knowledge on test equipment (oscilloscopes, BDM, Emulator, CANoe etc.) preferred
• Understanding of Semiconductor Specifications for HW components and HW design schematics preferred
• Experience in embedded and real time programming and related microcontroller architecture preferred
• All are welcomed to apply."
Senior Software Developer - #Urgent#WorkNow #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
Our team is currently building a scalable and frictionless account/identity experience for the entire Autodesk product and all of its users around the world.
If you have a passion to work at scale and looking for an environment to get the right things done right, this is the perfect role for you.
Our platform is built on cloud, the team is mostly self-sufficient, and we’re taking ownership of our services end-to-end. So, open communication, independence, and initiatives are part of our daily life.
Services we are building will impact all Autodesk products and millions of our users. Expect to have each day as a unique experience.
Responsibilities
Write and maintain effective and testable code, mostly in Go. Some portion of our system are written in other languages but we’re in the process of streamlining our codebase to Go
Contribute to all aspects of service development, mainly back-end services, and ensure everything is properly tested/validated
Collaborate with the whole team in running the overall production services, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them into elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement within the area of scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Get things done; that include end-to-end service ownership such as debug complex technical issues involving multiple systems & components
Minimum Qualifications
4+ years of experience as a software engineer
Solid experience in building backend system for web applications or API services
Exposure to Go. We are also open for a candidate who is strong in OOP with its implementation in any relevant programming language (such Java, C++, C#, Python, or others) and willing + capable to leap into Go swiftly. We’ll help you to make the jump and landing properly
Strong foundation of data structures, algorithm, and practical database usage
System/software performance metrics, especially in web application
Good experience in cloud-native application development and building the infrastructure as a code
Ability to convey complex message in an understandable form (written/spoken)
Preferred Qualifications
You will differentiate yourself from the rest of the candidates with any of the following qualifications:
Good sense of system design and engineering expertise in Go
Consistently aiming for a high bar in testing best practices and CI/CD
Experience working with web front-end, especially React
Working in Agile environment
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Backend Software Engineer, TikTok - Singapore","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
We are the messaging team on TikTok. Our team's mission is to facilitate meaningful user connections through TikTok's messaging experience, which is still in its infancy. We achieve our mission by building and shipping tools that help our users more easily connect and share the things they care about.
Responsibilities:
Develop large-scale software systems that powers TikTok app.
Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the product.
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high quality work in rapid product development.
Qualifications
BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Have good team communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior Software Developer #Urgent#JobsThatMatter #Urgent #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
Our team is currently building a scalable and frictionless account/identity experience for the entire Autodesk product and all of its users around the world.
If you have a passion to work at scale and looking for an environment to get the right things done right, this is the perfect role for you.
Our platform is built on cloud, the team is mostly self-sufficient, and we’re taking ownership of our services end-to-end. So, open communication, independence, and initiatives are part of our daily life.
Services we are building will impact all Autodesk products and millions of our users. Expect to have each day as a unique experience.
Responsibilities
Write and maintain effective and testable code, mostly in Go. Some portion of our system are written in other languages but we’re in the process of streamlining our codebase to Go
Contribute to all aspects of service development, mainly back-end services, and ensure everything is properly tested/validated
Collaborate with the whole team in running the overall production services, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them into elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement within the area of scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Get things done; that include end-to-end service ownership such as debug complex technical issues involving multiple systems & components
Minimum Qualifications
4+ years of experience as a software engineer
Solid experience in building backend system for web applications or API services
Exposure to Go. We are also open for a candidate who is strong in OOP with its implementation in any relevant programming language (such Java, C++, C#, Python, or others) and willing + capable to leap into Go swiftly. We’ll help you to make the jump and landing properly
Strong foundation of data structures, algorithm, and practical database usage
System/software performance metrics, especially in web application
Good experience in cloud-native application development and building the infrastructure as a code
Ability to convey complex message in an understandable form (written/spoken)
Preferred Qualifications
You will differentiate yourself from the rest of the candidates with any of the following qualifications:
Good sense of system design and engineering expertise in Go
Consistently aiming for a high bar in testing best practices and CI/CD
Experience working with web front-end, especially React
Working in Agile environment
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"R&D Embedded Software Engineer, - 212657BR","How Will You Make an Impact?
At Thermo Fisher Scientific, we have an incredible mission: to enable our customers make the world healthier, cleaner and safer. Our responsibility in supporting this vision is to consistently strive to work together and enable our customers more effectively.
We have the 4i Values – Integrity, Intensity, Innovation and Involvement that define the way we work together and with our customers. As we operate within the 4i framework, there are three areas that we believe could really lead to a breakthrough in the way we work together: Accountability. Innovation. Risk tolerance.
When you join us at Thermo Fisher Scientific, you’ll be part of a smart, driven team that shares your passion for exploration and discovery. With revenues of $40 billion and the largest investment in R&D in the industry, we give our people the resources and opportunities to make significant contributions to the world.
What will you do?
Interface with a global team of engineers for state-of-the-art product design
Derive product level requirements into system/sub system level functional requirements
Design, develop and maintain embedded software for life science instruments
Perform design and code reviews to ensure software quality
Participate in test results review, root cause analysis and propose solutions
Practice Software Configuration Management according to the project-specific software
Development plan
Apply new technologies and software features to enhance performance and improve quality
Maintain and comply with ISO 13485 procedures and SOPs in the course of application development
Ensure that systems and procedures are in compliance with ISO 9001,
ISO 14001, ISO 13845, ISO 14971, QSR21CFR and OHSAS 18001 requirements
How will you get here?
Education
Degree/Master in Computer Science/Computer Engineering/Electrical Engineering
Experience
C/C++ programming (2 years)
Python (2 years)
Embedded software development tools (2 years)
Linux based software development experience (2 years)
Source Code Version Control (2 years)
Embedded Linux programming (2 years)
Microprocessor architecture (Intel, ARM Cortex-A processors) (2 years)
Continuous Integration and Agile Programming (2 years)
Knowledge, Skills, Abilities
Software Development Life Cycle experience preferred
Embedded device development experience preferred
In-depth knowledge of Linux internals
GIT and SVN version control experience preferred"
Software Engineer,"Activate Interactive Pte Ltd (“Activate”) is a leading IT solution and service provider headquartered in Singapore with a presence in Malaysia and Indonesia. Our clients are empowered with quality, cost-effective, and impactful end-to-end application development, like mobile and web applications, and cloud technology that remove technology roadblocks and increase their business efficiency.
We believe in positively impacting the lives of people around us and the environment we live in through the use of technology. Hence, we are committed to providing a conducive environment for all employees to realise their full potential, who in turn have the opportunity to continuously drive innovation.
We are searching for our next team members to join our growing team.
If you love the idea of being part of a growing company with exciting prospects in mobile and web technologies that create positive impact on people’s lives, then we would love to hear from you.
We are looking for Software Engineer
Internal Code: HC7
What will you do?
Collaborate with government agencies to develop and deliver high-quality software applications according to requirements
Work with cross-functional teams to deliver technical solutions
Drive adoption of relevant, up-to-date technologies, practices and tools in Agile software projects
Ensure high performance and utility of services
Design and build services with a focus on business value and usability, with scalability and flexibility in mind
Contribute in technical discussions and solutioning sessions
Perform code reviews and evangelize best practices
What are we looking for?
In-depth knowledge of programming languages: NextJS, NestJS, React Native or ReactjJS, Typescript, ExpressJS, PostgreSQL, Mongodb and Nodejs
Experience with: JavaScript/TypeScript, React
Experience in designing, developing and deploying large, scalable production application on Cloud/PaaS platforms such as AWS and Azure
Experience with using Gitlab CI to manage test automation and deployment
Experience in containerization (Docker) would be advantageous
Experience in Agile development teams, employing relevant methodologies and practices such as Scrum, Continuous Integration and Deployment
Good communication and interpersonal skills
Self-driven and independent
What do we offer?
Fun working environment
Employee Wellness Program
Does it sound like something you are interested in exploring further? Please be in touch with our team for an initial chat.
Activate Interactive Singapore is an equal opportunity employer. Employment decisions will be based on merit, qualifications and abilities. Activate Interactive Pte Ltd does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, colour, religion, gender, sexuality, national origin, age, disability, marital status or any other characteristics protected by law.
Protecting your privacy and the security of your data are longstanding top priorities for Activate Interactive Pte Ltd.
Your personal data will be processed for the purposes of managing Activate Interactive Pte Ltd’s recruitment related activities, which include setting up and conducting interviews and tests for applicants, evaluating and assessing the results, and as is otherwise needed in the recruitment and hiring processes.
Please consult our Privacy Notice (https://www.activate.sg/privacy-policy) to know more about how we collect, use, and transfer the personal data of our candidates. Here you can find how you can request for access, correction and/or withdrawal of your Personal Data."
"Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, Associate #Seekbetter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an accomplished Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done."
AVP - Fullstack Developer,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Context:
CitiQuote is Citi Equity Derivatives Pre-trade platform. The current system relies on a mix of legacy technologies as well as new technologies. The program is undergoing a change with two initiatives:
Revamping of the platform in order to deliver the next generation platform to provide better performance and greater expansion for our business
Agile transformation to deliver business value faster and support our business in their growth.
The Ideal candidate is genuinely curious about technology, open-minded about exploring languages they are not familiar with, willing to get their hands dirty in understanding the legacy code to support it initially and then migrate it to the next gen platform. A solid knowledge of agile and devops best practices is a pre-requisite in order to deliver the desired level of quality that is targeted for this team
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
Mandatory:
3-6 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
2 year experience with Java-based languages, preferably Kotlin
Open to learn Kotlin
2 year experience in Micro-Services
Strong understanding of Agile and best practices (TDD, BDD, DevOps)
2 year experience on Containerization
Experience in Couchbase
Nice to have:
Experience in C#, MS SQL
Experience in Finance especially Equity Derivatives
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Lead Application Scientist (Hair Care, Sun Care)","Perm with AWS and Bonus
At least 4-7 years of experience, preferably in Personal Care industry
Experience in hair care and sun care will be advantageous, otherwise, open to sun care formualtors
Must be comfortable working in matrix organization with good collaboration skills (need to work with different functions e.g. sales, marketing)
Excellent communication skills, may be involved in webinars, provide trainings and conduct presentations
Job Description
Apply technical knowledge to evaluate and formulate new and existing products to meet market needs which consist of solving both complex and straightforward problems.
Design and carry out laboratory experiments. Review the results and seek answers to problems encountered through collection of data and investigation. Decide how to proceed with next experiment/stage of project. Assist less experienced staff through the same process.
Provide a technical support service to sales and marketing as and when required e.g. answering customer technical enquiries, recommending products, training sessions, participating in customer technical visits & training.
Work directly with customers to assess or develop formulations.
Keep research, sales and marketing teams up to date with developments on projects.
Frequently responsible for selecting most viable development routes in projects that can either be complex or straightforward. Decisions would be made in conjunction with the line manager.
Independently responsible for frequently planning and running multiple projects and carrying out experiments of varying complexity to deliver new data and formulations on time to the business. Typically, projects can range from a couple of days to six months.
Expected to use a creative and viable approach to support new product launches and existing product ranges, including development of new test methodologies, or developing new and novel finished formulations for promotional means.
Expected to enhance knowledge of relevant application and market area.
Requirements
Min Degree in Chemistry, Cosmetic Science or related field
4-7 years of experience in sun and/or hair formulation is preferred. Personal care formulation experience would be beneficial.
Delivers subject matter expertise in formula and process development
Experience in leading new product development projects would be advantageous.
Knowledge of claims testing methodologies is a plus.
Ability to travel for customer visits in the region (approximately once every quarter)
Ability to progress multiple projects simultaneously to successful conclusions under own initiative.
Creative and tenacious with good planning and problem solving skills
Good written communication skills, numerate, attention to detail.
Ability to interact constructively within department and with other departments
Adaptable around changing project requirements and priorities.
Excellent communication skills and comfortable fronting customers.
Excellent experimentalist with laboratory experience preferably in related area.
Singaporeans Only
Interested candidates please click “Apply Now”.
Triton AI Pte Ltd
Registration Number: R1980724
EA: 21C0661"
"Senior Software Engineer, Java, Payments Technology #urgent #Immediate #Worknow #Immediate","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
You will be working for a global team with members in Singapore, India and North America. The team is responsible for building low value and real time payments systems for our corporate customers. As a full stack developer, you will be working on high throughput, low latency micro services. There is a huge opportunity to learn the payments domain.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, MySQL and Cassandra
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of one or more IMDG technologies, e.g. Gemfire, Hazelcast
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Strong technical leadership
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT"
"Senior Developer, Commodities Technology - (2200018769)' #Immediate #UrgentHire","Role Responsibilities
This is a role for a highly experienced and highly motivated full-stack software developer delivering software solutions for the Commodities trading desk.
The main responsibilities include analysis, design, development and delivery of features in a challenging and ever-changing environment for front-office users across all functional groups of Financial Markets Commodities division.
Key Roles and Responsibilities
Working as part of the Commodities Technology team, which develops the technology solutions for supporting the Commodities sales and trading businesses at Standard Chartered.
Dependable experienced developer able to take ownership and leadership of tasks and drive them personally to successful delivery.
Innovator and intellectual leader.
Problem solver taking passion in resolving complicated problems.
Driven individual motivated by delivering successful solutions to users and using any means and technologies necessary to do so.
Work with an Agile team to develop, test and maintain applications.
Assist in the collection and documentation of user’s requirements, development of user stories and estimates.
Work with databases, software algorithms and design patterns.
Design, develop and test applications in accordance with established standards.
Participate in peer-reviews of solution designs and related code.
Develop, refine and tune integrations between applications.
Track and maintain code coverage, system performance and system security.
Work with a mature DevOps software delivery process.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Key Stakeholders
Commodities Front Office users including Sales, Trading, Structuring. Control functions including product control, market risk, credit risk, regulatory operations, regulatory technology, operations, application development teams.
Our Ideal Candidate
8 years’ experience working as a Front office developer in investment banking / FI.
Skilled in pattern design and analytical thinking.
Strong domain knowledge of Agile and its processes.
Experience in developing robust, distributed, scalable, high production quality applications.
Experience with picking and applying good software practices like test driven development, continuous integration, and continuous delivery.
Ability to work in a variety of client settings and in a team orientated collaborative environment.
High competency in software development using Java, React and relational databases such as Oracle or PostgreSQL.
Experience with developing micro services, test driven development and DevOps.
Agile Scrum Master
Desirable but not Essential
Familiarity with Commodities trading business, risk management.
Scrum Master and Product Owner certification.
Prior experience in retail banking, private banking and wealth management.
Others
Knowledge and previous experience in maintaining and supporting Development tools.
Familiarity and confidence working in an “agile” development environment.
Self-starter who can “own” the toolset and provide a first-class service to stakeholders.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Java
React, Angular or other UI
Relational Databases: Oracle or PostgreSQL
Micro-services architecture
Software testing, including test automation
DevOps
Messaging middleware: Solace, JMS or others"
Middleware Engineer,"At least 2-4 years of middleware support experience..
Provides daily operations support at the customer site, including monitoring of middleware, servers and hardware.
Performed regular housekeeping to ensure server resources are healthy.
Perform middleware patching as and when required.
Provide support for audit-related matters.
Provide after-office and weekend support when required.
Assist with diagnosing and resolving problems as and when arises.
proficient knowledge of Solaris, Windows and Linux.
Prefer to have experience with Oracle WebLogic
Work in a team environment to share knowledge and follow standard processes.
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, multi-task environment.
Excellent communication, interpersonal and time management skills.
Good written and verbal communication skills.
Strong problem-solving skills
Comfortable working shifts (including weekends/Public holidays/after office hours)"
#Program Trading Senior Developer | (Citibank)#.#JobsThatMatter..#Worknow#UrgentHire,"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with Program Trading Technology Team on application development/enhancements
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Core Java, Unix/scripting
Preferably knowledge of FIX protocol
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Software Specifications Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Perform technical writing of software specifications based on the product definitions, reference products, regulations and applicable customer standards
Specify concepts and system functionality leading to the derivation of system specifications
Drive improvements to software specification processes and product definitions aimed at optimising the management of specifications and product quality assurance
Ensure that specifications written covers complete range of products along with drawings if required
Create Standard software specification submittals and generate software specification data bank
Interact with various software groups to define scope and details of specification requirements and product needs
Work closely with cross functional teams to ensure on time product delivery.
Participate in ad hoc software projects discussions on specifications and assignments as required
Requirement:
Diploma/Degree in Engineering or related fields requiring specification creation.
Proficient in both written and spoken English
Must be able to speak mandarin to communicate with software departments in Taiwan.
Able to communicate and work well in teams
Self-discipline and good conduct with the ability to work without supervision
Must possess a flexible attitude to work and be willing to use their own initiative
Must be Singaporean Only"
Vice President -- Digital Software Engineer Lead Analyst #Immediate#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
Principal Duties and Responsibilities
Principal responsibilities for this role would include:
Be responsible for the team delivering various mobile initiatives/projects across APAC and EMEA regions for Citigroup Global Consumer Bank (GCB)
Man a team of highly motivated manrs, designers and developers drawn from our strategic partners and Citi staff based in multiple geographical locations
Demonstrated experience in managing multiple work streams and managing manr of manrs
Develop and implement best-in-class processes, metrics and practices
Responsible for driving technical design/architecture manment, product roadmaps with close interaction with Business Analysts, Subject matter experts, Cross Product Architecture and other Product Processors
Man partnership with business and external strategic vendors and ensure that the delivery is achieved within the defined quality and timeline
Ensure that the team is defining and implementing systems that are aligned with the organization strategy and goals
Man and track resources, review works to ensure high quality job to achieve customer satisfaction and service commitments
Train, assign work, provide Technical/Business advice and guidance to staff, provide regular performance feedback to staff for continuous improvement
Provide leadership, development opportunities, performance manment, development and succession-planning, staff communications, and positive interactive working environment to ensure the highest productivity and employee engment
Adhere to the Citigroup's compliance standards and ensure compliance for the applications supported
Qualifications:
Educational requirements :Bachelors of Engineering/Technology/Science in Computer Science or related field
Minimum of 11-15 of relevant experience preferably within an international technology organization in delivering complex projects
Demonstrated experience in Project Manment principles and software development lifecycle practices and methodology with hands-on knowledge of project manment practices, principles and tool sets
Strong functional knowledge in the banking domain. Understanding of the lending and credit services and functions is an added advant.
Deep understanding on the process and roles in Agile development, Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery
Prior Experience of Delivering high quality strategic large scale projects/releases
Experience running large scale application development teams
Ability to man senior staff, as well as man staff working remotely across multiple locations
Strong leadership, communication and organizational skills
Strong analytical, strategic thinking and communication skills - must have ability to synthesize, develop and present clear and concise recommendations
Excellent relationship manment skills
Demonstrated ability to work across organizational boundaries and geographies
Self-directed, motivated and mand; ability to deal with imperfect information, decision and drive to successful conclusions
Effective at prioritizing tasks, managing time, organizing people and getting things done
Excellent organization skills; must be able to man disparate tasks, project plans and ad-hoc teams without solid lines of authority
Ability to handle constant pressure and juggle multiple demands
Strong risk manment and ability to look beyond to the next set of challenges
Collaborative and team player, ensuring overall business success
Flexibility to travel
Good knowledge of Native mobile app development (using iOS Objective C or Swiftand Android -Java)
Good knowledge of Web Application Development, Hybrid mobile app development using Angular2/4/6, HTML5, Typescript, ES6, JQuery etc.
Experience in mobile app unit testing framework , methodologies and technical know-how on E2E testing
Digital application development manr would design, develop, implement and troubleshoot / certify mobile applications to meet our growing application needs. The person is also expected to lead a team of junior mobile developers, while being hands on with development. The ideal candidate must have strong Native and hybrid mobile-app development experience and familiar with test-driven development in a fast-paced agile environment. Experience in build, delivery and mobile architecture is also desired.
Development Value:
Opportunity to work with and learn from highly skilled and experienced global team members
Opportunity to work on challenging environment, technologies and banking technology space."
"Tech Lead(Messaging Middleware), Cloud Infrastructure #WorkNow","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Our messaging middleware team is responsible for the research and development of Tiktok messaging platform. We manage the Message Queue systems of all products such as Douyin, TikTok, Toutiao, Xigua Video and Hotsoon. We are industry-leading in the scale of data covered.
Because we are extremely sensitive to the stability and cost of external services, we have developed an in-house message queue BMQ. BMQ's architecture is based on the principle of segregation between storage and computing. It is also compatible with the kafka protocol. In addition to pursuing high levels of stability and optimized cost, we are also actively exploring and expanding supported business scenarios, leveraging the potential value of original log data, and accessing batch computing engines.
Responsibilities:
Construct an efficient and stable messaging platform. Continuous optimization to improve stability, performance and cost optimization. Build the next generation computing and storage separation architecture on a trillion-level messaging platform;
Play a key role in driving project objectives and execution management, architecture design and code reviews, define long term technical roadmap for the team, and demonstrate technical leadership;
Recruit and mentor engineers of various levels of experience into a performant team, build team culture and cohesion, help team members grow technical capabilities;
Work closely with stakeholder teams to identify business pain points, continuously optimize and improve customer experience, team reputation, and impact.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields;
6+ years of professional software development experience;
Strong with C++/Golang/Java/Python program development (at least one), pursue high-quality code and focused on code engineering quality;
Solid knowledge of Linux system, proficient in multi-threading, network programming, and distributed development in any programming language;
Good communication skills, able to lead and drive projects effectively. Familiar with team and project management methodologies and approaches.
Preferred Qualifications:
In-depth research and industry experience in large-scale messaging platform design and implementation, for example Kafka/RocketMQ/Pulsar/NSQ;
Contributor/Committer or PMC of the open-source community is a plus."
"Java Software Developer - Payment Technology, Associate #Worknow,'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development, such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing Microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Senior Software Engineer [C++/ Up to $6500],"[Order Number:2107-58399]
Responsibilities
Design and develop machine control software for automated semiconductor equipment.
Develop new process control software
Integrate software component or OEM equipment into a fully functional software system.
Demonstrate solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts and code comments.
Produce well organized, optimized, testable and efficient code for software released quality assurance.
Develop software solution by studying information needs, conferring with users, studying system flow, data usage and work process, investigating problem areas following the software development life cycle.
Determine operational feasibility by evaluating analysis, problem definition, requirements, solution development and propose sequencing and coding solutions.
Improve equipment performance by conducting system analysis, recommending changes in process/procedures.
Requirements
At least 3 years’ experience in programming on Windows (XP and above) environment.
Proficiency with C++, VC++, MFC, SQL and OOP.
Good knowledge in developing multi-threaded control software, equipment connectivity standard.
Knowledge in designing GUI and familiarity with SEMI SECS/GEM, C# and WPF programming will be an added advantage.
Strong analytical, troubleshooting and problem solving skills
Strong general programming skills, software debugging and execute full lifecycle software development.
Hardware experience in using Servo, Stepper Motion Controller, Analog Device and High Speed I/O.
To Apply, please kindly email your updated resume to yicheng(at)goodjobcreations.com.sg
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
However, rest assured that all applications will be updated to our resume bank for future opportunities.
EA Personnel Name: Tan Yi Cheng
EA Personnel Registration Number: R22109865
EA Licence No.: 07C5771"
"Vice President, Lead / Application Engineer (Java / DevOps), Group Technology","About UOB
United Overseas Bank Limited (UOB) is a leading bank in Asia with a global network of more than 500 branches and offices in 19 countries and territories in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. In Asia, we operate through our head office in Singapore and banking subsidiaries in China, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand, as well as branches and offices.
Our history spans more than 80 years. Over this time, we have been guided by our values – Honorable, Enterprising, United and Committed. This means we always strive to do what is right, build for the future, work as one team and pursue long-term success. It is how we work, consistently, be it towards the company, our colleagues or our customers.
About the Department
Group Technology and Operations (GTO) provides software and system development, information technology support services and banking operations.
We have centralized and standardized the technology components into Singapore, creating a global footprint which can be utilized for supporting our regional subsidiaries and the branches around the world. We operate and support 19 countries with this architecture to provide a secure and flexible banking infrastructure.
Our Operations divisions provide transactional customer services for our businesses while also focusing on cost efficiency through process improvements, automation and straight through processing.
Job Responsibilities
Design, development and implementation of applications for the bank.
Conduct prototyping and proof-of-concept experiments to prove out design decisions.
Brainstorm and help evaluate applications for new tools and technologies as they continually evolve.
Build frameworks that simplify the development lifecycle.
Build data platforms and streaming engines that are real time in nature.
Build and scale stream & batch processing platforms using the latest opensource technologies.
Design and code for highly scalable solutions for data extractions and transformations jobs for business rules application.
Work with data engineers to create services that can ingest and supply data to and from external sources and ensure data quality and timeliness
Effectively utilize a DevOps pipeline to improve process efficiency.
Build software to standards and of high quality.
Guiding developers with technical knowledge.
Maintain and help optimize existing systems.
Troubleshoot live issues.
Lead on next generation technology.
Attend design discussions and contributing effectively.
Committed to collaborative problem solving, sophisticated design and providing a quality product.
Job Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or similar domains; Related professional/technical qualification will be advantageous although not mandatory
At least 12 years’ experience in software development, with extensive hands-on experience as a Java Developer and with knowledge of DevOps tools.
Hands on experience with Spring (Spring Boot, Spring Data, Spring Cloud, Spring Security, ORM, MVC, Integration, Batch, among others)
Must have extensive web application experience in developing highly-scalable applications.
Strong understanding and hands-on experience in: 
building Microservices.
Web Services (REST, GraphQL)
concurrency, related patterns and building thread safe code.
integration frameworks such as Apache Camel 
Docker and Kubernetes based deployments.
using any cloud-based infrastructure.
CI/CD processes and pipelines.
using any distributed caching solution.
RDBMS (Oracle, MariaDB) and No SQL Databases (such as MongoDB, Cassandra).
code versioning using GIT.
testing frameworks such as Junit, Selenium, Cucumber, Mockito etc.
domain-driven design.
Agile Engineering Practices.
Good-to-have:
Kafka and Spark
Design, development and implementation of blockchain solutions, specializing in Hyperledger
Experience in modern front end Javascript frameworks such as React.js .
Python 
Good understanding of 12-factor app and cloud-native application design is a plus.
Ability to understand business requirements and translate them to technical requirements.
Ability to benchmark and optimize the components being built.
 Be a part of UOB Family
UOB is an equal opportunity employer. UOB does not discriminate on the basis of a candidate's age, race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or other non-merit factors. All employment decisions at UOB are based on business needs, job requirements and qualifications. If you require any assistance or accommodations to be made for the recruitment process, please inform us when you submit your online application.

Apply now and make a difference."
"Assistant Manager, Human Resource Information System (Hybrid)","About Certis
We are a leading security services organisation. We put technology to work in making the world a safer place. Our mission is that as trusted partners, we protect lives and assets, and deliver integrated critical services. By empowering our people, our goal is to enable our communities to stay safe and thriving.
We offer a broad range of opportunities and career pathways for our people to grow and explore their potential. We believe that people, equipped with innovative thinking and technological capabilities will make the world safer, smarter and better.
Life at Certis
If you are a passionate individual looking for opportunities to expand your skills, and purposeful work instead of just a ‘job’, we would love to hear from you.
At Certis, no two days look alike. Our work calendars are filled with chances to collaborate with others, and bring new initiatives to life. Whether you’re looking to improve a process, or have an innovative idea awaiting a technology solve, we want you to bring your ideas to the table.
We are a close-knit team that looks out for each other, works hard to get the job done, and encourages each other to grow – the perfect place for you to grow your career!
Duties & Responsibilities
Interact with business users, understand business processes and gather core business requirements
Create business requirement documentation and functional specifications
Perform functional testing and coordinate acceptance test with users
Plan and conduct training to users as part of project delivery
Provide solutions and options on operational issues encountered by end users
Assist in project coordination which includes liaising with all parties concerned to organize, track and consolidate deliverables.
Facilitate the creation and update of programme or project plans as required.
Assist in preparation of status reports, risk and issue registers.
Preparing necessary presentation materials for meetings and discussions and follow up with documentation of notes of discussions.
Providing administrative support as needed.
The successful candidate will work closely with all technology teams across the organisation.
Skills & Experience
Degree with at more than 3 years experience in business process analysis and project management
Experience capturing requirements and liaising directly with business stakeholders
Ability to document clear and precise business requirements and be able to marry this to the appropriate technology solutions and present this for approval to senior technology counterparts
Motivated, passionate about technology
Proactive, self starter, autonomous, good analytical skills
Strong level of verbal and written English
Recognition & Reward
What you can expect from us:
Work on projects for world-class security projects renowned for their safety, reliability and efficiency
Commitment to your ongoing development, including on-the-job opportunities, formal programs and assistance with further education
Community volunteering opportunities
A competitive remuneration package, featuring performance-based incentives and a medical insurance and dental allowance.
Certis is committed to fostering an inclusive and diverse workforce culture, which is supported by our Compass values. Our aim is to attract, develop and retain a truly diverse and high-performing workforce. "
VP - Senior C# Developer - (Hybrid) #WorkNow#.'.,"Responsibilities:
Write good quality C# code and work with large codebases
Interact with the senior stakeholders, other teams and drive the project commitments
Design Develop and Test new features for the Trading applications
Improve the stability and performance of existing applications
3rd line support of the production system (dedicated 24h support teams handle 1st / 2nd line).
Manage suite of apps in Pricing
Qualifications:
Essential:
Expert in C# .Net or Core Java with strong interest to program in C# as the primary language, Multithreading, Reactive Extensions, OO design
Experience in designing and writing APIs
Experience in SQL, PL/SQL
Experience in Profiling Applications
Able to debug complex event driven application
Understanding of computing science fundamentals – concurrency, algorithms, operating systems
Desirable:
Knowledge of Web Streaming Platforms like Liberator
Experience in using Design patterns
Exposure to Agile Methodologies like scrum, Kanban, and techniques like TDD
Exposure to .Net Core
Experience in App containerization and cloud deployment"
Loans Java Sr Developer. - #JobsThatMatter #Urgent#WorkNow,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Software Engineer (DevOps Platform) - Cloud Infrastructure #Urgent,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The DevOps team is responsible for building an industry-leading R&D platform to promote the implementation and landing of DevOps integration in TikTok and its affiliates.
Responsibilities:
Responsible for the development of a company-level DevOps engineering efficiency platform;
Improve the quality and efficiency of the R&D through the construction of frameworks, platforms, tools and processes;
Including but not limited to these tasks: internal CI/CD construction, automation of integrated compilation, test and release, promotion of engineering practices based on DevOps concepts in business lines, exploration of open source tools.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or a related field (or equivalent practical experience);
Proficient in any programming language and its common framework;
Familiar with common data structures and algorithms, database, network, cache, middleware, operation and maintenance;
Understand the design of high concurrency and high availability;
Possesses a certain understanding of application architectures such as microservices, serverless, and dynamic configuration.
Preferred Qualifications:
At least 3 years of relevant experience;
In-depth understanding of the internet and software R&D processes;
Keen on engineering efficiency optimization and pays attention to cutting-edge software engineering technology;
Familiar with R&D full-process tools and frameworks. Experienced with optimization and integration such as requirements, code, build, test, release, operation, maintenance, as well as other management tools;
Experienced in developing efficiency tools and private cloud platform tools."
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 #Immediate#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Software Engineer #SGUnitedJobs,"Responsibilities:
Responsible for technical drawings for electrical designs
Develop PLC Program and HMI Graphics for projects
Conduct Testing & Commissioning and Site Acceptance
Execute 1 or more Automation Projects concurrently
Requirements:
Diploma/Bachelor Degree in Electrical/Mechatronics
Knowledge in PLC (Omron NJ) / C++ / C# / ACAD / Microsoft Office
Preferably with Automation experience"
Sr. Application Developer - [21361752] #Seekbetter #Immediate#',"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Research Engineer, -- (Computer Science/Computer Engineering), - (R00004502)","NTU Continental Corporate Lab invites applications for the position of Research Engineer.

Key Responsibilities:
Focus on the design and development of an edge-processing architecture for privacy-aware information extraction in automotive cyber-physical systems (CPS)
Market survey
Design and development of privacy-aware edge-processing architecture for automotive cyber-physical systems
Solution prototyping and commercialization
Project management activities
Job Requirements:
Bachelor's in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields
Experience in embedded systems development (programming and deployment)
Familiarity with hypervisors (e.g., Xen), automotive standards such as AUTOSAR and autonomous architectures such as Autoware is highly desirable
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
"NLP Engineer, AI Lab","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About The Team
Our NLP team focuses on solving language barriers and promoting information flowing all over the world. We invite researchers and engineers in machine learning and natural language processing at all levels. We aim at pushing the limits of machine intelligence.
Responsibilities
Responsible for development of NLP technologies in ByteDance's products
Participate in and support the incubation of new NLP technologies
Participate in research on NLP technologies
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields
Rich experiences and strong skills in development of technologies in some of the following areas,
Natural language understanding
Natural language generation
Knowledge and reasoning
Recommendation and search
Reinforcement learning
Deep learning and representation learning
Machine Translation
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong computer science and coding skills (e.g. Python/Java/Go/C/C++);
Work and collaborate well with team members;
Ability to work independently
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
AVP - Digital Software Engineer (Payments) - Hybrid,"Responsibilities
Lead and develop highly effective teams that have synergy and will deliver the best desired outcome in all the projects.
Ensure regular communication with key stakeholders, understand any key concerns in how the initiative is being delivered or any risks/issues that have either not yet been identified or are not being progressed. Ensure dependencies and challenges (risks) are escalated and managed.
Perform post deployment verification of the system when the products are launched.
Requirements
8-10 years of relevant experiences
Working experience in Internal, Domestic, international payments and exposure to digital payments. 
Technical understanding of TIBCO & Spring boot technologies is a must.
Good knowledge on Micro services and Open APIs, Restful Web Services or APIs.
Expertise in understanding functional & technical issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Desirable:
Experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Strong knowledge of unit testing, behavioral testing and continuous integration.
Knowledge of monitoring/log analytic tools such as Splunk, AppDynamics would be added advantage
Extensive Knowledge in Open API architecture and its guidelines.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents, taking projects from inception to go live.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC."
"V.P., Lead Java Software Developer, Liquidity Technology -- #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #UrgentHire'","Job Description
Our Global Liquidity Technology team is seeking a Lead Java Software Developer to join us on this journey. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform Liquidity management and treasury functions in the firm.
You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. Development will be predominantly done by building micro services with Java/ Springboot/ SQL and building UI with Angular/ HTML/ JavaScript and adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience in Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Junit, Mockito
Advanced experience in building cloud native microservice applications with Spring Boot and Spring Cloud
Advanced experience with one or more database technologies (e.g. Oracle)
Advanced experience in building REST APIs
Experience of working in Containerization technology and platform – Dockers, Kubernetes and good knowledge in DevOps practices.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Strong understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse).
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka"
Applications Developer – Assistant Vice President #Urgent,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
AVP - Loans Java Sr Developer (Hybrid) - #WorkNow,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
University Bachelor’s degree or other equivalent certification
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Staff Software Engineer, Data, - Standard Chartered nexus..*.#JobsThatMatter","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
"Senior Software Engineer, Associate","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well using Front end technologies such as AngularJS, HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 8 years of Software Development work experience
Strong proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, AngularJS, JavaScript/HTML and SQL
Hands on experience with Springboot and distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Good understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Java 8 features, REST, UNIX shell scripting"
FullStack Developer- Wealth Management- Associate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Immediate,"The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering
Minimum 3 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
Applications Senior Developer - [21388615] #Immediate #Worknow#',"The Applications Development Senior Supervisor is an intermediate management level position responsible for providing full leadership and direction to a team of employees in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man an Applications Development team of professionals to accomplish established goals and conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, training and development, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Recommend new work procedures to increase process efficiencies
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Develop and apply comprehensive knowledge of how own area integrates within apps development and other technical areas
Ensure the quality of tasks provided by self and others on team as well as influence decisions through advice or facilitating services that impact the team and closely related work teams
Act as backup to Applications Development Manager and serve as an advisor and coach to junior developers and analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Ability to man teams.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
2-5 of relevant experience
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Ability to take ownership and make technical decisions on software development projects
Experience with dependency management, change management, continuous integration testing tools, and audit/compliance requirements
Extensive knowledge of software engineering and object-oriented design
Demonstrated leadership and management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Research Engineer (Software Development), SIMTech","Job Description:
Singapore Institute of Manufacturing Technology (SIMTech) develops high-value manufacturing technology and human capital to enhance the competitiveness of Singapore’s manufacturing industry. It collaborates with various multinational and local companies in the precision engineering, medtech, aerospace, automotive, marine, oil & gas, electronics, semiconductor, logistics, and other sectors.
The Manufacturing System Division (MSD) creates system technologies for autonomous manufacturing and resilient and responsive supply chain applications. We are looking for a highly motivated research engineer to work in the area of modernized application development in cloud computing. The successful candidate will be trained and involved in developing Industry 4.0 smart manufacturing applications using microservices and DevOps technologies.
The roles include:
Coordinate cross-functionally to ensure the project meets business objectives 
Translate business requirements into technical designs
Design and develop Microservices/API using best practice
Verify and deploy programs using DevOps CI/CD pipelines
Administer container cloud platform and DevOps CI/CD tools
Troubleshoot, debug, and upgrade existing software
Create technical documentation for reference and reporting
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Engineering,
Electrical/Mechanical Engineering or relevant disciplines
Preferably 2-3 years of working experience in software development using C# .NET
Demonstrated a strong understanding of the SDLC and agile methodologies
Knowledge in Microservice development/RESTful APIs and relational databases
Familiar with cloud technologies including Kubernetes and Docker Containers, DevOps CI/CD tools will be advantageous.
Ability to work independently in a fast-paced environment
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
The above eligibility criteria are not exhaustive. A*STAR may include additional selection criteria based on its prevailing recruitment policies. These policies may be amended from time to time without notice. We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
"Senior Application Developer, - 22495002 #Seekbetter","Citi Equities Systematic Algorithmic Trading Technology
Citi is on a multi-year initiative to build and renovate it’s offering in Systematic Trading of Equities and Listed Derivatives products including Warrants and Options Market Making products in Asia. The key focus of the initiative is to become a top provider for Equities and Listed Derivatives by building products using next generation technologies with high quality. As a part of the initiative, Citi is deeply focused on building out all aspects of the product from state-of-the-art pricing systems to Co-Location based deployments.
Impact
As a valued engineer in the new group that we are building in Hong Kong and Singapore, you will be empowered with focus of the initiative is to build next generation components across various subsystems of Electronic Execution, Systematic Trading and Market Making.
You will have access to Citi’s strategic microservices framework, gain understanding of various risk systems within Citi and individually drive innovation in all aspects of the system from contribution engines, low latency market data components and signal generation components.
You will have the opportunity to work with engineers who have multiyear experience in solving and building technology solutions for market making.
You will also be rewarded with the opportunity to work closely with the broader organization to integrate the systems with the Citi eco-system.
Apart from development, you will have the freedom to innovate in all aspects of the platform including automated testing, automated deployments, security posture and have a transparent access to all stakeholders all the way to trading desk heads.
Key Accountabilities
Develop technical solutions to meet business requirements taking into account recommended technologies, non-functional requirements, internal policies and procedures.
Participate in all elements of SDLC through designing, coding, testing, deploying, documenting and supporting applications.
Develop and maintain strong working relationships with peers and other technology team members both locally and regionally.
Develop and maintain strong working relationships with the local and regional business.
Adhere to firm policies and procedures, and regulatory requirements.
Key Competencies
Strong experience in either Electronic Trading systems such as Algorithmic Trading, Dark Pools, Smart Order Routers preferred
Excellent knowledge of Java preferred. However, we are also very open to strong engineers with a domain knowledge in the area with exposure in relevant languages such as C++ and C#. Candidates with such profiles should have a strong aptitude and curiosity to build systems in Java
Experience in KDB will be desirable
Domain Experience in Equities Cash trading or Equity Derivatives
Strong understanding in Object Oriented Analysis and Design techniques
Strong understanding of high volume, low latency trading systems and technical challenges of their design and operation
Knowledge of third-party Market Data provider platforms (Reuters, Exegy) will be highly desirable
Experience in working effectively with remote teams across different time zones
Familiarity with both traditional Waterfall as well Agile project management methodologies
Good written and verbal communication skills with ability to communicate technical concepts to various audiences (both business and technology) in clear and concise manner
Energetic, dynamic, motivated, and adaptable to changes
Able to work in highly challenging and often pressurized environment
Good prioritization and time management skills
QUALIFICATIONS / EXPERIENCE REQUIRED
Bachelor Degree (minimum requirement)
Preferably 10+ years’ experience"
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, - Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
"EFX/Commodities Application Support - #urgent #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,","Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
AVP - Full-Stack Senior Java Developer - 21387732. #Urgen #Urgent' #UrgentHire,"Job Description
We are looking for Java developers with experience in building high-performing, scalable, enterprise-grade applications.
Our ideal candidate should be passionate around solving business problems through innovation and best engineering practices. You will apply your knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner with our many stakehers to achieve common goals.
You'll work in a collaborative, respecting, trusting and diverse environment that encours creative thinking and critical problem solving that are best in class, to serve our clients globally.
Responsibilities
Write high quality and testable code following clean coding standards and SOLID design principles.
Create design, technical and project documentation.
Be a self-starter and plan/schedule own work for tasks and projects, implement functionality without direct supervision.
Perform profiling and troubleshooting of existing solutions.
Follow and understand defined software development process.
Communicate with clients and stakehers on a regular basis to clarify business requirements.
Participate in workshops and presentation of proposed solutions to clients and stakehers.
Assist team members with providing with technical solutions.
Perform code reviews and contribute to overall quality, maintainability and testability of software developed.
Work independently while in close collaboration with others in the team and across projects.
Coordinate deployment, test and release of applications developed.
Requirements
Advanced knowledge on Java 8, Core Java, ing
Good knowledge of Hibernate and Restful web services including its data interchange format/definition such as XML, JSON.
Understanding of code quality measurements using tools like Sonar and able to implement efficient Unit Tests.
Experienced in designing high quality solutions using OOP, TDD/BDD, Design Patterns and SOLID principles.
Experienced in distributed caching technologies like Apache Ignite or similar.
Experienced in relational database technologies e.g., Sybase, SQL Server.
Experienced with Agile development.
Ability to provide technical solutions from an architecture perspective.
Ability to provide realistic estimation on required effort and man to track and complete tasks in accordance to estimation.
Be self-managing and work without supervision.
Good communication skills.
Education
Bachelor or above in Computer Science, Software Engineering or related majors
Desirable
Full Stack Developer being able to build and maintain responsive and stylish user interface framework and web components with latest technology using Angular and NodeJS.
Experience in Equity trade capture and life cycle systems that support equity derivative products like options and swaps.
Experience in designing and building APIs, integrating with modern-web applications
Working experience in global environment where colleagues, stakehers and onsite client team locate in different locations, be able to cope with culture and time zone differences
Experience in mentoring juniors or less senior colleagues on the project(s)
Experience in conducting trainings or technical tech talks in the area of expertise"
"Software Engineer, Risk Data Mining, BRIC","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Business Risk Integrated Control (BRIC) team is missioned:
To protect TikTok users, including and beyond content consumers, creators, advertisers;
By securing platform health and community experience authenticity;
Through building infrastructures, platforms and technologies, as well as to collaborate with many cross-functional teams and stakeholders.
The BRIC team works to minimise the damage of inauthentic behaviours on TikTok, covering multiple classical and novel community and business risk areas such as account integrity, engagement authenticity, anti spam, API and growth health, live streaming security and financial safety (ads or e-commerce), etc.
In this team you'll have a unique opportunity to have first-hand exposure to the strategy of the company in key security initiatives, especially in building scalable and robust, intelligent and privacy-safe, secure and product-friendly systems and solutions. Our challenges are not some regular day-to-day technical puzzles -- You'll be part of a team that's developing novel solutions to first-seen challenges of a non-stop evolvement of a phenomenal product eco-system. The work needs to be fast, transferrable, while still down to the ground to making quick and solid differences.
Responsibilities
Build rules, algorithms and machine learning models, to respond to and mitigate business risks in ByteDance products/platforms. Such risks include and are not limited to abusive accounts, fake engagements, spammy redirection, scraping, fraud, etc.
Establish reliable, efficient and modularized risk defense solutions, reduce manual workload on ramping up risk controls on/against new business, risk area, or abusive means.
Uplevel risk defense excellence on privacy/compliance, machine learning, risk perception and analysis, achieve in-depth defense portfolio.
Qualifications
Bachelor or degrees above in computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering, statistics or other relevant majors (e.g. finance if applying for applying for financial fraud roles).
Solid engineering skills. Proficiency in at least two of: Linux, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Storm.
Familiarity with data mining, data science or machine learning. Bonus given to proficiency in modern machine learning theories and applications such as deep neural nets, transfer/multi-task learning, reinforcement learning, time series or graph unsupervised learning.
Ability to think critically, objectively, rationally. Reason and communicate in result-oriented, data-driven manner. High autonomy.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Application Developer (ASP.NET) #43393,"Industry/ Organization Type: IT/ Consultancy Firm
Position Title: Web Application Developer / Application Developer (ASP.NET)
Working Location: Tai Seng
Working Hours: Monday to Friday, 9.30 am – 7 pm
Salary Package: Up to $6,500 + Bonus + Allowances
Duration: Permanent Role
Key Responsibilities
Analyse requirements and develop, maintain and enhance custom developed application software and scripts to meet the requirements.
Develop application software or scripts as and when required.
Assist and/or represent the Company in the technical aspects of your software development.
Conduct code review and testing.
Prepare documentation e.g. Design specifications, User Acceptance Test documents,s and participate in reviews.
Software design and optimization.
Installation of the completed project on the Company’s Hosting Servers or Client’s Hosting Environment
Develop custom-built applications using .Net Framework, ASP Framework, Microsoft Visual Studio 2005 and 2008 Development Environment, Microsoft SQL Database Server Platform, and Oracle Database server platform.
APPLY NOW!!
Min 2 years of experience in development using .NET/ASP
Candidates with more experience will be considered for senior positions
Good programming and analytical skills.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Experience in scripting languages such as JAVA, XML, JSP
Good knowledge of Microsoft.NET Framework.
Good understanding of Web Services API
Please apply through ANY of the following methods:
Submit your application by clicking the APPLY button;
Email your resume to Job(at)anradus.com.sg. Please indicate #43393 on the email subject.
Anradus Policy: This clarifies Anradus' working procedures, from receiving the applicant's resume, screening to shortlisting. We assure you our consultants will go through every resume we receive but we regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Anradus Pte Ltd | EA License No. 20C0161
Adelin Chong | EA Reg No.: R1875641"
"Software Engineer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #Urgent,","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 6 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"Software Engineer, Analyst, Trade Surveillance - Singapore, #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Worknow","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
Lead DevOps Engineer,"Job Responsibilities:
- Collaborate with various teams that includes Development and Products to ensure successful delivery, maintenance planning and correction of build errors.
- Day-to-day monitoring, backup, deployment and maintenance of systems
- Develop/build/maintain continuous integration/deployment pipelines and automated testing to support high quality software build in a continuous build environment
- Writing scripts/programs for service monitoring and health check of systems
- Automate and build up scalable systems/environment using latest technologies
- Automate security hardening in testing, deployment and production setup based on industrial best practices
- Provide operating guidance, training and troubleshooting documents to internal and external parties.
- Provide technical insights for the design and implementation of solutions.
- Promote a DevOps culture through building relationships with Development & Operations and driving enhancements to the end-to-end release process
Job Requirements:
- Degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 5 years of relevant experience in the below areas:
- Ability to troubleshoot problems, and solve abstract issues during system administration.
- Experience in documentation for manuals, guides, troubleshooting and system design.
- Sound delivery experience of DevOps solutions on cloud computing platforms such as AWS(e.g. AWS: EC2, RDS, ELB, EFS, ELK, ElasticCache, S3, VPC, Glacier, IAM, CloudWatch, KMS)
- Experienced with building and setting up high velocity and reliable CI/CD pipeline using tools/platforms such as Jenkins, CircleCI
- Knowledge on Quality Tools and Management tools like Sonar and Jira
- Proficiency with containers and cloud orchestration tools such as Docker
- Familiarity with deployment of application performance monitoring
- Hands on in depth experience in some of the following technologies: Vault/Grafana/Prometheus/Keycloak
- Ability to automate repeatable processes via scripts (e.g. via Terraform, bash, Powershell, Ruby, JS, Python, Groovy, etc.)
- Excellent experience with system administration (Ubuntu/Debian)
- Experienced with the latest DevSecOps orchestration tools, designing DevSecOps environment and Docker containers which are application-centric rather than component-specific
- AWS certification will be an added advantage
- Good to have experience with micro-services and event-driven systems
EA License Number: 11C3017 EA Personnel Number: R1982007
Additional Information"
"Software Engineer (Pega Developer), Associate, Singapore. #WorkNow #Immediate #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
The Cyber security organization’s objective is to ensure that JPMC is able to effectively detect, prevent, and respond to cyber threats against our technology infrastructure. The scope of Cyber security comprises detection and monitoring of threats and vulnerabilities, managing security incidents, and evolving our preventive infrastructure to keep ahead of the threat. We accomplish this through strong information security leadership and active collaboration with line of business information risk managers to provide high quality security solutions and services that are focused on improving the Firm's risk posture.
Specific responsibilities will include:
Analyze, design, develop, debug, test, document, deploy and provide production support applications using primary skills in Java, J2EE, Pega PRPC (Pega Rules Process Commander), and BPM, Oracle.
Work with product owner and Cyber security operations on agreeing on refining business requirements and acceptance criteria.
Understand business workflow requirements from Cyber Operations team/Business Analysts and implement those requirements in Java/J2EE and Pega Rules Process Commander platform as part of a distributed agile team.
Implement test-driven development, Continuous Deployment and Continuous Integration practices and adhere to JPMC software development process. 
Assist team in supporting the application in QA and production environments    
Identify opportunities for process and tool improvements; drive them from concept to design to implementation
Keep abreast with the latest development practices and road map of Pega
Interact with business and cross block teams, identifying application impacts, interface design and technical specification design documentation 
Project scoping, release management, build planning, technical documentation and status reporting  
Lead the project team, technical training and mentoring for implementation of solutions and roll outs  
Ensure all quality standards are followed for the deliverables through code metrics checks, code reviews, unit and regression testing. Support quality assurance, performance and business user acceptance testing phases
Lead the team on Tech Refresh initiatives to revamp the underlying technology and application infrastructure to make it compliant with enterprise wide controls and policies.
Qualification
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of hands-on experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture    
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems  
Working proficiency in developmental tool-sets 
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices 
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational  goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture 
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages: Java/J2EE, Object Oriented
Proficiency in UI frameworks such as Java Script, React/Angular
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement    
Oracle SQL experience
Proven hands-on application development experience in large enterprise  class environment
Excellent understanding of integration with third party APIs (Web services, JSON, REST, XML etc.)
Proficiency in cloud and devops implementation
Good understanding on database design and query optimization
Experience with progressive development practices and tools (e.g. unit testing, static code analysis, continuous integration, etc.)
Strong interpersonal and communication skills; capable of writing documentation, training users in complex topics
Ability to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment while remaining productive and professional; exercise patience and ability to multi task  
Agile experience"
"Software Engineer (Graph Neural Network System), Cloud Infrastructure","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.
Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!
Responsibilities
Participate in the design and development of our self-developed distributed Graph Neural Network (GNN) training/inference systems over a large-scale graph dataset;
Serving and applying Graph Embedding/GNN into real-world application scenarios, including but not limited to risk control, etc.
Qualifications
Familiar with C++, Python development in Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming, cloud native K8S and other technologies;
Familiar with Tensorflow, Pytorch, Ray framework;
Possess good communication skills and ability to work well in a team.
Preferred Qualifications
Familiar with existing industry open source GE/GNN systems (e.g., DGL, PYG, Euler, GraphLearn, BigGraph, etc)."
System Application Engineer,"Responsibilities
•Configuration and programming of Audio DSPs e.g BSS, QSC etc
• Audio systems tuning and calibration tools experience preferred.
• Calculation of SPL Simulations (Digital platforms)
• Ensuring compliance and quality of System Design
• Perform testing and commissioning of AV/IT systems
• Conduct end-user training
Requirements
•  Diploma in Electronics/Electrical/Computer Engineering, IT or related fields preferred
•  Experience and knowledge in configuration and programming of networked audio systems e.g. DANTE, Q-SYS is preferred.
•  Ability to work in a team as well as in a remote environment.
•  Experience in EASE modeling is an advantage    "
Application Consultant-DevOps #Urgent,"Introduction
As an Application Developer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!"
"Regional IT Specialist, Sales Solutions","Job Summary
Work closely with Epson’s IT systems team to execute projects, enhancement, and production support.
Involved in the full life cycle of projects, starting from requirement gathering to providing support after project goes live.
Key Accountabilities
Responsible for project schedule and deliverables.
To support Front Office, Sales & Marketing teams' growing demand for digitalization and provide IT solutions to support revenue generation in the area of B2B & B2C.
To work closely with stakeholders in driving the adoption, optimization, and iteration of the Salesforce/MSD platform, leveraging multiple integrations and technologies.
Involved in the full life cycle of projects - support project teams for project implementation including requirement gathering, architecting, developing, testing, issue/risk management, change control, delivery, documentation, and post-implementation support.
Providing regular progress reports and status to project team, managing risk and related queries.
Key Job Requirements
At least 1-2 years of working experience in IT and project management.
Good working and learning attitude.
Have good communication skill, meticulous and organized.
Able to work under tight deadlines.
Good working knowledge of computer systems, security, network, and databases.
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Proficient in project management tools, Excel, Word
Able to prepare and interpret flowcharts, user story, use case or similar diagram.
Qualifications
Minimum Diploma in Information Technology, Computer Technology or equivalent."
Regulatory Technology - Database Application Developer #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate',"About J.P. Morgan Corporate& Investment Bank:  
J.P. Morgan's Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) is a global leader across Banking, Markets and Investor Services. The world's most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. Managing $18 trillion of assets under custody and $393 billion in deposits, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world.
The Team:
The CIB Regulatory Technology team has responsibility for providing strategic technology leadership, application development and production support to CIB wide regulatory agenda. The team has a large book of work with key objective of Simplifying Technology Architecture & Operating Model, Providing Scalable solutions & Resilient Infrastructure, and Improving Data Quality and Management to support Business Growth and new/changing Regulatory Requirements.
Role Description:
Over last few years Regulatory team has built or taken over multiple applications. This role is to work on an in-house developed regulatory reporting platform in Investment Banking Technology as a Senior Application Developer. This role is based in Singapore and is a part of a global regulatory reporting team which is spread across Asia, EMEA and North America. Candidate will be expected to have strong technical skills, designing skills, expert level technical knowledge, possess excellent inter-personal skills
Key Responsibilities:
Design and develop applications in Regulatory reporting space.
Translate business requirements to a high-level technical design and implementation
Articulate use cases and create in-depth analysis to support business & product
Develop, Deploy and support large-scale distributed applications in a mission-critical production environment
Key Skills:
3 years of  building medium to large scale Database applications and enterprise Data platforms handling critical data.
Knowledge in RDBMS - Oracle 11, Oracle 12c.
Inclination and knowledge in Query Performance Tuning techniques.
Working experience in UNIX Shell Scripting.
Interface with production support teams for issues if any reported.
Strong track records in Designing scalable solutions. Hands-on with latest development trends in IT Industry.
Knowledge of modern development lifecycles, such as Agile and iterative development.
Desirable (but not essential):
Good to have knowledge on Big Data & Cloud Technologies.
Good to have knowledge on Kubernetes and Continuous Integration Servers (e.g., Jenkins, TeamCity)
Qualifications:
The successful candidate should also possess the following attributes:
Bachelors degree in Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Information Systems
Strong work ethic, self-starter who is creative with a ‘can-do’ attitude
·Ability to contribute or handle multiple projects independently, while maintaining a high degree of communication and escalation
Team player, comfortable working in a fast-paced environment
Excellent problem solving skills and ability to work with tight deadlines
Strong Organization skills, be able to prioritize task based on priority level
Excellent communications skills."
"Lead, - DevOps. #JobsThatMatter","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shiftleft(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Understanding and translating Product roadmaps to the team
Define and improve the WoW for the product.
Engage different stakeholders to support and sync inorder to deliver the product.
Own the BAU and enhancement of the platform.
Our Ideal Candidate:
10+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 8 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Highly skilled in breaking down work and resource allocation.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation.
Skilled in translating the leader vision statement into Product Features and Controls.
Highly effective in creating Product Roadmaps in sync with Stakeholder teams.
Strong problem-solving skills and Self-Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Full Stack Developer, Cleared Derivatives Technology, Associate #Immediate","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Cleared Derivatives Technology team is hiring in Singapore. The team is responsible for developing and maintaining the Futures and Options (F&O) back office clearing application, P&L reporting process which scales across Finance, Treasury.
We are seeking a technically strong and disciplined developer. This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of software engineering experience
Minimum 2 years of banking experience
Experience in Java 8 is required
Experienced in Databases (Oracle/RDBMS) is required
Good to have experience in React/Angular/JavaScript
Good to have experience on Spring Boot with Microservices
Basics of cloud based applications is preferred
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base
Passionate about building an innovative culture, continuous learning in technical aptitude, business understanding and personal effectiveness
Understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment would be a plus
About Us

J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team

Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556). *#Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, - SC Ventures. #WorkNow #Urgent","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Senior Full Stack Agile Developer #Immediate#UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Department Overview:
Citi are undertaking a multi-year initiative to upgrade their structured products front-to-back infrastructure. The IT team is a key partner to the business and is a major contributor to its success and future growth.
To support the structured products business growth plan additional funding is being invested in technology and a number of new and exciting projects have been initiated. In line with this initiative, the Global Equities Technology Department are currently looking to hire an experienced Developer to become a key member of the Global Structured Products platform team.
Role Overview:
Citi are looking for a Senior Developer (VP Level) to work on a new structured products front to back platform. The team work in an agile manner, self-organise their work, speaking directly with business users across the globe and have good autonomy over technology decisions. They own the continuous delivery pipeline through to production and strive to release frequently into production. 
Key Responsibilities:
Develop software iteratively, from an idea through to production.
Collaborate with the rest of the team, frequently pairing.
Build strong relationships with business users through understanding the challenges that they face, then build systems that will allow them to overcome them.
Produce clean efficient code based on the specifications.
Strive to improve and share best engineering practice across the wider technology team.
Technology Skills Desired:
The platform is built using a Kotlin/Java8 in a micro service based architecture and is deployed within Kubernetes/Openshift containers. Kafka is used as the core messaging layer. 
Best practices around DevOps techniques are expected to be utilised with real-time monitoring and metrics part of the key deliverables/best practice.
The team will also be developing a user interface using React/Redux in-line with other applications in the estate so front to back skills are highly desirable. Experience in UX and design will also be highly valued.
The team also practice fully automated testing, continuous integration and trunk based development and would want the developer to have experience of working in such an environment."
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer,"Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
"Software Engineer, Analyst, - Singapore #Seekbetter #JPM","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 1 year of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
"Senior Java Software Developer, - Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Software Engineer, - Currencies and Emerging Markets, Associate ( 210132839) #Immediate#Urgent'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Athena is J.P. Morgan's cross-market risk management and trading system that provides functionality for traders, salespeople, operations and product control staff globally. It is used in our foreign exchange, fixed income, credit and commodities businesses. Athena includes a globally replicated object-oriented database, a powerful dependency graph and a fully integrated stack across pricing, risk and trading tools. The code is a combination of Python and C++: C++ for speed, and Python for flexibility and rapid but controlled releases. Athena is designed to provide a continuous deployment environment, and pull developers close to the business to help increase revenues, while improving operational processes and controls to reduce costs.
The Currencies and Emerging Markets (CEM) Athena team delivers business critical trade capture, risk management, transaction processing and trader tools to the CEM business globally.
The CEM Athena roles require technically strong and disciplined python developers. A record of delivering high quality, well-tested solutions in a mature controlled environment is a prerequisite. The roles require an ability to attain clear understanding of Athena environment and of the unique design considerations that come into play in a diverse and highly interdependent systems environment. A high level of interaction with the business is required as the applications involved are revenue generating and directly used by the businesses globally.
This is a unique opportunity for delivery-minded individuals to take ownership of the full software development lifecycle, partnering with the CEM business to understand and improve business workflows. The successful candidate will be empowered to build relationships with the Singapore front-office and quantitative research teams in order to deliver local requirements, provide business face-off and technical support, enhancements and fixes to the local users, as well as to own the delivery of Asia Pacific requirements on large-scale, global re-engineering initiatives
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree with at least 4 years of software engineering experience in Financial Services sector
Proficiency in Python programming language
Experience in developing and supporting complex systems used for intraday risk management
Deep understanding of risk management concepts and product knowledge in the Fixed Income space
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability.
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base.
Ability to manage multiple tasks concurrently in an efficient and effective manner with minimal supervision.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to present complex issues to non-technical users and to influence change.
Good problem solving skills with an ability to find creative, out of the box solutions to complex problems.
Good understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment and beyond.
Focus on testing through the entire development cycle to produce reliable and maintainable software"
Application Development Programmer (Hadoop/Python/Pyspark) (Hybrid) #Urgent,"Responsibilities
As a bank with a brain and a soul, Citi creates economic value that is systemically responsible and in our clients’ best interests.
As a financial institution that touches every region of the world and every sector that shapes your daily life, our Enterprise Operations & Technology teams are charged with a mission that rivals any large tech company.
Our technology solutions are the foundations of everything we do. We keep the bank safe and provide the technical tools our workers need to be successful.
We design our digital architecture and ensure our platforms provide a first-class customer experience. Our operations teams manage risk, resources, and program management.
We focus on enterprise resiliency and business continuity.
We develop, coordinate, and execute strategic operational plans. Essentially, Enterprise Operations & Technology re-engineers client and partner processes to deliver excellence through secure, reliable, and controlled services.
Global Functions Technology is a diverse organization comprised of more than 15,000 talented professionals with some of the brightest minds – all working together to realize Citi’s Vision of growth and economic progress. As a group, we partner with the Finance, Risk, Compliance, and Human Resources teams to drive the delivery of innovative technology solutions using common data, analytics, and platforms. Our technology operates in real-time environments, capturing and managing market, transaction, and accounting data, as well as the data from millions of customers daily. Our solutions cover all products and geographies in which Citi does business. We are the backbone for reporting across the bank, satisfying our regulatory commitments, enabling our businesses to be nimbler and helping to safeguard customer assets through highly effective controls.
Our commitment to diversity includes a workforce that represents the clients we serve globally from all walks of life, backgrounds, and origins. We foster an environment where the best people want to work. We value and demand respect for others, promote individuals based on merit, and ensure opportunities for personal development are widely available to all. Ideal candidates are innovators with well-rounded backgrounds who bring their authentic selves to work and complement our culture of delivering results with pride. If you are a problem solver who seeks passion in your work, come join us. We’ll enable growth and progress together.
Apps Dev Programmer Analyst 1
GFT is looking for a developer to work with business analysts and a group of seasoned technology professionals to deliver technology projects for Citi Funds Transfer Pricing application
Responsibilities
Develop high-quality code
Review and debug code
Identify ideas to improve system performance and impact availability
Coordinate with Senior developers, business analysts & users for requirements
Identify and analyze issues, make recommendations, and implement solutions
Provide continuous improvement through identifying best practices in technology products / processes / systems
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field
Minimum 2 years of total experience with background in Information Technology
Experience in development
Hands on experience in Hadoop, Python, Pyspark, Hive, Unix, Shell Scripting
Well versed in SDLC life cycle and project management documentations
Need to be self-driven, enthusiastic, quick learner, and have a problem-solving attitude with strong analytical skills"
"Senior Developer, Commodities Technology - (2200018769) #Urgent'","Role Responsibilities
This is a role for a highly experienced and highly motivated full-stack software developer delivering software solutions for the Commodities trading desk.
The main responsibilities include analysis, design, development and delivery of features in a challenging and ever-changing environment for front-office users across all functional groups of Financial Markets Commodities division.
Key Roles and Responsibilities
Working as part of the Commodities Technology team, which develops the technology solutions for supporting the Commodities sales and trading businesses at Standard Chartered.
Dependable experienced developer able to take ownership and leadership of tasks and drive them personally to successful delivery.
Innovator and intellectual leader.
Problem solver taking passion in resolving complicated problems.
Driven individual motivated by delivering successful solutions to users and using any means and technologies necessary to do so.
Work with an Agile team to develop, test and maintain applications.
Assist in the collection and documentation of user’s requirements, development of user stories and estimates.
Work with databases, software algorithms and design patterns.
Design, develop and test applications in accordance with established standards.
Participate in peer-reviews of solution designs and related code.
Develop, refine and tune integrations between applications.
Track and maintain code coverage, system performance and system security.
Work with a mature DevOps software delivery process.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Key Stakeholders
Commodities Front Office users including Sales, Trading, Structuring. Control functions including product control, market risk, credit risk, regulatory operations, regulatory technology, operations, application development teams.
Our Ideal Candidate
8 years’ experience working as a Front office developer in investment banking / FI.
Skilled in pattern design and analytical thinking.
Strong domain knowledge of Agile and its processes.
Experience in developing robust, distributed, scalable, high production quality applications.
Experience with picking and applying good software practices like test driven development, continuous integration, and continuous delivery.
Ability to work in a variety of client settings and in a team orientated collaborative environment.
High competency in software development using Java, React and relational databases such as Oracle or PostgreSQL.
Experience with developing micro services, test driven development and DevOps.
Agile Scrum Master
Desirable but not Essential
Familiarity with Commodities trading business, risk management.
Scrum Master and Product Owner certification.
Prior experience in retail banking, private banking and wealth management.
Others
Knowledge and previous experience in maintaining and supporting Development tools.
Familiarity and confidence working in an “agile” development environment.
Self-starter who can “own” the toolset and provide a first-class service to stakeholders.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Java
React, Angular or other UI
Relational Databases: Oracle or PostgreSQL
Micro-services architecture
Software testing, including test automation
DevOps
Messaging middleware: Solace, JMS or others"
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547].*. #JobsThatMatter","The Role Responsibilities
 Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
"Lead Full Stack Developer,. / #Urgent'.","The Role Responsibilities
Responsible to design and build function-centric solutions in the context of transition from traditional, legacy platforms to microservices architectures.
Responsible to define and refactor multi-channel client architecture offering and providing differentiated end-user experiences by leveraging containerization and cloud technology.
Responsible to outline the governance and microservices development guiding principles as well as ensuring the best practices are followed by the development team.
Informed - work collaboratively with an agile, scrum-based team to understand the business domain and client requirements that drive analysis, architecture/design and development of quality technical solutions and deliverables.
Accountable - these solutions cross a broad spectrum of technologies and must align with business and IT strategies and to comply with the organization’s architectural and security standards.
Consulted- Participate in coordinated planning sessions and provide effort estimates for business initiatives of IT solutions.
Responsible to maintain cutting edge knowledge of current and emerging technologies, industry trends and standards Qualifications.
Responsible to gather requirements, design, develop, test, deploy and support applications.
Responsible to drive innovative software engineering practices and architecture design.
Consulted - work with business and other technology teams to establish frameworks for delivering online capability.
Accountable - constantly analyse and improve the performance and quality of the product and team.
Accountable - able to adapt to changes in priorities and requirements.
Responsible for implementation of robust, fault tolerant and distributed application.
Accountable for synergy in the delivery of projects through co-ordination of interdependencies.
Responsible for delivery of applications that attend business and clients needs with automated tests, CI and CD.
Responsible to be able to solve complex software development/design issues using clean, coherent code following established coding guidelines.
Our Ideal Candidate
Mircoservices architecture using any of the market leading solutions.
Experience in implementing business critical, high volume, and highly available services is a must.
A strong hands-on development track records building integration and application utilizing a variety of technologies, development tools and database systems.
Experience with containerization and cloud technologies (eg. AWS EKS, EFK), Control-M, as well as DevOps and testing tools (Git, SVN, TFS – Terraform (IaC), Jira, Confluence, Jenkins, Nexus, Selenium, SonarQube, Bitbucket).
Experience with cloud-based, CD/CI or DevOps development environment.
Good communication skills both in writing and verbally with ability to present the complex ideas or technical solution to business and/or management team.
Working experience in both waterfall and Agile delivery approach.
Robust understanding of Java and a in-depth understanding of other Java technologies, including Solace, Oracle, SQL, Stored Procedures, Linux, Spring, Angular, React, Hibernate, Web services, API, Microservices.
Domain knowledge in Wealth Management and Private Banking and Wealth Lending business knowledge is desirable.
Full software development lifecycle experience in a mature CI / CD environment.
Strong in communication, trouble shooting and analysis skill.
Working experience delivering online/internet/mobile application.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
8+ years of experience in Software Development
Microservice Architecture
Containerization and cloud technologies (eg. AWS EKS, EFK), Control-M, as well as DevOps and testing tools (Git, SVN, TFS – Terraform (IaC), Jira, Confluence, Jenkins, Nexus, Selenium, SonarQube, Bitbucket).
CD/CI or DevOps
Java technologies, including Solace, Oracle, SQL, Stored Procedures, Linux, Spring, Angular, React, Hibernate, Web services, API, Microservices.
Agile Development
Requirements Analysis"
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Software Engineer, Analyst, - Trade Surveillance, - Singapore #SeekbettertHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
DevOps Engineer #Urgent,"Introduction
As an Application Developer, you will lead IBM into the future by translating system requirements into the design and development of customized systems in an agile environment. The success of IBM is in your hands as you transform vital business needs into code and drive innovation. Your work will power IBM and its clients globally, collaborating and integrating code into enterprise systems. You will have access to the latest education, tools and technology, and a limitless career path with the world’s technology leader. Come to IBM and make a global impact!"
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556). *#Seekbetter","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Full Stack Developer - F&O GEMM, Analyst #Immediate #JPM #Urgent #Immediate","Job Description
In launching your career in our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You will be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Required education in Bachelor of Science (Information Systems)
1 year of experience in the banking/financial domain
Experience of working with Springboot, Junit, React
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
In touch with industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals and passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Willingness to learn different technologies and toolsets required for F&O GEMM."
"Senior Application Developer, - 22495002#. #Urgent #Worknow |","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547].*'","The Role Responsibilities
 Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
Post -Trade Securities - Software Engineer #Immediate#Urgent',"Job Description
We look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Primary focus will be to manage the number of Post Trade Technology applications in APAC with target architecture and to implement new settlement & clearing capabilities so as to support business expansion and increased volumes. 
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Sciences 
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems.
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices.
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture.
Experience in building/ designing high volume/ real time processing systems.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Java/ J2EE
Spring Framework / Hibernate
RDBMS (Oracle)
Unix / Shell scripting
Cloud knowledge
Understanding Business Requirements and Functional Specifications
Understanding existing program logic
Providing and/or agreeing estimates for required development
Creation/ update of Detailed Design Specifications, Program Specifications, and program Version Control documentation
Coding of new programs and changes to existing programs
Creation of Unit Test Plans, and execution of Unit Tests
Providing technical support for User Acceptance Testing
Creation of Implementation/ Back out Plans and Support Handover Documents
Providing technical support for Production Implementations, and post-implementation support during implementation warranty period
Requirements: 
Minimum 5 years with relevant hands-on development work.
Experience in working in Eclipse/IntelliJ / Maven environments.
Experience in managing various settlement systems in Post Trade Technology in APAC region.
Expertise in Core Java, TDD, BDD, spring framework, Messaging, SQL, Unix shell scripts.
“Can do” attitude, which can identify problems, take ownership, and provide solutions.
Drive the project progress for the deliverables. In our small agile team, developers talk directly to operational users and other BAs for requirements. You will be developing great communication and project management skills on top of the technical skills.
Hand’s on experience in fine tuning application response / performance testing.
Experience of MQ / JMS (message transfer process), Kafka.
Experience using version control tool bitbucket.
Understanding of banking risk and compliance policies.
Experience in code scanning tools like black duck and tools like Sonar etc
Experience of development of Settlement and clearing applications.
Familiarity with SWIFT (Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication) Message formats.
Knowledge on markets such as Australia, Singapore and Japan is good."
#Java Application Developer (Officer - Hybrid) - [21388615]#Immediate,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Supervisor is an intermediate manment level position responsible for providing full leadership and direction to a team of employees in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man an Applications Development team of professionals to accomplish establid goals and conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, training and development, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Recommend new work procedures to increase process efficiencies
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Develop and apply comprehensive knowledge of how own area integrates within apps development and other technical areas
Ensure the quality of tasks provided by self and others on team as well as influence decisions through advice or facilitating services that impact the team and closely related work teams
Act as backup to Applications Development Manr and serve as an advisor and coach to junior developers and analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakehers and /or other team members.
Ability to man teams.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
2-5 of relevant experience
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Ability to take ownership and make technical decisions on software development projects
Experience with dependency manment, change manment, continuous integration testing tools, and audit/compliance requirements
Extensive knowledge of software engineering and object-oriented design
Demonstrated leadership and manment skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Backend Engineer (Entry & Senior Roles Available),"The Digital Technology Department in OSIM works together as a team to ensure that the final product is programmed to meet the needs and wants of the consumer, whilst, incorporating the latest and most desirable technology to remain competitive in the market. This department comprises of the Product Owners, UI/UX, Mobile Application, IOT as well as the Digital QA group. If you are forward-looking, able to think out of the box and always hungry to learn about the newest technology, we want you in our team!
Job Responsibilities
Participate in the entire backend application lifecycle, focusing on coding and debugging
Troubleshoot and debug backend applications
Develop unit tests to improve backend code quality
Engage cutting-edge technologies to improve applications performance and reliability
Collaborate with Product Owner, UIUX designer, Mobile engineer and Test Engineer on project
Assist in the operation of the cloud service, e.g. monitoring, alerting, logging and troubleshooting
Build reusable code and libraries for future use
Review code and improve code standard
Job Requirements
2-5 years relevant experience with RESTful service development
Strong programming skills with C# and .Net Core (python is a plus)
Strong understanding in Data Structures and Algorithms
Strong understanding in Serverless/micro-services architecture and technology
Strong understanding of SQL database and NoSQL database (e.g. Redis)
Experience of cloud service e.g. AWS, Azure or Tencent services
Experience of using GIT command line
Clean code capability
Clean architecture capability
Complete tasks independently with high quality
Experience of working in an Agile (scrum) team
Proactive and accurate communication skill and team work
Creative thinking & strong sense of responsibility
Additional Advantage:
Experience of IoT related product development"
Service Now Developer / (2200010556) #Immediate #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Lead, - DevOps #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shiftleft(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Understanding and translating Product roadmaps to the team
Define and improve the WoW for the product.
Engage different stakeholders to support and sync inorder to deliver the product.
Own the BAU and enhancement of the platform.
Our Ideal Candidate:
10+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 8 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Highly skilled in breaking down work and resource allocation.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation.
Skilled in translating the leader vision statement into Product Features and Controls.
Highly effective in creating Product Roadmaps in sync with Stakeholder teams.
Strong problem-solving skills and Self-Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Java Developer,"Responsibilities:
Code, modify, test, correct and document new and existing programs using assigned languages, tools and coding conventions;
Prepare and document test data;
Prepare and set up testing and production environment;
Prepare and maintain program and system documentation;
Assist in establishing file structures and processing logic requirements;
Produce deliverables according to group standards and procedures;
Assist Project Leaders in the study and design of application systems and work coordination, project management and user training work;
Troubleshooting and supporting end-users in the implementation and maintenance of application systems;
Requirements:
Diploma or Degree in Computer Science and Information Technology or equivalent
Relevant working experience in software application development such as Java/J2EE/Pega/.Net
Working knowledge of Agile, Scrum, Web Services, Spring MVC or Struts; Knowledge of Hibernate will be advantageous
Ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment
Interested candidates please click on APPLY button.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
IoT Technician,"Glos searching for an innovative and responsible technical engineer to join our company. 
To be successful as a IoT Technican, you should be meticulous, efficient, and have basic knowledge and familiar with IoT. You will work on the platforms that run devices, the cloud computing systems that deliver data and ensure the various building blocks of IoT systems function properly. 
Job responsibilities
Supporting the team during planning, design, development, installation, maintenance, and troubleshooting processes.
Analyzing existing systems and operations and developing preventative maintenance strategies.
Identifying potential problems and notifying the supervisor in a timely manner.
Monitoring processes, workers, and methods, and developing plans for increased efficiency.
Conducting required research and developing best practices.
To provide onsite or offsite testing, troubleshooting and commissioning
To provide onsite or offsite training to customers
Consolidate and provide insights to the supervisor and team on new technical issues faced on sites
Job requirement
One or more years of experience in a technical support role
Experience in a similar technical role recommended
Ability to work independently and collaboratively in a multidisciplinary team environment
Ability to follow instructions and collaborate with others."
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid) - 22561979 #Seekbetter,"Citi’s FXLM technology group supports the front office technology operations of one of the world’s largest capital market businesses. Our talented technology group is looking for a hands-on, java analyst developer to work in a new London based server side development team on our award winning Citi Velocity platform.
Citi Velocity is a best in-class, state of the art, proprietary ecommerce platform. It deploys cutting edge technology and innovation to offer a slick, dynamic and rich end user experience. By leveraging Citi’s global footprint with world-class innovation, we are giving our clients unprecedented access to our capital markets intelligence, multi-asset real-time execution and post-trade service.
Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 3+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java  
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Senior Software Engineer, Associate #Seekbetter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well using Front end technologies such as AngularJS, HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 8 years of Software Development work experience
Strong proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, AngularJS, JavaScript/HTML and SQL
Hands on experience with Springboot and distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Good understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Java 8 features, REST, UNIX shell scripting"
Senior Full Stack Agile Developer #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Department Overview:
Citi are undertaking a multi-year initiative to upgrade their structured products front-to-back infrastructure. The IT team is a key partner to the business and is a major contributor to its success and future growth.
To support the structured products business growth plan additional funding is being invested in technology and a number of new and exciting projects have been initiated. In line with this initiative, the Global Equities Technology Department are currently looking to hire an experienced Developer to become a key member of the Global Structured Products platform team.
Role Overview:
Citi are looking for a Senior Developer (VP Level) to work on a new structured products front to back platform. The team work in an agile manner, self-organise their work, speaking directly with business users across the globe and have good autonomy over technology decisions. They own the continuous delivery pipeline through to production and strive to release frequently into production. 
Key Responsibilities:
Develop software iteratively, from an idea through to production.
Collaborate with the rest of the team, frequently pairing.
Build strong relationships with business users through understanding the challenges that they face, then build systems that will allow them to overcome them.
Produce clean efficient code based on the specifications.
Strive to improve and share best engineering practice across the wider technology team.
Technology Skills Desired:
The platform is built using a Kotlin/Java8 in a micro service based architecture and is deployed within Kubernetes/Openshift containers. Kafka is used as the core messaging layer. 
Best practices around DevOps techniques are expected to be utilised with real-time monitoring and metrics part of the key deliverables/best practice.
The team will also be developing a user interface using React/Redux in-line with other applications in the estate so front to back skills are highly desirable. Experience in UX and design will also be highly valued.
The team also practice fully automated testing, continuous integration and trunk based development and would want the developer to have experience of working in such an environment."
Application Consultant (Project),"We are a leading IT software solution company focus on assisting businesses in elevating productivity by streamlining internal HR processes through the use of our HRiQ Human Capital Management Software. We are a fast-growing company that recognises people as our biggest asset and we continually search and invest in talent to fit into our team culture.
This is an exciting position and you will be working with the team and customer to deliver our products and services to implement world class Human Capital Management solutions to the Customers in Singapore and region.
Responsibilities:
•        Analysing and mapping Client’s functional requirements against the Software available functions
•        Translating client requirements into highly specified project deliverables
•        Identifying customization where needed and working with our own technical team to detail the scope of the customization works where required
•        Ensuring quality assurances, user acceptance and implementation of completed customization
•        Planning and executing data conversion activities
•        Providing training for the use of the Software to Client’s users
•        Managing project timelines to completion with clear documentation on task assignment, progress, and issue resolution
•        Demonstrating expert skill sets in Software in supporting client’s users on day to day usage
•        Hands On individual and be able to work with local and offshore teams to deliver projects
Requirements:
•        Degree/Diploma in Information Technology, Computer Science or related disciplines
•        At least 3 years’ experience in Application Software implementation environment with on-site support and Implementation
•        Knowledge of Microsoft Windows Operating System, SQL Server Database and programming skills in ASP.NET, VB.NET are required
•        Good analytical, problem-solving and communication skills
•        Capable of project management and able to deliver timely
•        Customer handling skills and service oriented
•        To understand and adhere to the company policies and procedures regarding information security management, Personal data protection and data confidentiality 
•        Perform the role assigned, if applicable, in managing information security and data protection. "
"Software Engineer (RPC Framework / Service Mesh), Cloud Infrastructure#.#Immediate","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Microservice Framework team focuses on in-depth research on programming languages, RPC frameworks, and high-performance middleware. We provide the company with research and development frameworks, high-performance middleware, service mesh, and unified SOA Governance platforms. Among them, the Golang framework (KiteX) has been applied to tens of thousands of services carrying over billions of QPS in total and is at the forefront of the industry in terms of performance and scalability. Service Mesh and our traffic management platforms cover most of the company's businesses.
Responsibilities
Design and develop microservice RPC frameworks for Golang/Java/Python/Rust;
Design and develop our Service Mesh system;
Design and develop our traffic management platforms.
Qualifications
Proficient in one or more programming languages such as Golang/Java/Python/Rust;
Strong interest in technologies such as RPC frameworks/Service Mesh/traffic management systems;
In-depth understanding of RPC principles and frameworks such as gRPC/bRPC/dubbo/thrift;
In-depth understanding of the key areas of microservice governance and its implementation.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in contributing to open source projects;
Practical experience with Service Mesh systems."
"Technical Solutions Consultant, Android Partner Engineering","Qualification
Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience.
5 years of experience in the mobile and consumer electronics space.
Experience with Android.
Preferred qualifications:
Experience in managing multiple customers and workstreams.
Experience in mobile device/application development and understanding of mobile ecosystem trends.
Experience in one or more programming languages (e.g., Java, C, C++, Python, etc.).
Experience in Android and web technologies with focus on solutions and integrations with cloud services and mobile devices.
Excellent communication and project management skills.
Description
As a Technical Account Manager, you are responsible for providing technical solutions and managing relationships with Google's largest and most strategic online publishers. As a liaison between clients and our technical staff, you flawlessly lead deployments, implementations and integrations of a variety of our product lines (such as Search, Mobile, Video and Commerce). From monitoring product performance to debugging and troubleshooting product code, you are the resident expert that addresses partner needs. You are a technical expert with an entrepreneurial drive and passion for client management.
Whether working with next-gen chipset manufacturers or emerging market telcos, Google's Android Partner Engineering team helps solve some of the toughest mobile technology problems. We work with teams throughout Google to develop solutions for strategic partners around the globe. We maintain crucial relationships with and build technical solutions for our long-term partners who are making Android into a world-changing platform. But we're just getting started.
Responsibilities
Lead and deploy Android related features and technologies, with external partners and third-party solution providers at scale, in close collaboration with Android Program Managers/Engineering.
Guarantee the technical aspects of a partner’s integration by providing the necessary documentation, technical guidance, and support.
Perform implementation reviews, advocate product features, and ensure the prompt/proper resolution of technical challenges.
Improve product feature offerings by providing partner feedback to internal cross-functional teams including Product Management, Business Development, and Software Engineering.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, internally and externally, including Product Management and Software Engineering.
Summary
Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience.
5 years of experience in the mobile and consumer electronics space.
Experience with Android."
Senior Java Developer - Associate #JPM #Immediate #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter,"Job Description
As an experienced member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Wealth Management Client and Party reference data platform technology team in APAC is specifically seeking a senior development team member for building party and account platform. As a technologist, you will be responsible for developing functionality for key projects that are owned and driven by APAC, but delivering for the business globally. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. As a full-stack technologist, the role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building applications with expertise on modern development practices. If you have a passion for bleeding edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
Key Responsibilities:
Turning epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts into technical designs and development
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services.
Responsible for executing clean code for complex designs that are in line with the architectural direction
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global technology team.
Active involvement in supporting the Client and Party reference data platform across all environments, including production in a devops model
Have a keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Lead the development team for Client and Party reference data platform and able to work with business stakeholders.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent experience
Experience with full-stack application development, including REST Web services , SpringBoot, and modern Javascript technologies such as ReactJS and/or Angular
Micro service design patterns and exposure to Cloud based application development. Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Experience with SQL databases such as Sybase or Oracle and with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra and/or MongoDB
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, etc. and exposure to event-driven design patterns.
Experience with distributed caches such as GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast, etc.
Experience developing with testing frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Selenium and Cucumber
Knowledge and experience of SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven.
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Keen understanding of financial control and budget management
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture"
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer |#.#Urgent'#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
"Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer - Vice President, #Urgent #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter'","Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer. #Urgent#Immediate,"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and  Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and  Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
DevOps Engineer,"Job Description
Our client, a emerging hedge fund firm headquartered in Asia, The firm's investment strategy is mainly quantitative trading using high-frequency trading strategies with a focus on domestic and overseas markets.
Your Key Responsibilities includes:
Monitoring of trading platform & infrastructure and assist in troubleshooting when needed.
Maintaining and ensuring that trading pipeline is operating efficiently on a daily basis
Managing and accessing operational risk of change in control in production
Planning and carrying out trading system development 
Requirements:
Minimum a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Experience in Data extracting and Python Transformation
Alternatively, you may call +65 9004 5401 for a quick discussion.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates would be notified.
Chan Chin How, Javier
Associate Consultant
Reg. No: R1989608
Stellar- Link Partners Pte Ltd (EA License: 21S0698)"
Senior Java Full Stack Developer - Payment Technology - Associate #Seekbetter,"About Team
J.P. Morgan Payment Technology is looking for a Senior Java Full Stack Software Developer to join our global team for a Greenfield development project. You will be part of the pioneer team in Singapore as we build our payment digital capabilities in the region.
In this role you will be working with state of the art technologies to design and develop a cloud based platform for external and internal development teams to integrate efficiently with the Payments API Ecosystem.
Primary Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable, well thought and defect free solutions.
Participate in Agile ceremonies - standups, retrospective, sprint planning and backlog refinement.
Write enterprise grade code with production stability and resiliency in mind.
Develop deep technical understanding of all the interfaces and communication protocol in the platform.
Build and maintain automated monitoring tools.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Manage hygiene of the application (code smells, vulnerabilities, code coverage).
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the project and product teams.
Experience and Skills Required
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related fields.
Minimum 3 years of experience in backend and frontend technologies (Java, Node, JavaScript, etc.)
Desirable skillset (React, Next.js, Spring Boot, HTML, CSS, Node.js)
Knowledge on architecture and design of enterprise systems will be highly advantageous.
Past understanding of working in and managing production environment is preferred.
Should be detail-oriented, strong analytical and good communication skills are a must.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams across the globe.
Pro-actively participate in designing/solution of the feature/platform
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
EFX/Commodities Application Support #urgent #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire,"Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
VP - Senior C# Developer - (Hybrid) #WorkNow#.,"Responsibilities:
Write good quality C# code and work with large codebases
Interact with the senior stakeholders, other teams and drive the project commitments
Design Develop and Test new features for the Trading applications
Improve the stability and performance of existing applications
3rd line support of the production system (dedicated 24h support teams handle 1st / 2nd line).
Manage suite of apps in Pricing
Qualifications:
Essential:
Expert in C# .Net or Core Java with strong interest to program in C# as the primary language, Multithreading, Reactive Extensions, OO design
Experience in designing and writing APIs
Experience in SQL, PL/SQL
Experience in Profiling Applications
Able to debug complex event driven application
Understanding of computing science fundamentals – concurrency, algorithms, operating systems
Desirable:
Knowledge of Web Streaming Platforms like Liberator
Experience in using Design patterns
Exposure to Agile Methodologies like scrum, Kanban, and techniques like TDD
Exposure to .Net Core
Experience in App containerization and cloud deployment"
"IOS Engineer, Intelligent Video Creation","Responsibilities
About TikTok:
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Why Join Us
At TikTok, our people are humble, intelligent, compassionate and creative. We create to inspire - for you, for us, and for more than 1 billion users on our platform. We lead with curiosity and aim for the highest, never shying away from taking calculated risks and embracing ambiguity as it comes. Here, the opportunities are limitless for those who dare to pursue bold ideas that exist just beyond the boundary of possibility. Join us and make impact happen with a career at TikTok.
About Video Creation Team:
Our team's mission is to empower TikTok users to turn creativity into reality via videos. We build the core video creation product to support tens of millions of TikTok creators every day. All the viral props and effects you find on TikTok are developed by us, via close collaboration with TikTok AR effects and multimedia teams. Our goal is to build the world's best video creation software. On this team, you will be working with our XFN partners to define a world-class video creation experience, designing the architecture of TikTok video creation tools and pipelines, and shipping cutting-edge features to take TikTok to the next level.
Responsibilities:
Collaborate with product/design and other engineering teams to define a world-class video creation experience.
Design and implement user-facing features of TikTok video creation software using the latest technology.
Build reusable software components with robust code and clear documentation, and deliver high quality work.
Analyze and optimize iOS applications for quality, efficiency, and performance.
Qualifications:
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with 2+ years of iOS development experience.
Proficient in Objective-C or Swift, strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities, and limitations of iOS platform.
Solid knowledge of multi-threading, data structure, operating system and network.
Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
Experience in audio & video multimedia client development is preferred.
An effective communicator with excellent collaborative skills, strong self motivation and great problem solving skills.
Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
Willing to take up challenges and grow in a fast-paced, dynamic environment. Experience of working in a cross-regional team is a plus.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
AWM - Software Engineer - Associate -- #Immediate',"Job Description
Software Engineer: Associate
J. P. Morgan Wealth Management Technology is driven by innovators who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Across 27 cities, our team of 4,600 agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions.
This role is for CRM platform which is a suite of applications used by Bankers and Investors to maintain client engagement and prospecting life cycle. We are looking for motivated technology talent to join the Wealth Management Investments and Advisor Technology team. You should have a passion for writing and testing good quality code, to build high performing and distributed, data-intensive applications.   
Job Description:
You will be part of an Agile team
You will be responsible for designing and implementing micro services using technologies like Java 11, Kafka, Elastic Search on Cloud.
You will write test cases using TDD/BDD approach with emphasis on high maintainability.
You will demonstrate scalability of your services using mock testing frameworks and other tools.
Participate in the API design sessions and selection of design patterns that are selected for use by the team.
Technical documentation of service API (using Swagger)
Implementing logging, auditability, security, and monitoring features.
You should be able to build lightweight user interface using React.
Qualifications:
BA/BA degree
MUST: Deep knowledge and expertise in Java programming - you should rate yourself 8 out of 10 or higher and be able to demonstrate during the hiring process.
Knowledge of CI/CD, DevOps tool chain, and a test-driven approach to agile delivery is expected.
8 years of experience in the role of software engineer. Experience building a truly distributed architecture based system, especially involving large data volumes and real-time distribution will be huge plus.
Experience with implementing middle-tier data caching solutions (e.g. Gemfire or Elastic) and/or designing/delivering messaging-based solutions (e.g. Kafka) is a plus.
Knowledge of modern architectures based on micro services, REST APIs, NoSQL stores (e.g. Cassandra), and event-based architecture will be key. 
Experience with Cloud design and deployment"
Loans Java Sr Developer. #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Worknow,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Senior Software Engineer 7339,"Job Description
Develop web applications using ASP.Net, MVC and ASP.Net Web API, following the development standards and technical design provided
Understanding of best practices in software development process (SDLC) including coding standards, code reviews, design patterns, source control and object-oriented programming.
Tap knowledge from domain experts and write SQL scripts to manage & query databases to extract & generate required data for analysis.
Ability to develop web-based dashboards to show the results for internal & external customers is preferred.
Supports and develops software engineers by providing advice, coaching, and educational opportunities.
Develop software solutions by studying information needs conferring with users studying systems flow, data usage and work processes
Document and demonstrate solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts, layouts, diagrams, charts, code comments and clear code
Design and architect new software product for data analytics
2nd level user support for application interface issues across systems
Analyse issues and work with other team members to identify root cause to prevent future occurrences
Requirements and Skills
2 to 5 years of relevant experience in core software apps support
Working knowledge of C#, ASP.Net, MS SQL
Degree in Engineering or Computer Science or IT
Hands on experience in technical design patterns, development, and documentation.
Experience using Visual Studio 2019 and later.
Strong in SQL server complex SQL query and Stored procedure development (2+ years)
Good knowledge of microservice architecture and SOA.
RPA UiPath knowledge advantage."
Application Consultant (Support),"We are a leading IT software solution company focus on assisting businesses in elevating productivity by streamlining internal HR processes through the use of our HRiQ Human Capital Management Software. We are a fast-growing company that recognises people as our biggest asset and we continually search and invest in talent to fit into our team culture.
This is an exciting position and you will be working with the team to deliver a great customer support on our world class Human Capital Management to the Customers in Singapore and region.
Responsibilities:
•        Attend to customer support requests on queries or problems on Application Software.
•        Check, Debug, rectify and test system on program error to ensure resolution.
•        Perform Data fixes, Technical Bug fixes and Configuration fixes
•        Ensure smooth workflow processes and attainment of service level commitments.
•        Communicate and work closely with the Software Product Team on reported problems or enhancements needed for the software.
•        Understanding and mapping Client’s functional requirements against the Software available functions and guiding the users
•        Identifying customization where needed and working with our own technical team to detail the scope of the customization works where required
•        Ensuring quality assurances, user acceptance and implementation of completed customization
•        Logging of tickets and all transaction on the Support ticketing tool
Requirements:
•        Degree/Diploma in Information Technology, Computer Science or related disciplines
•        At least 2-3 years’ experience in Application Software Support environment with preferably from Solution provider environment
•        Knowledge of Microsoft Windows Operating System, SQL Server Database and programming skills in ASP.NET, VB.NET are required. Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services will be an added advantage
•        Strong and proactive approach to problem-solving and inquisitive mind-set
•        Ability to manage and meet customer expectation and delivery timelines
•        Prior experience in developing and/or supporting enterprise business application such as Human Resource Management Systems or ERP is an added advantage.
•        Able to communicate effectively and willingness to work hard to achieve results;
•        Shown ability to work with other team members
•        Customer handling skills and service oriented
•        To understand and adhere to the company policies and procedures regarding information security management, Personal data protection and data confidentiality 
•        Perform the role assigned, if applicable, in managing information security and data protection. "
Service Now Developer / (2200010556) *' #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 - #Urgent #Worknow#Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Frontend Game Development (Lead),"■OVERVIEW
One of our clients is opening a new position!
Singapore-based Game Studio specializes in HTML5 Games
■RESPONSIBILITIES
● Lead a group of passionate game engineers to complete upcoming games.
● Focus on solution design, coding structure, setting good coding practice, deployment protocols and debugging.
● To brainstorm solutions and design robust, highly optimal applications that can deliver best performance across all devices.
● To work closely with product owners, key users, artists and the quality assurance team to ensure deliverables are as per expectation.
● To foresee technical and resource challenges and find solutions ahead of time.
● Translate business/game requirements into technical specifications.
● Design and implement game mechanics and UI according to design specifications.
● Establish effective strategies and development pipeline.
● Design, build and maintain efficient scalable, and reliable code.
● Ensure the best performance, quality, and responsiveness of applications and games.
● Create technical design document.
● Verify implementations according to specifications.
■REQUIREMENTS
● Minimally 3 years of game development experience across the full development lifecycle.
● Degree in Software/Computer Science/Computing/Computer Engineering/IT discipline or equivalent
● Shipped at least 1 title (Preferably Mobile) while working as the main developer.
● Proficient in scripting, textures, animation, GUI styles and shaders.
● Constantly learn and stay updated to the evolving game standards.
● Proficient knowledge of code versioning tools. (Such as Git, SVN, and Mercurial)
● Good understanding with API gateways integrations, and network optimisation.
● Solid understanding with game engine, either Cocos Creator or Unity.
● Driven and self-motivated, proactive, and work well as a team player.
● Ensure the best performance, quality, and responsiveness of applications and games.
● Create technical design document.
● Verify implementations according to specifications.
■PREFERRED SKILLS
● Good understanding of either NoSQL or SQL (preferably Mongo, Redis, MySQL)
● Familiar with cloud technologies (AWS services preferred, such as IAM, EC2, Lambda, AWS RDS, Elasticsearch, AWS CodeBuild etc)
● Domain knowledge of the game industry from game development to actual game operation.
● Passion in building games."
Core Payments Application Support - Associate #worknow #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You’ll develop solutions for a bank entrusted with holding $18 trillion of assets and $393 billion in deposits. CIB provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk, and extends liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world.
Working in Application Support means you'll use both creative and critical thinking skills to maintain application systems that are crucial to the daily operations of the firm. You'll work collaboratively in teams on a wide range of projects based on your primary area of focus: design or programming. While learning to fix application and data issues as they arise, you'll also gain exposure to software development, testing, deployment, maintenance and improvement, in addition to production lifecycle methodologies and risk guidelines. Finally, you'll have the opportunity to develop professionally —and to grow your career in any direction you choose.
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
Performs 2nd level support for application and platform incidents as needed
Brings a DevOps and SRE mindset to the entire software development life cycle, building, evolving and operating rapidly-changing resilient systems at scale
Ensures monitoring alerts and systems events are assessed, prioritized, and managed, and creates and maintain operational metrics
Drives continuous improvement of services and processes in order to increase platform stability and realize operational efficiencies
Participates in post incident reviews for client impacting incidents
Identifies post incident review action items and process improvement opportunities
Supports as needed Resiliency events (Disaster Recovery, Sustained Resiliency, etc.)
Automates routine tasks by scripting or by other programmatic means, and collaborates with technology and business partners to continuously identify proactive monitoring and health check opportunities
Ensures potential client impacting incidents are identified and remediated prior to client impact or remediated as soon as possible after issues arise
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Strong knowledge of Hadoop, Hive, HDFS, Cloudera, Impala
Strong application development experience or strong application support experience
Experience automating operational tasks with one or more of the following languages: Python, Linux shell scripting
Experience with relational databases (e.g. ORACLE, MY SQL)
Experience with application monitoring tools (Geneos, Dynatrace, or similar)
Experience with one or more of the following: Windows, Linux
Ability to work independently as a self-starter, and within a team environment
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent organizational and time management skills
Solid experience in documenting requirements and technical specifications
Unix (commands, scripting)
Education and experience requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or Information Technology
Minimum 3 years working in development or production support preferred
Knowledge of Information Technology Infrastructure Library (ITIL) production support best practices
Experience working in the financial industry and with core cash management systems is a plus
Understanding of Financial and Banking applications or related business experience is a plus"
"Frontend Engineer, - Autumn Venture - SC Ventures. ** #Immediate #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer - #Urgent #UrgentHire,"Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
"Senior Java Software Developer, - Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer. #Immediate #Urgent,"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer #JobsThatMatter#.',"Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
Loans Java Sr Developer #Immediate#.#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Software Engineer (Global Network), Global Payments #JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
The Global Payments team is building a platform to provide cross-border payment solutions for all our international product lines, such as TikTok, Helo, Games, Education, etc.
The Global Network team in Global Payments ensures a stable, professional and efficient overseas payment solution, helping businesses to unblock payment channels and effectively assisting overseas business and product expansion. This includes tasks such as building general service capabilities, payment instruction orchestration engine, etc.
Responsibilities:
Develop high-quality software design and architecture;
dentify, prioritise and execute tasks in the software development life cycle;
Develop tools and applications by producing clean, efficient code;
Automate tasks through appropriate tools and scripting;
Collaborate with internal teams and external vendors to fix and improve our products;
Document development phases and monitor systems;
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline, or equivalent practical experience;
Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages, such as Java/Go/C++/C#/Python;
Excellent proficiency in backend server development and expertise in relational database;
Strong analytical thinking and exceptional attention to details.
ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience.
We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Senior Full Stack Java Developer, Wholesale Payments Tech - Associate - #JPM #Urgent #Immediate'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The ideal candidate will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology group as a hands-on full stack developer passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree.
At least 8 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST web services.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS and/or Angular) and Microservice architecture.
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes) and distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Exposure in OAuth based authentication and API gateway
Exposure to Splunk and Elastic Search and Monitoring tools like Geneos
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism"
Finance Technology – Regulatory Reporting Software Engineer - Associate #JPM #Immediate #Seekbetter #Worknow,"Job Description:
The Finance Risk Data and Controls (FRDC) Technology organization is seeking strong engineer who wants to join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products in Regulatory Reporting Technology function.
The ideal candidate enjoys building, supporting, and the evolution of software applications, and has a strong understanding of designing and building applications in a variety of technologies as well as manage communication with stakeholders. In this role, a successful candidate will:
Manage and support a portfolio of production applications which includes vendor, in-house, on premise, and SaaS applications
Make sound architectural decisions around Regulatory Reporting application components
Identify gaps and weaknesses in existing applications and design and implement remediation of these gaps
Work to improve the stability of applications in the production environment
Ensure changes to the applications follow a disciplined change management processes including all documentation, reviews, and approval steps
Ensure adherence to design and coding standards
Define and execute test cases for quality of deliverables
Liaise with stakeholders from various teams which includes Finance, Corporate Controllers, Product Controllers within the region as well as global for all cycles (development, testing, implementation, post release)
Qualifications:
BS/BA Degree in Computer Science/Finance or equivalent
Application architecture analysis and design
3 years or more of experience in SQL, preferable in Oracle PL/SQL
2 years or more in Python or Java or equivalent development experience
Hands on experience in writing complex SQL queries and defining DB objects.
Good Knowledge on Stored Procedures/Packages, Functions and Triggers
Applicant must have strong English and Mandarin written to be able to communicate with clients and oral communication skills to effectively liaise with our stakeholders
Strong Unix and Shell scripting knowledge
Strong analytical & problem-solving skills
Familiar with Agile methodology
Able to work under pressure and tight timeline
Strong Excel knowledge
Windows OS
Source control tools, preferably Subversion"
Android Developer,"Job Description:
Support the entire application lifecycle (concept, design, test, release and support)
Produce fully functional mobile applications writing clean code
Gather specific requirements and suggest solutions
Write unit and UI tests to identify malfunctions
Troubleshoot and debug to optimize performance
Design interfaces to improve user experience
Liaise with Product development team to plan new features
Ensure new and legacy applications meet quality standards
Research and suggest new mobile products, applications and protocols
Stay up-to-date with new technology trends
Responsibilities:
Deliver across the entire software life cycle - concept, design, build, deploy, test, release and support advanced applications for web/mobile platform
Translate functional requirements from business users into sound technical designs that meet business objectives
Work on bug fixing and improving application performance
Provide subject matter expertise for development on mobile platform"
Senior Java Developer – Equity Systems #Worknow #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
More than 10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Experience working with high volume, high throughput, and low latency trading systems (e.g. equities or FX), or similar type of low latency platforms in Java
In-depth understanding of the challenges in developing high-throughput, low-latency trading systems while meeting the highest standards in resiliency and scalability.
Exposure to remediate low-latency solution challenges using practical software and hardware techniques
FIX, distributed systems, messaging middleware (Solace, Tibco etc.) and IPC (inter process communication)
Experience in implementing trading strategies and Order management system development.
Understanding of market data and exchange protocol
Hands on development experience in Java
Network programming is a plus – TCP, UDP, sockets, multicast
Working knowledge of Linux and/or Unix
Knowledge of Messaging, TCP/IP, UDP etc
Working knowledge of Database (Oracle/Sybase will be a plus)
Working knowledge of Python, Perl and shell scripting will be a plus
Knowledge of FIX protocol will be a plus
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"Vice President - Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting #Seekbetter #JPM","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Technical Lead, you play a key role in leading, designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
Bachelor degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Associate Director, Business Management Fundraising - 2704 - JT","Our client is actively searching for a Associate Director, Business Management (Fundraising) to join their team!
If you are a dynamic individual seeking a new career opportunity, read further!
The position will assume primary responsibility for the planning and development of fundraising strategies, as well as managing the progress, metrics and relationships that will lead to a successful comprehensive campaign for the University.
You will be a subject matter expert in university-wide campaign-related initiatives alongside senior staff leading the university's fundraising effort. You will engage with a multitude of key stakeholders, including senior management, deans, faculty, development teams.
A highly cross-functional role, the ideal candidate will possess a strategic, metrics-driven mindset, project management skills, curiosity, a can-do attitude, and a team-oriented approach.
The candidate will also oversee the project management of new donor markets and segments. He/she will also partake in campaign development across the University.
The responsibilities of this role are:Provide strategic support to the Development Office management team in the overall project management and advancement of institutional-wide fundraising campaigns.
Establish and monitor fundraising goals, strategies and performance measures, key milestones, and deliverables in project development to achieve desired outcomes.
Develop and generate strategic reports and presentations to the management, Senior Management, Board Members, and Faculty.
Establish and grow relationships with key partners and stakeholders, internally and externally, and cultivate support to drive business success.
Effectively communicate insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Inspire stakeholders to collaborate and pursue the University’s philanthropic goals. 
Organise meetings and engagements with internal stakeholders where necessary.
Manage and work with external consultants and vendors in driving the various stages of a campaign.
Identify and develop new donor segments, markets, and innovative ways of giving.
Support in prospect management and tracking of gift pipelines.
Develop compelling value propositions to advance the philanthropic needs of the University.
Develop and package compelling themes on new fundraising ideas, and create marketing and donor-centric assets.
Organize and manage development training workshops for capacity building in Deans, Faculty Champions and development staff across the University.
Support the management team, and undertake other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Perform duties that require significant confidentiality, tact, maturity, and independent judgement.
The ideal candidate will need to have the following qualities and experience:Tertiary level qualifications in Business/Marketing or equivalent.
At least 10 years’ progressive career track record.
Good and proven fundamental knowledge of Project Management.
Strong in quantitative, analytical and problem-solving skills and is process-driven.
Excellent skills in stakeholder management, relationship-building and communication, written and spoken.
High comfort level in managing organisational ambiguity and working on multiple projects simultaneously.
Ability to collaborate, drive motivation across diverse team members and manage difficult conversations.
Strategic forward-thinking approach to challenges with outstanding influencing, negotiating and persuasion skills.
Identifies the vision of the University and the mission of the office
Values philanthropy for higher education and is self-motivated to contribute to community building.
Resourceful and team-oriented with a positive “can-do” attitude.
Passionate, creative and diligent individual with good attention to detail and follow-through.
Strong customer service orientation.
Ability to work independently with minimal supervision.
Demonstrates discretion in preparing, disclosing and handling information of a confidential and sensitive nature.
An exciting career awaits the right candidate! Click ""Quick Apply"" to register your interest now.
All applicants' CV will be treated with the strictest confidentiality. We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted."
"Staff Software Engineer, Data, - Standard Chartered nexus..*' #Immediate #UrgentHire","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
"VP, Lead Java Software Developer, Liquidity Technology #Urgent #Worknow #UrgentHire'","Job Description
Our Global Liquidity Technology team is seeking a Lead Java Software Developer to join us on this journey. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform Liquidity management and treasury functions in the firm.
You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. Development will be predominantly done by building micro services with Java/ Springboot/ SQL and building UI with Angular/ HTML/ JavaScript and adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience in Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Junit, Mockito
Advanced experience in building cloud native microservice applications with Spring Boot and Spring Cloud
Advanced experience with one or more database technologies (e.g. Oracle)
Advanced experience in building REST APIs
Experience of working in Containerization technology and platform – Dockers, Kubernetes and good knowledge in DevOps practices.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Strong understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse).
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka"
"Sr. Java Software Engineer - Wealth Management - Associate, #UrgentHire #Immediate","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Key Responsibilities:
Review of epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts and turning those into technical designs and development
Utilize Agile methodology and adhere to coding standards, procedures and techniques while contributing to the technical code documentation
Provide high quality technology solutions that address business needs developing applications within mature technology environments
Design, develop, code, test, debug and document code, build, deploy, and support app environments
Review design and functional specification prepared by other team members
Coordinate with end users during User Acceptance Testing
Analyze and document problems, recommend solutions, and initiate corrective action
Support production rollouts of the functionality on-site by partnering closely with the Operate team
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering
5 years of Software Development experience
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Proficiency in multiple modern architectures based on micro services, REST APIs, and event-based architecture will be key.
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, Apache Flink etc.
Knowledge of CI/CD, DevOps tool chain, and a test-driven approach to agile delivery is expected.
Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Experience with JavaScript libraries (ReactJS, React-Redux, BackboneJS/ Angular)
Experience with full-stack Web application development, including REST Web services in Java 7/8, Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle or Sybase
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g., subversion, git), build automation (e.g., Maven), continuous integration (e.g., Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g., cucumber), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Self-motivated team player. Must possess the ability to research and resolve issues independently while working across teams to acquire needed information
Ability to organize/manage multiple priorities and projects coupled with the flexibility to adapt to changes in a fast-paced environment"
"Staff Software Engineer, - Data, - Standard Chartered nexus..*'. #JobsThatMatter","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
"Software Engineer, Analyst, Singapore #JPM #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #Urgent, #Immediate","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 1 year of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
Vice President - Digital Software Engineer Lead Analyst - #Urgent#. #WorkNow'.,"Responsibilities
Principal Duties and Responsibilities
Principal responsibilities for this role would include:
Be responsible for the team delivering various mobile initiatives/projects across APAC and EMEA regions for Citigroup Global Consumer Bank (GCB)
Man a team of highly motivated manrs, designers and developers drawn from our strategic partners and Citi staff based in multiple geographical locations
Demonstrated experience in managing multiple work streams and managing manr of manrs
Develop and implement best-in-class processes, metrics and practices
Responsible for driving technical design/architecture manment, product roadmaps with close interaction with Business Analysts, Subject matter experts, Cross Product Architecture and other Product Processors
Man partnership with business and external strategic vendors and ensure that the delivery is achieved within the defined quality and timeline
Ensure that the team is defining and implementing systems that are aligned with the organization strategy and goals
Man and track resources, review works to ensure high quality job to achieve customer satisfaction and service commitments
Train, assign work, provide Technical/Business advice and guidance to staff, provide regular performance feedback to staff for continuous improvement
Provide leadership, development opportunities, performance manment, development and succession-planning, staff communications, and positive interactive working environment to ensure the highest productivity and employee engment
Adhere to the Citigroup's compliance standards and ensure compliance for the applications supported
Qualifications:
Educational requirements :Bachelors of Engineering/Technology/Science in Computer Science or related field
Minimum of 11-15 of relevant experience preferably within an international technology organization in delivering complex projects
Demonstrated experience in Project Manment principles and software development lifecycle practices and methodology with hands-on knowledge of project manment practices, principles and tool sets
Strong functional knowledge in the banking domain. Understanding of the lending and credit services and functions is an added advant.
Deep understanding on the process and roles in Agile development, Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery
Prior Experience of Delivering high quality strategic large scale projects/releases
Experience running large scale application development teams
Ability to man senior staff, as well as man staff working remotely across multiple locations
Strong leadership, communication and organizational skills
Strong analytical, strategic thinking and communication skills - must have ability to synthesize, develop and present clear and concise recommendations
Excellent relationship manment skills
Demonstrated ability to work across organizational boundaries and geographies
Self-directed, motivated and mand; ability to deal with imperfect information, decision and drive to successful conclusions
Effective at prioritizing tasks, managing time, organizing people and getting things done
Excellent organization skills; must be able to man disparate tasks, project plans and ad-hoc teams without solid lines of authority
Ability to handle constant pressure and juggle multiple demands
Strong risk manment and ability to look beyond to the next set of challenges
Collaborative and team player, ensuring overall business success
Flexibility to travel
Good knowledge of Native mobile app development (using iOS Objective C or Swiftand Android -Java)
Good knowledge of Web Application Development, Hybrid mobile app development using Angular2/4/6, HTML5, Typescript, ES6, JQuery etc.
Experience in mobile app unit testing framework , methodologies and technical know-how on E2E testing
Digital application development manr would design, develop, implement and troubleshoot / certify mobile applications to meet our growing application needs. The person is also expected to lead a team of junior mobile developers, while being hands on with development. The ideal candidate must have strong Native and hybrid mobile-app development experience and familiar with test-driven development in a fast-paced agile environment. Experience in build, delivery and mobile architecture is also desired.
Development Value:
Opportunity to work with and learn from highly skilled and experienced global team members
Opportunity to work on challenging environment, technologies and banking technology space."
"Java Software Developer - Payment Technology, Associate #Worknow #UrgentHire#JobsThatMatter'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development, such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing Microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Java Software Developer - Payment Technology, Associate #Worknow #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development, such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing Microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
SCCM l MECM Engineer,"Ad-hoc baseline application packaging.
Generating the Weekly Report.
Logging JIRA ticket.
Logging Change Management request.
SCCM L1 application packaging.
Generating reports for all the application and coordinating with ServiceDesk.
Pre-pilot UAT testing.
3rd party application packaging. E.g. Google Chrome, Adobe Reader, Microsoft Edge and Mozila Firefox.
Lenovo Patch downloading drivers for the Lenovo models used by clients.
Monitoring compliance report for windows and office update.
Generating application detail report e.g. Java, MS office, etc.
Build OS report and monitoring deployment status.
Communicating with clients for vulnerability tracking with Jira request.
Closing SR request for staff notebook software. Coordinating meeting with users and helping software to install. Closing SR’s by prior.
Coordinating with users to get exe. or msi. files to do package and appropriate deployment groups details for software distribution ticket.
Monthly report submission."
AVP - Full-Stack Senior Java Developer - 21387732#. #UrgentHire #Worknow,"Job Description
We are looking for Java developers with experience in building high-performing, scalable, enterprise-grade applications.
Our ideal candidate should be passionate around solving business problems through innovation and best engineering practices. You will apply your knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner with our many stakehers to achieve common goals.
You'll work in a collaborative, respecting, trusting and diverse environment that encours creative thinking and critical problem solving that are best in class, to serve our clients globally.
Responsibilities
Write high quality and testable code following clean coding standards and SOLID design principles.
Create design, technical and project documentation.
Be a self-starter and plan/schedule own work for tasks and projects, implement functionality without direct supervision.
Perform profiling and troubleshooting of existing solutions.
Follow and understand defined software development process.
Communicate with clients and stakehers on a regular basis to clarify business requirements.
Participate in workshops and presentation of proposed solutions to clients and stakehers.
Assist team members with providing with technical solutions.
Perform code reviews and contribute to overall quality, maintainability and testability of software developed.
Work independently while in close collaboration with others in the team and across projects.
Coordinate deployment, test and release of applications developed.
Requirements
Advanced knowledge on Java 8, Core Java, ing
Good knowledge of Hibernate and Restful web services including its data interchange format/definition such as XML, JSON.
Understanding of code quality measurements using tools like Sonar and able to implement efficient Unit Tests.
Experienced in designing high quality solutions using OOP, TDD/BDD, Design Patterns and SOLID principles.
Experienced in distributed caching technologies like Apache Ignite or similar.
Experienced in relational database technologies e.g., Sybase, SQL Server.
Experienced with Agile development.
Ability to provide technical solutions from an architecture perspective.
Ability to provide realistic estimation on required effort and man to track and complete tasks in accordance to estimation.
Be self-managing and work without supervision.
Good communication skills.
Education
Bachelor or above in Computer Science, Software Engineering or related majors
Desirable
Full Stack Developer being able to build and maintain responsive and stylish user interface framework and web components with latest technology using Angular and NodeJS.
Experience in Equity trade capture and life cycle systems that support equity derivative products like options and swaps.
Experience in designing and building APIs, integrating with modern-web applications
Working experience in global environment where colleagues, stakehers and onsite client team locate in different locations, be able to cope with culture and time zone differences
Experience in mentoring juniors or less senior colleagues on the project(s)
Experience in conducting trainings or technical tech talks in the area of expertise"
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547). #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
 Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below:
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
Unity Game Developer / Programmer,"Full Job Description
Unity Game Developer
Location: Taiseng, Singapore.
The Unity Software Developer will create applications for target platforms such as mobile, VR, and Desktop applications.
Responsibilities
Collaborate with Project Manager throughout the project
Translate project requirements into engaging and user-friendly training simulation designs
Participate in project planning and estimate work effort estimates based on project requirements
Plan and implement programming functionalities according to agreed design
Troubleshoot and optimize code for the best possible performance, quality, and responsiveness of the training simulations
Maintain and make enhancements to existing code to fulfil new requirements
Implement, test, debug, and ensure integrity of all code
Provide technical documentation on projects created
Execute best practices and efficient workflows to ensure timely delivery of project milestones
Independently research on and prototype implementation of new features and/or technologies
Work with different departments and internal/external stakeholders to ensure smooth delivery
Qualifications & Work Experience
Minimum Diploma in Game Development, Computer Science, or related real-time interactive software
Minimum 2 years’ relevant experience
Skills
Technical skills include:
Proficient knowledge of Unity3D, including work experience with scripting, textures, UI, AR, VR, networking
Proficient in C# programming, and can write clean, readable, and easily maintainable and portable code
Proficient knowledge of Git versioning system
Good experience with game physics and particle systems
Good problem-solving and debugging skills, ability to use the debugger
Experience in editor plugin or shader coding
Experience in creating network solutions
Familiarity with unity material, lighting systems and render settings, with the capability to tune lighting and render settings for performant scenes
Familiarity with current design and architectural patterns
Familiarity with following would be advantageous but not required: eye tracking in VR, integration of external device API with Unity3D, AR, JavaScript
Generic skills include:
Curious, creative, and self-driven to research on best practices and new features that can value-add to projects
Able to work and problem solve independently when necessary
Adaptive and comfortable with changes in project requirements
Conscientious and committed to achieving high quality and finessed deliverables in the fastest possible time
High attention to detail
Collaborative
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental pay types:
Performance bonus"
Senior KDB Developer. #Immediate',"Overview of Citi:
Citi, the world leading global bank, has approximately 200 million customer accounts and a presence in more than 160 countries and jurisdictions worldwide. Citi provides consumers, corporations, governments and institutions with a broad range of financial products and services, including consumer banking and credit, corporate and investment banking, securities brokerage, transaction services, and wealth management. Citi enables clients to achieve their strategic financial objectives by providing them with cutting-edge ideas, best-in-class products and solutions, and unparalleled access to capital and liquidity.
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Implementation of Engineering/Architecture standards and programs
Project management of key components
Follow SDLC and Engineering standards
Utilize knowledge of applications development procedures and concepts, and basic knowledge of other technical areas to
identify and define necessary system enhancements, including using script tools and analyzing/interpreting code
Consult with users, clients, and other technology groups on issues, and recommend programming solutions, install, and support
Analyze applications to identify vulnerabilities and security issues, as well as conduct testing and debugging
Skills:
Experience within the technology or banking industry
Experience of developing or supporting q/KDB+ solutions
Experience of developing Java solutions is a plus.
Scripting (Shell)
Unix (preferably Linux)
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent work experience"
"Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting - Vice President #Seekbetter #Immediate #urgent","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
Loans Java Sr Developer - 22459837 #WorkNow,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Staff Software Engineer,. - Data, - Standard Chartered nexus","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556). #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
#Applications Senior Developer - [21388615]#.#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Supervisor is an intermediate manment level position responsible for providing full leadership and direction to a team of employees in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man an Applications Development team of professionals to accomplish establid goals and conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, training and development, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Recommend new work procedures to increase process efficiencies
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Develop and apply comprehensive knowledge of how own area integrates within apps development and other technical areas
Ensure the quality of tasks provided by self and others on team as well as influence decisions through advice or facilitating services that impact the team and closely related work teams
Act as backup to Applications Development Manr and serve as an advisor and coach to junior developers and analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakehers and /or other team members.
Ability to man teams.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
2-5 of relevant experience
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Ability to take ownership and make technical decisions on software development projects
Experience with dependency manment, change manment, continuous integration testing tools, and audit/compliance requirements
Extensive knowledge of software engineering and object-oriented design
Demonstrated leadership and manment skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"ICG Technology Software Development, 2023 Summer Analyst, Singapore #Urgent","You're the brains behind our work.
You’re ready to bring your knowledge from the classroom to the boardroom, and Citi wants to help you get there. Whether it’s honing your skills or building your network, we know that success can’t come without growth. Our programs equip you with the knowledge and training you need to play a valuable role on your team, and establish a long-term career here. At Citi, we value internal mobility, and career growth is not a question of if, but when.
Citi’s Institutional Clients Group (ICG) is looking for Summer Software Development Analysts to join the Technology team in Singapore. Our ICG Technologists support and enable the success of our trading businesses— and by utilizing a broad range of technologies, our team is at the forefront of innovation. We seek to drive our systems and processes toward scalable, low-latency, high-frequency enterprise systems to support Citi and our aggressive growth strategy.
Our Citi Singapore Technology team builds, owns and supports many front-end, middle-tier and back-office applications that are used on Citi trading floors around the world. Numerous applications handle millions of transactions per day and have billions of dollars in trade-flow. Many teams operate on a ""follow-the-sun"" model and are required to have their applications running 24/7.
Your time here will look something like this...
As a Software Development Analyst, you will work in an agile software development environment, developing quality and scalable software solutions using leading-edge technologies. Based on business requirements, you will develop code consistent with quality standards, and offer support during testing cycles and post-production deployment. To ensure defect-free programming, you will use the appropriate tools to test and debug code, and participate in the review of peer coding.
You will have the opportunity to focus on a variety of technologies, like the following:
Learn about best Enginering Excellance practices, Minimum Development Standards and Minimum Operational standards set and followed at CITI.
Opportunity to work on a small project/Proof of Concept using Core Java/C#/.Net with a SQL/No-SQL DB as backend(Oracle/MongoDB/Neo4J/Redis/HDFS/Cassandra) and React JS/Angular based front end.
Get basic understanding of latest design and software architecture patterns and frameworks - Microservices, APIs, Spring Core/MVC/Boot/Cloud, REST and so on.
Get basic understanding of event streaming/messaging systems using KAFKA or similar technology.
Understand CI/CD with exposure to various software development tools like : JIRA, Zephry, BitBucket, TeamCity, uDeploy, Artifactory, Openshift(ECS/Docker)
Exposure to Containers using Docker/Kubernetes
We provide you with the knowledge and skills you need to succeed.
We’re committed to teaching you the ropes. The Summer Analyst Program starts in early June with an in-depth education on the fundamentals of the Analyst role, as well as the nuances of Citi’s culture. The program also includes on the desk training, an informative speaker series as well as networking opportunities. Summer Analysts often return to Citi after graduating from University to become full-time Analysts and continue their career in technology.
We want to hear from you if...
You are in your penultimate year of university pursuing a degree in any discipline (graduating between Dec 2023 - June 2024); degrees in Computer Science; Information Systems; Computer Engineering; Business (technology focused); and other technology-focused degrees are preferred; but not required.
You are from a top academic institution and are on track to graduating with 2nd Upper Class honors (or equivalent)
Who we think will be a great fit...
A dedication to learning and a true passion for the business are vital.
As industries all over the globe continue to restructure and grow, we are hiring professionals who have a global perspective on the future of banking, and want to make an impact on the corporate level. We value diversity and so do you.
We’ll also be looking for the following:
Commitment to personal growth and career development, a strong desire to learn, and success in team environments
Desire to develop a deep understanding of the financial industry
Unquestioned commitment to integrity ethical decision-making
You are a good team player with a highly collaborative nature
Passionate about technology, with knowledge of any of the following being a plus
Ability to multi-task with sharp problem solving skills
Strong communicator, able to build relationships and rapport easily
Strong planning, and organizational skills
Adaptable and enjoy working in a fast-paced environment
Positive attitude and keen to learn.
Ability to work under time constraints
Unquestioned commitment to integrity ethical decision-making
We conduct assessment on a rolling basis, please submit application at your soonest convenience."
"Vice President, - Digital Software Engineer Lead Analyst | #WorkNow#.#Urgent'#Immediate","Responsibilities
Principal Duties and Responsibilities
Principal responsibilities for this role would include:
Be responsible for the team delivering various mobile initiatives/projects across APAC and EMEA regions for Citigroup Global Consumer Bank (GCB)
Man a team of highly motivated manrs, designers and developers drawn from our strategic partners and Citi staff based in multiple geographical locations
Demonstrated experience in managing multiple work streams and managing manr of manrs
Develop and implement best-in-class processes, metrics and practices
Responsible for driving technical design/architecture manment, product roadmaps with close interaction with Business Analysts, Subject matter experts, Cross Product Architecture and other Product Processors
Man partnership with business and external strategic vendors and ensure that the delivery is achieved within the defined quality and timeline
Ensure that the team is defining and implementing systems that are aligned with the organization strategy and goals
Man and track resources, review works to ensure high quality job to achieve customer satisfaction and service commitments
Train, assign work, provide Technical/Business advice and guidance to staff, provide regular performance feedback to staff for continuous improvement
Provide leadership, development opportunities, performance manment, development and succession-planning, staff communications, and positive interactive working environment to ensure the highest productivity and employee engment
Adhere to the Citigroup's compliance standards and ensure compliance for the applications supported
Qualifications:
Educational requirements :Bachelors of Engineering/Technology/Science in Computer Science or related field
Minimum of 11-15 of relevant experience preferably within an international technology organization in delivering complex projects
Demonstrated experience in Project Manment principles and software development lifecycle practices and methodology with hands-on knowledge of project manment practices, principles and tool sets
Strong functional knowledge in the banking domain. Understanding of the lending and credit services and functions is an added advant.
Deep understanding on the process and roles in Agile development, Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery
Prior Experience of Delivering high quality strategic large scale projects/releases
Experience running large scale application development teams
Ability to man senior staff, as well as man staff working remotely across multiple locations
Strong leadership, communication and organizational skills
Strong analytical, strategic thinking and communication skills - must have ability to synthesize, develop and present clear and concise recommendations
Excellent relationship manment skills
Demonstrated ability to work across organizational boundaries and geographies
Self-directed, motivated and mand; ability to deal with imperfect information, decision and drive to successful conclusions
Effective at prioritizing tasks, managing time, organizing people and getting things done
Excellent organization skills; must be able to man disparate tasks, project plans and ad-hoc teams without solid lines of authority
Ability to handle constant pressure and juggle multiple demands
Strong risk manment and ability to look beyond to the next set of challenges
Collaborative and team player, ensuring overall business success
Flexibility to travel
Good knowledge of Native mobile app development (using iOS Objective C or Swiftand Android -Java)
Good knowledge of Web Application Development, Hybrid mobile app development using Angular2/4/6, HTML5, Typescript, ES6, JQuery etc.
Experience in mobile app unit testing framework , methodologies and technical know-how on E2E testing
Digital application development manr would design, develop, implement and troubleshoot / certify mobile applications to meet our growing application needs. The person is also expected to lead a team of junior mobile developers, while being hands on with development. The ideal candidate must have strong Native and hybrid mobile-app development experience and familiar with test-driven development in a fast-paced agile environment. Experience in build, delivery and mobile architecture is also desired.
Development Value:
Opportunity to work with and learn from highly skilled and experienced global team members
Opportunity to work on challenging environment, technologies and banking technology space."
Application Developer - Real Time Payments (L3) #WorkNow #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire',"As an experienced professional in Software Engineering, you'll shape the technology solutions that drive Level 3 support and development initiatives across the region, Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll interact with colleagues in various lines of businesses to learn about challenges and opportunities, and translate that insight into high-quality solutions. In addition to working with the development team to create new solutions, you'll help optimize existing technology and identify new capabilities to ensure the applications run smoothly. While your role requires deep technological skills it also hinges on teamwork and leadership. You'll offer clear guidance and feedback to your Software Engineer colleagues, while promoting the values, culture, and brand of JPMorgan Chase & Co
Primary Responsibilities
Lead the Level 3 team during the US hours as well as support the EMEA and APAC evening during US hours
Drive the bug fixes and small enhancements
Drive the audit, hygine of the application and production deployments
Drive incident reviews with relevant stakeholders, ensure the action items are tracked to closure
Provide leadership within the support team and influence stakeholders in line with the our product and future strategy
Document the client requirements, changes in market behaviors and drive that through the core team for product enhancements
Manage the documentation review and approval process with the stakeholders
Take ownership of the bug fixes and small enhancement and associated artefacts
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the production management, project and product teams
Provide guidance and support to team members
Prepare and deliver training sessions to the business users and production management
Experience and Skills Required
You'll also play a crucial role in identifying, improving, and developing technology solutions that drive our strategic goals. This is a tremendous opportunity to learn about high-priority initiatives and collaborate with colleagues throughout the firm. Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills. No matter where your career ultimately takes you, you'll make a meaningful impact and lasting connections with outstanding colleagues and mentors.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors degree in Engineering, computer sciences or equivalent. with minimum of 1 year in BFSI industry. Exposure to core banking, payments is a must have skill
Experience working on major global transformation initiatives, for example SWIFT GPI, ISO 20022, Real Time Payments etc
Proficiency in business applications, data usage, and management
Ability to liaison between lines of business and the development team, while working with a wide range of stakeholders and collaborating with your team
Ability to work collaboratively in teams and develop meaningful relationships to achieve common goals
Experience obtaining requirements from business users and subject matter experts, reviewing business priorities, and/or analyzing options & risks
Ability to code in Java, Oracle, Microservices based architecture with experience in distributed cache and cloud computing
Experience in articulating functional system requirements specifications
Should be Detail-oriented, strong analytical and communication skills are a must
Ability to synthesize large amounts of information, and a curiosity to ask appropriate questions to fully develop business and functional requirements.
Pro-actively lead/participate in design/solution architecting of target state
Ability to interface directly with Senior Business Stakeholders and users with a view to influence and drive consensus.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Participate in creation of detailed functional specifications with AS-IS process flows and target state processes
Provide technical support throughout the project lifecycle, from requirements/functional specs to reviewing SIT and UAT test cases, and supporting all the testing phases.
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
"Senior Software Engineer, - DevOps –Standard Chartered nexus - (2200019763).* #JobsThatMatter","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
Applications Senior Developer - [21388615] #Immediate##Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Supervisor is an intermediate manment level position responsible for providing full leadership and direction to a team of employees in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man an Applications Development team of professionals to accomplish establid goals and conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, training and development, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Recommend new work procedures to increase process efficiencies
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Develop and apply comprehensive knowledge of how own area integrates within apps development and other technical areas
Ensure the quality of tasks provided by self and others on team as well as influence decisions through advice or facilitating services that impact the team and closely related work teams
Act as backup to Applications Development Manr and serve as an advisor and coach to junior developers and analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakehers and /or other team members.
Ability to man teams.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
2-5 of relevant experience
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Ability to take ownership and make technical decisions on software development projects
Experience with dependency manment, change manment, continuous integration testing tools, and audit/compliance requirements
Extensive knowledge of software engineering and object-oriented design
Demonstrated leadership and manment skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
URGENT!!! Software Engineer / System Analyst (C# / VB.Net / Asp.Net),"5 Days / Permanent Job Opportunity
Great remuneration and benefits
Responsibilities:
To perform system development for in-house web-based applications
To handle requirements gathering, estimation, design, coding, testing and preparation for deployment
To assist users in day-to-day helpdesk support
To prepare an appropriate amount of documentation for each stage of development
Any other IT project as assigned.
Requirements:
Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Engineering or other related fields
Familiarity with the following programming languages/tools:
Classic ASP & VBScript
JavaScript / JQuery
CSS
ASP.NET MVC, VB.NET, C#
MS SQL, Visual Studio
HTML5
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please send your latest resume to ref19(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
 Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Lim Dick Sern (Dick Sern)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22106832"
"Technical Lead, - (2200017771). #Urgent#Seekbetter #Worknow #JobsThatMatter","The Role Responsibilities
Focus on developing and delivering the technology roadmap for product
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive the technology strategy implementation within the team on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Stakeholders
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks and obsolescence so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Our Ideal Candidate
13 Years of experience in application development using Java and Advance Technologies tool.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles and coding standards.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology, plus adherence to VX principles
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Able to identify and drive compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Good experience in setting up and managing the delivery team in various location
Very good presentation and documentation skills.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, that also includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching etc.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Understanding of deploying microservices/API, cloud solutions and experience in integrating public cloud into traditional hosting/delivery models with a specific focus on AWS
Understanding and experience on core Java (Java 8 or higher), core Spring frameworks and experience in using design patterns
Understanding and experience on React, Redux, JavaScript MVC patterns / frameworks and CSS strategies
Understanding and experience on developing cloud native microservices using frameworks such as Spring boot, Spring cloud
Understanding and experience in working on Relation and non-Relation DBs (Progress, Oracle, Cassandra, MongoDB)
Understanding and knowledge on Implementing automated testing platforms, unit tests, and CICD
Understanding and knowledge on code versioning tools, such as Git, Bitbucket
Understanding of container platform, such as Docker and Kubernetes, in particular similar offerings by cloud providers such as AWS
Familiar and working experience with Ansible, Jenkins, Terraform
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, -SC Ventures.* #JobsThatMatter","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Lead Development, - (2200017551) - #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
The Developer will be responsible for managing and delivering any requirements specific to Channel Security Platform. The person who understands the priorities, manages the deliverables.
The Developer should work with to Channel Security Platform Technology Manager to provide the following operations on daily basis.
Work closely with Project team to ensure the required testing gets on time, with good communicating skills within team and with stake holders.
Knowledge in databases, data structures and collections and good understanding in environments, build, packaging and deployment.
Provide Support to Project team to address the non-productions issues which gets reported as an when the issue gets reported
Manage and participate in Daily Scrum calls and update the project status to Stake Holders and Scrum Master
Strong analytical skills with the ability to deep dive to drive solutions
Proven ability to take a step back and look at the macro view to connect the dots between requirements
Proven ability to perform under high pressure in a dynamic environment
Ability to work with cross functional teams across business and technology
Our Ideal Candidate
9 years of experience in Developement, Testing and automation practices in JAVA, Spring framework, Spring Boot, Hibernate, HikariCP, Oracle/Postgres/DB2 DB, Rest API with JSON,JMS,API Gateway
Knowledge on cryptography concepts(Asymmetric/symmetric cryptography, SSL/TLS handshake, key management in keystore/HSM)
knowledge in CICD integration and hands-on in devops tools (Bitbucket, Jenkins, SonarQube, Artifactory, etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Strong Development Experience in JAVA, Spring framework, Spring Boot, Hibernate, HikariCP, Oracle/Postgres/DB2 DB, Rest API with JSON,JMS,API Gateway
Must have some knowledge on cryptography concepts(Asymmetric/symmetric cryptography, SSL/TLS handshake, key management in keystore/HSM)
Experience in End to End DevOps pipeline Skills preferably with Openshift and Kubernetes and Experience with CI/CD and their pipelines
Expertise with container-based platforms (Docker, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Jenkins).
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Software Engineer - Java, ICG Innovation Lab AVP(Hybrid) #Seekbetter","Responsibilities
The Singapore Innovation Lab is focused on building the corporate banking of the future for Citi’s ICG clients with disruptive and emerging technologies such as AI, Blockchain, and IoT. This job opening is for a java developer who understand and works in full technology stack and has prior experience in driving technology products and solutions at scale using java by applying Agile practices along with Enterprise Architecture knowledge. The individual should also be hands-on with Full Stack application development.
Responsibilities
Write java applications end to end.
Create robust high-volume production applications.
Design, Develop & Prototype java applications for internal and external use.
Participate in full app life cycle: concept, design, build, deploy, test and release to app store.
Work with product teams on new product ideas, designs, prototypes, and estimates.
Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, a related field, or equivalent practical experience.
8 years of relevant work experience in software development.
Programming experience in Java.
Preferred qualifications:
Experience in computer science, data structures, algorithms, and software design.
Strong technical background – able to come up to speed and understand differing technologies quickly
Must be familiar with any of the source code repository like SVN TFS, and Git.
Must be familiar with one of the below JavaScript DOM (manipulation) frameworks such as Angular, React.
Must be familiar with DevOps process and tools required."
"Cloud Software Engineer, Principal Engineer. #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate'","Job Description
As an experienced member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Cloud computing allows the Athena platform to modernize the infrastructure, pursue next-generation innovation and reduce the compute footprint. To continue on this transformation, we are seeking an experienced software engineer with expertise in the strategy, design, development and implementation of large-scale distributed systems.
Athena is a cross-asset platform transforming technology at JP Morgan. It delivers innovative and efficient applications to a wide range of the firm’s businesses, including sales, trading, operations, risk and research. Athena combined the best of open source technologies with innovative components developed internally, which gives you the ability to contribute to a wide range of exciting projects. Our developers enjoy working with front office, quants and other technology teams. Our modernization strategy for Athena is to re-engineer parts of the runtime, infrastructure and applications platform to take advantage of elastic compute and “as a service” offerings from internal and external cloud providers.
The people who thrive in Athena are hands-on developers who enjoy solving challenging technical problems. You’re someone who has strong computer science foundations and is comfortable working across different platforms and languages. You’re inspired by working in a collaborative, fast-changing environment with a high degree of code sharing and reuse.
If this sounds like you, then Athena could be the perfect place to grow your career.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of experience
Experience in distributed systems
Proficiency in modern programming languages
Experience in cloud based services, Database technologies, Functional/Reactive Programming
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 #Immediate #WorkNow',"The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer, - Vice President #JPM #UrgentHire #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer - Vice President #JPM #UrgentHire #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire,"Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
"Senior Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Java Developer (Mobile and Web Application),"Responsibilities:
Develop and demonstrate a broad set of technology skills in Android application technologies.
Design and develop front-end and back-end mobile application
Application enhancements (changed requirements).
Application implementation (testing, documentation, training).
Application support and maintenance (troubleshooting, defect fixing, upgrades) including Mobile App.
Develop Web/Mobile based application projects.
New technology exploration and conduct proof-of-concept.
Prepare user guide and conduct user training. optimization.
Requirements:
Minimum Diploma or Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent preferred
Good working knowledge in at least either Java/J2EE, .Net and/or mobile Technologies
Extensive experience with Android SDK, Android Studio and modern Developer Tools
Strong Java development experience with an impressive Android project (or several!) in the app store
Good understanding of development methodologies, testing practices, and tools and knowing when to apply each method to achieve the desired outcomes
Experience in mobile application design as well as Java frameworks and development
Interested candidates please click on APPLY button.
EA License No: 13C6305
Reg. No.: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 - #Worknow #Urgent#',"The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Software Engineer (Service Stability) - Cloud Infrastructure,"Software Engineer (Service Stability) - Cloud Infrastructure
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The service stability team aims to improve the availablity of online systems and is responsible for building industry-leading stability related platforms. Our work includes but is not limited to: research and development of infrastructure, chaos engineering, online inspection and incident management. We support the rapid growth of TikTok and its affiliates under a globalized structure.
Responsibilities
Evolve fail-over capability of core applications and build industry-leading stability related platforms;
Design and develop a unified fault simulation layer that covers cloud infrastructure, middleware and application.
Carry out chaos engineering along with business teams and summarize best practice that works for mass users.
Build and evolve the standard process for incident response to minimize MTTR (mean time to recovery)
Design and develop measurement of hidden peril in production and take regular inspections
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field;
Proficiency with at least one programming language such as Go/Python/Java, good coding ability and style, familiar with concurrent programming is a plus;
Familiar with design/development of microservice architecture, experience with distributed systems, middleware and PaaS is a plus;
Familiar with cloud native stack such as Kubernetes, Container, Service Mesh, VPC etc. Experience with multi-datacenter and multi-region systems is a plus;
Strong sense of responsibility and initiative, excellent problem solving, communication, and teamwork skills."
2022 Software Engineer Program - Full Time Analyst - (Singapore) #JPM #Immediate#Urgent',"Be a part of a dynamic and diverse team that engineers large-scale, complex and resilient technology solutions that drive our global business. You'll help build and optimize digital applications and systems that support millions of customers, clients and employees worldwide.
 When you work at JPMorgan Chase, you're not just working at a global financial institution. You're an integral part of one of the world's biggest tech companies. In 16 strategic technology locations worldwide, our team of more than 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning and cloud development. As a firm, we're partnering with FinTech and Silicon Valley tech firms to deliver cutting-edge solutions to our clients and customers. Our $10.8 billion annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that will not only transform the financial services industry, but also change the world. 
WHAT YOU CAN EXPECT
Launching your career in our Software Engineer Program means you will:
Start with an in-depth induction program that teaches you about our businesses, builds on your knowledge of development methodologies, and sharpens your professional skills.
Dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that make a difference for our customers, clients and employees.
Create and improve the design, analytics, coding and testing for high-quality software and new products.
Own projects end-to-end, keeping teams and stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what's being developed.
Work and share ideas, information and innovation with our team of technologists from all over the world.
Develop through on-going training, mentorship and access to senior leaders.
Participate in our agile Force for Good teams to develop real-world technology solutions for non-profit organizations through a series of ""side"" projects over several months.
Join an inspiring and curious team of technologists who will support you in developing new skills, experiencing new projects and businesses, and taking your career where you want to go.
ABOUT YOU
If you're ready to put your passion for technology to work in a way that makes a real difference, you'll find your place in our Software Engineer Program.
Key skills include:
Computer Science and/or Engineering majors are preferred, while other majors may be considered
Pursuing a degree qualification with solid academic background
Relevant internship experience and leadership in school or community organization
Foundational knowledge of programming languages (e.g., Python, Javascript, Java, C++, C#), databases, data structures, and algorithms
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, collaborative environment
Exceptional problem solving ability
Relocation assistance for flight and accommodation will not be provided
Application Dateline:
October 31, 2021 (23:59 SGT)
JOIN US
At JPMorgan Chase, we are creating positive change for the diverse communities we serve. We do this by championing your innovative ideas through a supportive culture that helps you every step of the way as you build your career. If you are passionate, curious and ready to make an impact, we are looking for you.
What’s next?
Help us learn about you by submitting a complete and thoughtful application, which includes your resume. Your application and resume is a way for us to initially get to know you, so it’s important to complete all relevant application questions so we have as much information about you as possible. 
To start the application, you will be prompted to enter your email address.  Your email address will be used to create and maintain your profile so make sure it is one you will have long term access to.  Do not use an email address with “.edu” extension as doing so could result in delays receiving updates regarding your candidacy.
After you confirm your application, we will review it to determine whether you meet certain required qualifications. 
If you are advanced to the next step of the process, you’ll receive an email invitation to complete a series of 12 games through the pymetrics platform. pymetrics will allow you to showcase your potential beyond what you tell us in your resume and application form. It’s an additional data point that helps us gain a better understanding of who you are as an individual. It should take no longer than 25-35 minutes to complete. If you have already completed the pymetrics games, you will have the opportunity to submit your gameplay results for this specific application without having to replay the games.
Following completion of pymetrics, you’ll receive another email invitation to complete a video interview, powered by HireVue. This is your opportunity to further bring your resume to life and showcase your experience for our recruiting team and hiring managers.
Both pymetrics and HireVue are required, and your application will not be considered for further review until you have completed them. We strongly encourage that you apply and complete these required elements as soon as possible, since programs will close as positions are filled. 
JPMorgan Chase is committed to creating an inclusive work environment that respects all people for their unique skills, backgrounds and professional experiences. We strive to hire qualified, diverse candidates, and we will provide reasonable accommodations for known disabilities.
Reasonable Adjustments
J.P. Morgan is an inclusive employer of choice. If you require any adjustments to enable you to perform the essential functions of your job, please do not hesitate to contact your recruiter. If you would prefer to discuss this confidentially, please contact your respective recruiter.
©2021 JPMorgan Chase & Co. JPMorgan Chase is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer Disability/Veteran"
"Software Engineer (Pega Developer), Associate, Singapore. #WorkNow","Job Description
The Cyber security organization’s objective is to ensure that JPMC is able to effectively detect, prevent, and respond to cyber threats against our technology infrastructure. The scope of Cyber security comprises detection and monitoring of threats and vulnerabilities, managing security incidents, and evolving our preventive infrastructure to keep ahead of the threat. We accomplish this through strong information security leadership and active collaboration with line of business information risk managers to provide high quality security solutions and services that are focused on improving the Firm's risk posture.
Specific responsibilities will include:
Analyze, design, develop, debug, test, document, deploy and provide production support applications using primary skills in Java, J2EE, Pega PRPC (Pega Rules Process Commander), and BPM, Oracle.
Work with product owner and Cyber security operations on agreeing on refining business requirements and acceptance criteria.
Understand business workflow requirements from Cyber Operations team/Business Analysts and implement those requirements in Java/J2EE and Pega Rules Process Commander platform as part of a distributed agile team.
Implement test-driven development, Continuous Deployment and Continuous Integration practices and adhere to JPMC software development process. 
Assist team in supporting the application in QA and production environments    
Identify opportunities for process and tool improvements; drive them from concept to design to implementation
Keep abreast with the latest development practices and road map of Pega
Interact with business and cross block teams, identifying application impacts, interface design and technical specification design documentation 
Project scoping, release management, build planning, technical documentation and status reporting  
Lead the project team, technical training and mentoring for implementation of solutions and roll outs  
Ensure all quality standards are followed for the deliverables through code metrics checks, code reviews, unit and regression testing. Support quality assurance, performance and business user acceptance testing phases
Lead the team on Tech Refresh initiatives to revamp the underlying technology and application infrastructure to make it compliant with enterprise wide controls and policies.
Qualification
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of hands-on experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture    
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems  
Working proficiency in developmental tool-sets 
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices 
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational  goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture 
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages: Java/J2EE, Object Oriented
Proficiency in UI frameworks such as Java Script, React/Angular
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement    
Oracle SQL experience
Proven hands-on application development experience in large enterprise  class environment
Excellent understanding of integration with third party APIs (Web services, JSON, REST, XML etc.)
Proficiency in cloud and devops implementation
Good understanding on database design and query optimization
Experience with progressive development practices and tools (e.g. unit testing, static code analysis, continuous integration, etc.)
Strong interpersonal and communication skills; capable of writing documentation, training users in complex topics
Ability to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment while remaining productive and professional; exercise patience and ability to multi task  
Agile experience"
Web Developer | IT Engineer (Up to $5000 +AWS & VB),"Job Scope
Develop websites using PHP, ASP.Net, HTML and CSS
Develop and maintain software using C#
Develop and maintain excel macro using VB Script
Support and implement new EDI solutions and applications. Develop and maintain EDI integration using XML
Support and maintain e-commerce online web applications. Develop and implement a usability testing process to ensure that new applications meet requirements.
Analyze user requirements, write and test code, refining and rewriting it as necessary. Manage the software development lifecycle and integrate existing software in different platforms to work together
Support Microsoft Dynamic Navision ERP (or other ERP) system using C/AL and produce Jet Reports
Requirement
Proficient in software design and programming.
Good knowledge of web design and development, and programming languages.
Familiar with MS office applications (2007, 2010, 2013, Office 365)
Familiar with MS Windows (X Pro, 7 Pro, 10 Pro)
Regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted by our consultants.
Align Recruitment Pte Ltd (20C0253)
Tan Soon Heng (Reg No. R1108992)"
#Java Application Developer (Officer - Hybrid) - [21388615]#.#JobsThatMatter',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Supervisor is an intermediate manment level position responsible for providing full leadership and direction to a team of employees in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man an Applications Development team of professionals to accomplish establid goals and conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, training and development, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Recommend new work procedures to increase process efficiencies
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Develop and apply comprehensive knowledge of how own area integrates within apps development and other technical areas
Ensure the quality of tasks provided by self and others on team as well as influence decisions through advice or facilitating services that impact the team and closely related work teams
Act as backup to Applications Development Manr and serve as an advisor and coach to junior developers and analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakehers and /or other team members.
Ability to man teams.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
2-5 of relevant experience
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Ability to take ownership and make technical decisions on software development projects
Experience with dependency manment, change manment, continuous integration testing tools, and audit/compliance requirements
Extensive knowledge of software engineering and object-oriented design
Demonstrated leadership and manment skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
AVP - Apps Dev Programmer Senior Analyst (Openlink Endur)##UrgentHire #Immediate,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower-level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Has the ability to involve in Openlink endur development in Java/JVS/OC
Qualifications:
8+ years of relevant experience in Openlink development
Hands on Core Java / Java 8, JVS, OpenComponent / OC, design knowledge
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Frontend Software Engineer - TikTok e-Commerce*#.#Immediate,"Responsibilities
The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.
You will:
Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications for e-Commerce products.
Code optimisation to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications.
Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.
Experience in designing, analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
Experience in frontend engineering experience, with demonstrable experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility.
Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process.
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
Frontend Developer / CardsPal Venture - SC Ventures.* #Urgent. #JobsThatMatter,"About CardsPal by Standard Chartered
At CardsPal, we help you optimise your spending and maximise your savings.
We are an all-in-1 credit card comparison app in Singapore that shows you how to make the most of your cards to get the maximum benefits.
Personalise your money-saving experience based on the credit cards you own. We recommend you the best cards to use to earn the most cashback and rewards across multiple spending categories.
Role Summary
CardsPal is looking for a full stack developer to be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
The Role Responsibilities
The successful candidate will be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
Participating in an exciting venture and be part of the team to develop the platform.
Collaborate closely with product designers with a focus on new feature design.
Be involved in the user experience design process, from wireframes and mockups through implementation and release.
Work closely with designers and product owner to define and implement elegant solutions to interesting problems.
Working closely with the design team to create a reusable component library.
Fast prototyping of new user interactions and iteration based on feedback from peers.
Provide post production tech support.
Hands-on experience with Android and iOS mobile Apps built on React Native, with occasional troubleshooting on cloud backend.
Technical Competencies
3+ years of solid experience in front-end development, with strong interest in backend technologies.
Fluent with HTML / CSS / Javascript.
Worked with Frontend Frameworks like React, Angular or Vue.
Strong software engineering and solution design experience is beneficial. 
Had experience working with React Native.
Experience with cloud technologies like AWS is a bonus
Experience collaborating on software projects with design and backend aspects
Experience working in agile project team.
Work in an iterative approach, driven by customer feedback and data insights.
Our Ideal Candidate
You deeply care about providing a great user experience to our users.
A keen learner with an ambitious and results driven personality, who loves to share with other engineers.
Pro-active and self starter who can work independently.
Work well as part of a team in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent communication, organisational and documentation skills."
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556). *..#WorkNow","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting - Vice President - #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter, #UrgentHire'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Backend Software Engineer, Machine Learning Systems #JobsThatMatter*","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Join the Dynamic Team!
As part of the machine learning system team, you will build up the advanced system, combining high performance compute, networking, and storage into the powerful computing cluster. Our mission is to provide ML system and platform to help the research scientists and engineers improve our products and experiences.
Develop and maintain the machine learning system and platform, including training, inference, pipeline orchestration, to support core products;
Build the large scale systems for ML integrating with GPU, RDMA network and storage system;
Enrich the end to end machine learning experience, and provide machine learning resources for all the products of TikTok and its affiliates.
Qualifications
To be successful in this role, you have
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, Engineering or related fields.
Programming experience with at least one modern language such as C/C++, Golang, Python
Experience contributing to the large scale distributed systems, multi-tenant systems (architecture, reliability and scaling)
Experience contributing to Kubernetes / Kubeflow / YARN / Mesos orchestrations
Strong analytical abilities and problem solving
Good communication, self-motivation, engineering practice, documentation, etc."
Software Engineer,"Software Engineer Job Description
We are looking for a motivated Software Engineer to join our EV Charging Technology team in Singapore. You will join the team in a market that is slated for aggressive expansion and get to be part of a dynamic team set to grow greatly over the years to come. You will get to work on cutting edge technological solutions that will empower the growth of the EV market.
Your role will primarily revolve around developing and enhancing software solutions, as well as interfacing with external systems to solve real-world problems. You will also be involved in directing system testing and validation procedures, and also working with customers or departments on technical issues including software system design and maintenance.
To be successful in this role, you will need extensive knowledge of programming languages and the software development life-cycle. A bachelor's degree in computer science or related degree is required.
Responsibilities:
·        Modifying software to fix errors, adapt it to new hardware, improve its performance, or upgrade interfaces.
·        Testing and integration with external software systems through the use of APIs and SDKs.
·        Directing system testing and validation procedures.
·        Directing software programming and documentation development.
·        Consulting with departments or customers on project status and proposals.
·        Analyzing information to recommend and plan the installation of new systems or modifications of an existing system.
·        Consulting with engineering staff to evaluate software hardware interfaces and develop specifications and performance requirements.
·        Designing and developing software systems using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcomes and design consequences.
·        Preparing reports on programming project specifications, activities, or status.
Requirements:
·        Bachelor's degree in computer science or related degree.
·        Knowledge of the software development life-cycle.
·        Must be a full-stack developer and understand concepts of software engineering.
·        The desire to work in a fast-paced environment.
·        Ability to develop unit testing of code components or complete applications.
·        Experience working on a variety of software development projects.
·        Working experience in at least 2 programming languages.
·        Critical thinking & creative solutions
·        Willing to perform on-site troubleshooting
·        DevOps know-how & Azure working knowledge will be an advantage.
·        Creativity is always a plus."
SPECIALIST- SOFTWARE ENGINEERING,"Roles & Responsibilities
Must to have: Oracle Certified Professional - Java SE 8 Programmer or Oracle Certified Professional - Java SE 11 Developer or AWS Certified Developer - Associate or Microsoft - Azure Developer Associate
• At least 2 years of software development experience.
• Strong knowledge on Java 8, Core Java, Spring, Hibernate and restful web services including its data interchange format/definition such as XML, JSON.
• Strong experience in distributed caching technologies like Apache Ignite or similar.
• Familiar with different persistent storage technologies such as RDMS (Sybase, SQL Server or Oracle) and NoSQL.
• Solid experience working with source code management tools – Git or Bitbucket.
• Good understanding of clean coding principles and SOLID design principles.
• Good understanding of code quality measurements using tools like Sonar and able to implement design and implement unit, integration, and functional tests.
• Must demonstrate strong familiarity of design patterns.
• Good written and verbal communication skills.
• A team-player who is comfortable working in a team that deals with ambiguity and problem solving"
Lead Developer - *#Urgent'.,"Role Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain code that meets requirements, is high quality, efficient, reusable and performs efficiently and effectively to provide a great customer experience.
Incorporate standards and best practices, including performance, security, scalability, testability and maintainability.
Candidates will be responsible for automating parts of the development process in a way that tightens the development feedback loop. They should also be able to identify opportunities for automation during the development process.
Participate in code reviews to spot issues around architecture, performance, security, and more.
Translate application storyboards and use cases into functional applications.
Help maintain code quality, organization, and automatization.
Contribute to design patterns and coding standards while being mentored.
Troubleshooting interface software and debugging application codes.
Designing and implementing microservices for various functionalities and service interfaces.
Designing and implementing front-end architecture to support user interface concepts and experience in Micro Frontend.
Experience with design, development and deployment of Cloud First / Cloud Native applications and services.
Hands on experience in CI / CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Monitoring and improving application performance – Grafana, Prometheus, App Dynamics.
Documenting application changes and developing updates.
Use continuous delivery to ship incremental improvements many times per month.
Business
Manage business partner expectations. Ensure delivery to business meeting time, cost, budget and with high quality.
Drive an ecosystem of innovation and enabling business through technology.
Processes
Responsible for business initiatives delivery aligning to SCB defined technology, Agile principles and project management processes and frameworks.
Support Transformation agenda, Business Operating Models, Standards, Finance, Risk Controls and compliance with regulations.
Inculcate the Group’s values and code of conduct in the CCIB Technology Team to ensure adherence to the highest standards of ethics and compliance to relevant policies and processes.
Ensure compliance to the highest standards of business conduct, regulatory requirements and practices defined by internal and external requirements. This includes compliance with local banking laws and anti-money laundering stipulations.
People and Talent
Employ, engage and retain high quality talent to ensure CCIB Client Onboarding T&I is adequately staffed and skilled to deliver on business commitments. 
Lead through example and build appropriate culture and values. Set appropriate tone and expectations for the team and work in collaboration with risk and control partners.
Foster a culture of innovation, transparency and accountability in CCIB Client Onboarding T&I while promoting a “client-first” mentality at all levels.
Ensure role, job descriptions and expectations are clearly set, and periodic feedback provided to the entire team.
Develop and maintain a plan that provides for succession and continuity in the most critical IT management positions.
Risk Management
Identifying and owning architectural, technical and deployment risk, escalating to Product Managers and service owners (as appropriate) with strategies to mitigate that risk.
Be proactive in ensuring regular assurance that the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I Team is performing to acceptable risk levels and control standards.
Act quickly and decisively when any risk and control weakness become apparent and ensure those are addressed within quick / prescribed timeframes and escalated through the relevant committees.
Balance business delivery on time, quality and cost constraints with risks and controls to ensure that they do not materially threaten the Group’s ability to remain within acceptable risk levels.
Ensure business continuity and disaster recovery planning for the entire technology portfolio.
Governance
Responsible to deliver in accordance to T&I policies and ensure governance of the team’s adherence to the same.
Adheres to all governance controls.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Client Onboarding Portal Product Owners and Country IMO.
Tech Architecture Forum, Information & Cyber Security Forum
Global Technology Services Heads (Production Support, Infrastructure, etc)
Interface teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / Engineering or a related discipline, graduate degree preferred.
Lead Developer with 10 years’ experience.
AWS Certified Solutions Architect Associate will be an added advantage.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Proficient in Java 8+ (preferably 11+) with a good knowledge of its ecosystems.
Understanding of Object Orient Programming and Functional Programming paradigms.
Proficient MicroService based architecture and implementation of MicroServices in OCP and AWS platform.
Good knowledge of JavaScript, ReactJS and technologies around it.
Micro Frontend.
Cloud First Cloud Native, AWS.
CI/CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Understanding of code security and code quality.
IT Governance.
IT Systems Management.
Application Monitoring
Grafana, Prometheus, AppDynamics"
Lead Developer - *#Urgent,"Role Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain code that meets requirements, is high quality, efficient, reusable and performs efficiently and effectively to provide a great customer experience.
Incorporate standards and best practices, including performance, security, scalability, testability and maintainability.
Candidates will be responsible for automating parts of the development process in a way that tightens the development feedback loop. They should also be able to identify opportunities for automation during the development process.
Participate in code reviews to spot issues around architecture, performance, security, and more.
Translate application storyboards and use cases into functional applications.
Help maintain code quality, organization, and automatization.
Contribute to design patterns and coding standards while being mentored.
Troubleshooting interface software and debugging application codes.
Designing and implementing microservices for various functionalities and service interfaces.
Designing and implementing front-end architecture to support user interface concepts and experience in Micro Frontend.
Experience with design, development and deployment of Cloud First / Cloud Native applications and services.
Hands on experience in CI / CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Monitoring and improving application performance – Grafana, Prometheus, App Dynamics.
Documenting application changes and developing updates.
Use continuous delivery to ship incremental improvements many times per month.
Business
Manage business partner expectations. Ensure delivery to business meeting time, cost, budget and with high quality.
Drive an ecosystem of innovation and enabling business through technology.
Processes
Responsible for business initiatives delivery aligning to SCB defined technology, Agile principles and project management processes and frameworks.
Support Transformation agenda, Business Operating Models, Standards, Finance, Risk Controls and compliance with regulations.
Inculcate the Group’s values and code of conduct in the CCIB Technology Team to ensure adherence to the highest standards of ethics and compliance to relevant policies and processes.
Ensure compliance to the highest standards of business conduct, regulatory requirements and practices defined by internal and external requirements. This includes compliance with local banking laws and anti-money laundering stipulations.
People and Talent
Employ, engage and retain high quality talent to ensure CCIB Client Onboarding T&I is adequately staffed and skilled to deliver on business commitments. 
Lead through example and build appropriate culture and values. Set appropriate tone and expectations for the team and work in collaboration with risk and control partners.
Foster a culture of innovation, transparency and accountability in CCIB Client Onboarding T&I while promoting a “client-first” mentality at all levels.
Ensure role, job descriptions and expectations are clearly set, and periodic feedback provided to the entire team.
Develop and maintain a plan that provides for succession and continuity in the most critical IT management positions.
Risk Management
Identifying and owning architectural, technical and deployment risk, escalating to Product Managers and service owners (as appropriate) with strategies to mitigate that risk.
Be proactive in ensuring regular assurance that the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I Team is performing to acceptable risk levels and control standards.
Act quickly and decisively when any risk and control weakness become apparent and ensure those are addressed within quick / prescribed timeframes and escalated through the relevant committees.
Balance business delivery on time, quality and cost constraints with risks and controls to ensure that they do not materially threaten the Group’s ability to remain within acceptable risk levels.
Ensure business continuity and disaster recovery planning for the entire technology portfolio.
Governance
Responsible to deliver in accordance to T&I policies and ensure governance of the team’s adherence to the same.
Adheres to all governance controls.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Client Onboarding Portal Product Owners and Country IMO.
Tech Architecture Forum, Information & Cyber Security Forum
Global Technology Services Heads (Production Support, Infrastructure, etc)
Interface teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / Engineering or a related discipline, graduate degree preferred.
Lead Developer with 10 years’ experience.
AWS Certified Solutions Architect Associate will be an added advantage.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Proficient in Java 8+ (preferably 11+) with a good knowledge of its ecosystems.
Understanding of Object Orient Programming and Functional Programming paradigms.
Proficient MicroService based architecture and implementation of MicroServices in OCP and AWS platform.
Good knowledge of JavaScript, ReactJS and technologies around it.
Micro Frontend.
Cloud First Cloud Native, AWS.
CI/CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Understanding of code security and code quality.
IT Governance.
IT Systems Management.
Application Monitoring
Grafana, Prometheus, AppDynamics"
Onboarding Technology Developer (Hybrid) - 22543990 #WorkNow,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Intermediate Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
The key responsibility for the new hire is to develop and maintain Suitability and Account Opening modules for Client Onboarding Globally
Utilize knowledge of applications development procedures and concepts, and basic knowledge of other technical areas to identify and define necessary system enhancements, including using script tools and analyzing/interpreting code
Consult with users, clients, and other technology groups on issues, and recommend programming solutions, install, and support customer exposure systems
Apply fundamental knowledge of programming languages for design specifications.
Analyze applications to identify vulnerabilities and security issues, as well as conduct testing and debugging
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Identify problems, analyze information, and make evaluative judgements to recommend and implement solutions
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
2 - 5 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Intermediate level experience in Applications Development role
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Hands on development experience in Java, Oracle SQL
Hands on experience in Angular, extjs and leading UI languages a plus
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Senior Software Engineer (MNC - Automation/ Semiconductor /C#)),"Job Description: 
Development of automation control software using Visual Studio C#, WPF, SQL
Design, development and testing of new features in the applications 
Responsibility for design and implementation of software projects using C# 
Design, build, and maintain efficient and reliable C# code
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science
Experience in C#, WPF, Python, .Net Framework, Object Oriented Programming,
For interested applicants, kindly send your resume in Word/PDF format including the following in your resume to: https://rrecruiter-pte-ltd.breezy.hr/p/7301e221defd-automation-software-engineer-automation-semiconductor-plc
1. Current Salary
2. Expected Salary
3. Availability
4. Reason for leaving
Thank you for your application and we regret that only shortlisted applicants will be notified
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have agreed & consented to us collecting, using, retaining & disclosing your personal information to prospective employers with the services provided by us.
EA (18C9514/R1324924)"
"VP, Solutions Development Team Up to $15,000 |Clarke Quay","Implementation of an integrated multi assets, multi markets product management and business intelligence platform in the area of big data, reporting and business intelligence covering Risk, Analytics, Clearing and Client facing technology.
Software implementation by working closely with multiple business pillars implementing innovative software solutions, transform data into action and enabling business efficiency in a technology-intensive environment.
Contributing to a wide variety of work streams such as in-house and regulatory requirements and provide insights to design and implementing leading-edge technology solution for business, risk and operations.
The candidate will be participating in the entire software development life cycle from product definition requirements and development through to deployment and providing support/maintenance.
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, integrate and implement applications.
Providing assessment on the impact and risk of potential changes to the systems as a whole.
Leads the innovation, design and selection of new technologies in support of business initiatives and priorities.
Interaction with business analyst and users.
Creation of concise detailed system specifications for changes that solves business needs and implementing changes to these agreed specifications.
Following change control and version control processes to ensure quality changes are implemented in an auditable manner
Proactively suggest ways to reduce operational overhead by streamlining manual task into automated procedures.
Provides technical guidance to business users and technology team to design and development of technology solutions.
Requirements:
Minimum of 5 to 8 years’ software development and enterprise wide experience.
Experience in developing application GUIs.
Experience in design and development of scalable applications capable of supporting large amount of data.
Proficient in C#, MSSQL and WPF.
Exposure to ASP.NET, WCF, Javascript, Python, FIX Engine and Web Services is a plus.
Solid knowledge of MVVM design patterns.
Good understanding of the brokerage business and various financial products.
Ability to work both independently and with a team in a dynamic environment.
Work within an environment with high pressure on timeliness and quality of deliveries.
Desired Skills and Experience
Performance Testing, ASPNet, Brokerage, Web Services, White Box Testing, Big Data, Design Patterns, Data Transformation, JavaScript, Defect Tracking, Data Migration, Python, Change Control, C#, Software Development, WCF
By sending your job resume to us, it shall be deemed that you have agreed and hereby give your consent to Merries Employment LLP in collecting, using and/ or disclosing your personal data for the purpose of accessing and processing your job application and/ or for future job opportunities within Merries and/ or with the client(s) of Merries.
If you wish to withdraw your consent, please notify us.
We regret to inform only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Merries Employment LLP
EA Licence No: 14C7362
Posting Personnel: Jasmine Chew
EA Personnel Registration No: R1769441"
"Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst, - C13 #WorkNow#JobsThatMatter'","The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Senior Java Analyst Developer - (Hybrid).#Worknow#,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, - SC Ventures.'#JobsThatMatter","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Applications Senior Developer - [21388615] #Immediate#'#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Supervisor is an intermediate manment level position responsible for providing full leadership and direction to a team of employees in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man an Applications Development team of professionals to accomplish establid goals and conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, training and development, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Recommend new work procedures to increase process efficiencies
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Develop and apply comprehensive knowledge of how own area integrates within apps development and other technical areas
Ensure the quality of tasks provided by self and others on team as well as influence decisions through advice or facilitating services that impact the team and closely related work teams
Act as backup to Applications Development Manr and serve as an advisor and coach to junior developers and analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakehers and /or other team members.
Ability to man teams.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
2-5 of relevant experience
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Ability to take ownership and make technical decisions on software development projects
Experience with dependency manment, change manment, continuous integration testing tools, and audit/compliance requirements
Extensive knowledge of software engineering and object-oriented design
Demonstrated leadership and manment skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, -SC Ventures #Immediate #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Senior Java Software Developer, - Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547] - #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software).
The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547) -- #Seekbetter","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software).
The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
"Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - #'#JobsThatMatter","Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Loans Java Sr Developer #Immediate##UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
AVP - Apps Dev Programmer Senior Analyst (Openlink Endur) #WorkNow#' #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower-level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Has the ability to involve in Openlink endur development in Java/JVS/OC
Qualifications:
8+ years of relevant experience in Openlink development
Hands on Core Java / Java 8, JVS, OpenComponent / OC, design knowledge
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Frontend Developer, CardsPal Venture, - SC Ventures #UrgentHire","About CardsPal by Standard Chartered
At CardsPal, we help you optimise your spending and maximise your savings.
We are an all-in-1 credit card comparison app in Singapore that shows you how to make the most of your cards to get the maximum benefits.
Personalise your money-saving experience based on the credit cards you own. We recommend you the best cards to use to earn the most cashback and rewards across multiple spending categories.
Role Summary
CardsPal is looking for a full stack developer to be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
The Role Responsibilities
The successful candidate will be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
Participating in an exciting venture and be part of the team to develop the platform.
Collaborate closely with product designers with a focus on new feature design.
Be involved in the user experience design process, from wireframes and mockups through implementation and release.
Work closely with designers and product owner to define and implement elegant solutions to interesting problems.
Working closely with the design team to create a reusable component library.
Fast prototyping of new user interactions and iteration based on feedback from peers.
Provide post production tech support.
Hands-on experience with Android and iOS mobile Apps built on React Native, with occasional troubleshooting on cloud backend.
Technical Competencies
3+ years of solid experience in front-end development, with strong interest in backend technologies.
Fluent with HTML / CSS / Javascript.
Worked with Frontend Frameworks like React, Angular or Vue.
Strong software engineering and solution design experience is beneficial. 
Had experience working with React Native.
Experience with cloud technologies like AWS is a bonus
Experience collaborating on software projects with design and backend aspects
Experience working in agile project team.
Work in an iterative approach, driven by customer feedback and data insights.
Our Ideal Candidate
You deeply care about providing a great user experience to our users.
A keen learner with an ambitious and results driven personality, who loves to share with other engineers.
Pro-active and self starter who can work independently.
Work well as part of a team in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent communication, organisational and documentation skills."
Senior Full Stack Agile Developer.#Urgent #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Department Overview:
Citi are undertaking a multi-year initiative to upgrade their structured products front-to-back infrastructure. The IT team is a key partner to the business and is a major contributor to its success and future growth.
To support the structured products business growth plan additional funding is being invested in technology and a number of new and exciting projects have been initiated. In line with this initiative, the Global Equities Technology Department are currently looking to hire an experienced Developer to become a key member of the Global Structured Products platform team.
Role Overview:
Citi are looking for a Senior Developer (VP Level) to work on a new structured products front to back platform. The team work in an agile manner, self-organise their work, speaking directly with business users across the globe and have good autonomy over technology decisions. They own the continuous delivery pipeline through to production and strive to release frequently into production. 
Key Responsibilities:
Develop software iteratively, from an idea through to production.
Collaborate with the rest of the team, frequently pairing.
Build strong relationships with business users through understanding the challenges that they face, then build systems that will allow them to overcome them.
Produce clean efficient code based on the specifications.
Strive to improve and share best engineering practice across the wider technology team.
Technology Skills Desired:
The platform is built using a Kotlin/Java8 in a micro service based architecture and is deployed within Kubernetes/Openshift containers. Kafka is used as the core messaging layer. 
Best practices around DevOps techniques are expected to be utilised with real-time monitoring and metrics part of the key deliverables/best practice.
The team will also be developing a user interface using React/Redux in-line with other applications in the estate so front to back skills are highly desirable. Experience in UX and design will also be highly valued.
The team also practice fully automated testing, continuous integration and trunk based development and would want the developer to have experience of working in such an environment."
AVP - Full-Stack Senior Java Developer - 21387732#.#Worknow',"Job Description
We are looking for Java developers with experience in building high-performing, scalable, enterprise-grade applications.
Our ideal candidate should be passionate around solving business problems through innovation and best engineering practices. You will apply your knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner with our many stakehers to achieve common goals.
You'll work in a collaborative, respecting, trusting and diverse environment that encours creative thinking and critical problem solving that are best in class, to serve our clients globally.
Responsibilities
Write high quality and testable code following clean coding standards and SOLID design principles.
Create design, technical and project documentation.
Be a self-starter and plan/schedule own work for tasks and projects, implement functionality without direct supervision.
Perform profiling and troubleshooting of existing solutions.
Follow and understand defined software development process.
Communicate with clients and stakehers on a regular basis to clarify business requirements.
Participate in workshops and presentation of proposed solutions to clients and stakehers.
Assist team members with providing with technical solutions.
Perform code reviews and contribute to overall quality, maintainability and testability of software developed.
Work independently while in close collaboration with others in the team and across projects.
Coordinate deployment, test and release of applications developed.
Requirements
Advanced knowledge on Java 8, Core Java, ing
Good knowledge of Hibernate and Restful web services including its data interchange format/definition such as XML, JSON.
Understanding of code quality measurements using tools like Sonar and able to implement efficient Unit Tests.
Experienced in designing high quality solutions using OOP, TDD/BDD, Design Patterns and SOLID principles.
Experienced in distributed caching technologies like Apache Ignite or similar.
Experienced in relational database technologies e.g., Sybase, SQL Server.
Experienced with Agile development.
Ability to provide technical solutions from an architecture perspective.
Ability to provide realistic estimation on required effort and man to track and complete tasks in accordance to estimation.
Be self-managing and work without supervision.
Good communication skills.
Education
Bachelor or above in Computer Science, Software Engineering or related majors
Desirable
Full Stack Developer being able to build and maintain responsive and stylish user interface framework and web components with latest technology using Angular and NodeJS.
Experience in Equity trade capture and life cycle systems that support equity derivative products like options and swaps.
Experience in designing and building APIs, integrating with modern-web applications
Working experience in global environment where colleagues, stakehers and onsite client team locate in different locations, be able to cope with culture and time zone differences
Experience in mentoring juniors or less senior colleagues on the project(s)
Experience in conducting trainings or technical tech talks in the area of expertise"
Software Engineer,"Job Description:
To design, develop, test and deploy a suite of dynamic cloud-based RegTech solutions.
Responsible for team project implementation and delivery using Agile methodology with exposure to full cycle scrum product development.
Responsible for team provisioning of BAU maintenance, optimisation and enhancements based on product development needs and any client feedback.
Possess hands-on programming, and solution architecture design skills with demonstrated willingness and capability to on-board new technologies quickly.
Believe in good programming habits. Guide the team in writing elegant code, perform code review, and suggest changes to tools, policies and processes.
Work closely with QAs to ensure quality delivery that meets key metrics.
Work closely with DevOps to build frameworks and tools pipeline, define standards (e.g. REST API), improve overall efficiency of the development (e.g. CI/CD toolchain), hygiene of the code repository (e.g. GitHub), and manage the change & release process of deployments, upgrades and migrations.
Requirements:
At least 3 years of professional software development experience preferred.
Good knowledge of software engineering and best practices including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations for scalable, multi-tenancy and high-volume solutions.
High proficiency with using Java, Python, Django, Node.js, and comfortable with bash scripts on Linux-based systems, and using AWS (EC2, CloudFormation, CloudWatch, RDS, ECS etc.) is necessary.
Extensive experience with Docker, container management, SQL databases and REST API service integration.
Good understanding of OWASP security practices is a plus.
An ability to perform in a fast-paced, multi-time zone environment."
"Senior Developer, Commodities Technology - (2200018769).' *.","Role Responsibilities
This is a role for a highly experienced and highly motivated full-stack software developer delivering software solutions for the Commodities trading desk.
The main responsibilities include analysis, design, development and delivery of features in a challenging and ever-changing environment for front-office users across all functional groups of Financial Markets Commodities division.
Key Roles and Responsibilities
Working as part of the Commodities Technology team, which develops the technology solutions for supporting the Commodities sales and trading businesses at Standard Chartered.
Dependable experienced developer able to take ownership and leadership of tasks and drive them personally to successful delivery.
Innovator and intellectual leader.
Problem solver taking passion in resolving complicated problems.
Driven individual motivated by delivering successful solutions to users and using any means and technologies necessary to do so.
Work with an Agile team to develop, test and maintain applications.
Assist in the collection and documentation of user’s requirements, development of user stories and estimates.
Work with databases, software algorithms and design patterns.
Design, develop and test applications in accordance with established standards.
Participate in peer-reviews of solution designs and related code.
Develop, refine and tune integrations between applications.
Track and maintain code coverage, system performance and system security.
Work with a mature DevOps software delivery process.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Key Stakeholders
Commodities Front Office users including Sales, Trading, Structuring. Control functions including product control, market risk, credit risk, regulatory operations, regulatory technology, operations, application development teams.
Our Ideal Candidate
8 years’ experience working as a Front office developer in investment banking / FI.
Skilled in pattern design and analytical thinking.
Strong domain knowledge of Agile and its processes.
Experience in developing robust, distributed, scalable, high production quality applications.
Experience with picking and applying good software practices like test driven development, continuous integration, and continuous delivery.
Ability to work in a variety of client settings and in a team orientated collaborative environment.
High competency in software development using Java, React and relational databases such as Oracle or PostgreSQL.
Experience with developing micro services, test driven development and DevOps.
Agile Scrum Master
Desirable but not Essential
Familiarity with Commodities trading business, risk management.
Scrum Master and Product Owner certification.
Prior experience in retail banking, private banking and wealth management.
Others
Knowledge and previous experience in maintaining and supporting Development tools.
Familiarity and confidence working in an “agile” development environment.
Self-starter who can “own” the toolset and provide a first-class service to stakeholders.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Java
React, Angular or other UI
Relational Databases: Oracle or PostgreSQL
Micro-services architecture
Software testing, including test automation
DevOps
Messaging middleware: Solace, JMS or others"
Frontend Software Engineer - Trust and Safety Platform*#UrgentHire #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,"TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The construction of the content security system is to meet this challenge, protect user content, and create a healthy content sharing environment for users around the world.
About The Team
Our team is responsible for building outstanding platforms for content security system with high quality, excellent usability and great capability. With the continuous efforts from our team, TikTok is able to provide the best user experience and bring joy to everyone in the world.
Responsibilities
Implement cross platform web-based features, user interfaces and Node.js based services for content security platforms
Responsible for optimising scalability, reliability and responsiveness of web-based application pages, and to deliver compelling end user experience
Architect efficient and reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications
Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver compelling user-facing products
Keep at the forefront of emerging web-based technologies and trends, research and evaluate latest web development frameworks, apply new technologies to drive iterative product improvements
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions
3+ years experience in developing frontend web applications, with demonstrable expertise in deep optimisation of end user experience, stability & scalability, code modularity and rendering latency
Strong JavaScript/HTML/CSS frontend engineering experience and strong familiarity with key concepts including asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility and accessibility
Deep understanding of the underlying design philosophy and implementation of common web frameworks, including React/Vue/Angular
Deep familiarity and experience with common web compilation and bundling frameworks, including Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp
Good understanding of frontend - backend multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process
Experience in development of no-code/low-code platforms is highly advantageous
At least 3 years of relevant experience
Preferred Qualifications
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications
Ability to perform independent research to solve complex technical problems
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst for CPB Capital Markets Tech #WorkNow',"Job Purpose:
This position is within the Citi Private Bank’s Capital Markets Technology Team. Candidate will be part of a high performing team that will develop, enhance, support and maintain solution for applications within capital market’s product processor system.
Job Background:
The position is for a Senior developer individual contributor role within Citi Private Bank’s Capital Markets Technology Team. The team supports and enhance critical suite of applications used by bankers, structured products desk and operations users serving private bank’s prestigious clients. To be successful in this role, you will need to have proven experience in development of solution/platforms for Financial markets environment. It is expected that you will have superior technical knowledge of current programming languages, technologies and other leading edge development tools.
Key Responsibilities:
The primary responsibilities include –
Develop applications and enhancements based on the requirements.
Ensure that application development and enhancement is in line with Citi’s Coding Standards.
Ensure that application releases are packaged and deployed to the production environment following Citi’s Change Management Procedures.
Demonstrate ownership and initiative taking
Develop robust core framework for services and API based architecture
Develop java based high throughput applications
Requirement analysis including interaction with Business Users
Help build continuous integration environment
Perform Unit Testing, System Testing for all applications developed / enhancements and ensure that all critical and high-severity bugs are addressed.
Engage in end to end system design and development processes
As and when required, work on BAU development requests
Ability to own technical delivery/reported issues to completion
Right attitude to gel well with the technology team locally/globally
Development Value:
Excellent opportunity to understand Private Bank systems
Excellent opportunity to understand the capital markets domain from front office to back office across multiple asset classes.
Exposure to work and develop on new emerging technology stack
Knowledge/Experience:
8+ years of development experience required
Background and domain knowledge of wealth management will be a plus
Strong hands on experience in Java based development with good knowledge on messaging, caching,  performance management.
Experience on database technologies- SQL, Oracle
Core Java 1.8+ (Collections, System, design principles), in-memory caching, Distributed systems
Working knowledge of frameworks – Spring, Spring Boot, Angular, Rest API etc
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills is a must
Ability to own technical delivery/reported issues to completion
Experience of GIT, JIRA, confluence will be a mandatory
Understanding of Agile processes is desirable
Good to have skills
Concurrency, memory management, application/web server, micro-service and with experience in building low latency and high throughput system
Knowledge of middleware & distributed messaging technologies like Kafka and JMS
Organizational
Organized and accurate tracking and reporting
Self-motivated and a team player that works wells with individuals and thrives in a complex, global organization 
Ability to Track/ Report both high level and detail level status
Flexible with a desire to make an impact
Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree (in science, computers, information technology or engineering)
Candidate should be willing to adjust work timings to be able to collaborate with teams working in India, London and US."
Global Clearing Trade Processing – Java Sr. Full Stack Developer - Associate #JPM. #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Worknow #UrgentHire | #Seekbetter,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The F&O Trade Processing team is part of the Global Clearing business in Equities within the Corporate and Investment Bank. We are responsible for supporting the processing of over one million futures and options transactions every day as they flow between our clients, brokers, exchanges and clearing houses. In our business, our global footprint on some 80 exchanges is a clear market differentiator. But equally important is the timely, error-free and efficient processing of client trades, and technology, and specifically the applications supported by our team, plays a crucial part in the provision of these services to our clients. Our global team of 60 has a large presence in London with additional team members in Glasgow, New Jersey, Chicago, Mumbai, Bangalore and Singapore; extensive collaboration between locations is a feature of our working environment.
Our applications are built predominately in Java and utilize a number of advanced, distributed technologies including Gemfire, Kafka and Cassandra. During the next two years, we are also making a significant further investment in these applications as we seek to shift to containers (Kubernetes) and the cloud (GAIA, GKP and AWS) to increase our resilience, stability, capacity and performance. As well as our core portfolio of 12 in-house applications, we support another 15 or so vendor and third party applications which are integral to our workflow.
Developers are aligned to one of our Product Teams to work on the roadmap for a particular function and these include: Allocations (processing clients’ instructions in real time); Booking (ensuring timely and accurate updates into our core books and records system); Clearing (interfacing to external parties to affect the clearing of transactions in real time); Charging (maintaining fees & commissions schedules which are used to apply charges to trades in real time); Data (addressing data quality, data retention, data models and reference data across all our applications); Modernization (focusing on shifting our applications to the right through the adoption of Kafka messaging, Kubernetes and containers to drive our migration to the cloud). The Product Teams are increasingly mature in the use of agile techniques.
Developers typically focus on one of three distinct technical specialists: front-end user experience developers (developing solutions in React, Typescripts and the Markets UI Toolkit); back-end real-time event processing developers (using Java and messaging technologies); full-stack developers who build middleware (typically restful web services and streaming technologies) to integrate solutions front-to-back. 
Responsibilities
Design and build scalable and resilient technical solutions
Work with data services team to identify sources of data (both internal and 3rd party) for data cleansing / enhancement / enrichment/ data warehouse
Drive the delivery of business value via change programs/projects within the futures & options clearing technology group
Create automated unit tests using a Test Driven Development approach
Develop a strong understanding of key functions of clearing, margining & settlements within the F&O world.
Partner with supporting tech leads to develop realistic and achievable project estimates
Analysis and build within Control, Stability, Resiliency, Capacity & Performance areas.
Testing: Unit, SIT & UAT planning and management.
Robust delivery of code into the production environment with zero tolerance for post implementation issues
Take part in decisions affecting long range organizational goals & strategic planning.
Proactively look to develop, implement and further development best practices across the group.
Contribute to quality improvement, code reviews, code/architecture standards, code reuse etc.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor in Engineering/ Computer Science/ equivalent with at least 5 years of hands-on experience in core Java (at least JDK 1.8) with clear understanding of advanced concepts in collection framework, garbage collection, multi-threading etc
Strong demonstrated experience with at least one client side technologies – HTML, JavaScript, jQuery,Angular JS, React JS etc
Experience working with Maven, Jenkins, Git/Subversion etc.
Experience working with related technical frameworks – Spring, JMS, JDBC, Hibernate/JPA, MyBatis etc.
Solid understanding of database concepts and working knowledge with any of the vendors(Preferably Oracle) with at least some exposure to performance tuning
Ability to take on difficult and complex large scale problems and provide end to end solutions
Ability to build and maintain strong relationships with stakeholders in business, operations, operate etc.
Some experience of providing production support in a Level2/Level3 capacity
Very Strong problem solving, analytical and communication skills (both verbal and written)"
"Software Engineer, (NLP), TikTok e-Commerce #WorkNow #Urgent #Immediate","Responsibilities
We are the e-commerce department for TikTok and its affiliates. We are responsible for the research and development of NLP algorithms under TikTok and its affiliates' overseas e-commerce business, mainly including intelligent customer service and machine translation.
Responsible for Chinese and overseas's intelligent customer service under ByteDance's e-commerce business, based on two main kinds of products, which are automatic robots and intelligent assistance . Our team provides solutions such as intelligent dialogue, active service, and intelligent marketing, keep improving the efficiency of customer service staff and customers' experience. The algorithm capacities include the identification of a customer's incoming line, the intention understanding, and the solutions to various kinds of questions, etc.
Responsible for the language quality of TikTok and its affiliates overseas e-commerce platform (e.g., TikTok shopping, Fanno), including improving machine translation quality of products' information, IM of buyers and sellers, and supporting scenario of cross-lingual searching.
About the job:
Responsible for the NLP related R&D, mainly including:
Language understanding, including intention recognition, emotion recognition, FAQ, etc.
Build an intelligent dialogue system, including mining questions and answers.
Multilingual text generation such as products' copy, dialogue summary, email reply, etc.
Machine translation, including the translation of product titles and details, IM and other scenarios.
Cross-lingual search, including cross language matching, cross-lingual vector retrieval, etc.
Qualifications
Job Requirements:
Candidates who have practical experience in NLP (intelligent dialogue, machine translation, etc.) are preferred.
Familiar with at least one computer programming language, including but not limited to C/C++/Java/go/python.
Candidates who have published high-level papers are preferred, including but not limited to ACL, EMNLP, COLING, AAAI, IEEE TASLP, etc."
Service Now Developer / (2200010556) *' #JobsThatMatter,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Service Now Developer - (2200010556) #JobsThatMatter,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting - Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an accomplished Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done."
Senior Analyst Programmer,"Key Roles & Responsibilities:
Participate fully in the complete software development lifecycle including analysis, design, coding, testing and debugging applications
Develop system according to audit requirements, rules and regulations. · Liaise with DBA team to gather feedback on database design and provide remedy
Create and document unit test and assist QA team and users to finish QAT and UAT.
Participate in supporting, troubleshooting and resolve issues for existing systems.
Document system design and technical specifications
Prioritize tasks so that assigned tasks can be completed within the given timeline
Prerequisites from candidate:
Highly Proficient in SQL Programming such as T-SQL Stored Procedures, SSIS, SSRS
Proficient in writing Complex SQL Queries, SQL Stored Procedures, Views, Triggers
At least 3 year experience in building application using .Net Framework or .Net Core
At least 2 year experience in systems analysis and design
Experience in creating Web API, MVC application
Experience with version control tools (SVN, Github)
Skills:
Degree in Computer Science or related subjects
Able to analyze problematic situations; diagnose; and generalize alternative solutions to find the best solution
Able to communicate effectively in both verbal and writing and work with cross functional and cross geographical teams
Self-motivated, independent, detail oriented, responsible team-player
Able to work overtime when required to meet project timeline
A team player, responsible and keen to learn new things with can-do attitude"
Senior Software Engineer - (220002JH),"Job Purpose
To perform the role of the Application Designer/Developer  in supporting Life Insurance Application , LifeAsia
The Job
Application development and Maintenance for  Life Asia .

Production and Night Support

Coordination with BA/user for requirement gathering, Unit Testing and support SIT/UAT testing.

Analyzes BA or user's needs and software requirements to determine feasibility of design within time and cost constraints and develops the design specifications for the applications.

Modifies existing software to correct errors, adapting to new hardware, or to improve its performance or develop new applications meeting client's requirements.

Required to provide quality solutions to customer within the required SLA / schedule

Provides consultation to users about software system design and maintenance.

Required to provide good technical solution, develop out of box solutions but must meet IT organization's architecture standards

Documentation on design specification and functional specification
Takes accountability in considering business and regulatory compliance risks and takes appropriate steps to mitigate the risks.

Maintains awareness of industry trends on regulatory compliance, emerging threats and technologies in order to understand the risk and better safeguard the company.

Highlights any potential concerns /risks and proactively shares best risk management practices.
Our Requirements
Degree in Computer Engineering/Science or equivalent  

Software development experience with SMART400,  COBOL/400 Programming, CL/400, AS400/Query, SQL

Domain knowledge in Insurance Applications Life Asia

3 to 5 years of working experiences in AS400 platform.

Resourceful, dynamic individual, good communication skills.

Experience with working knowledge in Life Insurance.

Good understanding on SDLC.
High level of integrity, takes accountability of work and good attitude over teamwork.

Takes initiative to improve current state of things and adaptable to embrace new changes.
About Great Eastern
Established in 1908, Great Eastern places customers at the heart of everything we do. Our legacy extends beyond our products and services to our culture, which is defined by our core values and how we work. As champions of Integrity, Initiative and Involvement, our core values act as a compass, guiding and inspiring us to embrace the behaviours associated with each value, upholding our promise to our customers - to continue doing our best for them in a sustainable manner. 
We work collaboratively with our stakeholders to look for candidates who exhibit or have the potential to embrace our core values and associated behaviours, as these are the key traits that we expect from our employees as they develop their careers with us. 
We embrace inclusivity, giving all employees an equal opportunity to shine and play their role in exploring possibilities to deliver innovative insurance solutions.
Since 2018, Great Eastern has been a signatory to the United Nations (UN) Principles of Sustainable Insurance. Our sustainability approach around environmental, social, and governance (ESG) considerations play a key role in every business decision we make. We are committed to being a sustainability-driven company to achieve a low-carbon economy by managing the environmental footprint of our operations and incorporating ESG considerations in our investment portfolios; improving people’s lives by actively helping customers live healthier, better and longer; and drive responsible business practices through material ESG risk management.
To all recruitment agencies: Great Eastern does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our email or our employees. We will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes."
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547) - #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
2022 Software Engineer Program - Full Time Analyst (Singapore) #JPM #Worknow #UrgentHire,"Be a part of a dynamic and diverse team that engineers large-scale, complex and resilient technology solutions that drive our global business. You'll help build and optimize digital applications and systems that support millions of customers, clients and employees worldwide.
 When you work at JPMorgan Chase, you're not just working at a global financial institution. You're an integral part of one of the world's biggest tech companies. In 16 strategic technology locations worldwide, our team of more than 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning and cloud development. As a firm, we're partnering with FinTech and Silicon Valley tech firms to deliver cutting-edge solutions to our clients and customers. Our $10.8 billion annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that will not only transform the financial services industry, but also change the world. 
WHAT YOU CAN EXPECT
Launching your career in our Software Engineer Program means you will:
Start with an in-depth induction program that teaches you about our businesses, builds on your knowledge of development methodologies, and sharpens your professional skills.
Dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that make a difference for our customers, clients and employees.
Create and improve the design, analytics, coding and testing for high-quality software and new products.
Own projects end-to-end, keeping teams and stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what's being developed.
Work and share ideas, information and innovation with our team of technologists from all over the world.
Develop through on-going training, mentorship and access to senior leaders.
Participate in our agile Force for Good teams to develop real-world technology solutions for non-profit organizations through a series of ""side"" projects over several months.
Join an inspiring and curious team of technologists who will support you in developing new skills, experiencing new projects and businesses, and taking your career where you want to go.
ABOUT YOU
If you're ready to put your passion for technology to work in a way that makes a real difference, you'll find your place in our Software Engineer Program.
Key skills include:
Computer Science and/or Engineering majors are preferred, while other majors may be considered
Pursuing a degree qualification with solid academic background
Relevant internship experience and leadership in school or community organization
Foundational knowledge of programming languages (e.g., Python, Javascript, Java, C++, C#), databases, data structures, and algorithms
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, collaborative environment
Exceptional problem solving ability
Relocation assistance for flight and accommodation will not be provided
Application Dateline:
October 31, 2021 (23:59 SGT)
JOIN US
At JPMorgan Chase, we are creating positive change for the diverse communities we serve. We do this by championing your innovative ideas through a supportive culture that helps you every step of the way as you build your career. If you are passionate, curious and ready to make an impact, we are looking for you.
What’s next?
Help us learn about you by submitting a complete and thoughtful application, which includes your resume. Your application and resume is a way for us to initially get to know you, so it’s important to complete all relevant application questions so we have as much information about you as possible. 
To start the application, you will be prompted to enter your email address.  Your email address will be used to create and maintain your profile so make sure it is one you will have long term access to.  Do not use an email address with “.edu” extension as doing so could result in delays receiving updates regarding your candidacy.
After you confirm your application, we will review it to determine whether you meet certain required qualifications. 
If you are advanced to the next step of the process, you’ll receive an email invitation to complete a series of 12 games through the pymetrics platform. pymetrics will allow you to showcase your potential beyond what you tell us in your resume and application form. It’s an additional data point that helps us gain a better understanding of who you are as an individual. It should take no longer than 25-35 minutes to complete. If you have already completed the pymetrics games, you will have the opportunity to submit your gameplay results for this specific application without having to replay the games.
Following completion of pymetrics, you’ll receive another email invitation to complete a video interview, powered by HireVue. This is your opportunity to further bring your resume to life and showcase your experience for our recruiting team and hiring managers.
Both pymetrics and HireVue are required, and your application will not be considered for further review until you have completed them. We strongly encourage that you apply and complete these required elements as soon as possible, since programs will close as positions are filled. 
JPMorgan Chase is committed to creating an inclusive work environment that respects all people for their unique skills, backgrounds and professional experiences. We strive to hire qualified, diverse candidates, and we will provide reasonable accommodations for known disabilities.
Reasonable Adjustments
J.P. Morgan is an inclusive employer of choice. If you require any adjustments to enable you to perform the essential functions of your job, please do not hesitate to contact your recruiter. If you would prefer to discuss this confidentially, please contact your respective recruiter.
©2021 JPMorgan Chase & Co. JPMorgan Chase is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer Disability/Veteran"
Senior Full Stack Agile Developer - #Urgent#.#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Department Overview:
Citi are undertaking a multi-year initiative to upgrade their structured products front-to-back infrastructure. The IT team is a key partner to the business and is a major contributor to its success and future growth.
To support the structured products business growth plan additional funding is being invested in technology and a number of new and exciting projects have been initiated. In line with this initiative, the Global Equities Technology Department are currently looking to hire an experienced Developer to become a key member of the Global Structured Products platform team.
Role Overview:
Citi are looking for a Senior Developer (VP Level) to work on a new structured products front to back platform. The team work in an agile manner, self-organise their work, speaking directly with business users across the globe and have good autonomy over technology decisions. They own the continuous delivery pipeline through to production and strive to release frequently into production. 
Key Responsibilities:
Develop software iteratively, from an idea through to production.
Collaborate with the rest of the team, frequently pairing.
Build strong relationships with business users through understanding the challenges that they face, then build systems that will allow them to overcome them.
Produce clean efficient code based on the specifications.
Strive to improve and share best engineering practice across the wider technology team.
Technology Skills Desired:
The platform is built using a Kotlin/Java8 in a micro service based architecture and is deployed within Kubernetes/Openshift containers. Kafka is used as the core messaging layer. 
Best practices around DevOps techniques are expected to be utilised with real-time monitoring and metrics part of the key deliverables/best practice.
The team will also be developing a user interface using React/Redux in-line with other applications in the estate so front to back skills are highly desirable. Experience in UX and design will also be highly valued.
The team also practice fully automated testing, continuous integration and trunk based development and would want the developer to have experience of working in such an environment."
System Analyst (.NET),"Requirements :
The candidate must have at least 6 years of web-based applications development experience with one or more of the following qualities:
Working experience in one of the following environment:
i) .Net Platform
- Windows Mandatory
- IIS Server Mandatory
- HIS Server Mandatory
- SQL Server Mandatory
ii) J2EE Platform
- Apache HTTP Server Mandatory
- JBoss Application Server Mandatory
- Oracle Database Mandatory
iii) Pega CRM Preferred
Technically competent in one or more of the following languages, tools and technologies: 
Frontend/full-stack development experience using Microsoft Azure development platform such as .Net core, Logic Apps, App Services, Azure Data Factor, SQL database, 
Others such as Angular, NodeJS, CSS, HTML, Javascript, etc
Micro-services and container technologies eg. Kubernetes, 
Restful API, OAUTH 2 and 2 Way SSL 
Experience in building secure and resilient applications
 Able to develop applications using the following languages:
i) MVC, ADO.NET, SSIS/Transact SQL 
ii) MS Sharepoint technologies 
iii) Web Services, SOAP, XML, SAML 
iv) IOS/Android mobile development 
v) CSS, HTML, DHTML, XML, Ajax, JAVAScript and VBScript 
vi) ASP.NET, C#, VB.NET 
vii) Java Programming, Struts, Spring framework, Angular 
Able to support, edit and manage CPF website contents using the following tools:
i) Sharepoint 
ii) Visual Studio 
iii) Adobe Photoshop CS 
iv) Adobe Dreamweaver CS 
v) Adobe Flash Builder CS 
 Have good knowledge and skills in Object Oriented Analysis and Design, .Net technologies and tools.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
EA License No. 01C4394
REG No :R110526 (Ngiam Xinyi)
By sending us your personal data and curriculum vitae (CV), you are deemed to consent to PERSOLKELLY Singapore Pte Ltd and its affiliates to collect, use and disclose your personal data for the purposes set out in the Privacy Policy available at https://www.persolkelly.com.sg/policies. You acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree with the Privacy Policy"
Lead Full Stack Developer / #Urgent #UrgentHire,"The Role Responsibilities
Responsible to design and build function-centric solutions in the context of transition from traditional, legacy platforms to microservices architectures.
Responsible to define and refactor multi-channel client architecture offering and providing differentiated end-user experiences by leveraging containerization and cloud technology.
Responsible to outline the governance and microservices development guiding principles as well as ensuring the best practices are followed by the development team.
Informed - work collaboratively with an agile, scrum-based team to understand the business domain and client requirements that drive analysis, architecture/design and development of quality technical solutions and deliverables.
Accountable - these solutions cross a broad spectrum of technologies and must align with business and IT strategies and to comply with the organization’s architectural and security standards.
Consulted- Participate in coordinated planning sessions and provide effort estimates for business initiatives of IT solutions.
Responsible to maintain cutting edge knowledge of current and emerging technologies, industry trends and standards Qualifications.
Responsible to gather requirements, design, develop, test, deploy and support applications.
Responsible to drive innovative software engineering practices and architecture design.
Consulted - work with business and other technology teams to establish frameworks for delivering online capability.
Accountable - constantly analyse and improve the performance and quality of the product and team.
Accountable - able to adapt to changes in priorities and requirements.
Responsible for implementation of robust, fault tolerant and distributed application.
Accountable for synergy in the delivery of projects through co-ordination of interdependencies.
Responsible for delivery of applications that attend business and clients needs with automated tests, CI and CD.
Responsible to be able to solve complex software development/design issues using clean, coherent code following established coding guidelines.
Our Ideal Candidate
Mircoservices architecture using any of the market leading solutions.
Experience in implementing business critical, high volume, and highly available services is a must.
A strong hands-on development track records building integration and application utilizing a variety of technologies, development tools and database systems.
Experience with containerization and cloud technologies (eg. AWS EKS, EFK), Control-M, as well as DevOps and testing tools (Git, SVN, TFS – Terraform (IaC), Jira, Confluence, Jenkins, Nexus, Selenium, SonarQube, Bitbucket).
Experience with cloud-based, CD/CI or DevOps development environment.
Good communication skills both in writing and verbally with ability to present the complex ideas or technical solution to business and/or management team.
Working experience in both waterfall and Agile delivery approach.
Robust understanding of Java and a in-depth understanding of other Java technologies, including Solace, Oracle, SQL, Stored Procedures, Linux, Spring, Angular, React, Hibernate, Web services, API, Microservices.
Domain knowledge in Wealth Management and Private Banking and Wealth Lending business knowledge is desirable.
Full software development lifecycle experience in a mature CI / CD environment.
Strong in communication, trouble shooting and analysis skill.
Working experience delivering online/internet/mobile application.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
8+ years of experience in Software Development
Microservice Architecture
Containerization and cloud technologies (eg. AWS EKS, EFK), Control-M, as well as DevOps and testing tools (Git, SVN, TFS – Terraform (IaC), Jira, Confluence, Jenkins, Nexus, Selenium, SonarQube, Bitbucket).
CD/CI or DevOps
Java technologies, including Solace, Oracle, SQL, Stored Procedures, Linux, Spring, Angular, React, Hibernate, Web services, API, Microservices.
Agile Development
Requirements Analysis"
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Anlayst (C12). #Urgent#'#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Open Source Java Developer,"· Transforming legacy systems from .NET to Java technologies.
· Upgrading existing functionalities and creating new functionalities using data-driven insights.
· Implement and delivery SCM project development with great quality and according to business requirement.
o Business areas
§ International Parcel Service
§ Warehouse Management System
§ Order Management System
§ Transport Management System
§ Freight Management System
§ Etc.
· Involvement in all phases of the development cycle.
· Active participation in planning meetings.
· Implement new features according to business specifications.
· Write unit/functional or integration tests and perform unit testing
· Code review for other team members
· Automate the maintenance work with the development tools
Required Experience and Skills:
·Minimum IT degree with more than 5 years related experience
·Experience in designing and implementing Java-based (Java 8, Spring, Spring Boot) backed Restful applications, 5+ years
· Analyse, design and develop microservices applications using tools such as Docker, Kubernetes, OpenShift, etc.
· Worked on enterprise-scale projects using Java, .NET, Spring Boot, Angular, React.js, Vue.js, Jenkins, Git
· Be proficient in the technology stacks or tools such as Azure, AWS, Redis, Elastic Search & Kibana (ELK) and Grafana, Prometheus (Monitoring/alerts)
· Proficient skills with tools used in software development lifecycle, such as Eclipse, IntelliJIDEA, Git, Gradle, Maven, and other CI/CD tools
· Familiarity with debugging and performance tuning along with a good understanding of deploying, maintaining and monitoring complex Java applications
· Solid Object-Oriented analysis and design skills, understanding of design patterns and concepts
Additional Requirements:
· This position is required to be able to read, write and speak Korean as he/she will be the main contact person who regularly communicates with Headquarter and learn technical skills from them.
· Able to communicate effectively, analytical with good time management, problem-solving and documentation skills.
· Strong team player skill
· Able to performance various Developer roles where necessary & System Support
· Possess the capability to manage varying users of different capabilities
· Able to multi-task, manage and undertake various projects simultaneously
· Team player and able to work well with others.
HOW TO APPLY :
Interested candidates, please submit your resume by clicking on “Apply Now” or aliceyap(a)hkmsvs.com
All applications will be treated in the strictest confidence and only shortlisted candidates will be notified
Yap Lay Choo
EA Licence No. 03C5391 | Registration No. R1987101"
Frontend Developer / CardsPal Venture - SC Ventures.* #Urgent,"About CardsPal by Standard Chartered
At CardsPal, we help you optimise your spending and maximise your savings.
We are an all-in-1 credit card comparison app in Singapore that shows you how to make the most of your cards to get the maximum benefits.
Personalise your money-saving experience based on the credit cards you own. We recommend you the best cards to use to earn the most cashback and rewards across multiple spending categories.
Role Summary
CardsPal is looking for a full stack developer to be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
The Role Responsibilities
The successful candidate will be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
Participating in an exciting venture and be part of the team to develop the platform.
Collaborate closely with product designers with a focus on new feature design.
Be involved in the user experience design process, from wireframes and mockups through implementation and release.
Work closely with designers and product owner to define and implement elegant solutions to interesting problems.
Working closely with the design team to create a reusable component library.
Fast prototyping of new user interactions and iteration based on feedback from peers.
Provide post production tech support.
Hands-on experience with Android and iOS mobile Apps built on React Native, with occasional troubleshooting on cloud backend.
Technical Competencies
3+ years of solid experience in front-end development, with strong interest in backend technologies.
Fluent with HTML / CSS / Javascript.
Worked with Frontend Frameworks like React, Angular or Vue.
Strong software engineering and solution design experience is beneficial. 
Had experience working with React Native.
Experience with cloud technologies like AWS is a bonus
Experience collaborating on software projects with design and backend aspects
Experience working in agile project team.
Work in an iterative approach, driven by customer feedback and data insights.
Our Ideal Candidate
You deeply care about providing a great user experience to our users.
A keen learner with an ambitious and results driven personality, who loves to share with other engineers.
Pro-active and self starter who can work independently.
Work well as part of a team in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent communication, organisational and documentation skills."
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer. #WorkNow,"Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
Senior Application Developer #WorkNow'#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556). #Immediate","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Senior Software Engineer, DevOps – Standard Chartered nexus - (2200019763).* #JobsThatMatter","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
Senior Java Services Developer (Hybrid) - 22551343,"Responsibilities
This Senior Developer role is responsible for driving design and implementation of a new generation of advanced UI & microservices based trading applications. An ideal candidate will have the ability to make sound technology choices, manage and mentor a team.
Responsibilities:
Develop and design RESTful microservices and APIs
Be well versed in Java, spring boot and similar API's used for services-oriented development
Have experience in developing solutions using doc-based databases such as MongoDB
Develop functional database modes for either a DOC or a RDBMS style database.
Ensure that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are consciously considered in solutions
Stay abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Stay current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architecture and products
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
High caliber expertise in Java
Expertise in Angular/React is a plus
Hands on experience on Spring, Spring boot, containerization.
Knowledge of microservices (service discovery, API gateway, config server) will be an added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB & with very clear RDMS concepts
Desirable Skills:
Java unit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city is a plus
Experience expectations:
Ideally 7+ years of relevant experience.
Trading and Capital Markets background is desirable
Candidates with strong backgrounds & experiences in non-financial services domain are welcome.
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Technology, computer science related discipline
Strong communication skills, spoken and written
Experience in deployment management
Delivery orientation, results driven
Personal experience of defining requirements directly with business users
Capital Markets product knowledge
Experience of working collaboratively across geographies with highly technical team and business users"
"Staff Software Engineer, Data, - Standard Chartered nexus. #Immediate #UrgentHire","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst#. #UrgentHire #WorkNow,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Analyst, - Development (WSP). #Immediate*.","Role Responsibilities
Our Technology & Innovation (T&I) function is at the heart of shaping the bank for the future and serving our clients digitally across the globe. We are responsible for the systems development and technology infrastructure of the Bank, defining, innovating, and implementing digital agendas across functions, especially in our client services. Our team helps unlock new banking experiences for clients, while improving our operational effectiveness and enhance existing offerings.
We are focused on building your digital skills and adaptability necessary to be future-ready. You’ll be exposed to a diverse portfolio of projects in your allocated domain will help to deliver efficiencies and automation, introduce global platforms, machine learning, and bring forth intelligent technology. You’ll be constantly learning and sharing with your peers:
• Creating and designing cutting edge tools and applications that will redefine the future of banking
• Work in a truly Agile environment, as part of scrum teams that are striving to solve customer challenges
• Play a critical role in client journeys that help us make faster decisions to enhance the end-to-end client experience and achieve outcomes that are most valuable to our clients
Our Ideal Candidate 
If you are passionate about technology and customer experience, and possess traits and experience most of the below, we’d love to hear from you:
• Adaptive to changing situations and enjoy collaborating with global teams in a diverse multi-cultural environment.
• Curious and open-minded.
• Strong foundational knowledge of Algorithms, Data Structures, OOPs concepts and frameworks
• Passionate for solving challenging problems and learning new skills, coding languages.
• Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to JavaScript (ReactJS, React-Redux, nodeJS), TypeScript, Python.
• Experience in working with either front end and/or back-end technologies and frameworks.
• Experience in one or more Cloud Technologies. "
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid).#Urgent#UrgentHire #Immediate,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Frontend Engineer, - Autumn Venture - SC Ventures. ** #Immediate. #Urgent","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Software Engineer (PHP),"Responsibilities:
Design, Develop & Implement different software solutions for different clients (Ranging from Web-based projects to Mobile applications)
Work with different department and customers to create and enhance new features on Web Applications
Gathering user requirements and translate into technical specification
Develop proof of concepts and technical designs
Follow Agile Software methodologies for development.
Requirements:
Diploma or Degree in Computer Science and Information Technology or equivalent
At least 1 year of working experience in Web Development 
Web development experience using CakePHP, MVC, HTML/ HTML 5, CSS, JavaScript, Bootstrap, JQuery & Web API
Knowledge of Microsoft SQL Server/ Linux Server
Knowledge in AWS (Amazon Web Service)
Interested candidates please click on APPLY button.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
PowerApps / PowerAutomate Developer,"Responsibilities:
Responsible for the development, implementation, performance, integrity, and security of applications
Understand the client’s collaboration, workflow, data and document management requirements, and design and implement automation solutions
Design, develop and implement software, architecture, specifications and technical interfaces and features
Provides user support, including researching issues and determining options for resolution
Assist in managing application projects including project migration, pilot project testing and rollout
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Minimum 2 years relevant working experience
Experience in PowerApps Development is a must
Experience in C#, ASP.Net, ASP.Net MVC, VB.Net and MS SQL scripting
Knowledge of Web services standard such as REST, XML, SOAP, JSON and XSDL
Interested candidates who wish to apply for the advertised position, please click APPLY to submit your resume. 
EA License No: 13C6305
Reg. No.: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
"Software Engineer, - Recommendation Architecture,*","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About The Team
Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.
Responsibilities - What You'll Do
Build and maintain high performance online services for recommendation system；
Build extremely efficient and reliable data pipelines for candidates generation, profile generation, training examples generation, realtime online training, etc;
Build globalized large-scale recommendation system;
Design and develop high performance computing frameworks and storage systems
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields,
Experience building scalable system;
Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang;
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive;
Experience in at least one area of the following areas: personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks is a plus.
At least 3 years of relevant experience
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too"
Senior Software Engineer [Data] #JobsThatMatter,"Position Overview
As a hand on developer, you will be working to build robust and scalable self-service data platform for Autodesk. You will work with cutting edge open source technologies in big data space.
Responsibilities:
Design and develop components of end to end Data Platform 
Work with the team to make the Data Platform an efficient, robust and scalable platform
Enthusiastic and passionate member of a highly skilled and motivated agile development team 
Contribute to a team culture that values quality, robustness, and scalability while fostering initiatives and innovation
Minimum Qualifications:
BS or MS in computer science or a related field
Experience with Map Reduce
Experience with Hive and one relational DB
Strong problem solving skills
Strong communication skills
Ability to learn new technical skills
4+ years of experience with Big Data
Expert knowledge and experience in Hadoop 2.0 and its ecosystem
Expert programming skills in either Java, Scala or Python
Solid proficiency with Amazon Web Services
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with Spark
Experience with Hadoop / Spark Source Code
Experience with Python, Scala
Experience with Flume
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes
Experience with at least one workflow scheduler (e.g. Oozie)
Experience with Kafka/Splunk/ELK/Hive Metastore
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.
Are you an existing contractor or consultant with Autodesk? Please search for open jobs and apply internally (not on this external site). If you have any questions or require support, contact Autodesk Careers."
"TDI – FIC Technology, - Java Software Developer (VP),","Details of the Division and Team:
FIC Technology within Investment Bank Technology is responsible for managing end to end technology related to FX, Emerging markets, Rates, Credit and Listed Derivatives businesses.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and wellbeing at its center.
You can expect:
Flexible benefits plan including virtual doctor consultation services
Comprehensive leave benefits
Gender Neutral Parental Leave
Flexible working arrangements
25 days of annual paid leave, plus public holiday & Flexible Working Arrangement
Your key responsibilities:
Collaborate and communicate openly; pairing with colleagues to write software and solve problems
Engage directly with business stakeholders to elicit requirements and ensure that the software delivered is fit for purpose
Technical analysis, solution design, developing, unit testing, code review, architecture and API documentation
Engage with QA to prepare infrastructure for integration and load testing activities
Deployment of the solution for SIT, UAT testing activities and for demonstration session to business stakeholders;
Production SL3 support
Your skills and experience:
Minimum 10 years of relevant experience in Core Java, Collection Framework, Multithreading and back-end development
Preference will be given to candidates who have worked in the banking/financial, e-commerce or high-tech companies
Hands-on experience on full-stack programming/development Basic knowledge of SQL
Basic knowledge of Unix/Linux
Analytical thinker, team player and possess strong communication skills
Enable experimentation and fast learning approaches to creating business solutions
Familiar in the use of solution design tool
Soft skills:
The ability to solve complex problems
The ability to take responsibility for the task from start till full completion
Communicability, teamwork skills, the ability to work in international team;
Attention to details
Readiness to learn new technologies and approaches 
Good to have:
Understanding and experience with network technologies (websockets, netty, gRPC, multicast, nginx);
Experience in Web technologies (React, Angular 2+, TypeScript)
Python 3.6
How we’ll support you:
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career
About us and our teams:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. Click here to see what we do.
Deutsche Bank & Diversity
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
Click here to find out more about our diversity and inclusion policy and initiatives.  
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
Click here to find out more about diversity and inclusion at Deutsche Bank."
"TDI – FIC Technology - Java Software Developer (VP),","Details of the Division and Team:
FIC Technology within Investment Bank Technology is responsible for managing end to end technology related to FX, Emerging markets, Rates, Credit and Listed Derivatives businesses.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and wellbeing at its center.
You can expect:
Flexible benefits plan including virtual doctor consultation services
Comprehensive leave benefits
Gender Neutral Parental Leave
Flexible working arrangements
25 days of annual paid leave, plus public holiday & Flexible Working Arrangement
Your key responsibilities:
Collaborate and communicate openly; pairing with colleagues to write software and solve problems
Engage directly with business stakeholders to elicit requirements and ensure that the software delivered is fit for purpose
Technical analysis, solution design, developing, unit testing, code review, architecture and API documentation
Engage with QA to prepare infrastructure for integration and load testing activities
Deployment of the solution for SIT, UAT testing activities and for demonstration session to business stakeholders;
Production SL3 support
Your skills and experience:
Minimum 10 years of relevant experience in Core Java, Collection Framework, Multithreading and back-end development
Preference will be given to candidates who have worked in the banking/financial, e-commerce or high-tech companies
Hands-on experience on full-stack programming/development Basic knowledge of SQL
Basic knowledge of Unix/Linux
Analytical thinker, team player and possess strong communication skills
Enable experimentation and fast learning approaches to creating business solutions
Familiar in the use of solution design tool
Soft skills:
The ability to solve complex problems
The ability to take responsibility for the task from start till full completion
Communicability, teamwork skills, the ability to work in international team;
Attention to details
Readiness to learn new technologies and approaches 
Good to have:
Understanding and experience with network technologies (websockets, netty, gRPC, multicast, nginx);
Experience in Web technologies (React, Angular 2+, TypeScript)
Python 3.6
How we’ll support you:
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career
About us and our teams:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. Click here to see what we do.
Deutsche Bank & Diversity
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
Click here to find out more about our diversity and inclusion policy and initiatives.  
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
Click here to find out more about diversity and inclusion at Deutsche Bank."
"Senior Software Engineer, - nexus #Immediate","What you will be doing:
In this role, you will be creating green field Banking as a Service platform from ground up. Your day to day will involve leading multi-shore engineering team and working closely with product owners to deliver features incrementally including:
aligning on the centralized design standards, frameworks & tools to accelerate deliverables
Design, Develop, test, deploy and run on Kubernetes
Work with Java to create the platform on cloud native stack.
Simplify the business requirements and propose clean design with help of UML.
Mentor and coach junior developers
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Good design for given business domain and occasional implementation of POCs
Provide unit testing and load testing
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
What you need to be successful in this role:
“Write code for others, not for yourself” – your code will be visible to thousands of developers
Hands-on on Java Spring boot, microservices, REST, GRPC APIs
Ability to mentor, coach and communication clearly on deliverables and trouble shooting.
8+ years Java server-side development experience with decent understanding of core design patterns.
knowledge of GIT, branching strategies, build and deployment pipelines
Experience with SQL and NoSQL databases
Knowledge of software best practices, like Continuous Integration (CI) & Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Hands-on on consuming and providing REST APIs
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
We are also looking for:
Experience with microservices, Container Orchestration and Containerisation technologies
Experience of dealing with scalability & performance issues on a distributed system
Experience of GO, SCALA & SPARK is a plus
Knowledge of CASSANDRA, KAFKA is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP/terraform)
Retail banking experience is a plus"
"Senior Software Engineer, - nexus.* - #Immediate. #UrgentHire","What you will be doing:
In this role, you will be creating green field Banking as a Service platform from ground up. Your day to day will involve leading multi-shore engineering team and working closely with product owners to deliver features incrementally including:
aligning on the centralized design standards, frameworks & tools to accelerate deliverables
Design, Develop, test, deploy and run on Kubernetes
Work with Java to create the platform on cloud native stack.
Simplify the business requirements and propose clean design with help of UML.
Mentor and coach junior developers
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Good design for given business domain and occasional implementation of POCs
Provide unit testing and load testing
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
What you need to be successful in this role:
“Write code for others, not for yourself” – your code will be visible to thousands of developers
Hands-on on Java Spring boot, microservices, REST, GRPC APIs
Ability to mentor, coach and communication clearly on deliverables and trouble shooting.
8+ years Java server-side development experience with decent understanding of core design patterns.
knowledge of GIT, branching strategies, build and deployment pipelines
Experience with SQL and NoSQL databases
Knowledge of software best practices, like Continuous Integration (CI) & Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Hands-on on consuming and providing REST APIs
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
We are also looking for:
Experience with microservices, Container Orchestration and Containerisation technologies
Experience of dealing with scalability & performance issues on a distributed system
Experience of GO, SCALA & SPARK is a plus
Knowledge of CASSANDRA, KAFKA is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP/terraform)
Retail banking experience is a plus"
Software Quality Assurance,"Software Quality Assurance (QA Test) Engineer
Job Highlights
Outstanding career development
opportunities
Excellent benefit
Work-Life Balance
Job Descriptions
Design/Test and Verify the quality of end-user applications and server-side components to ensure that they meet requirements and functional specifications
Executing regression, integration, performance, unit, and system test plans
Documenting test results into the bug tracking system and following through to resolution
Working with developers to resolve and debug issues
Audit and enforce key testing related to SDLC project milestones, documents, and standards
Perform defect tracking and management
Review software documentation to ensure technical accuracy and completeness
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma, Advanced/Higher/Graduate Diploma, Bachelor’s Degree, Post Graduate Diploma, Professional Degree in IT, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or equivalent
Any experience with Microsoft SQL Server inquiry language will be a plus
Accuracy and attention to detail
Experience in testing web-based software is strongly preferred
Sharp analytical abilities, problem-solving techniques, proven design skills, and track record of delivery
Excellent written and verbal communications
Please note that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
Senior Application Developer - 22495002 #Immediate' #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"SENIOR LEAD, SOLUTION ARCHITECTURE","KEY RESPONSIBILITIES 
Understand and translate business requirements into system designs and take leadership in successfully delivering the required functionalities.
Architect solutions and troubleshoot applications.
Work with Business Units and the Commercialisation team to conceptualise and implement new programmes and initiatives that will transform and create significant impact to the legal community.
Design and implement technical solutions, proof-of-concept, and pilots, ensuring the system complies with open standards and meets requirements for high availability, resiliency, scalability, and security.
Work closely with product management, infrastructure, development, and operations teams to conform/contribute solution to technology stack and ensure smooth delivery. Foster relationships effectively with diverse groups across geographies. Adapt and multi-task, handling complex requirements.
Develop technical standards and guidelines against industry standards, to allow technical interoperability of various component within each system and between systems.
Evolve and maintain common components, frameworks, and SDKs as part of technology stack to reduce repeated work.
Apply best practices regarding system security measures and performance.
Analyze current technologies used within the company and determine ways to improve.
Craft great user experience and quality code that is robust and maintainable. Provide detailed specifications for proposed solutions.
Help drive our teams and products through launch cycles – particularly by balancing good engineering with launch commitments.
KEY SPECIFICATIONS
At least 8 years of proven technology experience managing complex projects, driving technology solutions and meeting business expectations
Hands-on Java full-stack development with prior experience leading a team.
Hands-on experience in MySQL, Hibernate and other database technologies.
Hands-on exp on Amazon cloud services (AWS Lambda, SES, SQS, S3, AWS Aurora, AWS RDS, AWS CI/CD, ec2, Load Balancers, etc.)
Proven Self-starter with initiative, accountability, and ability to work independently as well as collaborate with the team, locally, regionally, and globally.
Experience in building cloud-native apps.
Champion continuous improvement to the quality of solutions delivery using agile practices.
Experience in CI/CD toolchain and automated testing frameworks to ensure quality and time-to-market.
Experience with Azure AD and/or search solutions preferred.
Interested candidates are invited to submit your resume, stating your current / expected salary and date of availability via APPLY NOW.
Only shortlisted candidates will be notified. "
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, - SC Ventures. #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Data Engineer / Technology /Up to $8,000/month!","My client, an established company is looking out for a data Engineer and the incumbent to join needs to have such attributes.
Job roles:
Manage data lake API calls from 3rd party application and access controls.
Participate in designing the architecture of the data lake platform for new use cases.
Responsible for verifying changes implemented by vendor and deploy it into the data lake production environment.
Identify, design, and implement continuous
Able to understand business requirements and translate to design document from data ingestion to data modelling.
Develop data pipelines and ingest data from various sources to data warehouse for consumption from 3rd party applications.
Job requirements:
Experience in utilising Microsoft Azure and any related tooling for data engineering (such as Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Lake Storage, Databricks, Synapse).
Knowledge of data modelling and understanding of different data structures and their benefits and limitations.
Proficiency in writing SQL including stored procedures in languages such as T-SQL and PL/SQL.
A minimum 2 years’ experience in data engineering (e.g. data modelling, data pipeline, data architecture, ETL).
How to Apply:
Interested applicants may apply by sending in your updated résumé (in MS Word format) to my email or apply directly:
Consultant: Tan Jun Jie
EA personnel reg. no.R1878852
EA License No. 17C8502"
#Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer - (21405806) #Seekbetter,"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
URGENT / Software Engineer (Fab Support) (JAVA / MES / CIM / Up to $5.5K),"Job Description:
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error / cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirement:
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related fields
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent fields with at least 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is a plus
Successful candidate will have opportunity to work in our new facility and to be trained and worked overseas for a period of time
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please click on send your latest resume in MS WORD format to ref19(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Lim Dick Sern (Dick Sern)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22106832"
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer #WorkNow#.#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
Senior Software Engineer - Associate #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well using Front end technologies such as AngularJS, HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 8 years of Software Development work experience
Strong proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, AngularJS, JavaScript/HTML and SQL
Hands on experience with Springboot and distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Good understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Java 8 features, REST, UNIX shell scripting"
Service Now Developer / (2200010556) *'#Urgent,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Senior Java Analyst Developer - (Hybrid).#Worknow #JobsThatMatter#.,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter #Immediate","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
"Digital Post-Trade, Full Stack Developer #Worknow, #Immediate'","Job Description

As a Full Stack Developer of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems.
1 year working in Software Development 
Knowledge in one or more of the following technologies:
Core Java Fundamentals, Java 8+, Spring, Spring Boot, REST Web Services and testing frameworks such as Junit, Cucumber, etc
Demonstrable ability to build applications in React, and have understanding of the core Javascript language, up to the current ECMAScript spec. Able to write useful tests using industry-standard frameworks like jest and react-testing-library
CSS and HTML: semantic HTML, CSS optimization and, preferably, Javascript-based styling solutions (e.g., material-ui styles)
Microservices and Cloud, containers with Kubernetes orchestration
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle, MySQL and NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, MongoDB, etc
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Understanding of architecture and design principles
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Preferred skills/experience:
BPM and Workflow Engines experience is a plus"
Trainee Executives Programme - Commercial (2023),"Applications for Wilmar International's widely acclaimed Trainee Executives Programme - Commercial has opened for year 2023.
Upon joining Wilmar, our trainees undergo a comprehensive in-house training programme to give them a good overview of the various businesses. We emphasise hands-on experience and based on individual interest and capability, encourage trainees to work in various departments and potentially on specific projects locally or overseas. The HR team, their assigned mentors and their Department heads will help develop each trainee’s unique path based on their interest, capability and potential for leadership positions.
Shortlisted trainees will be assigned to our commercial team to develop their skills and career.
They will undergo a department rotation to learn more about our trade support / operations and trading business. These rotations are designed to give our trainees a hands-on experience as they work together with their senior colleagues.
Trading
The Trading Department manages a global portfolio of palm and lauric oils, oilseeds and grains, sugar, specialty fats and oleochemicals. The Trading team implements the macro trading strategies set by the Trading Head and provides support to analyse commodity markets with firsthand knowledge of the destinations they service. They are entrusted to develop good relationships with external and internal customers of the Group. This team has hands-on management of physical trade flow, sensitivity to customer requirements and a good understanding of risks.
Trade Support / Operations
The Trade Support team is responsible for verifying and recording all trades in a timely manner. The team organises logistical support for the Trading team and the Operations team to make informed trading and planning decisions.
The Operations team carries out all post-trade contract activities from planning to payment collection. This involves the preparation of shipping documents and coordinating with the suppliers, buyers, shipbrokers, ship owners and agents, surveyors, and insurance companies to ensure smooth loading and delivery.
The Candidate
The successful candidate will possess the following:
A degree in Economics/ Business / Commercial field with a focus in agriculture and/or international trade
Diligent, passionate, has perseverance and thrives under pressure
Other essential attributes sought are good business acumen, maturity, integrity and independence
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Internationally mobile – willing to accept assignments in different countries on short notice
Apply today
If you’re ready to learn and be challenged in Asia's largest agribusiness, please send in your applications now.
""I interned in Wilmar previously and decided to join the Trainee Executives programme after my graduation from university in 2016. The international exposure has allowed me to collaborate with people from all the world. The various job rotations I have undergone has allowed me to grow and learn immensely as a professional within the agribusiness industry. My fellow colleagues have also made my experience in Wilmar very fulfilling."" - Mr Ang Wei Sheng, Business Development Assistant Manager"
Piano/ Violin Teacher,"Job Highlights
Attractive Salary and Benefits (Annual increment & bonus)
Wonderful Working Culture and Environment
Work life balance
Comprehensive training
Performance Opportunity
Transport Allowance
Bonus & Incentives
Medical Benifits & Sick Leaves
Job Description
Responsibilities:
To conduct piano / violin lesson (individual & group)
Attend school development program
Prepare students for performance, recital & competitions
Help student to prepare for examinations
Involvement in company activities such as music recitals, charity concert etc
Involvement in composing of songs and arranging existing songs
Recording tutorial and performing video (to upload on Social Media Platforms or other platforms for marketing purpose)
Requirements:
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree/Post Graduate Diploma/Professional Degree in Music/Performing Arts Studies or equivalent.
Required language(s): English, Mandarin -in order to liaise with Mandarin speaking associates
No work experience required.
Preferably Entry Level specialized in Entertainment/Performing Arts or equivalent."
Front Office Software Engineer- Currency and Emerging Markets Technology- Associate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire',"As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
You will be working in Currencies and Emerging Markets (CEM) Athena team. The team delivers business critical pricing, trade capture, risk management, transaction processing and trader tools to the CEM business globally. This include in executing project to integrate the business operation, tools or system to the strategic framework or system.
You will need to work with Operation, Trading desk, Quantitative Research, Controller and Technology groups to deliver the technology modernization agenda, improve CEM business workflows and enable the business to capture new frontier emerging market.
Athena is J.P. Morgan's cross-market risk management and trading system that provides functionality for traders, salespeople and operations staff globally. It is used in our foreign exchange, fixed income & credit and commodities businesses. Athena includes a globally replicated object-oriented database, a powerful dependency graph and a fully integrated stack across pricing, risk and trading tools. The code is a combination of Python and C++: C++ for speed, and Python for flexibility and rapid but controlled releases. Athena is designed to provide a continuous deployment environment, and pull developers close to the business to help increase revenues, while improving operational processes and controls to reduce costs.
We are seeking a technically strong and disciplined developer. The role will require an ability to attain clear understanding of Athena environment and of the unique design considerations that come into play in a diverse and highly interdependent systems environment.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Math 
Minimum 3 years of experiences in programming languages such as  Python, Java, Scala, C++ or C#. preferably within the Financial Services sector
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, resilient
Strong analytical and problem solving skills, bring innovative and new ideas to the table
Comfortable multi-tasking with minimal supervision 
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams across geographical boundaries to achieve organizational goals
Eagerness to take accountability/ownership of work, have real business impact, collaborate with a global community of developers sharing the technology and code base.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages and willingness to pick up skill on new and legacy technology
Understanding of Foreign exchange & Fixed Income products will be considered favorably"
"Automation & Software Defined Network Engineer/Programmer AVP Hybrid,. - #Urgent' |#WorkNow","Responsibilities
Automation and Software Defined Network Engineer/Programmer
This position is responsible to help enhance network operations capability in fault detection, troubleshooting and recovery of network incidents through automation and tools in our rapidly evolving network infrastructure. We are looking for skilled candidate with a passion for networking and aptitude for developing advance scripts and improving existing automation tools to boost the capability of the network operations team in pre-emptive fault findings and early prevention in network outages through automation. Developing best practices/standards and keeping our network automation tools/scripts are up to date. This role is at the forefront of a software-defined revolution that will change the way we build and operate our network services to ensure agility, improved capabilities and better economics. 
Responsibilities:
Write the tooling and generate code to make your own and other people's job easier.
Contribute in projects to improve the network infrastructure and network operations in support of enterprise need
Build APIs to collect and process system, application, network, and OS level events.
Data and System Events analytics; translating the vast network events and data into dynamic dashboards capable of providing useful insights and fault assessment.
Improving efficiency and effectiveness of existing network automation tools.
Bridging the gap between infrastructure network engineer & software defined network engineers.
Educational Qualification:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Engineering or other related fields of study
Experience:
5+ years of experience in software programming.
Dev/Ops Knowledge: can demonstrate knowledge and varying levels of experiences with one or more of the following: Ansible, JSON, YANG and Rest API, Python, Kafka, Grafana, Machine Learning - e.g. Hadoop and clustered big data, Kubernetes, Docker, Data Visualization.
Ability to parse data structures using python
Experience with coding/scripting/automation/orchestration platforms(Python, Ansible), including interfacing with APIs
Experience of managing code with GIT, Bitbucket branches
Experience with Visual Studio Code and integration to tests and git
Experience writing Ansible Playbooks in YAML
Experience of how to use regex within python code
Experience in Network monitoring tools (i.e., NetFlow Tracker, Elastic, and Splunk) is a plus
Experience in Software Defined Network is a plus
Basic level working knowledge of enterprise infrastructure networking.
Large financial institution working experience is a plus. 
Industry certifications includes; CCNA, ITIL, etc is a plus
Others:
IAC principles
Microservices architectures & reasons for developing in such a way
Data protection & classification for storage
Basic ML techniques a bonus
Professional Attributes:
Ability to work with a limited set of requirements. Desire to mentor colleagues, spearhead new architectures, and drive team efforts
Excellent communication and relationship skills, especially the ability to articulate advanced technical topics to both technical and non-technical staff
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills."
"Sr. Algorithm Engineer, Search, - #WorkNow #URGENT*#Immediate","Responsibilities
Develop set processes for data mining, data modeling, and data production;
Design and implement ML/DL algorithms to solve enterprise problems in an end-to-end fashion;
Collaborate with your team members (e.g., data engineers, domain experts) to achieve the goals of the projects.
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree In Computer Science/Statistics/Math or equivalent experience, M.S./Ph. D. a plus.
At least 3 years of experience in data science and quantitative analysis.
Proven experience in the application for search in ML/DL techniques, such as anomaly detection, prediction, and recommendation.
Master one of several mainstream machine learning development frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, MXNet.
Strong programming skills, master one or several mainstream programming languages, such as Java, Python, Go.
Able to troubleshoot and tune model performance issues.
Fast learner and eager to absorb new emerging technologies, and enjoy working with other team members with strong collaboration and communication skills."
"Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst,. - C13 #WorkNow#JobsThatMatter |","The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid).#Worknow#',"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst #Urgent #WorkNow,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Urgent / Software Engineer - C# / .Net / Java / SDLC / Cyber Security Exposure,"Responsibilities
Consultant will learn and understand the needs of the client and be the go-to person for the assigned SAST product - Checkmarx
Leads the SAST project with various Development teams of the client
Instils the right security mindset and culture across the Development team of the client
Reviews the security vulnerabilities found on the project along with the relevant development team of the client
Assists with vulnerability remediation, clarify questions, review work performed
Understands applications from a technical architecture and business goals perspective to apply Security best practices
Works on multiple tasks and support one or more project teams simultaneously
Requirements
Proficient with programming language e.g., C#, .NET, Java, etc.
Preferably possess Threat Modelling Knowledge and understand DevOps Integration
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please send your latest resume in MS WORD format to ref27(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd    
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448"
"Software Engineer, Associate, Singapore #UrgentHire","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 7 years of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
"Lead Development, - (2200017551) #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
The Developer will be responsible for managing and delivering any requirements specific to Channel Security Platform. The person who understands the priorities, manages the deliverables.
The Developer should work with to Channel Security Platform Technology Manager to provide the following operations on daily basis.
Work closely with Project team to ensure the required testing gets on time, with good communicating skills within team and with stake holders.
Knowledge in databases, data structures and collections and good understanding in environments, build, packaging and deployment.
Provide Support to Project team to address the non-productions issues which gets reported as an when the issue gets reported
Manage and participate in Daily Scrum calls and update the project status to Stake Holders and Scrum Master
Strong analytical skills with the ability to deep dive to drive solutions
Proven ability to take a step back and look at the macro view to connect the dots between requirements
Proven ability to perform under high pressure in a dynamic environment
Ability to work with cross functional teams across business and technology
Our Ideal Candidate
9 years of experience in Developement, Testing and automation practices in JAVA, Spring framework, Spring Boot, Hibernate, HikariCP, Oracle/Postgres/DB2 DB, Rest API with JSON,JMS,API Gateway
Knowledge on cryptography concepts(Asymmetric/symmetric cryptography, SSL/TLS handshake, key management in keystore/HSM)
knowledge in CICD integration and hands-on in devops tools (Bitbucket, Jenkins, SonarQube, Artifactory, etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Strong Development Experience in JAVA, Spring framework, Spring Boot, Hibernate, HikariCP, Oracle/Postgres/DB2 DB, Rest API with JSON,JMS,API Gateway
Must have some knowledge on cryptography concepts(Asymmetric/symmetric cryptography, SSL/TLS handshake, key management in keystore/HSM)
Experience in End to End DevOps pipeline Skills preferably with Openshift and Kubernetes and Experience with CI/CD and their pipelines
Expertise with container-based platforms (Docker, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Jenkins).
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Software Engineer, Analyst, Trade Surveillance - Singapore #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
"Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Anlayst, - (C12)##WorkNow#'#Urgent","Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Senior Java Software Developer, - Regulatory Reporting, Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #Immediate","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Medical authorities agree that being vaccinated is the best way to protect yourself, loved ones, colleagues and communities from COVID-19. To protect the health and safety of our employees, and for workforce planning purposes in line with the Ministry of Manpower’s guidance, only vaccinated employees are able to enter our offices. In light of this, in order for the successful candidate to be able to enter the office, they must be either fully vaccinated against COVID-19 (as defined by the Singapore Ministry of Health at the time of commencing employment) or be certified by a medical practitioner as being medically ineligible to be fully vaccinated.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Software Engineer - Vice President #Worknow #URGENT,"Job Description
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 10 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912. -#WorkNow #UrgentHire#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank. Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Finance Technology Software Engineer, Analyst #Worknow'","FRDC – Finance Technology Software Engineer
Job Description:
The Finance Risk Data and Controls (FRDC) Technology organization is seeking strong engineer who wants to join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products in Regulatory Reporting Technology function.
The ideal candidate enjoys building, supporting, and the evolution of software applications, and has a strong understanding of designing and building applications in a variety of technologies as well as manage communication with stakeholders.
In this role, a successful candidate will:
Manage and support a portfolio of production applications which includes vendor, in-house, on premise, and SaaS applications
Make sound architectural decisions around Regulatory Reporting application components
Identify gaps and weaknesses in existing applications and design and implement remediation of these gaps
Work to improve the stability of applications in the production environment
Ensure changes to the applications follow a disciplined change management processes including all documentation, reviews, and approval steps
Ensure adherence to design and coding standards
Define and execute test cases for quality of deliverables
Liaise with stakeholders from various teams which includes Finance, Corporate Controllers, Product Controllers within the region as well as global for all cycles (development, testing, implementation, post release)
Qualifications
BS/BA Degree in Computer Science/Finance or equivalent
Application architecture analysis and design
2 years or more of experience in SQL, preferable in Oracle PL/SQL
1 year or more in Python or Java or equivalent development experience
Hands on experience in writing complex SQL queries and defining DB objects.
Good Knowledge on Stored Procedures/Packages, Functions and Triggers
Applicant must have strong English and Mandarin written and oral communication skills to effectively liaise with our China stakeholders
Good Knowledge Unix and Shell scripting knowledge
Strong analytical & problem-solving skills
Familiar with Agile methodology
Able to work under pressure and tight timeline
Strong Excel knowledge
Windows OS
Source control tools, preferably Subversion"
"Analyst, - Fintech (WSP) - (2200019495). #Immediate' #JobsThatMatter","Role Responsibilities
Our Technology & Innovation (T&I) function is at the heart of shaping the bank for the future and serving our clients digitally across the globe.
We are responsible for the systems development and technology infrastructure of the Bank, defining, innovating, and implementing digital agendas across functions, especially in our client services.
Our team helps unlock new banking experiences for clients, while improving our operational effectiveness and enhance existing offerings.
We are focused on building your digital skills and adaptability necessary to be future-ready.
You’ll be exposed to a diverse portfolio of projects in your allocated domain will help to deliver efficiencies and automation, introduce global platforms, machine learning, and bring forth intelligent technology.
You’ll be constantly learning and sharing with your peers:
Creating and designing cutting edge tools and applications that will redefine the future of banking
Work in a truly Agile environment, as part of scrum teams that are striving to solve customer challenges
Play a critical role in client journeys that help us make faster decisions to enhance the end-to-end client experience and achieve outcomes that are most valuable to our clients
Our Ideal Candidate 
If you are passionate about technology and customer experience, and possess traits and experience most of the below, we’d love to hear from you:
Adaptive to changing situations and enjoy collaborating with global teams in a diverse multi-cultural environment.
Curious and open-minded.
Strong foundational knowledge of Algorithms, Data Structures, OOPs concepts and frameworks
Passionate for solving challenging problems and learning new skills, coding languages.
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to JavaScript (ReactJS, React-Redux, nodeJS), TypeScript, Python.
Experience in working with either front end and/or back-end technologies and frameworks.
Experience in one or more Cloud Technologies. 
About Standard Chartered  
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning 
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
AVP - Loans Java Sr Developer (Hybrid) #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
University Bachelor’s degree or other equivalent certification
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Senior Java Software Engineer, - Regulatory Reporting - Associate #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an accomplished Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done."
AVP - Apps Dev Programmer Senior Analyst (Openlink Endur)#'#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower-level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Has the ability to involve in Openlink endur development in Java/JVS/OC
Qualifications:
8+ years of relevant experience in Openlink development
Hands on Core Java / Java 8, JVS, OpenComponent / OC, design knowledge
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Frontend Engineer, - Autumn Venture - SC Ventures. #Immediate #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Senior Java Software Engineer - Associate #JPM #Urgent #Seekbetter #Immediate',"As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
As part of Banking Technology Engineering & Architecture Group, you will join the Solutions Delivery Team which is responsible for creating common value added services to be used across Banking by leveraging best in class SDLC processes and components/architecture. We will also establish common demand for services and provide managed services for applications across the estate.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree with at least 6 years of software engineering experience
Knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Successful contribution to software systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, global and collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages i.e. Java, React
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
A clear passion to deliver high quality products
Experience in message queue technologies i.e. Kafka, MQ preferred
Experience of Cloud Technologies including AWS, containers and Kubernetes is advantageous
Demonstrated experience of performing DevOps for platforms
Experience with Automated testing"
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547)","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software).
The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
Applications Developer Sr. Analyst #WorkNow#Urgent #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with Program Trading Technology Team on application development/enhancements for Equities Trading
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower-level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Core Java, Unix/scripting
Preferably knowledge of FIX protocol
Knowledge Sybase/Oracle is an added advantage
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Full Stack Developer, VP - Infrastructure Development, #Worknow #Worknow'","Job Description
As a Full stack Development professional, your knowledge in system design, application development, and testing will help your team deliver high-quality products in Data Domain.
As a member of our Infrastructure Development team, you'll dive right into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to developing and deploying large-scale infrastructure solutions that support JPMorgan Chase & Co.’s diverse and critical businesses. You'll be using the latest technologies, data management, and security practices in all aspect of software development. Critical thinking, clear communication, and collaboration are key to successful product delivery.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information technology, or related field
Provide technical expertise in Java, Springbok throughout the software lifecycle including design, implementation and delivery.
Exposure to Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages: Java, Spring Boot & Angular UI/UX.
Must have 10 years' experience as strong Java, Spring & UI/UX developer with very good understanding of framework architecture and Best Practices.
Good knowledge on Data products, Data pipelines, Data Engineering – Kafka would be required.
Working experience in framework technologies: REST Standards, JavaScript Frameworks, ES6 Standards.
Experience working with two or more from the following: database, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, information retrieval, networking, large scale software development, security software development
Understanding or have experience with agile and lean philosophies
Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills with clear communication
Ability to collaborate with different roles to achieve common goals
Development practices such test driven development. Well versed with API Swagger
Complete understanding of Source code branching with Bit Bucket, CI/CD Release Pipeline with Jenkins & Deployment tool."
Junior .Net Solutions Consultant,"Title: Junior .Net Solutions Consultant
My client is recruiting a junior .NET solutions consultant who is willing to learn and grow. Training and mentoring will be provided. If you are still looking to kick start your career and widen your knowledge and skills, click on the link below to apply now!
Responsibilities:
Assist in preparing solutions proposals and get buy-in from clients’ business
Develop custom codes using C#.NET for external integrations with DPA solutions
Assist Senior Consultants in applications’ support work
The ideal candidate:
Strong interest in applications solution design like Digital Process Automation (DPA) and Robotic Process Automation (RPA)
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
2 years of .Net development experience
Experienced in SQL Server programming (T-SQL)
Excellent communication skills
Undying passion in exploring new technologies usages and benefits
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
Active Advisory Full stack Developer --- Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #UrgentHire #Worknow,"The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
Senior Java Developer – Equity Systems #Immediate #Urgent',"Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
More than 10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Experience working with high volume, high throughput, and low latency trading systems (e.g. equities or FX), or similar type of low latency platforms in Java
In-depth understanding of the challenges in developing high-throughput, low-latency trading systems while meeting the highest standards in resiliency and scalability.
Exposure to remediate low-latency solution challenges using practical software and hardware techniques
FIX, distributed systems, messaging middleware (Solace, Tibco etc.) and IPC (inter process communication)
Experience in implementing trading strategies and Order management system development.
Understanding of market data and exchange protocol
Hands on development experience in Java
Network programming is a plus – TCP, UDP, sockets, multicast
Working knowledge of Linux and/or Unix
Knowledge of Messaging, TCP/IP, UDP etc
Working knowledge of Database (Oracle/Sybase will be a plus)
Working knowledge of Python, Perl and shell scripting will be a plus
Knowledge of FIX protocol will be a plus
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"GEM Technology - Java and Python Software Developer - AVP,","Position Overview
Details of the Division and Team:
GEM is a market leader for Emerging Markets offering client FIC products globally. It operates across more than 20 locations with hubs based in Singapore, London and New York and provides a comprehensive range of products and services in these markets.
GEM Connect is a client workflow automation ecosystem designed to address challenges across collections, payments, funding and FX in markets with capital restrictions, and will be servicing Corporate Bank and Fixed Income & Currencies business units in APAC and wider Emerging Markets. Using any combination GEM Connect components like account-less currency capability, cash balance APIs, digital documentation, rules-based FX execution tools or payment and hedge matching solution, Deutsche Bank will be able to provide a one-stop liquidity and FX management solution for its clients in EM markets such as India, Indonesia, Korea, Malaysia, Mainland China, Philippines, Taiwan and Thailand.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and wellbeing at its center.
You can expect:
Flexible benefits plan including virtual doctor consultation services
Comprehensive leave benefits
Gender Neutral Parental Leave
Flexible working arrangements
25 days of annual paid leave, plus public holiday & Flexible Working Arrangement
Your key responsibilities:
Responsibilities:
Collaborate and communicate openly; pairing with colleagues to write software and solve problems
Engage directly with business stakeholders to elicit requirements and ensure that the software delivered is fit for purpose
Technical analysis, solution design, developing, unit testing, code review, architecture and API documentation
Engage with QA to prepare infrastructure for integration and load testing activities
Deployment of the solution for SIT, UAT testing activities and for demonstration session to business stakeholders;
Production SL3 support
Your skills and experience:
Skills and experience:
Core Java, Collection Framework, Multithreading - 8+ years
Good hands-on experience on Python to develop open source ML models
Experience in Business-Driven development methodology and knowledge of BDD frameworks such as JBehave or Cucumber
Hands-on experience in at least one of the DevOps tools such as Bit bucket, Jenkins, Team City etc.
Hands-on experience building Micro services including writing Unit and Integration tests
Analytical thinker, team player and possess strong communication skills
Enable experimentation and fast learning approaches to creating business solutions
Familiar in the use of solution design tool
Soft skills:
The ability to solve complex problems
The ability to take responsibility for the task from start till full completion
Communicability, teamwork skills, the ability to work in international team;
Attention to details
Readiness to learn new technologies and approaches 
Role is required to be performed on-site at One Raffles Quay office. Relevant vaccination requirement applies.
How we’ll support you:
Flexible working to assist you balance your personal priorities
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career"
"GEM Technology, - Java and Python Software Developer - AVP,","Position Overview
Details of the Division and Team:
GEM is a market leader for Emerging Markets offering client FIC products globally. It operates across more than 20 locations with hubs based in Singapore, London and New York and provides a comprehensive range of products and services in these markets.
GEM Connect is a client workflow automation ecosystem designed to address challenges across collections, payments, funding and FX in markets with capital restrictions, and will be servicing Corporate Bank and Fixed Income & Currencies business units in APAC and wider Emerging Markets. Using any combination GEM Connect components like account-less currency capability, cash balance APIs, digital documentation, rules-based FX execution tools or payment and hedge matching solution, Deutsche Bank will be able to provide a one-stop liquidity and FX management solution for its clients in EM markets such as India, Indonesia, Korea, Malaysia, Mainland China, Philippines, Taiwan and Thailand.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and wellbeing at its center.
You can expect:
Flexible benefits plan including virtual doctor consultation services
Comprehensive leave benefits
Gender Neutral Parental Leave
Flexible working arrangements
25 days of annual paid leave, plus public holiday & Flexible Working Arrangement
Your key responsibilities:
Responsibilities:
Collaborate and communicate openly; pairing with colleagues to write software and solve problems
Engage directly with business stakeholders to elicit requirements and ensure that the software delivered is fit for purpose
Technical analysis, solution design, developing, unit testing, code review, architecture and API documentation
Engage with QA to prepare infrastructure for integration and load testing activities
Deployment of the solution for SIT, UAT testing activities and for demonstration session to business stakeholders;
Production SL3 support
Your skills and experience:
Skills and experience:
Core Java, Collection Framework, Multithreading - 8+ years
Good hands-on experience on Python to develop open source ML models
Experience in Business-Driven development methodology and knowledge of BDD frameworks such as JBehave or Cucumber
Hands-on experience in at least one of the DevOps tools such as Bit bucket, Jenkins, Team City etc.
Hands-on experience building Micro services including writing Unit and Integration tests
Analytical thinker, team player and possess strong communication skills
Enable experimentation and fast learning approaches to creating business solutions
Familiar in the use of solution design tool
Soft skills:
The ability to solve complex problems
The ability to take responsibility for the task from start till full completion
Communicability, teamwork skills, the ability to work in international team;
Attention to details
Readiness to learn new technologies and approaches 
Role is required to be performed on-site at One Raffles Quay office. Relevant vaccination requirement applies.
How we’ll support you:
Flexible working to assist you balance your personal priorities
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career"
Senior Engineer (IC Design) [Semicon/ East/ Up to $8.5k],"[Order Number: 2111-60489]
Responsibilities
Perform IC design development of products for FTDI products
Perform Verilog RTL design to meet product specifications and requirements
Perform front-end verification using UVM methodology
Work closely with Systems and Software engineers on FPGA verification
Any other ad hoc duties assigned
Requirements
5 years or above experience in the area of digital IC design and/or verification
Working experience from design to tape-out
Experience in Verilog RTL design and/or OVM/UVM verification methodology
Experience in using EDA tools from Cadence, Synopsys
Knowledge and working experience in one or more of the following:
Digital and mixed-signal design
USB interface products
Graphics processor and driver products
Knowledge in connectivity technology such as USB, WIFI, Bluetooth, RFID, NFC, GPS, UART, SPI, I2C
Project Management
At least Degree/Master in Electrical/Electronic Engineering
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified. However, rest assured that all applications will be updated to our resume bank for future opportunities
EA Personnel Name: Wong Slaine
EA Personnel Reg. no.: R2096245
EA License no.: 07C5771"
"Java Software Developer, Regulatory Reporting - Associate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Worknow","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting Technology team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an accomplished Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You will work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 3 years of experience in Java/J2EE, RDBMS or full stack development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Good to have - Some experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data or API/
Prior experience working as a Full Stack or backend developer on Enterprise Application
Knowledge in any cloud technology
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Banking experience is a plus but not mandatory
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done."
"Frontend Developer, CardsPal Venture, - SC Ventures* #Immediate #JobsThatMatter","About CardsPal by Standard Chartered
At CardsPal, we help you optimise your spending and maximise your savings.
We are an all-in-1 credit card comparison app in Singapore that shows you how to make the most of your cards to get the maximum benefits.
Personalise your money-saving experience based on the credit cards you own. We recommend you the best cards to use to earn the most cashback and rewards across multiple spending categories.
Role Summary
CardsPal is looking for a full stack developer to be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
The Role Responsibilities
The successful candidate will be the part of a start-up team building an innovative platform and app leveraging on data, analytics to drive the business. This is a rare opportunity for a self-driven, strong entrepreneurial spirit, start-up minded, solid and passionate developer to participate and contribute to a venture.
Participating in an exciting venture and be part of the team to develop the platform.
Collaborate closely with product designers with a focus on new feature design.
Be involved in the user experience design process, from wireframes and mockups through implementation and release.
Work closely with designers and product owner to define and implement elegant solutions to interesting problems.
Working closely with the design team to create a reusable component library.
Fast prototyping of new user interactions and iteration based on feedback from peers.
Provide post production tech support.
Hands-on experience with Android and iOS mobile Apps built on React Native, with occasional troubleshooting on cloud backend.
Technical Competencies
3+ years of solid experience in front-end development, with strong interest in backend technologies.
Fluent with HTML / CSS / Javascript.
Worked with Frontend Frameworks like React, Angular or Vue.
Strong software engineering and solution design experience is beneficial. 
Had experience working with React Native.
Experience with cloud technologies like AWS is a bonus
Experience collaborating on software projects with design and backend aspects
Experience working in agile project team.
Work in an iterative approach, driven by customer feedback and data insights.
Our Ideal Candidate
You deeply care about providing a great user experience to our users.
A keen learner with an ambitious and results driven personality, who loves to share with other engineers.
Pro-active and self starter who can work independently.
Work well as part of a team in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent communication, organisational and documentation skills."
Software Engr. (Service Governance) - Cloud Infrastructure*#.#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo. 
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The service governance team is responsible for the complete life cycle support and governance of the company's service system, constructing an industry-leading governance system. Our work includes but is not limited to: research and development of infrastructure, basic tools, service observation, traffic scheduling, capacity analysis, and chaos engineering. We support the rapid growth of TikTok and its affiliates under a globalized structure.
Responsibilities
Participate in the construction of the company's standardization system for R&D activities, and construct a safe and efficient R&D environment with a supporting toolchain system;
Build a complete governance product system, including service observation, capacity analysis, traffic scheduling, etc., to support various business governance scenarios;
Support the construction and evolution of the company's disaster recovery system, and help to promote and build the chaos engineering culture;
Focus on the trends of the service governance industry so as to promote the company's continuous growth.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field;
Proficiency with at least one programming language such as Go/Python/Java, good coding ability and style;
Familiar with cloud-native and microservice systems, such as Kubernetes, Serverless Computing, Service Mesh, Trace, etc.;
Familiarity with distributed systems and the related technologies including high availability, asynchronization, consistency, etc.;
Strong sense of responsibility and initiative, excellent problem solving, communication, and teamwork skills.
Preferred Qualifications
At least 3 years of relevant experience;
Development experience with private cloud PaaS/SaaS and related products;
Experience in full-stack development."
"Backend Engineer, Intelligent Video Creation #WORKNOW*#Immediate #JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
About TikTok:
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok global offices include Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo. Now we are building up an engineering team for the core TikTok video production in Singapore.
About Video Creation Team:
Our team's mission is to empower TikTok users to turn creativity into reality via videos. We build the core video creation product to support tens of millions of TikTok creators every day. All the viral props and effects you find on TikTok are developed by us, via close collaboration with TikTok AR effects and multimedia teams. Our goal is to build the world's best video creation software.
On this team, you will be working with our XFN partners to define a world-class video creation experience, designing the architecture of TikTok video creation tools and pipelines, and shipping cutting-edge features to take TikTok to the next level.
Collaborate with AR Effect team, Computer Vision team and Digital Video & Audio team to define a world-class video creation experience.
Learn and understand how Bytedance product works and help build end-to-end solutions.
.Design and implement large-scale backend systems that empower Bytedance video creation products.
Build world-class products, which combine usability, accessibility, elegance, performance, and maintainability. 5.Adopt automated and manual test strategies to ensure product quality.
Qualifications
Proficient in at least one coding language, including but not limited to Go, Java, Nodejs, C++.
Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities and limitations of frontend and server backend.
Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
Good communication and collaboration skills.
Experience building and maintaining server/back-end architecture for mobile or PC platforms.
Experience with backend components, including: Mysql, Kafka, RocketMQ, Redis etc..
At least 3 years of relevant experience"
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer #WorkNow#',"Responsibilities
Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
"Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting - Vice President #Immediate #UrgentHire'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting - Vice President #Immediate #UrgentHire'","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
Mobile Developer (Android),"Requirements:
We're looking for self-starting engineers with strong experience developing sophisticated applications. You will be Involved in end-to-end mobile application development life cycle.
Interested in building first-class product to solve real world problems
Experienced with various technologies, a fast learner and have a “get things done” mentality
Strong organizational skills and interpersonal skills and the ability to juggle conflicting requirements from many different stakeholders
Humble to embrace better ideas from others, eager to make things better, open to challenges and possibilities
Experience building complex applications for the Android using Kotlin/Java
Mobile application development at the user interface and system levels
Experience and good understanding on Test-Driven-Development (TDD), implement instrumented unit tests
Experience with MVVM, Reactive Patterns using RxJava/RxAndroid and the multi-module architecture
Experience in building real time graph, displaying real time data etc.
Willing to learn
#LI-JY2 #LI-Hybrid
Benefits
What you can expect from us?
We offer an attractive compensation package working in a cutting-edge field of Fintech.
Huge responsibilities from Day 1. Be the owner of your own learning curve.
The possibilities are limitless and depend on you.
You get to work in a very dynamic environment and be part of an international team.
You will get to have involvement in developing a brand new product from scratch alongside with a talented team.
Only shortlisted candidates will be contacted with information on the next steps of our application process."
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912. #WorkNow',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank. Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Specialist, IT Application (Full stack)","Responsibilities
Support multiple applications across various technologies and platforms
Participate and manage all phases of SDLC
Elicit, organize and translate business requirements into detailed technical functional and non-functional requirements
Facilitate user requirement sessions and user acceptance test with users
Deliver elements of system design including wireframe, data migration plan, integration plan, UI / UX design and other detailed deliverables for each SDLC phases
Understand existing system design for translating user requirements for change requests and implementing new functionality
Application programming, testing and implementation of application systems
Troubleshoot problem and provide long term and short term solution
Provide training to end users
Collaborate with cross functional teams to maintain efficiency and consistency for implementation of applications
Prepare and submit project progress report
Manage application change control and risk mitigation
Manage applications for compliance to IT standards and policies
Participate in internal and external system audit
Participate in RFQ / tender process i.e. tender specs including functional and non-functional specs, submission, clarification and evaluation
Work with vendor for outsourcing projects
Requirements
Degree / Diploma in Computer Science / Information Systems
Overall at least 5 years relevant IT experience including 2 successful projects in the role as application analyst or developer
Experience in hands-on programming (VB.net, Javascript, HTML5, Jquery, Swift, RESTful API, MS SQL, Outsystems). Any other development technology, would be added advantage
MS .Net Certified Programmer preferred
Knowledge on UI/UX design would be added advantage
Working knowledge of both waterfall and agile development methodology
Able to work as part of an effective team assisting and supporting team members
Keen learner, self-motivated team player, ability to multi-task across projects and priorities with strong communication and interpersonal skills
By submitting your application for this position, you consent to:
a. the collection, use and disclosure of your personal data by SBS Transit Limited and its subsidiaries (“the Company”) for the purposes of your application and potential employment with the Company, including disclosing such personal data to any of SBS Transit Limited’s subsidiaries, affiliates or related corporations (if necessary for processing of job application); and
b. SBS Transit Limited and its subsidiaries' retention of your personal data for 2 year for consideration of future job opportunities (where applicable) from the date of submission of application.
We regret to inform that only shortlisted applicants will be notified."
Senior Java Developer – Equity Systems #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
More than 10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Experience working with high volume, high throughput, and low latency trading systems (e.g. equities or FX), or similar type of low latency platforms in Java
In-depth understanding of the challenges in developing high-throughput, low-latency trading systems while meeting the highest standards in resiliency and scalability.
Exposure to remediate low-latency solution challenges using practical software and hardware techniques
FIX, distributed systems, messaging middleware (Solace, Tibco etc.) and IPC (inter process communication)
Experience in implementing trading strategies and Order management system development.
Understanding of market data and exchange protocol
Hands on development experience in Java
Network programming is a plus – TCP, UDP, sockets, multicast
Working knowledge of Linux and/or Unix
Knowledge of Messaging, TCP/IP, UDP etc
Working knowledge of Database (Oracle/Sybase will be a plus)
Working knowledge of Python, Perl and shell scripting will be a plus
Knowledge of FIX protocol will be a plus
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"Vice President, Senior Full Stack Developer - (Front Office Application), Wealth Management #Immediate","Job Description
The Wealth Management business has been on a transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a best in class experience. The Engage Technology team is partnering with our business in building and rolling out world-class solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner to build cutting edge technology solutions
The Engage team in APAC is specifically seeking a Vice President, Senior Full Stack Developer (Front Office Application) to join us on this journey. You will be responsible for driving and managing the technical delivery of key projects that are owned and driven by APAC but also delivering for the business globally. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners globally, as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. The role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building Web applications for desktop and/or native mobile platforms. Also, if you have a passion for cutting edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Advanced knowledge of architecture and design across all systems
Proficiency in multiple modern programming languages
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Turning epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts into technical designs and development
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services.
Responsible for executing clean code for complex designs that are in line with the architectural direction
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Have a keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Work with business and technology product owner on Product backlog prioritization
Work with business and technology product owner to drive program roadmap
Individual development contribution across most or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services and DB
Face off to and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including front-office business, product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Active involvement in supporting the platform across all environments, including production in a Devops model
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Finance
Minimum of 8 years industry experience in using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito, Hibernate, React
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Good to have:
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
"Vice President, - Senior Full Stack Developer (Front Office Application), Wealth Management #Immediate","Job Description
The Wealth Management business has been on a transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a best in class experience. The Engage Technology team is partnering with our business in building and rolling out world-class solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner to build cutting edge technology solutions
The Engage team in APAC is specifically seeking a Vice President, Senior Full Stack Developer (Front Office Application) to join us on this journey. You will be responsible for driving and managing the technical delivery of key projects that are owned and driven by APAC but also delivering for the business globally. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners globally, as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. The role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building Web applications for desktop and/or native mobile platforms. Also, if you have a passion for cutting edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Advanced knowledge of architecture and design across all systems
Proficiency in multiple modern programming languages
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Turning epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts into technical designs and development
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services.
Responsible for executing clean code for complex designs that are in line with the architectural direction
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Have a keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Work with business and technology product owner on Product backlog prioritization
Work with business and technology product owner to drive program roadmap
Individual development contribution across most or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services and DB
Face off to and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including front-office business, product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Active involvement in supporting the platform across all environments, including production in a Devops model
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Finance
Minimum of 8 years industry experience in using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito, Hibernate, React
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Good to have:
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
Software Engineer - Direct Custody Technology - #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Worknow,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
DCC Technology team is part of broader Custody technologies under Securities Services BU. We offer technology solutions for direct market connectivity to our clients for settlements and asset servicing. The technology stack is a good mix of in house and vendor platforms using open source technologies which gives a diverse exposure in terms of solution design and delivery management.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Required Skills/Experience
Bachelor's degree in Computer science, information technology
5 years of Software development hands on experience.
Advance knowledge of core Java code writing using the latest open source frameworks – i.e. Spring framework, Hibernate framework, MVC Framework
Understanding of technology architecture and ability to understand the complex system flows
Java/J2EE, JMS based messaging, Multi-threaded programming, JavaScript, JSP, AJAX, CSS.
Debugging skills – Java, web app and SQL debugging
Good knowledge of Oracle Database and SQL writing
Apache, Tomcat, Maven
Web Services
SQL performance tuning, web application performance analysis and tuning, analyzing performance metrics
Hands on experience on shell scripts
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Ability to conduct business analysis and comprehend functional requirements
Preferred Skills/Experience
Prior domain experience in settlements and asset servicing functions
Ability to articulate and present to business audience
Agile development experience.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
AVP - Apps Dev Programmer Senior Analyst (Openlink Endur) #WorkNow#' #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower-level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Has the ability to involve in Openlink endur development in Java/JVS/OC
Qualifications:
8+ years of relevant experience in Openlink development
Hands on Core Java / Java 8, JVS, OpenComponent / OC, design knowledge
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Anlayst (C12) #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"AWM - Senior Software Engineer, - Associate #UrgentHire #Urgent #Worknow #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or above
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Minimum of 6 years industry experience and Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Have a keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn. 
Experience with full-stack Java application development, including REST Web services, SpringBoot, and modern Javascript technologies such as ReactJS and/or Angular 
Micro service design patterns and exposure to Cloud based application development. Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage. 
Experience with SQL databases such as Sybase or Oracle and with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra and/or MongoDB 
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, etc. and exposure to event-driven design patterns. 
Experience developing with testing frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Selenium and Cucumber 
Knowledge and experience of SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven."
Mobile App Developer,"Responsibilities:
Perform continuous integration and delivery process for app delivery
Design, build and streamline app development
Design, implement and test product features and platforms
Work closely with internal and external stakeholders in delivering high-quality software through code reviews and mentoring
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Minimum 2 years of experience in native app development
In addition to your primary development environment, you also have sufficient implementation experience with the other platform.
Knowledge in REST, HTTP, Xamarin, Xcode will be an added advantage
Interested candidates who wish to apply for the advertised position, please click on the APPLY button below to send in your resume.
EA License No: 13C6305
Reg. No.: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Software Engineer (Project) - C# / .Net / Java / SDLC / Cyber Security Exposure,"Responsibilities
Consultant will learn and understand the needs of the client and be the go-to person for the assigned SAST product - Checkmarx
Leads the SAST project with various Development teams of the client
Instils the right security mindset and culture across the Development team of the client
Reviews the security vulnerabilities found on the project along with the relevant development team of the client
Assists with vulnerability remediation, clarify questions, review work performed
Understands applications from a technical architecture and business goals perspective to apply Security best practices
Works on multiple tasks and support one or more project teams simultaneously
Requirements
Proficient with programming language e.g., C#, .NET, Java, etc.
Preferably possess Threat Modelling Knowledge and understand DevOps Integration
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, kindly send your resume in MS WORD format to ref10(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or please click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Hooi Wai Man (Samantha)
EA Personnel Reg No: R21100062"
API Tech Lead Analyst #WorkNow #Urgent',"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
Senior Application Developer #WorkNow#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
VP-TL - Developer - (VOY1_SG_H&R) - #LetsGetToWork#Seekbetter,"About UOB
United Overseas Bank Limited (UOB) is a leading bank in Asia with a global network of more than 500 branches and offices in 19 countries and territories in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. In Asia, we operate through our head office in Singapore and banking subsidiaries in China, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand, as well as branches and offices.Our history spans more than 80 . Over this time, we have been guided by our values — Honorable, Enterprising, United and Committed. This means we always strive to do what is right, build for the future, work as one team and pursue long-term success. It is how we work, consistently, be it towards the company, our colleagues or our customers.
About the Department
The Technology and Operations function is comprised of five teams of specialists with distinct capabilities: business partnership, technology, operations, risk governance and planning support and services. We work closely together to harness the power of technology to support our and digital banking services and operations. This includes developing, centralising and standardising technology systems as well as banking operations in Singapore and overseas branches.
Job Responsibilities
The Developer is a Technical Specialist who will be responsible to review and sign-off various development aspects (e.g.: user experience, reliability, maintainability, security and performance).
He or must have strong command of the J2EE technology, and should be able to organise and drive technical discussion working with vendors remotely.
The successful candidate is expected to have at least eight of hands-on development working experience on various J2EE and Oracle technologies. 

Job Responsibilities
Conduct code review and guide vendor in developing quality software for FSCM program
Review UI/UX design, and ensure the code is web responsive and works with various devices
Reviews Java Script, Java Code, Oracle SQL leveraging variety of tools (e.g.: Sonar, Veracode, AWR) to cover multiple quality aspects (e.g.: user experience, reliability, maintainability, security and performance).
Monitor and man risks issues related to development quality and resolve them on timely fashion
Work as required to support production migrations, continuity testing, environment migration activities

Job Requirements
Exposure to web responsive design and expertise in front end technologies (Java Script, Ext JS, React JS)
Hands on expertise in J2EE technologies, JMS, Java 8, ing, Struts EJB
Oracle SQL development experience, able to troubleshoot database issues using AWR reports.
Expertise in technical solution design, architecture design patterns, modelling (UML, Visio)
Good understanding on OWASP development practices and tools like Veracode
Experience reviewing Sonar dashboard and drive technical debt reduction in code
Able to review vendor code and come up with high level design for better understanding of application architecture.
Proven coding proficiency through proctored online assessment (e.g.: Brain Bench Certification)
Understanding of Trade Finance Domain is an added advantage
Excellent communication skills both written and verbal
Ability to multi-task and perform well under pressure

Be a part of UOB FamilyUOB is an equal opportunity employer. UOB does not discriminate on the basis of a candidate's , race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, or mental disability, or other non-merit factors. All employment decisions at UOB are based on business needs, job requirements and qualifications. If you require any assistance or accommodations to be made for the recruitment process, please inform us when you submit your online application.Apply now and make a difference."
"Senior Software Engineer, - DevOps, – Standard Chartered nexus, (2200019763).* #JobsThatMatter","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
Software Engineer - Liquidity Technology #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter#JobsThatMatter',"As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products.
You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications and data feeds within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well as SQL and HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent experience
Minimum 8+ years of Software Development work experience
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Working proficiency in developmental tool sets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages  Java, JavaScript, SQL
Knowledge of Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST, AngularJS, UNIX shell scripting will be an added advantage
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka, will be an added advantage
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Software Engineer (Back End Developer), Singapore Global Network (1 year Contract)","The Singapore Economic Development Board (EDB), a government agency under the Ministry of Trade and Industry, is responsible for strategies that enhance Singapore’s position as a global centre for business, innovation, and talent. We undertake investment promotion and industry development, and work with international businesses, both foreign and local, by providing information, connection to partners and access to government incentives for their investments. Our mission is to create sustainable economic growth, with vibrant business and good job opportunities for Singapore. For more information on EDB, please visit www.edb.gov.sg
The Singapore Global Network (SGN) is a division in the Economic Development Board tasked to re-energise Singapore’s efforts in building a strong and extensive ecosystem of overseas Family, Friends, Fans (3F) for Singapore. SGN leads the Whole-Of-Government (WOG) effort to coordinate across agencies and strengthen our collective networks whose skills, affinity, and influence help build linkages to global business and talent communities; and enhance the international mindshare of Singapore as a leading globally connected city. For more information on SGN, please visit https://singaporeglobalnetwork.gov.sg/
Roles and Responsibilities:
As SGN builds and maintains relationships with individuals and organisations globally, its dedicated Product and Engineering team builds and maintains a digital infrastructure to support this global network backend. The team deploys and integrates digital products such as a centralised Client Relationship Management System (CRMS), Events Management Systems (EMS), Website, Membership portal and various data collection, validation and analytics tools.
The digital infrastructure engineer will work with the Product teams to do the following:
Developing the underlying digital technology stack.
Leverage latest serverless technologies and databases to achieve scale, ease of support, and security.
Ensuring quality of releases and debug issues, fix bugs, and identify bottleneck.
Ensuring that the application is secure.
Seeing through a project from conception to finished product.
Developing, troubleshooting, and monitoring API connections to existing products like CRMS, Web Portal, and EMS.
Designing, developing, and maintaining RESTful APIs.
Meeting both technical and business needs.
Implement DevOps and Continuous Integration/Continuous Development strategies to improve velocity and quality of development and operations teams.
Build, test, package and release software incrementally in an automated way to all environments including production.
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages.
Work in self-organising cross-functional Scrum teams.
Required Qualifications:
Proficient in back-end frameworks such as Node.js.
Strong collaboration skills, ability to partner and work effectively across teams and with business stakeholders.
Good communication skills, ability to articulate technology concepts, participate in discussions on requirements with stakeholders.
Proactive and self-motivated with the willingness to learn and has the ability to focus on priorities to deliver in a fast paced environment.
Singaporean Citizen / Singapore Permane'nt Residen't.
Other Preferable Qualifications and Responsibilities:
Relevant background in Business Information Systems (IS), Computer Science or related field, or equivalent related IT experience.
2- 3 years of experience in professional enterprise software development and have worked on one or more product teams utilising the Agile software development methodology.
Experience in designing software using Design Patterns and development practices such as Test-Driven Development, Pair Programming, Secured Coding etc.
Proficient in relational and non-relational databases including coming up with efficient data architecture.
Proficiency in other programming languages like SQL, Python, PHP, and C/C++.
Experience in leveraging on Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery tools to enable rapid delivery of value such as scripts for automated testing tools, scripts for configuration management.
Familiar with version control systems such as Git.
Experience in Docker and Kubernetes.
We review applications and interview on a rolling basis. Applicants can expect to receive an application outcome within 8 weeks of application date."
VP Compliance Technology - Java Application Developer [E-Communications Surveillance Technology] #Urgent #UrgentHire,"Job Description
The Corporate Compliance Technology organization is seeking strong application developer and reliability engineer who wants to join a fast-paced, high-energy team. The ideal candidate being a highly skilled individual contributor building, supporting and has a strong understanding of designing and building applications in a variety of technologies. In this role, a successful candidate will:
Work as part of a Scrum Team adhering to Agile principles
Work on automation in all phases of product development
Support a portfolio of home-grown applications
Work to improve the stability of applications in the production environment
Provide Level 2 and 3 production support to applications in production
Make sound architectural decisions around application components interfacing with a large number of other applications within and outside the firm
Identify gaps and weaknesses in existing applications and design and implement remediation of these gaps focused around automation
Migrate applications to new infrastructure and a standard CI/CD environment including on-boarding the applications to the standard tools for change management, source control, access management, and application monitoring
Ensure changes to the applications follow a disciplined and continuous change management processes including all reviews and approval steps
Ensure adherence to design and coding standards
Qualifications
BA/BS Degree in Information Technology or Computer Science
At least 10 years of work experience on application development
5 years’ experience in Java development with emphasis on Spring container specifically Spring bootstrap Micro Services
Experienced in working with cloud integration, implementation and deployments
5 years of experience in tier 2 and 3 production and operational support
Worked on integration automation
SQL knowledge
Experiences with batch, data-intensive processing and transfer including controls for ensuring the completeness of transferred data
Experience with source control tools, preferably GIT + BitBucket
Wrote PowerShell and/or Bash scripts"
2021 Code For Good - Singapore #Urgent #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter,"Code for Good
At our Code for Good event, we bring coders and non-profit organizations together to solve real-world technical problems. You will experience firsthand how we use technology to inspire change, foster inclusion and make a difference in our communities. Work alongside our tech experts. Meet our recruiting teams and experience what it’s like to work as an engineer at J.P. Morgan.
Event Date: October 8th – 9th, 2021
 Over the course of the event, you and your team will:
Develop a technology solution for a leading social good organization.
Get to work side by side with our expert J.P. Morgan Chase technologists
Be encouraged to come up with cutting-edge ideas that could make a difference for the people who need it most
Coders will be attending the event virtually and will require a personal device (laptop/desktop) participate. Further details and instructions will be provided to successful applicants
Ahead of the 2021 Code for Good Hackathon, we will run a bootcamp, release helpful resources, and host optional Q&A sessions to help you settle into a collaborative virtual environment and prepare for the big event. The CFG Bootcamp is designed to introduce you to key tools and platforms that will assist you in having a successful hack during the event, especially if you are new to the hackathon space.
Our Code for Good Hackathon is a pipeline for future internship and graduate opportunities.
We appreciate you taking the time to complete all the needed information in this application.
Eligibility: The Code for Good Hackathon (“Hackathon”) is open to individuals who are:
Computer Science and/or Engineering majors are preferred, while other majors may be considered
Pursuing degree qualification with solid academic background (Summer Internship)
Foundational knowledge of programming languages (e.g., Python, Javascript, Java, C++, C#), databases, data structures, and algorithms
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, collaborative environment
Relevant internship experience and demonstrated leadership in a school or community organization 
How to apply:
Please read the Official Rules before you start this application
Complete the online application by Sunday, September 26th, 11.59PM SGT
Selected students will be notified on a rolling basis via email with final event details"
"Software Engineer, Analyst, - Trade Surveillance, Singapore #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #UrgentHire'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
Software Application Engineer (Perm/Hybrid Arrangement/5 Days),"Job Title: Software Application Engineer (Perm/Hybrid Arrangement/5 Days)
Industry: Science & Technology
Salary: SGD 3,500 - 6,000
Location: South East
About Company:
Our Client is a Japanese company, has been incorporated in Singapore for more than 20 years supporting wide range of Information Technology Services to Japanese customers whose business is located in Asia. They are specialized in designing and building customized software applications and databases which are used to automate the business process to increase efficiency.
Job Description:
- Maintain and implement improvements on our software application products
- Support Project Leader with system design and development activities
- Provide our customers with system maintenance and support
- Perform data analysis and fine-tune SQL performances to improve system performance
Job Requirements:
- Diploma in Computer Engineering/ Computer Science
- Advanced SQL knowledge
- Preferably some knowledge in C#.Net
- Understanding of business processes or operations workflow in finance, manufacturing, trading or service industries
- Ability to work independently and as well as in a team
- Good communication skill & have spirits to challenge
- Preferred those can start immediately
Interested applicants are invited to submit their resume via clicking the apply button.
JointHire Singapore Pte Ltd.(EA License No.: 17C8920)
Ivy Chin (Registration No.: R21100604)"
Backend Software Engineer - Customer Service Platform,"TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Customer Service Platform (CSP) is a team that integrate the product technology resources of the company's internal customer service system. Our mission is to provide users with efficient self-service solutions and provide agents with convenient tools so as to improve customer service experience.
Responsibilities:
Develop large-scale software systems that powers TikTok app;
Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the product;
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high quality work in rapid product development.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience in Computer Science or related technical fields;
2+ years of coding experience with a general purpose programming language (ie. Java, C/C++, Go, Python);
Demonstrated knowledge of Redis/MySQL/Elasticsearch/Druid/Spark Streaming;
Experience working on distributed cloud services;
Understanding of algorithms, data structures, and their time and space performance;
Preferred Qualification:
Good understanding of large scale backend service design."
#Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer - (21405806) #Immediate,"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
"Software Engineer, Liquidity Technology, Associate - 210124096 #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications and data feeds within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well as SQL and HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 3 years of Software Development work experience
Proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, JavaScript, SQL
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST, AngularJS, UNIX shell scripting
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
#Program Trading Senior Developer | (Citibank) #Urgent,"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with Program Trading Technology Team on application development/enhancements
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Core Java, Unix/scripting
Preferably knowledge of FIX protocol
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Technical Lead, - (2200017771) #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Focus on developing and delivering the technology roadmap for product
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive the technology strategy implementation within the team on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Stakeholders
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks and obsolescence so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Our Ideal Candidate
13 Years of experience in application development using Java and Advance Technologies tool.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles and coding standards.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology, plus adherence to VX principles
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Able to identify and drive compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Good experience in setting up and managing the delivery team in various location
Very good presentation and documentation skills.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, that also includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching etc.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Understanding of deploying microservices/API, cloud solutions and experience in integrating public cloud into traditional hosting/delivery models with a specific focus on AWS
Understanding and experience on core Java (Java 8 or higher), core Spring frameworks and experience in using design patterns
Understanding and experience on React, Redux, JavaScript MVC patterns / frameworks and CSS strategies
Understanding and experience on developing cloud native microservices using frameworks such as Spring boot, Spring cloud
Understanding and experience in working on Relation and non-Relation DBs (Progress, Oracle, Cassandra, MongoDB)
Understanding and knowledge on Implementing automated testing platforms, unit tests, and CICD
Understanding and knowledge on code versioning tools, such as Git, Bitbucket
Understanding of container platform, such as Docker and Kubernetes, in particular similar offerings by cloud providers such as AWS
Familiar and working experience with Ansible, Jenkins, Terraform
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Senior Java Analyst Developer - (Hybrid).#Urgent #WorkNow'#UrgentHire,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
Tech Lead Analyst - Java. #Urgent',"Global FX and Local Markets (FXLM) is a dynamic and high-performing division of Citi’s Markets business. The Tech group within FXLM is a Sales-Product Management-Product Development division headquartered in London, and its development & support teams are located in Chennai. This team manages mission-critical applications that drive deal booking, risk management, eCommerce and analytical applications across multiple asset classes - Foreign Exchange (FX), Money Markets (MM), Fixed Incomes (FI) and Derivatives.  The team also provides production support for the various applications and the infrastructure that they run on. The unit in Chennai is led by the Business Head who reports to the Head of FXLM in London. The Heads of Development, Production Support, Infrastructure, Administration and Business Management report to the Business Head.
We work on business critical high availability application solutions for the FXLM business that are deployed across 80+ countries and power our global FX & Local Markets business. Our applications are considered amongst the best-in-class within the industry, with our eCommerce and analytical products continuing to win industry awards year after year.
As part of an expansion, the team is looking to hire top-performing technologists with proven track record at Team Lead level, reporting to the Development Project Manager.
Key Responsibilities:
Take ownership for delivering/maintaining front/back-office applications
Plan and coordinate end-to-end project within tight timelines and meeting the business expectation.
Own the entire lifecycle of the development project
Plan the project & Prepare the required documentations
Coordinate with business analysts & user communities to define requirements
Oversee technical design : Define the product scope, product functionality, look, feel and performance, deliver what the clients need while adhering to overall product architecture & organisation standards
Guide the developers and the team in ensuring quality deliverables.
Coordinate functionality & performance testing and provide continuously improved product experience
Actively assist Business Analysts and Support team in rolling out the product to our global user community
Manage the interfaces with various external groups – e.g. upstream & downstream applications, data centre & related services and various process/control functions.
Play a hands-on role during all phases of the lifecycle including plan, code reviews, testing and support
Motivate, mentor and lead technical teams, evaluate their delivery, guide the members to deliver quality output with responsible delegation and build a high performance team
Together with the partner teams, user community, business analysts and Tech management contribute to innovative & best-in-class solutions for our business
Development Value:
This position gives an excellent opportunity for the selected candidate to play a significant role in an exciting and critical business within Citi. As a member of our highly acclaimed Technology team, this role provides the opportunity to participate in and shape the expansion and pre-eminence of our Business working together with our team of highly skilled technologists. The opportunity to work in back-office application space spanning multiple asset classes in a high-velocity & high availability environment is, of itself, an exciting proposition. We believe it is even more special to do this as part of Citi, a premier financial institution that is one of the biggest and best in the market, and as a part of our team that has a high visibility for our work both inside our larger organisation as well as in the global Capital Markets world. The position will enable you to leverage Citi’s incomparable geographical reach, product richness, and engineering expertise and to translate these into a successful and top-of-the-class product offering for our customers.
Knowledge/Experience:
12+ years hands on experience
Strong Knowledge in one of the project management methodologies
Experience in designing and implementing Multi-tier applications
Excellent analytic & problem solving skills
Excellent knowledge in troubleshooting, performance tuning and best practices
Experience in Messaging, failover designing and recovery planning
Experience in delivering high quality applications
Experience in project risk identification techniques, mitigation and escalation
Familiar with all phases of the systems lifecycle, from analysis, design and development through to support
Experience in developing performance sensitive multi-tier Java/JEE applications
Knowledge of the FX/MM/FI market and products is very desirable
Skills:
Strong interpersonal and articulation skills (spoken and written)
Excellent persuasive, influencing and negotiation skills
Outstanding analytic and problem solving skills; innovative and solutions oriented
Technical
Essential:
Excellent knowledge in Java (JDK 1.7 or more) Excellent knowledge experience with JMS, JEE, Jsp, Servlets, Struts 2.0 and SQL/PLSQL Basics
Java performance tuning, Threads, Collections
Knowledge of any application server
Desirable
Any Project Management Tool
Messaging middlewares
Spring, SWING
Oracle11g
Weblogic server/App server administration
H5
Beneficial:           
MQ/Tibco
Flexcube, Flex PP etc.
Qualifications:
Graduation/Post Graduation qualifications in Computer Engineering (preferable) or any Engineering stream with a very good academic record throughout.  
A high degree of Analytical ability and Quantitative skills is desirable
Competencies:
Innovative and Positive ‘Can Do’ attitude
Ability to make effective judgements on available data / knowledge
Planning and Organising – Ability to identify the steps to be taken to achieve objectives
Resilience – Used to working towards tight deadlines, under pressure and using appropriate coping methods to stay focused
Accountability –self start on goals and achieve targets
Strong team orientation and commitment to overall team success; willing to go above and beyond to ensure team success; intense customer focus and commitment to driving quality"
Frontend Developer (ReactJS),"Responsibilities:
Design and develop user interfaces using ReactJS best practices.
Adapt interface for modern internet applications using the latest front-end technologies.
Write codes using JavaScript, CSS, and HTML.
Develop product analysis tasks.
Make complex technical and design decisions for AngularJS projects.
Develop e application codes and unit tests in ReactJS, Java Technologies, and Rest Web Services.
Requirements:
Proficient in TypeScript-based front-end web application platforms like Angular 2 and above
Experience with Highcharts
Experience with data-driven web development, including excellent knowledge of JSON and AJAX
Experience building and maintaining REST microservices
Knowledge of code versioning tools such as Git
Experience with ReactJS for at least 2 years
Experience with DevOps tools is a plus
Interested candidates please click on APPLY button.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
"API Tech Lead Analyst, #Urgent#WorkNow'","Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
#Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer - 21405806. #Immediate' #UrgentHire,"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
Senior Java Developer / Java Tech Lead#. #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
Job Summary:
Global Domestic and International Settlements platform architect deeply involved in design and implementation of new Operations Solutions platform (OpSo). This is to support the consolidation of both domestic and international legacy clearing/settlement platforms into the new age TMZ (Trade Manager Zone) platform. Highly experienced and extremely hands-on technologist building multiple franchise critical programs working closely with senior business stakeholders, Operations staff and other technology partners. This will require a clearly demonstrated experience in reengineering large-scale enterprise applications with constant interactions across multiple organizations including the Front Office Business, Middle Office, Finance and Technology. The successful candidate should have excellent communications skills, while extremely hands-on exposure to the upcoming and trending technologies including Big Data, Micro Services and the Container Technologies to support highly scalable and real-time deployments.
Job Description:
It is a critical senior technology role in the Markets Operations Technology organization, responsible for delivering state of the art engineering solutions and ensuring alignment/coverage for global Strategy and Book of Work. The candidate is expected to lead global DevOps teams, perform current state and future state analysis and work with the development team to deliver the most optimal architectural solution. The individual will work very closely with Front Office, Middle Office and Back Office Operations & Technology and must have a successful track record in handling large scale enterprise platforms. The candidate must have consistently demonstrated strategic and forward thinking vision.
The individual will be highly skilled in various new technologies, provide clear direction and insight. The candidate should have an established track record of innovation and R&D in the large scale implementations. The candidate must oversee and actively contribute to developing scalable architectures and data models aligned with the firm’s Enterprise Data Strategy to offer world-class client services and improve revenue streams.
Duties & Responsibilities:
Provide senior technology design and implementation leadership in managing large enterprise platforms.
Expert in orchestrating large scale, enterprise platform architecture roadmaps.
Implementations of complex back office applications with automated CI and CD pipelines on large-scale container platform clusters using Java, Docker, MongoDB, Elastic, AMQP, Kubernetes & Open Shift.
Rapid troubleshooter in investigating complex architectural defects & offer robust implementation solutions.
Forward thinking in terms of automation in order to provide direction/suggestions for productivity improvements.
Should provide strategic documentation w/r/t roadmaps, process flows, etc.
Ensure resolution of day-day project issues and conflicting workload priorities, escalation as required.
Report on roadmaps, next steps and issues/risks to stakeholders and sponsors in line with Citi standards.
Qualifications:
Knowledge, Skills and Experience Required:
Must have exceptionally strong delivery tech track. 8-10 years of proven delivery record of large scale, real-time enterprise platforms of high trade volume especially in the back office clearing and settlement environments.
Expert knowledge in diverse financial products - FX, Equities, OTC and Listed Derivatives, Rates/Credit and Commodities. Very strong design and delivery experience in Front, Middle and Back Office technologies is a must. In depth knowledge of integrating technologies and platforms and understanding dependencies in support of a world-class client experience.
Expertise in niche large scale container technologies on micro services based environments. Architect monolithic applications into re-usable and scalable micro services.
Strong hands on experience on Java, Python, Docker, Kubernetes, Open Shift and Spring Boot. Robust understanding of API Management and Gateways. Messaging environments – EMS and RabbitMQ.
Experience in Reactive programming and Event driven architecture is a plus."
"AWM Software Engineer, Associate #Immediate #Seekbetter","Job Description
As an experienced member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Wealth Management Global Operations Technology team in APAC is specifically seeking a senior development team member for building a new tax platform. As a technologist, you will be responsible for developing functionality for key projects that are owned and driven by APAC, but delivering for the business globally. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. As a full-stack technologist, the role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building applications with expertise on modern development practices. If you have a passion for bleeding edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
Key Responsibilities:
Turning epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts into technical designs and development
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services.
Responsible for executing clean code for complex designs that are in line with the architectural direction
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global technology team.
Active involvement in supporting the global platform across all environments, including production in a devops model
Have a keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Experience with full-stack Java application development, including REST Web services, SpringBoot with minimum 7 years of experience in software development.
Micro service design patterns and exposure to Cloud based application development.
Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Experience with SQL databases such as Sybase or Oracle and with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra and/or MongoDB
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as Kafka,MQ, JMS, etc. and exposure to event-driven design patterns.
Experience with distributed caches such as GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast, etc.
Experience developing with testing frameworks such as Junit,Fitnesse, Mockito, Cucumber and Selenium
Knowledge of Model driven development
Knowledge and experience of SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven.
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends such as NoSQL and Design Pattern and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
J.P. Morgan Asset & Wealth Management delivers industry-leading investment management and private banking solutions with client assets of $4 trillion. Asset Management provides individuals, advisors and institutions with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes through our global network of investment professionals. Wealth Management helps individuals, families and foundations take a more intentional approach to their wealth or finances to better define, focus and realize their goals. 
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
Digital Post-Trade - Full Stack Developer #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Job Description

As a Full Stack Developer of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems.
1 year working in Software Development 
Knowledge in one or more of the following technologies:
Core Java Fundamentals, Java 8+, Spring, Spring Boot, REST Web Services and testing frameworks such as Junit, Cucumber, etc
Demonstrable ability to build applications in React, and have understanding of the core Javascript language, up to the current ECMAScript spec. Able to write useful tests using industry-standard frameworks like jest and react-testing-library
CSS and HTML: semantic HTML, CSS optimization and, preferably, Javascript-based styling solutions (e.g., material-ui styles)
Microservices and Cloud, containers with Kubernetes orchestration
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle, MySQL and NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, MongoDB, etc
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Understanding of architecture and design principles
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Preferred skills/experience:
BPM and Workflow Engines experience is a plus"
Technical Lead (Java),"Responsibilities
Lead and manage a small team of developers to deliver the modules to develop web-based application systems
To perform requirement analysis and oversee the implementation of architectures of the project scope.
Participate in the design and development of web applications based on company product (J2EE-based)
To conduct unit testing using automated unit test frameworks and identify and address possible risk by conducting mitigation action planning.
Conducting configuration of your own work or from the team and assess the technical impact of multiple technologies/strategies.
Using coding standards and best practices to ensure quality.
Contribute as a team member to operational, integration, or application architecture requirements, design, implementation, or on-going operations deliverables.
Requirements
Candidate must possess at least a Diploma/Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 2 years of relevant experience in JAVA/J2EE Technologies.
At least 2 years of experience writing code using languages such as (but not limited to) J2EE, Java, PL/SQL.
Some team leading experience.
Must have Hands-on experience with Java Struts, Spring, and Hibernate enterprise frameworks.
Worked with Version Control Systems like SVN (Subversion), GIT.
Minimum experience of 3 or more full SDLC for web application projects.
Interested candidates please click on APPLY button.
EA License No.: 13C6305
Reg No: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid).#Urgent#.#Worknow,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
AWM Java Software Engineer - Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #Seekbetter',"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Brokerage Derivatives Trading & Regulations Technology team develop applications for end to end trade lifecycle management including trade capture and control workflow to position booking, trade reporting and confirmations. As a senior software engineer in the team, you will be part of multi-year program, working alongside diverse team in Singapore globally aligned with business stakeholders redefining the entire booking flow for Derivatives in the Private Bank.  
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Strong Java Development skills with 7+ years of experience in solving business problems having exposure to performance tuning, low latency, and multithreading 
2+ years of experience with big data tools Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Strong Agile development background and experience with TDD/BDD concepts and testing skills 
Strong problem-solving skills and understanding of data structures & algorithms
Some exposure to Cloud (AWS / Cloud Foundry) would be needed to succeed in the role
Some experience in data modeling, visualization, and reporting techniques like QlikSense
BS/BA degree
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
"Lead, - DevOps #Immediate #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shiftleft(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below:
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Understanding and translating Product roadmaps to the team
Define and improve the WoW for the product.
Engage different stakeholders to support and sync inorder to deliver the product.
Own the BAU and enhancement of the platform.
Our Ideal Candidate:
10+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 8 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Highly skilled in breaking down work and resource allocation.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation.
Skilled in translating the leader vision statement into Product Features and Controls.
Highly effective in creating Product Roadmaps in sync with Stakeholder teams.
Strong problem-solving skills and Self-Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997) #Immediate #UrgentHire,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid)#Seekbetter#Urgent,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Digital Post-Trade, Full Stack Developer #Seekbetter","Job Description
As a Full Stack Developer of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems.
1 year working in Software Development 
Knowledge in one or more of the following technologies:
Core Java Fundamentals, Java 8+, Spring, Spring Boot, REST Web Services and testing frameworks such as Junit, Cucumber, etc
Demonstrable ability to build applications in React, and have understanding of the core Javascript language, up to the current ECMAScript spec. Able to write useful tests using industry-standard frameworks like jest and react-testing-library
CSS and HTML: semantic HTML, CSS optimization and, preferably, Javascript-based styling solutions (e.g., material-ui styles)
Microservices and Cloud, containers with Kubernetes orchestration
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle, MySQL and NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, MongoDB, etc
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Understanding of architecture and design principles
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Preferred skills/experience:
BPM and Workflow Engines experience is a plus"
Senior Java Developer - Rates Derivatives Structured Pricing#. #JobsThatMatter #Urgent',"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Working experience in enterprise application development using JAVA and it's peripheral systems/frameworks/technologies.
Working experience in middleware/messaging technologies like Solace/Kafka
Experience in developing microservices, and know how in cloud native API development.
Knowledge in cloud technologies like Dockers, Kubernetes, Openshift etc.
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Senior Java Developer - Rates Derivatives Structured Pricing.-- #Urgent #JobsThatMatter#WorkNow,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Working experience in enterprise application development using JAVA and it's peripheral systems/frameworks/technologies.
Working experience in middleware/messaging technologies like Solace/Kafka
Experience in developing microservices, and know how in cloud native API development.
Knowledge in cloud technologies like Dockers, Kubernetes, Openshift etc.
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Software Engineer (Automation/ Semiconductor /PLC),"(Senior) Systems Engineer/ Software Engineer (MNC – PLC/C++)  
Job Description: 
The design and development of our Inspection and Metrology machines.
Create automated tests.
Develop and maintain supporting tooling.
write PLC level test sequences for mockup validation and data collection
Job Requirements:
MS degree or BS degree in electro-mechanical, electronics, software or mechanical engineering.
Programming skills (PLC controllers, C, C++ Python, VBA, …)
Travel required. 
For interested applicants, kindly send your resume in Word/PDF format including the following in your resume to: https://rrecruiter-pte-ltd.breezy.hr/p/7301e221defd-automation-software-engineer-automation-semiconductor-plc
1. Current Salary
2. Expected Salary
3. Availability
4. Reason for leaving
Thank you for your application and we regret that only shortlisted applicants will be notified
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have agreed & consented to us collecting, using, retaining & disclosing your personal information to prospective employers with the services provided by us.
EA (18C9514/R1324924)"
FullStack Engineer* #Urgent #UrgentHire,"We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Continually ideate, scope, develop, deliver, test and iterate features for the constantly evolving API Platform.
Ensure appropriate levels of automation are adopted (build, deploy, configure, validate, monitor).
Business
Lead planning, design and implementation of technical solutions for global internal and external customers.
Represent the bank technically at industry, regulatory API forums and workshops with external partners.
Processes
Liaise with other global technology, data, operations, compliance teams to execute.
Follow a structured approach to software delivery within the team
Advocate best practice release and change management protocols for developments consisting of multiple streams.
People and Talent
Take ownership and accountability of squad's deliverables.
Be a positive contributor to team culture and constructive feedback to peers and partner teams
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Our Ideal Candidate
Experience of 2+ years in IT industry
Proficient in Java 8+ with a good knowledge of its ecosystems
Good knowledge of Java, JS, Spring, SpringBoot, SpringBatch, and technologies around it.
Good knowledge of frameworks such as ReactJS and EmberJS, RESTful APIs, HTML and CSS.
Proficient understanding of code versioning and CICD tools like Git or Bitbucket, Jenkins, Ansible, Maven, Gradle
Knowledge and experience in Container Infrastructure such as Openshift (OCP), Kubernetes, Helm, AWS, Terraform.
Monitoring and Tracing using tools such as Sysdig, AppDynamics or Elastic stack
Experienced working in an Agile environment with globally distributed teams.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
RESTful APIs, SpringBoot, Java 8+
CICD tools like Git or Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Openshift (OCP), Kubernetes, AWS, Terraform.
JS, ReactJS or EmberJS or similar"
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Anlayst (C12)#. #UrgentHire #Urgent,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
IOS Software Engineer-TikTok (Social) Singapore -- #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Team Intro
We are the messaging team on TikTok. Our team's mission is to facilitate meaningful user connections through TikTok's messaging experience, which is still in its infancy. We achieve our mission by building and shipping tools that help our users more easily connect and share the things they care about.
We are looking for passionate mobile software engineers to join us and help contribute to our aim of helping users explore and discover the world's creativity, knowledge and moments that matter in everyday life, all while empowering everyone to be a creator directly from their smartphones.
Responsibilities:
Design, implement the new-user features of our mobile application.
Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a world-class mobile experience.
Analyse and optimize iOS applications for efficiency and performance.
Promote robust and maintainable code, clear documentation, and deliver high quality work on a tight schedule.
Qualifications
BS/MS degree in Computer Science or equivalent majors with experience in native iOS development.
Strong understanding of software development principles, capabilities and limitations of iOS platform.
Proficiency in Objective-C or Swift.
Ability to understand and debug large and complex code bases.
Good team communication and collaboration skills.
Passion and experience building consumer-facing products is a huge plus; We would love to hear about apps you've developed!
Preferred Qualification
Minimum 3 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997) #UrgentHire,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
URGENT / Firmware Engineer (C++ / Peripherals / Embedded System),"Highlights:
MNC, Manufacturing Industry
Great career progression
Great remuneration and benefits
Friendly environment, work life balance
Job Descriptions:
Design, develop and perform system/software verification & validation on embedded systems
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
Develop system on gateways and embedded controllers system communicating over wire and wireless channels
Conduct design review, bug fix and update/create design documentation
Work with other teams to implement and test on various devices for interconnectivity.
Requirements:
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic) or equivalent.
At least 3 year(s) of working experience in firmware development
Extensive experience in Embedded Programming using C/C++ in Embedded Linux and MCU
Good experience with various communication interface (peripherals) and protocols (especially SPI, I2C, UART, MODBUS TCP/IP and RS232/RS485)
Experience in wireless communication system/protocols eg. Bluetooth, Zigbee, Wi-Fi, Lora will be an advantage
Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively
Flexible and willing to accept a change in priorities as necessary
Good interpersonal communication and documentation/presentation skills
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, please send your latest resume to ref19(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd      
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Lim Dick Sern (Dick Sern)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22106832"
Backend Software Engineer - TikTok Content Discovery (Location) #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
TikTok is one of the fastest growing apps in the world, and we are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users enjoy their time on TikTok, earn trust in privacy protection, and more.
TikTok Location Team's goal is to deliver user-facing products based on the location that connects people with places, localized content, and service in the real world around the globe.
Develop large-scale software systems that power TikTok app.
Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability, performance and reliability of the product.
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to deliver high quality work in rapid product development.
Qualifications
BS/MS Degree in Computer Science or related major.
Experienced in building backend services for large-scale consumer-facing applications.
Proficient in at least one of the following languages: Go, Python, Java, C++.
Deep understanding of computer architectures, data structures and algorithms.
Have good team communication and collaboration skills.
Minimum 3 - 5 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engineer, Liquidity Technology, - Associate (210124096) #JobsThatMatter,","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications and data feeds within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well as SQL and HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 3 years of Software Development work experience
Proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, JavaScript, SQL
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST, AngularJS, UNIX shell scripting
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Software Engineer, Liquidity Technology, Associate, 210124096 #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications and data feeds within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well as SQL and HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 3 years of Software Development work experience
Proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, JavaScript, SQL
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST, AngularJS, UNIX shell scripting
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Frontend Engineer, - Autumn Venture - SC Ventures. ** #Immediate'","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter #Worknow","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
VP Commodities Risk C# Developer#.'#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
Background
The role is for a VP lead developer/analyst within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Responsibilities
Work directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast-moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Strong experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Some knowledge of risk processes ( Front Office or downstream ).
Ideally experience of working with quant libraries
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred.
Knowledge of Front office trading (preferably Commodities) and investment banking experience preferred.
Team leading and stakeholder management potential."
Software Engineer (App Engine / PaaS) Cloud Infrastructure #Urgent #JobsThatMatter*,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
Relying on the cloud native environment, PaaS team creates a simple and easy-to-use service hosting platform for developers, improving research and development efficiency whilst reducing service maintenance costs. PaaS comes from a service perspective, connecting developers with the cloud native environment, shielding developers from the learning costs of kubernetes, and providing functions such as service hosting, code release, capacity adjustment, as well as operation and maintenance governance.
PaaS has been integrated into our development ecosystem, helping to build service discovery, quota management, access control, monitoring, alarm, and log transmission. At present, our PaaS platform has hosted most of the company's online services and is in a leading position in the industry in terms of the number of services and cluster size. We look forward to those who are interested in challenging tasks and are willing to embrace cloud native computing.
Responsibilities
Design and develop application engines serving billions of requests;
Design TikTok and its affiliates' business-oriented architecture, and construct an efficient online/offline service hosting platform;
Provide solutions for internal product lines, and integrate with business-oriented frameworks;
Design and develop key components of PaaS.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or a related field;
Good programming habits and proficiency in Go/Python;
Practical experience with large-scale distributed system development and maintenance;
Excellent modeling and problem solving skills;
Familiarity with microservice architecture and microservice governance;
Familiarity with the best practices of R&D process.
Preferred Qualifications
At least 3 years of relevant experience;
Experience with cloud computing development;
Familiarity with Docker, Kubernetes, GAE, SAE, etc.;
Experience with full stack development and private cloud platform components."
DevOps Engineer,"Responsibilities
Map business requirements to software design and implementation with a focus on improving operational readiness for web-based applications
Own release process, implement best practices for CI/CD across multiple systems and environments
Develop, architect, and introduce improvements to a multi-team build/test/deploy system
Research new development technologies and tools that can help us automate and scale systems
Develop automation systems to manage and monitor cloud infrastructure
Responsible for the integrity of the software build and deploy processes and overall quality of code versioning and integration across development, test and production environments
Contribute to the improvement of infrastructure and process security posture
Manage disaster recovery process by creating and testing procedures for backup and restore
Advise on infrastructure billing and cost optimization
Requirements
Possesses strong attention to detail
Ideally someone who possesses strong communication skills who has dealt with and managed stakeholders within a multinational organization
Solid experience with a cloud service provider, AWS strongly preferred
Experience with containerization, container orchestration, microservices - Docker, Kubernetes (K8s), Helm
Solid experience with release management and CI/CD e.g. Jenkins, Github Actions, Ansible
Familiar with GNU/Linux, and the ecosystem.
Basic networking concepts - subnets, firewalls, load balancers, VPNs, DNS, etc.
Familiar with monitoring/logging
On-hand programming experience, e.g. Lisp, C/C++, Rust, Python, Javascript and Java
Nice to Have
Possesses a solid software development background
Certifications, e.g. AWS, RHCE, RHCSA, ITIL, CISA, CCNA
Familiar with Infrastructure as Code / configuration management tools e.g. Terraform, ansible, Kubernetes etc
#LI-Hybrid #LI-JN1
Benefits
What you can expect from us?
We offer an attractive compensation package working in a cutting-edge field of Fintech.
Huge responsibilities from Day 1. Be the owner of your own learning curve.
The possibilities are limitless and depend on you.
You get to work in a very dynamic environment and be part of an international team.
You will get to have involvement in developing a brand new product from scratch alongside with a talented team.
Only shortlisted candidates will be contacted with information on the next steps of our application process."
Technical Design / Delivery Lead - (2100011857) #Immediate #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities 
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate 
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Software Engineer (C++),"Nearest MRT: Haw Par Villa
Training provided for entry level candidates
Job Scope:
New software feature design and implement for automation machine applications to enhance product’s capability 
Work with product specialists, hardware, and process engineers to develop new features
Software requirement analysis and documentation
Customer specific software requirement analysis and software issue support
Debugging on machine
Using version control and issue tracking tool for software release management and documentation
Job Requirements:
With background knowledge or experience in C++ programming
Knowledge of software process, quality, version control and testing methodologies
An understanding of mechanical systems, electronics or semiconductor packaging process is a plus
*Shortlisted candidates will be informed.
Interested applicants please send in your updated resume to with the subject “Software Engineer C++”
Jeffrey Koh Kok Ann
Registration No.: R1770345
EA License No.: 02C3423"
"Lead, - DevOps..* #Immediate","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shiftleft(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software).
The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Understanding and translating Product roadmaps to the team
Define and improve the WoW for the product.
Engage different stakeholders to support and sync inorder to deliver the product.
Own the BAU and enhancement of the platform.
Our Ideal Candidate:
10+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 8 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Highly skilled in breaking down work and resource allocation.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation.
Skilled in translating the leader vision statement into Product Features and Controls.
Highly effective in creating Product Roadmaps in sync with Stakeholder teams.
Strong problem-solving skills and Self-Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Programmer,"Roles & Responsibilities
We Looking for Programmers whi can write code for computer programs and mobile applications. They are also involved in maintaining, debugging and troubleshooting systems and software to ensure that systwm in company is running smoothly.
The programmers must be resourceful and fluent in at least 4 programming languages. One of them must be an app development platform (e.g. Xcode, Objective C) for the IOS.
Candidates must be familiar with parsers for html4/html5/ XML scrapping.
This post don’t need to possess a degree.
Candidates will be tested during the interview. So bring own laptop loaded with own preset own development platform. The interview process will require interviewee to produce a working piece software where we will give the requirement specs."
"Tech Lead, (Messaging Middleware) Cloud Infrastructure #WorkNow*","TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Our messaging middleware team is responsible for the research and development of Tiktok messaging platform. We manage the Message Queue systems of all products such as Douyin, TikTok, Toutiao, Xigua Video and Hotsoon. We are industry-leading in the scale of data covered.
Because we are extremely sensitive to the stability and cost of external services, we have developed an in-house message queue BMQ. BMQ's architecture is based on the principle of segregation between storage and computing. It is also compatible with the kafka protocol. In addition to pursuing high levels of stability and optimized cost, we are also actively exploring and expanding supported business scenarios, leveraging the potential value of original log data, and accessing batch computing engines.
Responsibilities:
Construct an efficient and stable messaging platform. Continuous optimization to improve stability, performance and cost optimization. Build the next generation computing and storage separation architecture on a trillion-level messaging platform;
Play a key role in driving project objectives and execution management, architecture design and code reviews, define long term technical roadmap for the team, and demonstrate technical leadership;
Recruit and mentor engineers of various levels of experience into a performant team, build team culture and cohesion, help team members grow technical capabilities;
Work closely with stakeholder teams to identify business pain points, continuously optimize and improve customer experience, team reputation, and impact.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields;
6+ years of professional software development experience;
Strong with C++/Golang/Java/Python program development (at least one), pursue high-quality code and focused on code engineering quality;
Solid knowledge of Linux system, proficient in multi-threading, network programming, and distributed development in any programming language;
Good communication skills, able to lead and drive projects effectively. Familiar with team and project management methodologies and approaches.
Preferred Qualifications:
In-depth research and industry experience in large-scale messaging platform design and implementation, for example Kafka/RocketMQ/Pulsar/NSQ;
Contributor/Committer or PMC of the open-source community is a plus."
Java Application Consultant,"Job Responsibilities
Enhancement and support works for Java EE web projects.
Liaise with clients for their requirements.
Update solution documentation.
Train key-users before solution rollout.
Answer queries from clients.
Job Requirements
Code: Java EE, Spring framework
Databases: Microsoft SQL, MySQL
Familiar with MSSQL Stored Procedures. Some AWS experience will be good.
If you been working on the above for the past 1-5 years, please apply."
"Manager, Information Management, - (2100032149). #Immediate #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
This is an exciting opportunity for a Full Stack Developer to support the Singapore Finance Team digitize their processes by working on existing applications as well as development of enhancements and new applications primarily using Microsoft SQL Server and various latest generation front-end technologies
As the successful candidate, you will be part of the Singapore Finance team as opposed to the Standard Chartered Technology function and you will have direct involvement with the business on a daily basis working in an agile fashion to progress solutions quickly from idea to prototype to delivery. It will require you to handle multiple support tasks as well as tactical project analysis and development.
Business
Work closely with the finance teams to drive process digitisation to deliver efficiency and enable new capabilities for MI and Insights to propel the function towards its strategic objectives.
Processes & Responsibilities
Manage DevOps related responsibilities to ensure the Finance servers continue to perform at peak capacity and availability
Full Stack Development responsibilities to build and maintain end to end applications to digitize finance processes across a multitude of Finance functions (e.g. Tax, Performance Management, Controls, Balance Sheet Management etc.)
Risk Management & Governance
Ensure adherence to all internal technology policies and regulations and establish a robust governance process covering the RAD solutions developed.
Continually enhance the control environment to maintain robust processes around security, data reconciliation, data quality and audit trails ensuring complete and accurate reporting across designed processes.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the SG Finance RAD team to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CFO Singapore and the Head of all the Finance functions reporting into the CFO
Other Responsibilities
Working with onshore/offshore teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Over 6 years of proven technical background with development and design experience in front-end and server-side
Strong in RESTful APIs, ASP.Net MVC, .Net Core/C#
Strong in SQL Server, SSRS/SSAS
Experience with Microsoft VBA stack of automation (Excel/Access) and knowledge in powerBI is advantageous
Strong in modern UI technologies - Javascript, VueJS Framework, NodeJS, HTML5, CSS
Experience with DevOps CI/CD tools and processes (Bitbucket/Git, Jenkins, Sourcetree) and Agile methodologies
Basic knowledge of UI/UX and prototype designing, testing frameworks (Junit)
Exposure to Selenium (or similar tool) for UI automation and testing
Understanding and some working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous
Provide solid and reliable documentation on work items such as code, concepts, logic and user documentation
Must have following soft skills:
Understand and deal well with rapid development cycles, remain flexible and calm in the face of ambiguity, drive clarity
Well spoken and Emotionally intelligent whilst working and collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals having diverse work cultures and skill sets
Good communication skills and ability to articulate technical details and challenges to business users
Team player who is self driven and proactive in learning new technologies and skills
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Manager, Information Management, - (2100032149). #Immediate #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
This is an exciting opportunity for a Full Stack Developer to support the Singapore Finance Team digitize their processes by working on existing applications as well as development of enhancements and new applications primarily using Microsoft SQL Server and various latest generation front-end technologies
As the successful candidate, you will be part of the Singapore Finance team as opposed to the Standard Chartered Technology function and you will have direct involvement with the business on a daily basis working in an agile fashion to progress solutions quickly from idea to prototype to delivery. It will require you to handle multiple support tasks as well as tactical project analysis and development.
Business
Work closely with the finance teams to drive process digitisation to deliver efficiency and enable new capabilities for MI and Insights to propel the function towards its strategic objectives.
Processes & Responsibilities
Manage DevOps related responsibilities to ensure the Finance servers continue to perform at peak capacity and availability
Full Stack Development responsibilities to build and maintain end to end applications to digitize finance processes across a multitude of Finance functions (e.g. Tax, Performance Management, Controls, Balance Sheet Management etc.)
Risk Management & Governance
Ensure adherence to all internal technology policies and regulations and establish a robust governance process covering the RAD solutions developed.
Continually enhance the control environment to maintain robust processes around security, data reconciliation, data quality and audit trails ensuring complete and accurate reporting across designed processes.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the SG Finance RAD team to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CFO Singapore and the Head of all the Finance functions reporting into the CFO
Other Responsibilities
Working with onshore/offshore teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Over 6 years of proven technical background with development and design experience in front-end and server-side
Strong in RESTful APIs, ASP.Net MVC, .Net Core/C#
Strong in SQL Server, SSRS/SSAS
Experience with Microsoft VBA stack of automation (Excel/Access) and knowledge in powerBI is advantageous
Strong in modern UI technologies - Javascript, VueJS Framework, NodeJS, HTML5, CSS
Experience with DevOps CI/CD tools and processes (Bitbucket/Git, Jenkins, Sourcetree) and Agile methodologies
Basic knowledge of UI/UX and prototype designing, testing frameworks (Junit)
Exposure to Selenium (or similar tool) for UI automation and testing
Understanding and some working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous
Provide solid and reliable documentation on work items such as code, concepts, logic and user documentation
Must have following soft skills:
Understand and deal well with rapid development cycles, remain flexible and calm in the face of ambiguity, drive clarity
Well spoken and Emotionally intelligent whilst working and collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals having diverse work cultures and skill sets
Good communication skills and ability to articulate technical details and challenges to business users
Team player who is self driven and proactive in learning new technologies and skills
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"EFX/Commodities Application Support #worknow #JobsThatMatter, #Urgent'","Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
"#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - 22429912 #JobsThatMatter#Seekbetter #UrgentHire","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Associate Software Specifications Engineer,"Responsibilities:
Support Specification engineers in technical writing of software specifications based on the product definitions, reference products, regulations and applicable customer standards
Ensure that specifications written covers complete range of products along with drawings if required
Update software specification submittals and support modifications to software specifications
Interact with software groups to refine details of specification requirements
Work closely with internal specification engineers to ensure on time product delivery.
Participate in ad hoc software projects discussions on specifications and assignments as required
Requirement:
Diploma in Engineering or related fields where technical understanding is required.
Proficient in both written and spoken English
Able to communicate and work well in teams
Self-discipline and good conduct with the ability to work without supervision
Must possess a flexible attitude to work and be willing to use their own initiative
Must be Singaporean Only"
"Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - 22429912.#UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank. Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"V.P., Lead Java Software Developer, Liquidity Technology #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
Our Global Liquidity Technology team is seeking a Lead Java Software Developer to join us on this journey. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform Liquidity management and treasury functions in the firm.
You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. Development will be predominantly done by building micro services with Java/ Springboot/ SQL and building UI with Angular/ HTML/ JavaScript and adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience in Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Junit, Mockito
Advanced experience in building cloud native microservice applications with Spring Boot and Spring Cloud
Advanced experience with one or more database technologies (e.g. Oracle)
Advanced experience in building REST APIs
Experience of working in Containerization technology and platform – Dockers, Kubernetes and good knowledge in DevOps practices.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Strong understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse).
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka"
Digital Technology Consultant,"The role will support the Digital Technology Transformation agenda, from planning & design of the digitisation journey to the execution and operationalization of digital capabilities to meet the organisation’s strategic goal.
About the Job
The role holder will play a key role in our Digital ecosystem and support the interfaces that facilitates the collaboration, interaction and transactions with our customers digitally, bringing them the best experience McDonalds has to offer:
System Analysis and Development
Understands business requirements and define technical requirements, evaluate and manage development and implementation of technology solutions
Supports the solution development, testing, implementation, and enhancements of identified solutions
Provides technical expertise to identify design efficiency and adherence to data and security standards
Project Management
Supports the Digital Technology team to define a prioritized digital technology portfolio of the highest-impact work aligned to business priorities and deliver the greatest consumer value Periodically review and align with key business stakeholders on any shifts
Proactively manage stakeholder expectations, identify risks and find effective and creative solutions to mitigate delays to deliver faster and continuously
Project manage the design and build phases of digital communications and tools including developing and managing the process for these phases, and meeting milestones from ideation through to launch
Digital Tech Operations
Provides support to ensure that digital platforms operate for scalability and stability. Ensuring day2day support for platforms & systems that is reliable with high uptime, and with sufficient capacity supporting increasing solutions and demands
Keeping systems well maintained and with up to date with technology, equipped with adequate tools & processes from end to end - monitoring phase to recovery phase
Monitor and report on support KPIs, ensure reports and updates are provided on the digital tech portfolio regularly. Review and ensure that the performance of the systems is meeting defined KPIs, flagged out areas for concern and put in place corrective/recovery actions
Requirements
Possess a recognized degree in computing related areas.
Has at least 3 - 5 years of related working experience in delivering Digital or eCommerce technology capabilities;
Strong technical, analytical & problem-solving skills.
Comfortable with working in a fast-paced environment and managing change.
Strong organisation, communication & interpersonal skills, including experience with managing and influencing stakeholders
Project Management certified professional will be an added advantage.
Proven technical skills in working with digital platforms & emerging technologies such as Mobile Apps, eCommerce platforms, Cloud based Systems & Architecture, Data integration technology, Reporting and automation"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, - #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Loans Java Sr Developer. - #Worknow #JobsThatMatter #Urgent#.,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
API Tech Lead Analyst - #Urgent #WorkNow'#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
System Analyst,"Responsibilities:
Develop applications using backend development kits for smartcards, reader devices, biometric sensors, etc
Develop software solutions by studying information needs; conferring with users; studying systems flow, data usage, and work processes; investigating problem areas; following the software development lifecycle
Provide engineering support when building, deploying, configuring, and supporting systems for customers. Responding promptly and professionally to bug reports
Test new software programs to ensure that logic and syntax are correct, and that program results are accurate; assists lower-level programmers with programming assignments
Participate with the engineering and operations teams to define plans for standardizing, scaling and enhancing our products and the services utilized to deploy/install/release those products
Document and demonstrates solutions by developing documentation, flowcharts, layouts, diagrams, charts, code comments and clear code
Prepare and install solutions by determining and designing system specifications, standards, and programming
Improve operations by conducting systems analysis, recommending changes in policies and procedures
Provide information by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing development and service issues
Investigate, analyse and make recommendations to management regarding technology improvements, upgrades and modifications
Write applications to meet customers’ needs and ensures the applications are tested and work efficiently and effectively
Ensure timely completion of assignment and produce accurate output
Report to the Software Development Manager
Requirement:
Diploma/ Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
3 to 5 years in software development environment is preferred
Able to work independently and a team player with fellow colleague
Interested applicants please e-mail your resume with current and expected salaries via 'Apply Now' button."
#Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer - 21405806. #Immediate' #Worknow,"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst#',"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Applications Development Intermediate Analyst #JobsThatMatter'#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
The Analyst is expected to understand / analyse user requirements, understand and interpret BRD (Business Requirement Document), prepare Functional Requirements document in the Custody domain. The person should be able to engage with the Technical Team to clarify requirements, participate in Technical design to ensure the requirements are met by the product design and validate developed product
Responsibilities:
The role requires strong ability to do business analysis
Interface with Product and Operations team in the AsPAC region to understand and clarify the requirements
Understand the Business Requirement Documents and create Functional Requirement Documents and get it approved and implemented effectively.
Identify problems, analyze information, and make evaluative judgements to recommend and implement solutions
Interface with teams spread geographically
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Qualifications:
Ability to work with diverse and geographically disperse teams
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work efficiently within team environments and as an individual contributor
Ability to efficiently plan and organize own workload, and teams workloads
2-5 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Software Development and Custody domain knowledge would be an advantage
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst - AVP (Hybrid),"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742 #Urgent#'#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Application Support Intermediate Analyst.#WorkNow'#Seekbetter,"The Apps Support Intmd Analyst is a developing professional role. Deals with most problems independently and has some latitude to solve complex problems. Integrates in-depth specialty area knowledge with a solid understanding of industry standards and practices. Good understanding of how the team and area integrate with others in accomplishing the objectives of the subfunction/ job family. Applies analytical thinking and knowledge of data analysis tools and methodologies. Requires attention to detail when making judgments and recommendations based on the analysis of factual information. Typically deals with variable issues with potentially broader business impact. Applies professional judgment when interpreting data and results. Breaks down information in a systematic and communicable manner. Developed communication and diplomacy skills are required in order to exchange potentially complex/sensitive information. Moderate but direct impact through close contact with the businesses' core activities. Quality and timeliness of service provided will affect the effectiveness of own team and other closely related teams.
Responsibilities:
The Apps Support Intmd Analyst provides technical and business support for users of Citi Applcations.
Utilizes good understanding of apps support procedures and concepts and basic knowledge of other technical areas to field issues and queries from stakeholders, provide short-term resolutions and work with relevant technology partners for long term remediation.
Develop a comprehensive understanding of how areas of apps support collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Act as a liaison between users/traders, interfacing internal technology groups and vendors
Participates in disaster recovery testing
Participate in application releases, from development, testing and deployment into production.
perform post release checkouts after application releases and infrastructure updates. Develop and maintain technical support documentation.
Considers implications of the application of technology to the current environment.
Analyzes applications to identify risks, vulnerabilities and security issues.
Makes evaluative judgments based on analysis of factual information; resolves problems by identifying and selecting solutions Cooperation with Development colleagues to prioritize bug fixes and support tooling requirements.
Directly impacts the business by ensuring the quality of work provided by self and others; impacts own team and closely related work teams.
Exchanges ideas and information
Active involvement in and ownership of Support Project items, covering Stability, Efficiency, and Effectiveness initiatives.
Performs other duties and functions as assigned in a concise and logical manner.
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
2-5 years experience
Basic knowledge or interest about apps support procedures, concepts and of other technical areas.
Participation in some process improvements.
Previous experience or interest in standardization of procedures and practices.
Basic Business knowledge/ understanding of financial markets and products.
Knowledge/ experience of problem Management Tools.
Understands of how own sub-function integrates within the function and commercial awareness
Evaluates (sometimes complex) situations using multiple sources of information Developed communication and diplomacy skills to persuade and influence
Good customer service, communication and interpersonal skills
Good knowledge of the business and its technology strategy
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Knowledge of issue tracking and reporting using tools
Good all-round team member
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholder
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience"
Research Associate (Software engineer for UTM platform) - R00012408,"The Air Traffic Management Research Institute (ATMRI) invites applications for the position of Research Associate. 
The Research Associate (RA) is needed for the NRF project on unmanned traffic management (UTM) under Air Traffic Management Research Institute. The project will focus on the investigation of implementable UTM strategies that is suitable for Singapore, as well as other factors that should be considered to implement UTM in Singapore. The PO will work on the development and maintenance of UTM server system and the integration of new advances in UTM research into the system.
Key Responsibilities: 
Work with the research team focusing on the development and implementation of UTM server system, while taking Unmanned Aircraft’s performance requirements and 3rd party risks into consideration.
Develop and maintain UTM-relevant platform, covering R&D on GUI, Third-Party Risk, Airworthiness, etc.;
Participate in flight test of UTM operations as the administrator of UTM system;
Understand and implementation of new research advances in UTM system;
Construct and maintain proper documentations for the entire UTM platform;
Work with members for the on-time completion of project milestones and deliverables;
Report to the Principal Investigator on Research Progress of the research teams;
Prepare technical report to the funding agency;
Prepare research publication on the relevant area;
Accomplish required milestones and deliverable;
Prepare quarterly (administrative) progress report to the funding agency.
Job Requirements:
A Master’s degree in mechanical, computer science, electrical engineering or related field;
Solid experience with front-end and back-end web server development;
Solid programming skills in Finite Element Analysis, JavaScript, Python, and Matlab;
Experience with implementation on remote server;
Willing to accept and perform last-minute job(s) and administrative tasks contributed to the program, able to fulfill multi-tasking requirements.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified."
"Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst, AVP - Futures Clearing Technology - [22425739]#.","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
The Futures Clearing Technology group in Citigroup is dynamic and fast-paced and allows low latency, high performance, straight-through-processing of exchange traded derivatives. Futures Clearing Technology platform handles trade allocations and clearing of Futures and Options across 22 clearing houses across the globe.
We are looking for a senior developer for the Singapore team who would be working with other Developers across the globe to deliver on the Futures Clearing Book items related to margin payment automation and fees and commissions automation flows
The overall objective of this role is to architect, design and deliver cutting-edge, best-in-class solutions to solve business challenges and implement enhancements related to futures clearing, build reusable libraries and components and ensure that the platform stays current and modern with evolving technologies. We are looking for developers who are exceptionally strong and hands-on with the technical stack, passionate about engineering excellence, possess demonstrated experience in building cohesive, high-performing teams.
Key Responsibilities
Design, develop and test resilient, stateless, scalable, and reusable services and APIs utilizing latest frameworks and libraries while adhering to development standards.
Architect, review and implement technical solutions that conform to Citi standards, deliver optimized client experience and competitive advantage while utilizing best-of-breed technology.
Develop reusable software components in a microservices cloud-native architecture.
Develop high-performing Angular screens utilizing latest in-house frameworks and libraries with an emphasis on design patterns, reusability, code quality and secure coding practices.
Drive application development activities by partnering closely with stakeholders, product managers and business analysts to understand problem statement.
Implement automated build, test and deployment pipelines utilizing latest DevOps tools available at Citi.
Strong experience in validating testing and have quality product at early stage of lifecycle and ability to partner with QA engineers to drive test automation efforts.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to build reusable, shared libraries, and components.
Mentor/coach junior team members and enforce governance with respect to application development and testing standards and best practices to continuously enhance code quality.
Research and understand front-end development and DevOps best practices based on industry and Citi standards.
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure that the application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint.
Required Skills
Seasoned professional with 7+ years of experience in the IT industry. Sound technical background with a passion to explore emerging technologies.
Experience designing and developing cloud native applications with a microservices architecture running on Docker, OpenShift/Kubernetes platform
Application development experience using Java, SQL, REST APIs, Kafka/ IBM MQ, CI/CD tools like Bitbucket, Jenkins
Experience developing web applications in JavaScript, Angular, HTML and CSS.
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum work environment and managing stakeholders in a global and dynamic environment.
Detail-oriented professional who can juggle priorities in a high-pressure, dynamic, global environment.
Strong analytical, inter-personal and problem-solving skills with the ability to innovate and a can-do attitude.
Quick learner with the ability to multi-task, manage tight deadlines, adapt to changing requirements and deal with ambiguity without impacting delivery.
Detail-oriented and self-organized individual with exceptional written and verbal communication skills
Ability to build trusted relationships and partner across a complex organization.
Proactive and self-motivated professional who can hit the ground running. Willingness to ask questions, challenge the status-quo and seek out answers and a passion for continuous process improvements.
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Computer Science or Information Technology
Desirable Skills
Experience and Competencies Understanding of futures and options clearing workflow and experience working with futures exchanges and clearinghouses.
Experience working on application security standards and protocols such as Oauth, TLS, SSL, SSH, SFTP and PKI
Experience with distributed Cache (Gemfire/ Redis)"
"Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst, AVP - Futures Clearing Technology - [22425739]#.#JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
The Futures Clearing Technology group in Citigroup is dynamic and fast-paced and allows low latency, high performance, straight-through-processing of exchange traded derivatives. Futures Clearing Technology platform handles trade allocations and clearing of Futures and Options across 22 clearing houses across the globe.
We are looking for a senior developer for the Singapore team who would be working with other Developers across the globe to deliver on the Futures Clearing Book items related to margin payment automation and fees and commissions automation flows
The overall objective of this role is to architect, design and deliver cutting-edge, best-in-class solutions to solve business challenges and implement enhancements related to futures clearing, build reusable libraries and components and ensure that the platform stays current and modern with evolving technologies. We are looking for developers who are exceptionally strong and hands-on with the technical stack, passionate about engineering excellence, possess demonstrated experience in building cohesive, high-performing teams.
Key Responsibilities
Design, develop and test resilient, stateless, scalable, and reusable services and APIs utilizing latest frameworks and libraries while adhering to development standards.
Architect, review and implement technical solutions that conform to Citi standards, deliver optimized client experience and competitive advantage while utilizing best-of-breed technology.
Develop reusable software components in a microservices cloud-native architecture.
Develop high-performing Angular screens utilizing latest in-house frameworks and libraries with an emphasis on design patterns, reusability, code quality and secure coding practices.
Drive application development activities by partnering closely with stakeholders, product managers and business analysts to understand problem statement.
Implement automated build, test and deployment pipelines utilizing latest DevOps tools available at Citi.
Strong experience in validating testing and have quality product at early stage of lifecycle and ability to partner with QA engineers to drive test automation efforts.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to build reusable, shared libraries, and components.
Mentor/coach junior team members and enforce governance with respect to application development and testing standards and best practices to continuously enhance code quality.
Research and understand front-end development and DevOps best practices based on industry and Citi standards.
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure that the application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint.
Required Skills
Seasoned professional with 7+ years of experience in the IT industry. Sound technical background with a passion to explore emerging technologies.
Experience designing and developing cloud native applications with a microservices architecture running on Docker, OpenShift/Kubernetes platform
Application development experience using Java, SQL, REST APIs, Kafka/ IBM MQ, CI/CD tools like Bitbucket, Jenkins
Experience developing web applications in JavaScript, Angular, HTML and CSS.
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum work environment and managing stakeholders in a global and dynamic environment.
Detail-oriented professional who can juggle priorities in a high-pressure, dynamic, global environment.
Strong analytical, inter-personal and problem-solving skills with the ability to innovate and a can-do attitude.
Quick learner with the ability to multi-task, manage tight deadlines, adapt to changing requirements and deal with ambiguity without impacting delivery.
Detail-oriented and self-organized individual with exceptional written and verbal communication skills
Ability to build trusted relationships and partner across a complex organization.
Proactive and self-motivated professional who can hit the ground running. Willingness to ask questions, challenge the status-quo and seek out answers and a passion for continuous process improvements.
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Computer Science or Information Technology
Desirable Skills
Experience and Competencies Understanding of futures and options clearing workflow and experience working with futures exchanges and clearinghouses.
Experience working on application security standards and protocols such as Oauth, TLS, SSL, SSH, SFTP and PKI
Experience with distributed Cache (Gemfire/ Redis)"
Frontend Software Engineer - TikTok e-Commerce*#.#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.
You will:
Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications for e-Commerce products.
Code optimisation to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications.
Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.
Experience in designing, analyzing, and troubleshooting large-scale distributed systems.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
Experience in frontend engineering experience, with demonstrable experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility.
Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process.
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
"Backend Software Engineer - Trust and Safety Engineering #UrgentHire,","Responsibilities
About Tiktok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About the Team
Our Trust and Safety Engineering team is responsible for building a highly scalable, complex and intelligent platform that is able to manage high traffic loads. You would also be building the tools to help protect our users from harmful content and abusive behaviors. With the continuous efforts of our trust and safety team, we can provide the best user experience and bring joy to everyone in the world.
Responsibilities
Build a highly-scalable, efficient and robust trust and safety platform and tools;
Understand product objectives to develop an easy-to-use platform that aligns with customers needs;
Collaborate with trust and safety specialists, experts and machine learning engineers;
Improve system design and architecture to ensure high stability and performance of the services;
Work with Trust and Safety teams to protect TikTok globally.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 3+ years of relevant experience.
Proficiency in designing data structures, building algorithms, and at least one programming languages: Java, Python, C++ Go, PHP.
Passion about techniques and solving challenging problems.
Experience in problem solving with related internet products.
Prior experience working on Internet Products or large scale platforms.
Preferred Qualifications
Great communication and teamwork skills"
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742 #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Lead Java Developer -- [22440742].' #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"C++ Developer, - Electronic Market Making & Trading, Associate #Worknow #UrgentHire'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This is a developer role focusing on work related to electronic market making (EMM) and low latency trading in the EMM Technology APAC Team. The ideal candidate will be team oriented and will work closely with traders globally. The qualified individual will be responsible for the design, develop, maintain and support the strategic ultra low latency trading platform. The position will also contribute significantly to the front office trading team in terms of pre and post-trade analysis and the design of low latency strategies.
Design, develop, and maintain the cutting edge electronic market marking system for Equity Derivative Products
Design, develop, and maintain the next generation low latency trading platform
Work closely with traders to define the specification / requirements for their trading needs
Provide a meaningful contribution to trading strategies; help traders to maximize revenue and minimize loss potential
Help traders to perform pre and post-trade analysis to fine tune the trading strategies / parameters
Exhibit sound judgment under pressure in handling time critical situations
Ensure all relevant parties (vertically and horizontally) are kept abreast of key technology developments in MM and low latency trading both within and outside the firm
Provide a solution-based framework to business; Take the initiative to make things better
Understand firm's approach and policies for control and governance related to electronic trading
Build foundation of trust with traders by demonstrating an understanding of their needs and being responsive
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum 3 years of experience in technology field.
Good understanding of SDLC and Agile software development practice
Proficiency in modern C++, Python, and bash scripting
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Experience in application development and support in Linux environment
Knowledge of low latency system architecture and design is preferable
Familiar with derivatives pricing and trading strategies is preferable
Previous experience in exchange connectivity / market data feed development is preferable."
"Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer, - Vice President #Urgent'","Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
"Analyst, Development (WSP). #JobsThatMatter*.","Role Responsibilities
Our Technology & Innovation (T&I) function is at the heart of shaping the bank for the future and serving our clients digitally across the globe. We are responsible for the systems development and technology infrastructure of the Bank, defining, innovating, and implementing digital agendas across functions, especially in our client services. Our team helps unlock new banking experiences for clients, while improving our operational effectiveness and enhance existing offerings.
We are focused on building your digital skills and adaptability necessary to be future-ready. You’ll be exposed to a diverse portfolio of projects in your allocated domain will help to deliver efficiencies and automation, introduce global platforms, machine learning, and bring forth intelligent technology. You’ll be constantly learning and sharing with your peers:
• Creating and designing cutting edge tools and applications that will redefine the future of banking
• Work in a truly Agile environment, as part of scrum teams that are striving to solve customer challenges
• Play a critical role in client journeys that help us make faster decisions to enhance the end-to-end client experience and achieve outcomes that are most valuable to our clients
Our Ideal Candidate 
If you are passionate about technology and customer experience, and possess traits and experience most of the below, we’d love to hear from you:
• Adaptive to changing situations and enjoy collaborating with global teams in a diverse multi-cultural environment.
• Curious and open-minded.
• Strong foundational knowledge of Algorithms, Data Structures, OOPs concepts and frameworks
• Passionate for solving challenging problems and learning new skills, coding languages.
• Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to JavaScript (ReactJS, React-Redux, nodeJS), TypeScript, Python.
• Experience in working with either front end and/or back-end technologies and frameworks.
• Experience in one or more Cloud Technologies. "
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, #JobsThatMatter","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Lead Java Developer -- [22440742].#Urgent#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"Software Engineer, - Senior Associate #JobsThaMatter #Seekbetter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 6 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"Senior Software Engineer, DevOps – Standard Chartered nexus - (2200019763). #Immediate #UrgentHire","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
PHP Full-Stack Developer,"Looking to take your web development career to a whole new level? Then this role is for you!
First Page Digital is looking for an experienced PHP Full Stack Developer (full time role) to build upon some very cool custom-built software. A high visibility project that allows you to develop cool, state of the art new features. Never a dull moment!
First Page Digital prides itself on being a leader, not only in Singapore but also throughout Australasia in the field of digital. We have won numerous awards because we love what we do! Passion breeds success!
With offices in Australia, Hong Kong, Singapore, Thailand, Malaysia, Panama, Brazil & Dubai, you will be joining a company that rewards success and strives to be the best in the industry. We provide a strong entrepreneurial environment, which has seen the organization ranked #1 fastest growing digital group in Australia 3 years straight.
Rewards you deserve:
·      Generous salary & medical with ClassPass fitness membership
·      Collaborate with a strong and dynamic international team
·      Working side by side talented individuals. A-graders!
·      Always new and exciting projects. Never a dull moment!
·      A fun, dynamic company culture
What you will be doing:
·      Enhancing our custom built CRM and client portal with cool new features. Creative freedom!
·      Liaising with our Project Manager to map out and develop new custom tools, that will enhance our agencies growth
·      Writing clean, functional code
·      Testing and fixing bugs
·      Develop and manage well-functioning databases and applications
·      Test software to ensure responsiveness and efficiency
What we need:
·      Strong attention to detail
·      Can think outside the box
·      Minimum 5 years’ experience as a PHP Full-Stack Developer
Required technical skills:
·      PHP
·      CodeIgniter or similar MVCs
·      HTML 5/CSS 3/JS (ES 6)
·      Vue.js
·      Git
·      Shell
·      CRON
·      AWS service management
·      EC2
·      RDS
·      CloudWatch
·      Postfix
Why us:
We want Singapore’s top talent and recognise that means paying accordingly. Our newly transformed office is a great space to inspire creativity, as well as being close to cafes and public transport. You will be among a highly engaged team of the country's most talented digital gurus.
Looking for more reasons?
· Referral Bonus
· Guaranteed yearly salary increment
· Flexible work arrangement
· Structured & rapid career progression
· Sponsorship opportunities for professional development
· Unlimited Dental benefits
· Medical benefits
· ClassPass gym access or wellness sessions
· Annual leaves, birthday leave, graduation leave, study leave, and others
· Birthday cakes and celebrations
· Weekly in-house company-wide training
· Monthly team building events
· Annual retreat
· New joiner buddy meals
Please attach your CV and we will be in touch for a confidential chat. Let's do great things together!"
"Senior Software Engineer, DevOps – Standard Chartered nexus - (2200019763). #Immediate #UrgentHire","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
Backend Developer (Springboot Microservices) - J39762,"We are looking for a Backend Developer proficient in Spring Boot Microservices.
5 days work week (Mon - Fri)
Attractive remuneration package
Achieve work life balance whilst working in an open, fast-paced environment
Responsibilities:
Actively participate in back end software development (JAVA, Springboot)
Involve in microservices design and implementation, create RESTFUL APIs
Develop and deploy portable applications using container technology (Docker/ Kubernetes)
Involve in functional and unit testing
Requirements:
Experience with spring boot, Java, Kotlin, Gradle, JPA, Spring Security, Spring Batch, kafka
Experience in leveraging on cloud platforms such as Amazon AWS, Azure or Google Cloud
Proficient in unit and functional testing
Collaborative team player with good interpersonal skills
To apply, please send your updated resume to spml(at)scientecpersonnel.com by indicating Job ID J39762 to fasten the process.
Lee Wen Ying (Mattias)
Outsourcing Team
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd - 11C5781"
Senior Full Stack Developer,"Job Responsibilities:
Promote car leasing services to corporate clients and build new customer base
Maintain strong relationship with existing customers and partners with the aim of increasing sales
Daily communication with customers regarding lease cars. Responding to inquiries from customers.
Connect information about customer accidents, breakdowns, etc. to operation staff
Requirements
Diploma in Business Discipline or equivalent/ GCE “O” / “A” level holder with extensive relevant experience are also welcome to apply
Sincere response to customers
Preferably minimum 2 – 3 years of sales experience in service or car leasing industry
Interested in and familiar with cars
Possess good track record in corporate business and able to bring in new corporate accounts
Must possess a valid Class 3/3A driving license
Good communication and problem-solving skills"
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912 #JobsThatMatter #Urgent',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Application Development Sr Manager, - #WorkNow #Urgent'#Worknow","Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Identify opportunity for applying modern technologies, digital products and service Campaigns.
Manage Application on Tech Stack ( Java , Big Data , Digital Marketing , JMS, Micro Service , Cloud platforms )
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects.
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas.
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
8-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Hands on Technical Experience in Data Engineering , Apache Kafka, Solace, Java Tech stack ( Front End and Server side ), JMS, Micro Service , Oracle , Mongo DB, Redis , BPM Tools.
Hands on Experience in Marketing Tools , Adobe marketing platforms , Pega.
Experience in AWS , Google Analytics, Azure , Cloud computing , AI/ML is added advantage.
Facilitate development of Marketing Data Driven operating Model.
Experience in analyze marketing performance aligned to business strategy.
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Good Team player with team and peer management skills.
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Senior Software Engineer (Data) #WorkNow #Urgent #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
As a hand on developer, you will be working to build robust and scalable self-service data platform for Autodesk. You will work with cutting edge open source technologies in big data space.
Responsibilities
Design and develop components of end to end Data Platform 
Work with the team to make the Data Platform an efficient, robust and scalable platform
Enthusiastic and passionate member of a highly skilled and motivated agile development team 
Contribute to a team culture that values quality, robustness, and scalability while fostering initiatives and innovation
Minimum Qualifications
BS or MS in computer science or a related field
Experience with Map Reduce
Experience with Hive and one relational DB
Strong problem solving skills
Strong communication skills
Ability to learn new technical skills
4+ years of experience with Big Data
Expert knowledge and experience in Hadoop 2.0 and its ecosystem
Expert programming skills in either Java, Scala or Python
Solid proficiency with Amazon Web Services
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with Spark
Experience with Hadoop / Spark Source Code
Experience with Python, Scala
Experience with Flume
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes
Experience with at least one workflow scheduler (e.g. Oozie)
Experience with Kafka/Splunk/ELK/Hive Metastore
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.
Are you an existing contractor or consultant with Autodesk? Please search for open jobs and apply internally (not on this external site). If you have any questions or require support, contact Autodesk Careers."
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547)'. #WorkNow","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software).
The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product.
This includes automating capabilities like below:
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
Lead Java Developer - [22440742] - #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"VP / Assistant VP, - Development Lead - API, - Group Technology #Seekbetter","About UOB
United Overseas Bank Limited (UOB) is a leading bank in Asia with a global network of more than 500 branches and offices in 19 countries and territories in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. In Asia, we operate through our head office in Singapore and banking subsidiaries in China, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand, as well as branches and offices.Our history spans more than 80 years. Over this time, we have been guided by our values — Honorable, Enterprising, United and Committed. This means we always strive to do what is right, build for the future, work as one team and pursue long-term success. It is how we work, consistently, be it towards the company, our colleagues or our customers.
About the Department
Group Technology and Operations (GTO) provides software and system development, information technology support services and banking operations.We have centralized and standardized the technology components into Singapore, creating a global footprint which can be utilized for supporting our regional subsidiaries and the branches around the world. We operate and support 19 countries with this architecture to provide a secure and flexible banking infrastructure.Our Operations divisions provide transactional customer services for our businesses while also focusing on cost efficiency through process improvements, automation and straight through processing.
Job Responsibilities
The incumbent is responsible for all aspects of software delivery and release for applications in the external API domain. Applications include the API Gateway (Axway) as well as microservices (Java Springboot) for payments and consent.
Work with a team of subject matter experts, architects and software developers to deliver projects and change requests via in-house development or vendor (Axway). 
Manage business stakeholders expectation and establish best or alternative solutions that are feasible within the technology and timeline constraints
Review solution design and effort estimates from the team and prioritize projects and change requests assigned to the team
Manage delivery of initiatives - projects and change request. Responsible for planning, manage vendor and in-house development, solutioning, implementing and maintaining software applications systems.

Job Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science / Engineering
Hands-on experience and deep technical knowledge and skills in the following technologies:
API Gateway (preference for Axway API Gateway, other products can be considered) 
Groovy / Javascript
API Portal (preference for Axway API Portal, other products on Joomla can be considered)
Middleware (IBM MQ, Connect Direct, Control-M)
Java (Springboot, Camel, JBoss application server)
Infrastructure (Linux, databases including Oracle, Cassandra and MariaDB)
Security (SSL, JWT, JKS, OAuth, SAML, Threat Protection, Cryptography, WS-Security)
DevOps (Bitbucket, Jenkins, SonarQube, VeraCode, TOSCA)
Experience in Integration Architecture API Lifecycle (API Definition, Implementation and Testing, API Publication, API Consumption and AIP Operational Metrics)
Experience in an Application Development role for large/complex projects involving multiple technologies; experience with container-based technology (e.g. OpenShift) is a plus
Experience in project Software Development Methodology - initiation, planning, tracking, requirement analysis, design, development, testing, implementation on open systems
Ability to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented environment
A strong and assertive communicator in speaking and writing
Resolving and influencing the positive outcome of conflicting objectives and priorities

Be a part of UOB Family UOB is an equal opportunity employer. UOB does not discriminate on the basis of a candidate's age, race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or other non-merit factors. All employment decisions at UOB are based on business needs, job requirements and qualifications. If you require any assistance or accommodations to be made for the recruitment process, please inform us when you submit your online application.
Apply now and make a difference."
"Software Engineer, Liquidity Technology, Associate, 210124096 #JobsThatMatter#WorkNow'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications and data feeds within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well as SQL and HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 3 years of Software Development work experience
Proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, JavaScript, SQL
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST, AngularJS, UNIX shell scripting
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Software Engineer, Associate, Singapore - #UrgentHire #Seekbetter'","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 7 years of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, #Immediate #JobsThatMatter","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate,. --- #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #UrgentHire","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate, -- #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #UrgentHire","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate, --- #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #UrgentHire","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, -SC Ventures.*#UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912 #JobsThatMatter #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - 22429912 #JobsThatMatter #JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Asst Manager, ASEAN Reg Capital Implementation, - (2200011595) #UrgentHire #Immediate","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategic Projects
Support the development of business requirements for regulatory capital platform to align with current and new regulatory requirements
Support operationalisation of Basel IV and FRTB requirements in Singapore and ASEAN region and provide comfort to senior management that business requirements have been appropriately captured in the capital platform
Change management for regulatory capital platform changes to handle new regulations, models, etc
Other critical responsibilities and adhoc deliverables assigned by Finance or Treasury leadership
Effective contribution to tactical and strategic projects that may be assigned
Governance & Risk Management
Perform periodic gap analysis against regulatory requirements to ensure full compliance
Develop remediation plans to strengthen compliance to capital rules
Support the implementation of appropriate controls that ensure critical data elements are subject to the right level of substantiation and escalations are made for downstream issues for resolution
Support BCBS 239 compliance efforts
Support adherence to all internal policies and external regulations and establish a robust governance process to evidence compliance.
Team Engagement & Conduct
Contribute to work climate that promotes team engagement, alignment with group/country strategic deliverables and compliance with Group code of conduct
Contribute to an agile and growth mindset within the team
Stakeholder Management
Effective collaboration with other teams (e.g. Risk, Finance, Compliance, Treasury) to meet common team objectives
Translate complex technical subjects into simple overviews for business and other stakeholder updates
Optimal outcomes from Internal and external audit engagements
Optimal outcomes from regulatory engagements
Key Stakeholders
Internal
Risk – model implementation, reporting and insights
Capital COE/GFS – establishing an effective reporting process. 
Compliance – regulatory compliance and interpretation
GIA – Internal audit engagement
Group Treasury Teams – Policy alignment and sharing of best practices
External
Statutory auditors - to ensure that audits are finalized smoothly
Ratings agency – S&P, Fitch, Moody’s
Others – regulatory requests
Our Ideal Candidate
5+ years of experience including experience in the financial services sector
Degree or professional qualification in the Financial Services sector with strong experience in Capital reporting
Should have knowledge on Capital and RWA per MAS rules and Basel standards.
Should possess basic knowledge of Financial markets products offered.
Should be conversant with MI tools and generating insights from large amounts of data
Should be a resilient, self starter with well developed communication & inter-personal skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Sound judgement is required in identifying implementation and systems issues and suggesting measures to plug them.
Judgement and complexity in the job arise when dealing with other stakeholders in the project team. Working with FOT, ITO, GFS and risk functions in a collaborative manner and implementing the appropriate solutions.
Judgement & complexity arises in interpretation of regulatory matters and how they translate into a computation, systems and reporting solution.
Development of the Capital and liquidity MIS and reporting
Development of regional stress testing capabilities
Development of recovery and resolution capabilities
Overall success of strategic projects or enhancements
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Digital Post-Trade, Full Stack Developer #Worknow,'","Job Description
As a Full Stack Developer of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems.
1 year working in Software Development 
Knowledge in one or more of the following technologies:
Core Java Fundamentals, Java 8+, Spring, Spring Boot, REST Web Services and testing frameworks such as Junit, Cucumber, etc
Demonstrable ability to build applications in React, and have understanding of the core Javascript language, up to the current ECMAScript spec. Able to write useful tests using industry-standard frameworks like jest and react-testing-library
CSS and HTML: semantic HTML, CSS optimization and, preferably, Javascript-based styling solutions (e.g., material-ui styles)
Microservices and Cloud, containers with Kubernetes orchestration
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle, MySQL and NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, MongoDB, etc
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Understanding of architecture and design principles
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Preferred skills/experience:
BPM and Workflow Engines experience is a plus"
Post-Trade Technology - Software Engineer - VP--#JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #Worknow,"Job Description
We look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Primary focus will be to manage the number of Post Trade Technology applications in APAC with target architecture and to implement new settlement & clearing capabilities so as to support business expansion and increased volumes. 
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Sciences 
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems.
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices.
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture.
Experience in building/ designing high volume/ real time processing systems.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Java/ J2EE
Spring Framework / Hibernate
RDBMS (Oracle)
Unix / Shell scripting
Cloud knowledge
Understanding Business Requirements and Functional Specifications
Understanding existing program logic
Providing and/or agreeing estimates for required development
Creation/ update of Detailed Design Specifications, Program Specifications, and program Version Control documentation
Coding of new programs and changes to existing programs
Creation of Unit Test Plans, and execution of Unit Tests
Providing technical support for User Acceptance Testing
Creation of Implementation/ Back out Plans and Support Handover Documents
Providing technical support for Production Implementations, and post-implementation support during implementation warranty period
Requirements: 
5 years relevant hands-on development work.
Experience in working in Eclipse/IntelliJ / Maven environments.
Experience in managing various settlement systems in Post Trade Technology in APAC region.
Expertise in Core Java, TDD, BDD, spring framework, Messaging, SQL, Unix shell scripts.
“Can do” attitude, which can identify problems, take ownership, and provide solutions.
Drive the project progress for the deliverables. In our small agile team, developers talk directly to operational users and other BAs for requirements. You will be developing great communication and project management skills on top of the technical skills.
Hand’s on experience in fine tuning application response / performance testing.
Experience of MQ / JMS (message transfer process), Kafka.
Experience using version control tool bitbucket.
Understanding of banking risk and compliance policies.
Experience in code scanning tools like black duck and tools like Sonar etc.
Experience of development of Settlement and clearing applications.
Familiarity with SWIFT (Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication) Message formats.
Knowledge on markets such as Australia, Singapore and Japan is good."
#Apps Development Sr Manager | [21404500] #Immediate #UrgentHire #Worknow,"The Applications Development Senior Manr is a senior manment level position responsible for accomplishing results through the manment of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish establid goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget manment, and handling day-to-day staff manment issues, including resource manment and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manr
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeher and people manment experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project manment skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
Master’s preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Duties:
This position is hands on position and part of tech arch group (horizontal) CPB/ Capital Markets
Partner with multiple manment teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to -level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Skills:
12+ of relevant experience, Java, application servers, UI frameworks such as Angular, ReactJS, Infrastructure knowledge, Containers, CI/CD, microservices, ing, distributed computing
Knowledge of Info security and can resolve issues highlighted in VA across various application module/components
Assist in strategizing library and component upgrades such as Kafka, Gemfire, Mongodb, apache storm, Oracle and other 3rd party libraries
As part of central tech arch team, can work on creating common components, assist in automating environment flow via script or Java
Gain functional knowledge as will get aligned to different verticals in CPB/ Capital Markets
Previous experience in working in a horizontal team in agile/ scrum setting will be an added advant
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project manment techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and man deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements"
"Java Software Engineer, Core Technology, Associate - [210107542]b #Worknow,","As a member of our Software Engineering Group we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation & engineering practices. You will be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent experience
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Minimum 4 years of hands on experience in Java, Spring, React or Angular JS
Knowledge of modern architectures based on micro services, REST APIs, and event-based architecture will be key. 
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, etc. 
Knowledge of CI/CD, DevOps tool chain, and a test-driven approach to agile delivery is expected.
Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
J.P. Morgan Asset & Wealth Management delivers industry-leading investment management and private banking solutions with client assets of $4 trillion. Asset Management provides individuals, advisors and institutions with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes through our global network of investment professionals. Wealth Management helps individuals, families and foundations take a more intentional approach to their wealth or finances to better define, focus and realize their goals. 
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
Full Stack Senior Agile Developer - Hybrid - 22555924,"Responsibilities
Job Description
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Context:
CitiQuote is Citi Equity Derivatives Pre-trade platform. The current system relies on a mix of legacy technologies as well as new technologies. The program is undergoing a change with two initiatives:
Revamping of the platform in order to deliver the next generation platform to provide better performance and greater expansion for our business
Agile transformation to deliver business value faster and support our business in their growth.
The Ideal candidate is genuinely curious about technology, open-minded about exploring languages they are not familiar with, willing to get their hands dirty in understanding the legacy code to support it initially and then migrate it to the next gen platform. A solid knowledge of agile and devops best practices is a pre-requisite in order to deliver the desired level of quality that is targeted for this team
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
Mandatory:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
5 year experience with Java-based languages, preferably Kotlin
Open to learn Kotlin
4 year experience in Micro-Services
Strong understanding of Agile and best practices (TDD, BDD, DevOps)
4 year experience on Containerization
Experience in Couchbase
Nice to have:
Experience in C#, MS SQL
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"Software Engineer (Pega Developer), Associate, Singapore. #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
The Cyber security organization’s objective is to ensure that JPMC is able to effectively detect, prevent, and respond to cyber threats against our technology infrastructure. The scope of Cyber security comprises detection and monitoring of threats and vulnerabilities, managing security incidents, and evolving our preventive infrastructure to keep ahead of the threat. We accomplish this through strong information security leadership and active collaboration with line of business information risk managers to provide high quality security solutions and services that are focused on improving the Firm's risk posture.
Specific responsibilities will include:
Analyze, design, develop, debug, test, document, deploy and provide production support applications using primary skills in Java, J2EE, Pega PRPC (Pega Rules Process Commander), and BPM, Oracle.
Work with product owner and Cyber security operations on agreeing on refining business requirements and acceptance criteria.
Understand business workflow requirements from Cyber Operations team/Business Analysts and implement those requirements in Java/J2EE and Pega Rules Process Commander platform as part of a distributed agile team.
Implement test-driven development, Continuous Deployment and Continuous Integration practices and adhere to JPMC software development process. 
Assist team in supporting the application in QA and production environments    
Identify opportunities for process and tool improvements; drive them from concept to design to implementation
Keep abreast with the latest development practices and road map of Pega
Interact with business and cross block teams, identifying application impacts, interface design and technical specification design documentation 
Project scoping, release management, build planning, technical documentation and status reporting  
Lead the project team, technical training and mentoring for implementation of solutions and roll outs  
Ensure all quality standards are followed for the deliverables through code metrics checks, code reviews, unit and regression testing. Support quality assurance, performance and business user acceptance testing phases
Lead the team on Tech Refresh initiatives to revamp the underlying technology and application infrastructure to make it compliant with enterprise wide controls and policies.
Qualification
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of hands-on experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture    
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems  
Working proficiency in developmental tool-sets 
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices 
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational  goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture 
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages: Java/J2EE, Object Oriented
Proficiency in UI frameworks such as Java Script, React/Angular
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement    
Oracle SQL experience
Proven hands-on application development experience in large enterprise  class environment
Excellent understanding of integration with third party APIs (Web services, JSON, REST, XML etc.)
Proficiency in cloud and devops implementation
Good understanding on database design and query optimization
Experience with progressive development practices and tools (e.g. unit testing, static code analysis, continuous integration, etc.)
Strong interpersonal and communication skills; capable of writing documentation, training users in complex topics
Ability to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment while remaining productive and professional; exercise patience and ability to multi task  
Agile experience"
"Vice President - Software Engineer - Market Data Services, Singapore #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire'","Job Description
About Team :
Market Data Services is the firm wide team responsible for all aspects of market data delivery to all lines of business including vendor and financial management, engineering and development, connectivity, risk and control, and product support. We provide consultancy to development teams on how to build high performance applications using market data to help manage risk, discover and exploit trading opportunities.
An innovative Big Data system for accessing such information is being built by MDS to allow application developers and end users to stop worrying about mechanics of the data flow and start focusing on the value of the content. Still in early stages of its lifecycle, this application needs talented engineers with passion for changing the way people think about data.
Primary Responsibilities :
Will be a part of the high-caliber Agile development team with multiple patents pending
Must be curious, hardworking and detail-oriented, motivated by complex analytical problems
Has to demonstrate experience in financial markets, and have ability to communicate directly with the business users
Should be able to work individually or as part of a global team to achieve project goals
Will interact closely with the product owner, Scrum Master and customer teams
Will be responsible for full SDLC lifecycle: Coding, Compiling, Unit testing, integration, packaging and deployment of application software
Ensure overall quality of deliverables is consistent with defined standards and Agile development practice
Experience and Skills Required :
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related fields.
Minimum 10years of Java programming and Market Data experience
Understanding of Network Protocols
In Depth knowledge of JavaScript with React knowledge, UI Toolkit/Material UI, Redux and TypeScript
Scripting including csh, sh, Perl, or Python
Be familiar with the ODRL and W3 standards
CI/CD pipelines
Experience in consuming REST services
Cloud experience would be a huge plus
Agile development experience
Excellent understanding in data persistence (SQL or non-SQL) data paradigms
Applicants must be fluent in Japanese and Mandarin to support clients in Japan and China"
Full Stack Senior Agile Developer - Hybrid - 22555924 #WorkNow,"Responsibilities
Job Description
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Context:
CitiQuote is Citi Equity Derivatives Pre-trade platform. The current system relies on a mix of legacy technologies as well as new technologies. The program is undergoing a change with two initiatives:
Revamping of the platform in order to deliver the next generation platform to provide better performance and greater expansion for our business
Agile transformation to deliver business value faster and support our business in their growth.
The Ideal candidate is genuinely curious about technology, open-minded about exploring languages they are not familiar with, willing to get their hands dirty in understanding the legacy code to support it initially and then migrate it to the next gen platform. A solid knowledge of agile and devops best practices is a pre-requisite in order to deliver the desired level of quality that is targeted for this team
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
Mandatory:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
5 year experience with Java-based languages, preferably Kotlin
Open to learn Kotlin
4 year experience in Micro-Services
Strong understanding of Agile and best practices (TDD, BDD, DevOps)
4 year experience on Containerization
Experience in Couchbase
Nice to have:
Experience in C#, MS SQL
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Application Developer - Real Time Payments (L3) #urgent #Worknow',"As an experienced professional in Software Engineering, you'll shape the technology solutions that drive Level 3 support and development initiatives across the region, Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll interact with colleagues in various lines of businesses to learn about challenges and opportunities, and translate that insight into high-quality solutions. In addition to working with the development team to create new solutions, you'll help optimize existing technology and identify new capabilities to ensure the applications run smoothly. While your role requires deep technological skills it also hinges on teamwork and leadership. 
You'll offer clear guidance and feedback to your Software Engineer colleagues, while promoting the values, culture, and brand of JPMorgan Chase & Co
Primary Responsibilities
Lead the Level 3 team during the US hours as well as support the EMEA and APAC evening during US hours
Drive the bug fixes and small enhancements
Drive the audit, hygine of the application and production deployments
Drive incident reviews with relevant stakeholders, ensure the action items are tracked to closure
Provide leadership within the support team and influence stakeholders in line with the our product and future strategy
Document the client requirements, changes in market behaviors and drive that through the core team for product enhancements
Manage the documentation review and approval process with the stakeholders
Take ownership of the bug fixes and small enhancement and associated artefacts
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the production management, project and product teams
Provide guidance and support to team members
Prepare and deliver training sessions to the business users and production management
Experience and Skills Required
You'll also play a crucial role in identifying, improving, and developing technology solutions that drive our strategic goals. This is a tremendous opportunity to learn about high-priority initiatives and collaborate with colleagues
throughout the firm. Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills. No matter where your career ultimately takes you, you'll make a meaningful impact and lasting connections with outstanding colleagues and mentors.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors degree in Engineering, computer sciences or equivalent. with minimum of 1 year in BFSI industry. Exposure to core banking, payments is a must have skill
Experience working on major global transformation initiatives, for example SWIFT GPI, ISO 20022, Real Time Payments etc
Proficiency in business applications, data usage, and management
Ability to liaison between lines of business and the development team, while working with a wide range of stakeholders and collaborating with your team
Ability to work collaboratively in teams and develop meaningful relationships to achieve common goals
Experience obtaining requirements from business users and subject matter experts, reviewing business priorities, and/or analyzing options & risks
Ability to code in Java, Oracle, Microservices based architecture with experience in distributed cache and cloud computing
Experience in articulating functional system requirements specifications
Should be Detail-oriented, strong analytical and communication skills are a must
Ability to synthesize large amounts of information, and a curiosity to ask appropriate questions to fully develop business and functional requirements.
Pro-actively lead/participate in design/solution architecting of target state
Ability to interface directly with Senior Business Stakeholders and users with a view to influence and drive consensus.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Participate in creation of detailed functional specifications with AS-IS process flows and target state processes
Provide technical support throughout the project lifecycle, from requirements/functional specs to reviewing SIT and UAT test cases, and supporting all the testing phases.
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
#Apps Development Sr Manager | [21404500] #Immediate',"The Applications Development Senior Manr is a senior manment level position responsible for accomplishing results through the manment of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Man one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish establid goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget manment, and handling day-to-day staff manment issues, including resource manment and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manr
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeher and people manment experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project manment skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s /University or equivalent experience
Master’s preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Duties:
This position is hands on position and part of tech arch group (horizontal) CPB/ Capital Markets
Partner with multiple manment teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to -level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Skills:
12+ of relevant experience, Java, application servers, UI frameworks such as Angular, ReactJS, Infrastructure knowledge, Containers, CI/CD, microservices, ing, distributed computing
Knowledge of Info security and can resolve issues highlighted in VA across various application module/components
Assist in strategizing library and component upgrades such as Kafka, Gemfire, Mongodb, apache storm, Oracle and other 3rd party libraries
As part of central tech arch team, can work on creating common components, assist in automating environment flow via script or Java
Gain functional knowledge as will get aligned to different verticals in CPB/ Capital Markets
Previous experience in working in a horizontal team in agile/ scrum setting will be an added advant
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project manment techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and man deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements"
TECHNICAL/APPLICATION ENGINEER,"Responsibilities:
To Study system and products technical details to provide professional technical advice
Provide technical support, design, demonstration or training in both software and IT system and OT system
Support technical matters for large and complex Physical Security Project
Knowledge, lesson learnt sharing with co-workers and supervisor
Site verification of sub-contractor’s installation works adhere to the design document
Deploy, Site Acceptance Test (SAT) and T&C of Integrated Security Management System at sites
Perform system and product trouble shooting
Ad-hoc tasks assigned by supervisor
Requirements:
Minimum Diploma in Mechanical / Electrical / Electronic Engineering or a related subject
Team player, fast learner, high initiative, and able to work independent
 Able to perform network setting, configuration
Working experience in CCTV, Access Control, FIDS and Integrated Security will be advantageous"
Senior Software Engineer - Associate #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #Worknow #UrgentHire,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well using Front end technologies such as AngularJS, HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 8 years of Software Development work experience
Strong proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages Java, AngularJS, JavaScript/HTML and SQL
Hands on experience with Springboot and distributed messaging systems such as Kafka
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Good understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Preferred Skills:
Knowledge of Java 8 features, REST, UNIX shell scripting"
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid) - 22511265 #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
Citi’s FXLM technology group supports the front-office technology operations of one of the world’s largest capital market businesses. This team is a key partner to the markets business and has been a major contributor to its success. Our talented technology group is looking for a hands-on, java developer to work in Singapore based server-side development team on our award-winning Citi Velocity platform.
Citi Velocity is a best in-class, state of the art, proprietary e-commerce platform. It deploys cutting edge technology and innovation to offer a slick, dynamic and rich end-user experience. By leveraging Citi’s global footprint with world-class innovation, we are giving our clients unprecedented access to our capital markets intelligence, multi-asset real-time execution and post-trade service.
As a senior developer you will work together with front office, operations, product development teams and members of the development team to provide solutions that improve efficiency, decrease operational risk, and enable the business to expand. You will have experience in building high-performing, scalable and enterprise-grade application, adopting best-in-class engineering practices. These are high profile applications that offer you the opportunity to shape the future technical direction and take ownership of functional components. You'll work in a collaborative, respecting, trusting and diverse environment that encourages creative thinking and critical problem solving that are best in class, to serve our clients globally.
Responsibilities / Role:
Working closely with the global business, support, and development teams to define the architecture, design, develop, test, and maintain our e-commerce platform.
Design and implement scalable applications and services with a solid focus on quality, continuous integration, and deployment.
Write testable code following clean coding and SOLID design principles.
Perform code reviews and contribute to overall quality, maintainability and testability of software developed.
Be willing and able to adapt to changes in priorities and requirements.
Be a self-starter and plan/schedule own work for tasks and projects, implement functionality without direct supervision.
Work closely with clients and stakeholders to define feature requirements and deliver a product that materially impacts the business and improves the end user experience.
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces.
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues.
Third line support of the platform during trading hours.
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users supporting FX trading.
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
At least 5 years of software development experience.
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Solid knowledge on Java 8/11, Core Java, and Spring framework.
Good understanding of multi-threading and OO principles.
Unix/Linux experience
Familiar with different persistent storage technologies such as RDBMS (e.g., SQL Server) and NoSQL.
Experience working with large complex applications.
Good understanding of clean coding principles and familiarity of design patterns.
Good understanding of code quality measurements using tools like Sonar and able to implement design and implement unit, integration, and functional tests.
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase.
Non-Technical Skills Required:
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career.
Good written and verbal communication skills as it’s a sales and trader facing role.
Be willing and able to adapt to changes in priorities and requirements.
A team-player who is comfortable working in a team that deals with ambiguity and problem solving.
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized.
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and/or improving workflow.
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts.
Desirable Skills (Not essential):
Knowledge of FX products & product lifecycle.
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of e-trading or e-commerce applications.
#LI-Hybrid"
Software Engineering - Singapore - #JPM #Worknow #UrgentHire#JobsThatMatter',"Role description
The Wealth Management business has been on a transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a best in class experience. The Active advisory Technology team is partnering with our business in building and rolling out world-class solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner to build cutting edge technology solutions
The Active advisory team in APAC is specifically seeking a senior Web/Application Technology Lead to join us on this journey. As a Technology lead, you will be responsible for driving and managing the technical delivery of key projects that are owned and driven by APAC, but delivering for the business globally. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners globally, as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. As a technical lead, the role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building Web applications for desktop and/or native mobile platforms. Ability to manage and steer a team of developers towards successful deliveries is a must. Also, if you have a passion for cutting edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
Responsibilities
Work with business and technology product owner on Product backlog prioritization
Work with business and technology product owner to drive program roadmap
Own overall application technical architecture and design
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services and DB
Manage and oversee the contributions of team members
Face off to and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including front-office business, product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Active involvement in supporting the platform across all environments, including production in a Devops model
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
Bachelor's degree or above
10 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
3 or more years of experience in managing team
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Strong leadership skills
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
Senior Software Engineer (Data) #WorkNow #Urgent-#JobsThatMatter,"Position Overview
As a hand on developer, you will be working to build robust and scalable self-service data platform for Autodesk. You will work with cutting edge open source technologies in big data space.
Responsibilities
Design and develop components of end to end Data Platform 
Work with the team to make the Data Platform an efficient, robust and scalable platform
Enthusiastic and passionate member of a highly skilled and motivated agile development team 
Contribute to a team culture that values quality, robustness, and scalability while fostering initiatives and innovation
Minimum Qualifications
BS or MS in computer science or a related field
Experience with Map Reduce
Experience with Hive and one relational DB
Strong problem solving skills
Strong communication skills
Ability to learn new technical skills
4+ years of experience with Big Data
Expert knowledge and experience in Hadoop 2.0 and its ecosystem
Expert programming skills in either Java, Scala or Python
Solid proficiency with Amazon Web Services
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with Spark
Experience with Hadoop / Spark Source Code
Experience with Python, Scala
Experience with Flume
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes
Experience with at least one workflow scheduler (e.g. Oozie)
Experience with Kafka/Splunk/ELK/Hive Metastore
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.
Are you an existing contractor or consultant with Autodesk? Please search for open jobs and apply internally (not on this external site). If you have any questions or require support, contact Autodesk Careers."
Software Engineer,"Job details
Salary
$5,000 - $10,000 a month
Job Type
Full-time
Permanent
Full Job Description
Investment Company of the People’s Republic of China (Singapore) Pte Ltd is a fully owned subsidiary of the People’s Bank of China. The company manages a part of foreign exchange reserve within the scope authorized by the People’s Bank of China, undertakes and transacts various kinds of investment businesses.
Job Description:
Work closely with the business for development of investment management functionalities, ensure the quality of deliverable for the work assigned;
Participate in the full RAD/Agile projects and also maintenance/ support post implementation;
Involved in analysis and scripting SQL queries for data analysis and data extraction, implement new regulatory changes, create new reports etc.;
Collaborate with internal technical team/users in investigating, testing and together providing delivery solutions;
Perform coding, implementation, integration, deployment, documentation and user guide of IT application systems;
Work with IT teams and senior management, regular reporting to management.
Requirements:
At least 5 years of IT experience in driving enterprise-wide projects;
Deep understanding with Software engineering, OOP, Database, OS and Network fundamentals.
Experience in C#/Python language and framework, SQL Developer, B/S projects, Strong skills in coding.
Experience in investment or financial sector, basic understanding of financial products and quantitative finance mathematics;
Good communication, negotiation, problem-solving, conflict management skills, Independent and proactive yet a strong team player;
Ability to interact with business users, senior management, IT teams effectively.
We offer a competitive salary which commensurate with experience, or beyond the stated salary range for unicorns."
"Full Stack Developer, VP-Infrastructure Development - #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter","Job Description
As a Full stack Development professional, your knowledge in system design, application development, and testing will help your team deliver high-quality products in Data Domain.
As a member of our Infrastructure Development team, you'll dive right into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to developing and deploying large-scale infrastructure solutions that support JPMorgan Chase & Co.’s diverse and critical businesses. You'll be using the latest technologies, data management, and security practices in all aspect of software development. Critical thinking, clear communication, and collaboration are key to successful product delivery.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information technology, or related field
Provide technical expertise in Java, Springbok throughout the software lifecycle including design, implementation and delivery.
Exposure to Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages: Java, Spring Boot & Angular UI/UX.
Must have 10 years' experience as strong Java, Spring & UI/UX developer with very good understanding of framework architecture and Best Practices.
Good knowledge on Data products, Data pipelines, Data Engineering – Kafka would be required.
Working experience in framework technologies: REST Standards, JavaScript Frameworks, ES6 Standards.
Experience working with two or more from the following: database, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, information retrieval, networking, large scale software development, security software development
Understanding or have experience with agile and lean philosophies
Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills with clear communication
Ability to collaborate with different roles to achieve common goals
Development practices such test driven development. Well versed with API Swagger
Complete understanding of Source code branching with Bit Bucket, CI/CD Release Pipeline with Jenkins & Deployment tool."
Senior Backend Engineer-Top Internet Company,"1. Responsible for the development and maintenance of global account and payment systems.
2. Responsible for the development and maintenance of game SDK and module functions.
Client Details
Top gaming company
Description
What you will do:
1. Responsible for the development and maintenance of global account and payment systems.
2. Responsible for the development and maintenance of game SDK and module functions.
Profile
1. Bachelor's degree (or above) in Computer Science or related programs, with 5 years above experience in Server development.
2. Proficient in any backend language with 3+ years of experience. Golang is preferred.
3. Familiar with the development and maintenance of large-scale micro-services, understanding services optimization and monitoring.
4. Familiar with web service development and related tech stack, including HTTP, security, database, cache, message queue, etc.
5. Strong understanding of database design, able to do SQL and performance optimization, familiar with at least one NoSQL database or cache such as Redis、MongoDB、Memcached.
6. Experienced in account or payment system development is preferred.
Job Offer
Competitive salary
To apply online please click the 'Apply' button below. For a confidential discussion about this role please contact Michael Yuan on +65 6541 9917."
Senior Java Analyst Developer - (Hybrid). #WorkNow #Urgent',"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Technical Lead, - (2200017771). #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Focus on developing and delivering the technology roadmap for product
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive the technology strategy implementation within the team on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Stakeholders
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks and obsolescence so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Our Ideal Candidate
13 Years of experience in application development using Java and Advance Technologies tool.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles and coding standards.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology, plus adherence to VX principles
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Able to identify and drive compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Good experience in setting up and managing the delivery team in various location
Very good presentation and documentation skills.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, that also includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching etc.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Understanding of deploying microservices/API, cloud solutions and experience in integrating public cloud into traditional hosting/delivery models with a specific focus on AWS
Understanding and experience on core Java (Java 8 or higher), core Spring frameworks and experience in using design patterns
Understanding and experience on React, Redux, JavaScript MVC patterns / frameworks and CSS strategies
Understanding and experience on developing cloud native microservices using frameworks such as Spring boot, Spring cloud
Understanding and experience in working on Relation and non-Relation DBs (Progress, Oracle, Cassandra, MongoDB)
Understanding and knowledge on Implementing automated testing platforms, unit tests, and CICD
Understanding and knowledge on code versioning tools, such as Git, Bitbucket
Understanding of container platform, such as Docker and Kubernetes, in particular similar offerings by cloud providers such as AWS
Familiar and working experience with Ansible, Jenkins, Terraform
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Software Engineer - Recommendation(Dev Efficiency and Infra)#.#Urgent,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Team Intro
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy.
Our TikTok recommendation team is responsible for developing state-of-the-art machine learning models and strategies to improve user consumption experience, inspire creativity, build a fair and flourishing ecosystem.
Own backend/systems work for TikTok short video platform. Building world class distributed system in C++, Python, Java. Building great system for Produce Engineers and users
Own the design and implementation of online services, offline data processing systems. Own user engagement metrics, developer efficiency, stability.
Implement great compute, storage, monitoring, debug system for product teams.
Improve the efficiency of hardware, people, company through technology and management techniques
Qualifications
Ownership and proactive thinking
Good data structure and programming capability (in any modern programming language).
Bonus if having ACM-ICPC experience.
Have good taste technically, open to learn, interested in working as a world class engineer.
Preferred Qualification
Minimum 3 years relevant work experience from a large-scale internet business
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Loans Java Sr Developer#.' #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
BackEnd Engineer (C++),"Title: BackEnd Engineer (C++)
My client is in solutions and services providing mobility intelligence and they looking for a BackEnd C++ developer to their team. If you enjoy an environment which requires critical thinking and analysis, click on the link below to apply now!
Responsibilities:
·       Works with Software Development Team and Product/Project Managers to ensure delivery of projects
·       Accountable for the timeline and quality of the projects
·       Creates, implements and maintains a continuous improvement plan for software development
The ideal candidate:
·       6 years experience in Software Development
·       Have experience in leading a team and worked on large scale enterprise projects
·       Good knowledge and foundation in logical implementation, Data Structures and Algorithms
·       Proficient in of C/C++ programming language on Linux and Windows platform
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
"Digital Post-Trade - Full Stack Developer #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate,'","Job Description
As a Full Stack Developer of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems.
1 year working in Software Development 
Knowledge in one or more of the following technologies:
Core Java Fundamentals, Java 8+, Spring, Spring Boot, REST Web Services and testing frameworks such as Junit, Cucumber, etc
Demonstrable ability to build applications in React, and have understanding of the core Javascript language, up to the current ECMAScript spec. Able to write useful tests using industry-standard frameworks like jest and react-testing-library
CSS and HTML: semantic HTML, CSS optimization and, preferably, Javascript-based styling solutions (e.g., material-ui styles)
Microservices and Cloud, containers with Kubernetes orchestration
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle, MySQL and NoSQL databases such as Cassandra, MongoDB, etc
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Understanding of architecture and design principles
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Preferred skills/experience:
BPM and Workflow Engines experience is a plus"
"ICG Technology Software Development, 2023 Summer Analyst, Singapore |","Responsibilities
You're the brains behind our work.
You’re ready to bring your knowledge from the classroom to the boardroom, and Citi wants to help you get there. Whether it’s honing your skills or building your network, we know that success can’t come without growth. Our programs equip you with the knowledge and training you need to play a valuable role on your team, and establish a long-term career here. At Citi, we value internal mobility, and career growth is not a question of if, but when.
Citi’s Institutional Clients Group (ICG) is looking for Summer Software Development Analysts to join the Technology team in Singapore. Our ICG Technologists support and enable the success of our trading businesses— and by utilizing a broad range of technologies, our team is at the forefront of innovation. We seek to drive our systems and processes toward scalable, low-latency, high-frequency enterprise systems to support Citi and our aggressive growth strategy.
Our Citi Singapore Technology team builds, owns and supports many front-end, middle-tier and back-office applications that are used on Citi trading floors around the world. Numerous applications handle millions of transactions per day and have billions of dollars in trade-flow. Many teams operate on a ""follow-the-sun"" model and are required to have their applications running 24/7.
Your time here will look something like this...
As a Software Development Analyst, you will work in an agile software development environment, developing quality and scalable software solutions using leading-edge technologies. Based on business requirements, you will develop code consistent with quality standards, and offer support during testing cycles and post-production deployment. To ensure defect-free programming, you will use the appropriate tools to test and debug code, and participate in the review of peer coding.
You will have the opportunity to focus on a variety of technologies, like the following:
Learn about best Enginering Excellance practices, Minimum Development Standards and Minimum Operational standards set and followed at CITI.
Opportunity to work on a small project/Proof of Concept using Core Java/C#/.Net with a SQL/No-SQL DB as backend(Oracle/MongoDB/Neo4J/Redis/HDFS/Cassandra) and React JS/Angular based front end.
Get basic understanding of latest design and software architecture patterns and frameworks - Microservices, APIs, Spring Core/MVC/Boot/Cloud, REST and so on.
Get basic understanding of event streaming/messaging systems using KAFKA or similar technology.
Understand CI/CD with exposure to various software development tools like : JIRA, Zephry, BitBucket, TeamCity, uDeploy, Artifactory, Openshift(ECS/Docker)
Exposure to Containers using Docker/Kubernetes
We provide you with the knowledge and skills you need to succeed.
We’re committed to teaching you the ropes. The Summer Analyst Program starts in early June with an in-depth education on the fundamentals of the Analyst role, as well as the nuances of Citi’s culture. The program also includes on the desk training, an informative speaker series as well as networking opportunities. Summer Analysts often return to Citi after graduating from University to become full-time Analysts and continue their career in technology.
We want to hear from you if...
You are in your penultimate year of university pursuing a degree in any discipline (graduating between Dec 2023 - June 2024); degrees in Computer Science; Information Systems; Computer Engineering; Business (technology focused); and other technology-focused degrees are preferred; but not required.
You are from a top academic institution and are on track to graduating with 2nd Upper Class honors (or equivalent)
Who we think will be a great fit...
A dedication to learning and a true passion for the business are vital.
As industries all over the globe continue to restructure and grow, we are hiring professionals who have a global perspective on the future of banking, and want to make an impact on the corporate level. We value diversity and so do you.
We’ll also be looking for the following:
Commitment to personal growth and career development, a strong desire to learn, and success in team environments
Desire to develop a deep understanding of the financial industry
Unquestioned commitment to integrity ethical decision-making
You are a good team player with a highly collaborative nature
Passionate about technology, with knowledge of any of the following being a plus
Ability to multi-task with sharp problem solving skills
Strong communicator, able to build relationships and rapport easily
Strong planning, and organizational skills
Adaptable and enjoy working in a fast-paced environment
Positive attitude and keen to learn.
Ability to work under time constraints
Unquestioned commitment to integrity ethical decision-making
We conduct assessment on a rolling basis, please submit application at your soonest convenience."
Senior Software Engineer [Data] #UrgentHire,"Position Overview
As a hand on developer, you will be working to build robust and scalable self-service data platform for Autodesk. You will work with cutting edge open source technologies in big data space.
Responsibilities:
Design and develop components of end to end Data Platform 
Work with the team to make the Data Platform an efficient, robust and scalable platform
Enthusiastic and passionate member of a highly skilled and motivated agile development team 
Contribute to a team culture that values quality, robustness, and scalability while fostering initiatives and innovation
Minimum Qualifications:
BS or MS in computer science or a related field
Experience with Map Reduce
Experience with Hive and one relational DB
Strong problem solving skills
Strong communication skills
Ability to learn new technical skills
4+ years of experience with Big Data
Expert knowledge and experience in Hadoop 2.0 and its ecosystem
Expert programming skills in either Java, Scala or Python
Solid proficiency with Amazon Web Services
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with Spark
Experience with Hadoop / Spark Source Code
Experience with Python, Scala
Experience with Flume
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes
Experience with at least one workflow scheduler (e.g. Oozie)
Experience with Kafka/Splunk/ELK/Hive Metastore
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.
Are you an existing contractor or consultant with Autodesk? Please search for open jobs and apply internally (not on this external site). If you have any questions or require support, contact Autodesk Careers."
"Software Engineer, - Senior Associate #JobsThaMatter #Urgent #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 6 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"*Lead Java Developer, - 22440742. #Urgent'","The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - #Immediate#"" |","Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556). #Urgent'.","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Software Engr. (Codebase Platform) - Cloud Infrastructure,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Codebase team is responsible for the construction of TikTok and its affiliates' unified code system and related toolchains, including code hosting, code review, code analysis, CI/CD, Cloud IDE and other products. Our team is committed to developing industry-leading R&D infrastructure to provide engineers with the ultimate development experience, creating our unique code culture, and continuously improving code quality and development efficiency.
Responsibilities
Develop advanced and standardized R&D infrastructure, improve code quality, and ensure the efficiency and experience of R&D engineers;
Participate in the formulation of R&D processes, design and develop platforms and tools that cover the entire R&D life cycle, and support large-scale R&D activities;
Continuously optimize technical solutions and implementation, accumulate technical capabilities, and improve development efficiency and service quality.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field, with more than 3 years of relevant working experience;
Proficiency with Linux system and one of the following languages: Golang, Python, C++, Java;
Solid foundations in computing, storage, network and other computer systems. Experienced with large-scale system design and development;
A broad technical vision and in-depth understanding of open source and industry technologies;
Excellent problem analysis and problem-solving skills, a passion for solving challenging problems.
Preferred Qualifications
At least 3 years of relevant experience;
Familiar with R&D tools such as Github, Gitlab, Jenkins, Travis CI, Sourcegraph, Phabricator, Gerrit, Cloud9, Bazel, etc.;
Full-stack development experience or open source project contributions."
Senior Embedded Software Engineer,"OSIM is looking for a responsible Embedded Software Engineer with team spirit to develop Communication Daughter Cards (CDC) in our IoT products. 
Responsibilities
Work with Mobile Engineer, Backend Engineer, UX designer, and CDC Vendor in a digital team to develop wireless communication firmware on PCB for IOT products
Develop new feature for different type, such as WIFI, BlueTooth, ZigBee, 2G, and versions of CDC
Do code review for vendor and other team members on embedded software code basing on Github
Maintain existing code base and provide bug fixes
Analyse, monitor and improve efficiency, stability of the CDC system
Involve in schematic and PCB design process
Work with a variety of microcontroller, SDK and communication protocol
Work closely with team members to ensure the project is delivered on time
Requirements
3 to 5 years of experience in embedded software engineering
Familiar with Agile (Scrum) team cooperation process
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electronic Engineering or its equivalent
Proficient in C, C++ programming in MCU and Linux environment
Familiar with Git software version control
Strong verbal communication and writing skills in English and Mandarin as there will be needs to communicate with our China team of developers.
Able to read schematics and datasheets
Experience in developing and troubleshooting on embedded products
Experience with wireless network stack such as Wi-Fi, Bluetooth, BLE, Zigbee, Cellular, etc "
"API Tech Lead Analyst, #Urgent#WorkNow","Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
Service Now Developer / (2200010556) *#WorkNow,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst #Immediate #UrgentHire#Seekbetter,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Senior Software Engineer (f|m),"Responsibilities
We are looking for software engineers to join us in the exciting journey of enabling our clients to embrace digital automation. You will undergo a structured training programme and will be given opportunities to gain valuable real-life working experience through a wide array of exciting assignments. As you progress and advance your career with Actico, we will provide you with diverse development and career opportunities to help you grow as a Fintech professional. If you want to work in emerging technologies, are a good team player with can-do attitude, Actico has the right job for you.
Qualifications
Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent
3 to 7 years of experience in software development or software product implementation
Experience in Product Design and Architecture making use of Best Practices and Design Patterns
Design and Development experience in Core Java, J2EE, Spring Framework
Should have experience on System Integrations using XML, Web Services (SOAP, Rest), MQ
Experience with ORM Frameworks (Hibernate, MyBatis) is a good to have
Hands-on experience in Oracle / MSSQL is must
Hands-on experience with any of the Application Server (IBM Websphere, Oracle Weblogic, Redhat Jboss, Apache Tomcat) Setup and Maintenance
Familiar with CICD and Source Control tools such as Jenkins, Maven and Svn/Git
Should be able to take ownership for a complete module development, release and support lifecycle
Should possess good analytical and debugging skills
Flexibility to work on Project Implementation and Pre-Sales Activities whenever necessary
Experience with DevOps
Experience in Financial Industry is a plus
About ACTICO
We are a diverse and international team: creative minds, experienced software experts and astute consultants. What sets us apart is the shared enthusiasm for innovative software solutions and technologies.
If you have any questions about your application and your entry, our HR team will be happy to help.
Daniel Deland
Human Resources
+49 7545 9338-300
Join us. Rely on us. Grow with us."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization - #Urgent #Immediate","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, - #Urgent #Immediate","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912 #Immediate #Worknow',"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Vice President- Senior Python Developer - Commodities Technology -#UrgentHire #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter',"As a member of our Commodities Technology team in Singapore, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through technology and innovation. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on shared goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment - one that welcomes creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role is part of a global team that develops and maintains commodity trading, risk management, P&L reporting and price calculation applications based on J.P. Morgan’s Athena platform and requires an agile mindset to be able to focus on both strategic initiatives and streamline/support the day-to-day trading activities of the desk.
Athena is J.P. Morgan's cross-market risk management and trading system that provides functionality for traders, sales and operations staff globally. It is used in our foreign exchange, fixed income & credit and commodities businesses. Athena includes a globally replicated object-oriented database, a powerful dependency graph and a fully integrated stack across pricing, risk and trading tools. The code base is a combination of Python and C++: C++ for speed, and Python for flexibility and rapid but controlled releases. Athena is designed to provide a CI/CD environment, and pulls developers close to the business to help increase revenues, while improving operational processes and controls to reduce costs.
We are seeking a technically strong and disciplined developer. Working closely with QR, Trading, Sales and Middle Office teams, you will be called upon to deliver quality code in a fast paced environment that evolves as business opportunities present themselves. The role will require an ability to attain clear understanding of the Athena platform and of the unique design considerations that come into play in a diverse and highly interdependent systems environment.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Math 
5+ years of experience in performant, large-scale system development in an object-oriented or functional language such as Python, Java, Scala, C++ or C#.
Good understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment.
Focus on testing through the entire development cycle to produce reliable and maintainable software.
Software development experience in commodities, finance or investment banking preferred, or willingness to rapidly learn the business domain.
Ability to develop a good understanding of end to end business processes.
Enthusiastic to keep learning and growing, in technical aptitude and business understanding.
Excellent interpersonal skills to interact confidently and credibly with business users, to understand and agree business requirements and their prioritisation.
Ability to collaborate with and influence other technology teams to deliver end to end solutions to the business in a constantly changing environment.
Strong knowledge of data structures, algorithms and enterprise architecture."
"Software Development Engineer, - #UrgentHire #LetsGetToWork #JobsThatMatter","TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
We are now looking for talented individuals to join us in 2022 - people who want to inspire creativity and co-create the future with TikTok.
About the TikTok Engineering Team
We are building up an engineering team for core TikTok product in Singapore, to ensure TikTok continues a healthy growth, deliver the best product experience to all of our users, build the most attractive features to help users on enjoying their time on TikTok, earn trust on privacy protection, and more.
Participate in the development of automated testing tools/frameworks, design and execution of automated test cases, automatically building test environments, and continuous integration.
Responsible for the entire process of advertising system testing, including requirements analysis, design review, formulating test plans, designing and executing test cases, conducting defect tracking and software quality analysis, etc.
Understand the tools and techniques used in developing new products and work with cross-functionality teams to establish and refine dashboards and metrics to facilitate our data-driven approach.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science or related major is preferred.
Familiar with at least one programming language (Python/Java).
Solid computer basics (network/database/algorithm).
Proactive, self-driving, and in-depth understanding of the business; capability of communicating with cross-functional teams and taking charge of a business independently.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiar with golang/c++ is a plus.
Familiar with API test platform, pytest, diff tools is a plus.
Experience in continuous integration is preferred."
"Infrastructure Developer, - Associate, Singapore #Urgent","As an experienced Infrastructure Development professional, your mission is to help lead our team of innovators and technologists toward creating next-level solutions that improve the way our business is run. Your hands-on knowledge in system design, application development, testing, and operational stability will help your team deliver high-quality products. You’ll be instrumental in solving more difficult technical issues, developing integration elements, building data models, APIs, and open 3rd-party SDKs. You’ll see your ideas come to life as part of a small, success-driven team. Your quest to embracing leading-edge technologies and methodologies inspires your team to follow suit. And best of all, you’ll be able to harness massive amounts of brainpower through our global network of technologists from around the world to tackle big challenges.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree
Minimum 6 years of experience in infrastructure and at least 2 years of experience in development
Provide technical expertise throughout the software lifecycle including design, implementation and delivery
Understanding of cloud, virtualization, APIs, and modern software languages
Software development experience in one or more general-purpose programming languages: Python, Java, C, C++, Go, Ansible
Experience with developing frameworks that help increase developer and release velocity, improving code health and technical standards
Advanced experience working with two or more from the following: web application development, database, unix/linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, information retrieval, networking, large-scale software development, security software development
Understanding or have experience with Agile and Lean philosophies
Strong critical-thinking and problem-solving skills with clear communication
Ability to collaborate with different roles to achieve common goals"
"Technical Design & Delivery Lead, - (2100011857).'* #Immediate #Worknow","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
URGENT / Software Engineer (Java / J2EE / Spring Boot),"Highlights:
5 Days
Permanent job opportunity
Great remuneration and benefits
Responsibilities:
Produce fully functional web and mobile applications and write clean code
Development, implementation, configuration, support, maintenance and security of IT software and applications
Design and develop high-volume, low-latency applications for mission-critical systems and deliver high-availability and performance
Contributing in all phases of the development lifecycle
Write well designed, testable, efficient code and improve the quality of the code
Conduct software analysis, programming, testing and debugging
Enforce best practices in code quality and release/deployment process to achieve near-zero production incidents
Design and work with REST APIs, Spring Framework, Angular, Google GWT, JSP, Struts1.3, Java Android, or IOS
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or a related field or a combination of related experience and education
At least 1- 2 years of proven working experience in Java development
Experience in software implementation, requirements gathering, systems analysis and functional design
Hands-on experience in designing and developing applications using Java or J2EE or Java Web Applications or Angular, Spring Boot, Spring Framework, Google GWT, Struts1\
Preferably with technical knowledge in Microservices, MSSQL, Oracle, TypeScript, JavaScript, CSS, HTML5; and interactive debuggers effectively
Full analytical capability based on a good understanding of technical architecture and familiar with query tools such as Eclipse, Git, Maven and Gradle
Good communication, analytical & troubleshooting skills
Ability to quickly grasp concepts relating to customization
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please send your latest resume to ref19(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
 Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Lim Dick Sern (Dick Sern)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22106832"
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742..#',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742.',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Java Developer - (2200019786).,"Job Scope
The successful candidate will be a skilled software engineer who is excited about working with a world class team to analysing, designing, developing and delivering solutions built for FM business.
We are looking for forward-thinking, energetic and passionate individuals to be part of a new exciting journey! 
Development of large scale big data solutions to be used in a very large production environment.
Gather, analyse and maintain large data sets to provide answers to address hurdles and create innovative solutions in large-scale data infrastructures.
Interact with both business and technical stakeholders to deliver high quality products and services that meet business requirements and expectations while applying the latest available tools and technology.
Develop code and mentor junior developers to ensure deliverables are on time, within budget, and with good code quality.
Present technical solutions, capabilities, considerations, and features in business terms.
Effectively communicate status, issues, and risks in a precise and timely manner.
Our Ideal Candidate
Strong analytical and problem solving and creative skills.
Good communication skills in both written and oral English.
Ability to be organised and multi-task on different requirements across various stakeholders, and to work independently and under pressure.
Cultural sensitivity and awareness to work with a range of people from diverse background and geographies.
Mandatory Technical Skills
5+ years hands on experience with Java / J2EE development experience.
Demonstrated hands on experience building Big Data solutions.
Experience with Hadoop ecosystem: Hadoop, Spark, MapReduce, Hive, Yarn, HBase, etc.
Experience with RDBMS as well as NoSQL stacks (ElasticSearch, HBase, Cassandra).
 Hands on experience on devops technology.
Desirable Technical Skills – but not mandatory
Good grasp of statistical and scientific programming packages in Python is a plus.
Good grasp of data science concepts with emphasis on machine learning techniques is a plus.
Experience with Agile / Scrum development methodologies.
Software testing know-how, including black-box and white-box testing methodologies and both functional and non-functional testing.
Test driven development experience.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Big Data
JAVA
SQL / HIVE
SPARK
PYTHON
Communication
Problem solving
System Design
About Standard Chartered
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Software Engineer - (PSET-CPD-IDL) #WorkNow #UrgentHire,"Position Overview 
An exciting career opportunity in the Identity and Entitlements Engineering team, in Autodesk Singapore that is critical to the Subscription business model transformation.
As a Software Engineer, you will design, develop and deliver business model workflows which aligned with the business goals and strategy. You will work with developers, architects, product owners and operations to collaboratively deliver various team requirements and goals to advance the platform for subscriptions and entitlements. You will proactively work to evaluate and adopt technology solutions that help with improving the quality of the platform as well as productivity of the team.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, test, debug, and document new and existing components to ensure that software meets business, quality and operational needs
Work on the development of business requirements closely with product owners and other stakeholders
Ensure that high quality code is delivered by following best practices like peer code reviews, code standards, unit testing and test-driven development
Drive and participate in code and document reviews, and share best practices
Work with business and technical product owners to interpret and translate business needs to technical requirements
Evaluate and recommend tools, technologies and processes to ensure the highest quality and performance is achieved
Monitor and troubleshoot code level problems quickly and efficiently
Apply technical expertise to resolve challenging programming and design problems
Focus on scalability, security and availability of all applications and processes
Contribute to technical road map and technical debt elimination, balancing time, resource, and quality constraints to achieve business and strategic goals and requirements
Minimum Qualifications 
Bachelor’s / Master’s Degree (in Computer Science or other engineering discipline.) or equivalent work experience 
Entry Level or with 1+ years hands-on experience developing scalable, distributed applications in the cloud
Experience with XML/JSON, designing and building REST/SOAP based web services
Excellent Programming skills in one of the programming paradigms… Object oriented or Functional programming.
Experience with building cloud-based API platforms or backend systems in a Unix environment
Possess good analytical skills with problem-solving abilities
Detail-oriented with respect to documentation and communication
Experience with AWS or other cloud-based service providers
Preferred Skills
Entry level with a hunger for technologies
Experience in Cloud service is a plus
Experience working with large scale distributed systems is a plus+
Hands on Experience with Docker based application development.
The Ideal Candidate
Passion for developing robust software and writing maintainable code 
Pragmatic and results oriented & ability to learn large software systems quickly 
Flexibility under changing conditions and ability to multi-task between projects, able to work well in a team to deliver on team goals 
Good verbal and written communication skills in English language 
Willingness to take initiative and committed to deliver on time 
Keen interest in new technologies
Ability to work inclusively and people with diverse background 
Ability to work with remote and international team members
About Autodesk
With Autodesk software, you have the power to Make Anything. The future of making is here, bringing with it radical changes in the way things are designed, made, and used. It’s disrupting every industry: architecture, engineering, construction, manufacturing, and media and entertainment. With the right knowledge and tools, this disruption is your opportunity.
Our software is used by everyone - from design professionals, engineers, and architects to digital artists, students, and hobbyists. We constantly explore new ways to integrate all dimensions of diversity across our employees, customers, partners, and communities. Our ultimate goal is to expand opportunities for anyone to imagine, design, and make a better world."
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912 #Immediate#',"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Senior Software Engineer,"Title: Senior Engineer, Software (Cloud)
My client is an international conglomerate involved in the R&D, manufacture and distribution of industrial products primarily related to Water filtration and healthcare. Click apply now if you want to find out more and have a chat with the team!
Responsibilities:
·       Develop Full stack web applications.
·       Conduct requirement gathering, design, implementation, integration, testing.
·       Continual improvement of software management process.
·       Troubleshooting, document, upgrade and develop maintenance procedures.
The ideal candidate:
·       Bachelor’s Degree in computer engineering/Computer Science or related discipline.
·       3 – 5 years’ experience in software development.
·       2 years of experience in Node.js Framework, e.g. express, meteor, react, angular.
·       Experience in administrating and deploying application on AWS.
·       Completed at least 2 full Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
FRG Technology Consulting is the specialized delivery arm of Frank Recruitment Group – the global niche IT recruitment specialists. We focus on quick delivery to our Key Clients on roles that are traditionally that little bit more difficult to fill. We established an exceptional reputation for delivering the very best professionals to our customers. By focusing solely on the niche IT field, our consultants are genuine experts, meaning they not only fully understand the market, but have built solid relationships with a wide range of vendors, customers and specialists looking to progress their careers.
We worked hard to build a reputation for delivering only the very best professionals to our customers. Our top-level service has assisted vendor channel partners, global manufacturing businesses and SMEs attract and retaining the right people for their business.
EA License Number: 21C0475
EA Personnel Number: R22110132"
"Tech Lead, Cloud Native Infrastructure #URGENT*#Immediate #Urgent","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Our Cloud Native Infrastructure team manages a Kubernetes-like cluster management system to host microservices, serverless applications, big data processing, machine learning, distributed storage services, and edge computing platforms for the company.
The team builds and leverages the container-based cluster management system to manage elastic computing resources, and provides PaaS hosting capabilities to our developers and infrastructure services. This cluster management system is designed to be capable of managing our fleet of machines across multiple data centers, managing hundreds of millions of containers and applications for our business, with high agility, large scalability, high availability, and extreme performance assurance.
Responsibilities
Lead the team to build application orchestration framework to host various types of production workloads, covering services management, big data jobs, distributed machine learning systems, and distributed storage services;
Build performant container-based cluster management system to manage our hyper-scale resources and workloads, with horizontal scalability and ultra-low E2E container startup latency;
Design and build cluster federation, horizontal scaling, vertical scaling, and co-location solutions to optimize resource utilization;
Apply ML methodologies to the scheduler system to help reduce resource fragmentation, balance hot spots and optimize data center power usage;
Recruit and mentor engineers with various levels of experience into a performant team, build team culture and cohesion, help team members grow technical capabilities.
Qualifications
Bachelor's or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields;
6+ years of professional software development experience;
Strong with Golang/Java/Python program development (at least one), pursue high-quality code and focused on code engineering quality;
Solid knowledge of Linux system, proficient in multi-threading, network programming, and distributed development in any programming language;
Good communication skills, able to lead and drive projects effectively. Familiar with team and project management methodologies and approaches.
Preferred Qualifications
In-depth research and industry experience in application scaling, workload co-location, and isolation enhancement;
Experience in cloud-native application or framework development, including OAM, dapr, vitess;
Experience in large scale cluster management systems, including Kubernetes, Yarn, Mesos;
Experience in container runtime and relevant projects, including Containerd, Kata-Container, gVisor, and x-containers;
Contributor/Committer or PMC of the open-source community is a plus."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization - #Urgent #JobsThatMatter","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization - #Urgent #JobsThatMatter #WorkNow","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Loans Java Sr Developer,. - #JobsThatMatter #Urgent#'#WorkNow","Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997)'. #JobsThatMatter,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
Commodities FO Risk Developer .NET (AVP)#.#JobsThatMatter #Worknow,"Background
The role is for an AVP analyst / developer manager within the Commodities Technology Front Office Risk team in Singapore.
Citi are now one of the largest Commodities players in the banking sector, having grown rapidly over the past five years and we have ambitious plans to further develop our Commodities platform. Our technology challenges are therefore fast-moving and varied.
The team develops and supports a strategic platform which calculates, manages and stores intra-day and EOD risk data for front office trading.
Our roles offer motivated candidates the chance to engage with our trading, quants and sales teams in an agile way and learn the vital role that risk plays across a wide range of commodities financial and physical products and we offer the chance to gain experience of real-time pricing and risk techniques.
Participate in development of an exciting brand new risk system.
Responsibilities
Interface directly with traders, sales and quants to gather and define business requirements.
Contribute to the re-engineering. development and enhancement of a wide range of risk management tools.
Adhere to and continuously improve our processes and SDLC in a fast moving environment.
Knowledge / Experience
Experience in server side programming using C#.
Experience in Python preferred.
Knowledge of investment banking products and trade lifecycle preferred."
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst#.#WorkNow #UrgentHire,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President, Singapore - #Worknow","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
"Java Full Stack Developer, Associate #Worknow","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including: 
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
2 or more years of experience with full stack Java application development and distribution, including frameworks like Spring, JPA, Java 11 features, REST services
Experience with SQL based databases like MySql/Oracle
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Exposure to Cloud based application development platform such as Cloud Foundry/AWS or container based such as Kubernetes
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Additional Preferred Skills: 
Understanding and knowledge of Data Engineering/Analytics and Machine Learning
Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Jest"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, - #Immediate #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
API Tech Lead Analyst - 22452305 #JobsThatMatter' #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
API Tech Lead Analyst - 22452305 - #JobsThatMatter#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
Solution Architect (Java),"Responsibilities:
Develop architectural and design principles to improve performance, capacity, and scalability of product.
Perform design, development and support of existing and new feature.
Maintain architectural standards that assure development projects optimally align with business objectives.
Hands on experience designing and development of full stack applications - web-based, middleware and platforms using Java, Angular, Web Services.
Ensure high performance, scalability, reusability and integrity of application
Review the Technical Design Specialization
Requirements:
Minimum Degree in Information Technology or equivalent.
Minimum 1 years of proven working experience in software architecture design.
Good understanding and experience in Java/J2EE application design, development and implementation with integration to other platforms, SOA architecture, security, best practices and knowledge of emerging trends
Framework and tools such as Spring, Hibernate, SQL, Angular
Interested candidates please click the APPLY button.
EA License No: 13C6305
Reg. No.: R1770654
For candidate who applied for the advertised position is deemed to have consented to us that we may collect, use or disclose your personal information for purpose in connection with the services provided by us."
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst 22429912 #JobsThatMatter##Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
.Lead Developer #WorkNow',"Role Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain code that meets requirements, is high quality, efficient, reusable and performs efficiently and effectively to provide a great customer experience.
Incorporate standards and best practices, including performance, security, scalability, testability and maintainability.
Candidates will be responsible for automating parts of the development process in a way that tightens the development feedback loop. They should also be able to identify opportunities for automation during the development process.
Participate in code reviews to spot issues around architecture, performance, security, and more.
Translate application storyboards and use cases into functional applications.
Help maintain code quality, organization, and automatization.
Contribute to design patterns and coding standards while being mentored.
Troubleshooting interface software and debugging application codes.
Designing and implementing microservices for various functionalities and service interfaces.
Designing and implementing front-end architecture to support user interface concepts and experience in Micro Frontend.
Experience with design, development and deployment of Cloud First / Cloud Native applications and services.
Hands on experience in CI / CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Monitoring and improving application performance – Grafana, Prometheus, App Dynamics.
Documenting application changes and developing updates.
Use continuous delivery to ship incremental improvements many times per month.
Business
Manage business partner expectations. Ensure delivery to business meeting time, cost, budget and with high quality.
Drive an ecosystem of innovation and enabling business through technology.
Processes
Responsible for business initiatives delivery aligning to SCB defined technology, Agile principles and project management processes and frameworks.
Support Transformation agenda, Business Operating Models, Standards, Finance, Risk Controls and compliance with regulations.
Inculcate the Group’s values and code of conduct in the CCIB Technology Team to ensure adherence to the highest standards of ethics and compliance to relevant policies and processes.
Ensure compliance to the highest standards of business conduct, regulatory requirements and practices defined by internal and external requirements. This includes compliance with local banking laws and anti-money laundering stipulations.
People and Talent
Employ, engage and retain high quality talent to ensure CCIB Client Onboarding T&I is adequately staffed and skilled to deliver on business commitments. 
Lead through example and build appropriate culture and values. Set appropriate tone and expectations for the team and work in collaboration with risk and control partners.
Foster a culture of innovation, transparency and accountability in CCIB Client Onboarding T&I while promoting a “client-first” mentality at all levels.
Ensure role, job descriptions and expectations are clearly set, and periodic feedback provided to the entire team.
Develop and maintain a plan that provides for succession and continuity in the most critical IT management positions.
Risk Management
Identifying and owning architectural, technical and deployment risk, escalating to Product Managers and service owners (as appropriate) with strategies to mitigate that risk.
Be proactive in ensuring regular assurance that the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I Team is performing to acceptable risk levels and control standards.
Act quickly and decisively when any risk and control weakness become apparent and ensure those are addressed within quick / prescribed timeframes and escalated through the relevant committees.
Balance business delivery on time, quality and cost constraints with risks and controls to ensure that they do not materially threaten the Group’s ability to remain within acceptable risk levels.
Ensure business continuity and disaster recovery planning for the entire technology portfolio.
Governance
Responsible to deliver in accordance to T&I policies and ensure governance of the team’s adherence to the same.
Adheres to all governance controls.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Client Onboarding Portal Product Owners and Country IMO.
Tech Architecture Forum, Information & Cyber Security Forum
Global Technology Services Heads (Production Support, Infrastructure, etc)
Interface teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / Engineering or a related discipline, graduate degree preferred.
Lead Developer with 10 years’ experience.
AWS Certified Solutions Architect Associate will be an added advantage.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Proficient in Java 8+ (preferably 11+) with a good knowledge of its ecosystems.
Understanding of Object Orient Programming and Functional Programming paradigms.
Proficient MicroService based architecture and implementation of MicroServices in OCP and AWS platform.
Good knowledge of JavaScript, ReactJS and technologies around it.
Micro Frontend.
Cloud First Cloud Native, AWS.
CI/CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Understanding of code security and code quality.
IT Governance.
IT Systems Management.
Application Monitoring
Grafana, Prometheus, AppDynamics"
"Java Software Engineer- Wealth Management, - Associate - #Seekbetter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Key Responsibilities: 
Review of epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts and turning those into technical designs and development
Utilize Agile methodology and adhere to coding standards, procedures and techniques while contributing to the technical code documentation
Provide high quality technology solutions that address business needs developing applications within mature technology environments.
Design, develop, code, test, debug and document code, build, deploy, and support app environments
Review design and functional specification prepared by other team members
Coordinate with end users during User Acceptance Testing
Analyze and document problems, recommend solutions, and initiate corrective action.
Support production rollouts of the functionality on-site by partnering closely with the Operate team
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science and engineering 
Minimum 5 years of Software Development experience
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement"
"Lead, - Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF - (2200018251) #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
"Lead, - Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF - (2200018251).#UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
Backend Java Software Engineer - Payment Technology - Associate #Immediate #Urgent',"About Team
J.P. Morgan Payment Technology is looking for a Backend Java Software Developer to join our global team for a Greenfield development project. You will be part of the pioneer team in Singapore as we build our payment digital capabilities in the region.
In this role, you will be working with state of the art technologies to design and develop a cloud based platform for external and internal development teams to integrate efficiently with the Payments API Ecosystem
Primary Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable, well thought and defect free solutions.
Participate in Agile ceremonies - standups, retrospective, sprint planning and backlog refinement.
Write enterprise grade code with production stability and resiliency in mind.
Develop deep technical understanding of all the interfaces and communication protocol in the platform.
Build and maintain automated monitoring tools.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Manage hygiene of the application (code smells, vulnerabilities, code coverage).
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the project and product teams.
Experience and Skills Required
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related disciplines.
Minimum 3 years of Java development expertise is a must.
Hands-on with Relational Databases, Spring Boot, REST APIs, Junit, Mockito, JPA
Experience working on large enterprise applications with micro service based architecture. Cloud knowledge and Kubernetes is preferred.
Past understanding of working in and managing production environment is preferred.
Should be detail-oriented, strong analytical and good communication skills are a must.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams across the globe.
Pro-actively participate in designing/solution of the feature/platform
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President - Singapore #Immediate #Seekbetter","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - 22429912. -#WorkNow#,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank. Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
API Tech Lead Analyst - 22452305 - #JobsThatMatter.#Worknow#.#UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate #Seekbetterrknow","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst – Singapore – AVP #Immed #Urgentiate,"Responsibilities
As a bank with a brain and a soul, Citi creates economic value that is systemically responsible and in our clients’ best interests. As a financial institution that touches every region of the world and every sector that shapes your daily life, our Enterprise Operations & Technology teams are charged with a mission that rivals any large tech company. Our technology solutions are the foundations of everything we do. We keep the bank safe and provide the technical tools our workers need to be successful. We design our digital architecture and ensure our platforms provide a first-class customer experience. Our operations teams manage risk, resources, and program management. We focus on enterprise resiliency and business continuity. We develop, coordinate, and execute strategic operational plans. Essentially, Enterprise Operations & Technology re-engineers client and partner processes to deliver excellence through secure, reliable, and controlled services.
Global Functions Technology is a diverse organization comprised of more than 15,000 talented professionals with some of the brightest minds – all working together to realize Citi’s Vision of growth and economic progress. As a group, we partner with the Finance, Risk, Compliance, and Human Resources teams to drive the delivery of innovative technology solutions using common data, analytics, and platforms. Our technology operates in real-time environments, capturing and managing market, transaction, and accounting data, as well as the data from millions of customers daily. Our solutions cover all products and geographies in which Citi does business. We are the backbone for reporting across the bank, satisfying our regulatory commitments, enabling our businesses to be nimbler and helping to safeguard customer assets through highly effective controls.
Our commitment to diversity includes a workforce that represents the clients we serve globally from all walks of life, backgrounds, and origins. We foster an environment where the best people want to work. We value and demand respect for others, promote individuals based on merit, and ensure opportunities for personal development are widely available to all. Ideal candidates are innovators with well-rounded backgrounds who bring their authentic selves to work and complement our culture of delivering results with pride. If you are a problem solver who seeks passion in your work, come join us. We’ll enable growth and progress together.
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Anlyst
GFT is looking for a developer to work with business analysts and a group of seasoned technology professionals to deliver technology projects for Citi Funds Transfer Pricing application
Responsibilities:
Work with architects and create high level / low level design
Develop high-quality code and ensure it adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Identify ideas to improve system performance and impact availability
Coordinate with Senior developers, business analysts & users for requirements
Identify and analyze issues, make recommendations, and implement solutions
Provide continuous improvement through identifying best practices in technology products / processes / systems
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field
Minimum 8 years of total experience with background in Information Technology
Extensive experience in system analysis and development
Well versed in SDLC life cycle and project management documentations
Experience in Funds Transfer Pricing functionalities is a plus
Hands on experience in Hadoop, Web services, Java Spark, Oracle, Openshift, Hive, Java and UNIX shell scripting
Need to be self-driven, enthusiastic, quick learner, and have a problem-solving attitude with strong analytical skills
Fluent in written and spoken English
About Citi
Citi, the leading global bank, has approximately 200 million customer accounts and does business in more than 160 countries and jurisdictions. Citi provides consumers, corporations, governments, and institutions with a broad range of financial products and services, including consumer banking and credit, corporate and investment banking, securities brokerage, transaction services, and wealth management."
Manager / Information Management - (2100032149) #Immediate #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
This is an exciting opportunity for a Full Stack Developer to support the Singapore Finance Team digitize their processes by working on existing applications as well as development of enhancements and new applications primarily using Microsoft SQL Server and various latest generation front-end technologies
As the successful candidate, you will be part of the Singapore Finance team as opposed to the Standard Chartered Technology function and you will have direct involvement with the business on a daily basis working in an agile fashion to progress solutions quickly from idea to prototype to delivery. It will require you to handle multiple support tasks as well as tactical project analysis and development.
Business
Work closely with the finance teams to drive process digitisation to deliver efficiency and enable new capabilities for MI and Insights to propel the function towards its strategic objectives.
Processes & Responsibilities
Manage DevOps related responsibilities to ensure the Finance servers continue to perform at peak capacity and availability
Full Stack Development responsibilities to build and maintain end to end applications to digitize finance processes across a multitude of Finance functions (e.g. Tax, Performance Management, Controls, Balance Sheet Management etc.)
Risk Management & Governance
Ensure adherence to all internal technology policies and regulations and establish a robust governance process covering the RAD solutions developed.
Continually enhance the control environment to maintain robust processes around security, data reconciliation, data quality and audit trails ensuring complete and accurate reporting across designed processes.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the SG Finance RAD team to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CFO Singapore and the Head of all the Finance functions reporting into the CFO
Other Responsibilities
Working with onshore/offshore teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Over 6 years of proven technical background with development and design experience in front-end and server-side
Strong in RESTful APIs, ASP.Net MVC, .Net Core/C#
Strong in SQL Server, SSRS/SSAS
Experience with Microsoft VBA stack of automation (Excel/Access) and knowledge in powerBI is advantageous
Strong in modern UI technologies - Javascript, VueJS Framework, NodeJS, HTML5, CSS
Experience with DevOps CI/CD tools and processes (Bitbucket/Git, Jenkins, Sourcetree) and Agile methodologies
Basic knowledge of UI/UX and prototype designing, testing frameworks (Junit)
Exposure to Selenium (or similar tool) for UI automation and testing
Understanding and some working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous
Provide solid and reliable documentation on work items such as code, concepts, logic and user documentation
Must have following soft skills:
Understand and deal well with rapid development cycles, remain flexible and calm in the face of ambiguity, drive clarity
Well spoken and Emotionally intelligent whilst working and collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals having diverse work cultures and skill sets
Good communication skills and ability to articulate technical details and challenges to business users
Team player who is self driven and proactive in learning new technologies and skills
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Credit Application Development Lead (VP)#.#Immediate #Urgent #WorkNow #Immediate',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities. This position is primarily responsible for application development and management of Credit and Lending applications of Citi Wealth management business.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects in accordance to architectural guidelines
Responsible for reviewing the end-to-end process flows, Recommends and oversees process improvements and follow through technology implementation
Liaise with project sponsors and regional business leads on an ongoing basis to understand their needs and priorities as well as to pro-actively manage expectations, buy-in, feedback and resolution of issues.
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Deliver effective communication and report on initiatives to various levels including senior leadership. Identifying issues/risks and manage escalations.
Manage offshore development team through effective virtual management experience.
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Experience in developing large scale applications involving technologies such as – Java, Angular, Oracle, messaging layer, extensive Data processing.
Domain knowledge in Wealth management, investment, credit or reporting area will be advantageous
Experience in developing and modernizing application with cloud architecture will advantageous
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst 22429912 #JobsThatMatter #Urgent#,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Senior Software Engineer, Data Engineering & Architecture, VP #Seekbetter","Job Description
Come join a creative team of Data Engineers, as part of Engineering & Architecture in Corporate and Investment Bank (CIB).
We work on data modelling, lineage and transporting data at scale on cloud technologies. We are at the forefront of defining and driving adoption of the latest technology and best practices throughout the CIB.
Key Responsibilities
You will be working on cutting-edge projects in data modelling, lineage, data transport, DSL design domains.
You will collaborate as part of a global and diverse team, with clients across the globe.
You will communicate with users, developers and DevOps teams to gather requirements, design, implement and support our platform.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor Degree with major in Computer Science or Engineering 
Minimum 10 years hands-on software development experience in an Object-Oriented programming language (such as Python, Java, C++)
Hands-on software development experience with proficiency in Scala
Hand-on experience with Spring boot, Spring cloud, Hibernate
Experience with Source Code Control Systems such as Git, bitbucket, svn, etc.
Experienced in agile methodologies
Passion for working in an innovative culture
Curiosity, creativity, resourcefulness and a collaborative spirit
Interest in problems related to the financial services domain (specific past experience in the domain is not required)
Ability to work in large, collaborative, global teams
Preferred skills:
Working proficiency in any IDE
Experience with micro services based architecture
Familiarity with Cloud technologies (such as Docker, Kubernetes, AWS)
Proficiency with relational DBs, SQL, RDS
[Java/ Scala] Experience with development and build tools (or similar): Intellij/Eclipse, Maven, Gradle, Sprint Boot, MVC, Spring Cloud
Familiarity with Kafka or other messaging transport"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization #JobsThatMatter#UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, -- #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742. #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Applications Development Intermediate Analyst #Worknow #JobsThatMatter,"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
The Analyst is expected to understand / analyse user requirements, understand and interpret BRD (Business Requirement Document), prepare Functional Requirements document in the Custody domain. The person should be able to engage with the Technical Team to clarify requirements, participate in Technical design to ensure the requirements are met by the product design and validate developed product
Responsibilities:
The role requires strong ability to do business analysis
Interface with Product and Operations team in the AsPAC region to understand and clarify the requirements
Understand the Business Requirement Documents and create Functional Requirement Documents and get it approved and implemented effectively.
Identify problems, analyze information, and make evaluative judgements to recommend and implement solutions
Interface with teams spread geographically
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Resolve issues by identifying and selecting solutions through the applications of acquired technical experience and guided by precedents
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Qualifications:
Ability to work with diverse and geographically disperse teams
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work efficiently within team environments and as an individual contributor
Ability to efficiently plan and organize own workload, and teams workloads
2-5 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Software Development and Custody domain knowledge would be an advantage
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - #Urgent#.#UrgentHire,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - 22429912 #Urgent","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
.Lead Developer.* #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Role Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain code that meets requirements, is high quality, efficient, reusable and performs efficiently and effectively to provide a great customer experience.
Incorporate standards and best practices, including performance, security, scalability, testability and maintainability.
Candidates will be responsible for automating parts of the development process in a way that tightens the development feedback loop. They should also be able to identify opportunities for automation during the development process.
Participate in code reviews to spot issues around architecture, performance, security, and more.
Translate application storyboards and use cases into functional applications.
Help maintain code quality, organization, and automatization.
Contribute to design patterns and coding standards while being mentored.
Troubleshooting interface software and debugging application codes.
Designing and implementing microservices for various functionalities and service interfaces.
Designing and implementing front-end architecture to support user interface concepts and experience in Micro Frontend.
Experience with design, development and deployment of Cloud First / Cloud Native applications and services.
Hands on experience in CI / CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Monitoring and improving application performance – Grafana, Prometheus, App Dynamics.
Documenting application changes and developing updates.
Use continuous delivery to ship incremental improvements many times per month.
Business
Manage business partner expectations. Ensure delivery to business meeting time, cost, budget and with high quality.
Drive an ecosystem of innovation and enabling business through technology.
Processes
Responsible for business initiatives delivery aligning to SCB defined technology, Agile principles and project management processes and frameworks.
Support Transformation agenda, Business Operating Models, Standards, Finance, Risk Controls and compliance with regulations.
Inculcate the Group’s values and code of conduct in the CCIB Technology Team to ensure adherence to the highest standards of ethics and compliance to relevant policies and processes.
Ensure compliance to the highest standards of business conduct, regulatory requirements and practices defined by internal and external requirements. This includes compliance with local banking laws and anti-money laundering stipulations.
People and Talent
Employ, engage and retain high quality talent to ensure CCIB Client Onboarding T&I is adequately staffed and skilled to deliver on business commitments. 
Lead through example and build appropriate culture and values. Set appropriate tone and expectations for the team and work in collaboration with risk and control partners.
Foster a culture of innovation, transparency and accountability in CCIB Client Onboarding T&I while promoting a “client-first” mentality at all levels.
Ensure role, job descriptions and expectations are clearly set, and periodic feedback provided to the entire team.
Develop and maintain a plan that provides for succession and continuity in the most critical IT management positions.
Risk Management
Identifying and owning architectural, technical and deployment risk, escalating to Product Managers and service owners (as appropriate) with strategies to mitigate that risk.
Be proactive in ensuring regular assurance that the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I Team is performing to acceptable risk levels and control standards.
Act quickly and decisively when any risk and control weakness become apparent and ensure those are addressed within quick / prescribed timeframes and escalated through the relevant committees.
Balance business delivery on time, quality and cost constraints with risks and controls to ensure that they do not materially threaten the Group’s ability to remain within acceptable risk levels.
Ensure business continuity and disaster recovery planning for the entire technology portfolio.
Governance
Responsible to deliver in accordance to T&I policies and ensure governance of the team’s adherence to the same.
Adheres to all governance controls.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Client Onboarding Portal Product Owners and Country IMO.
Tech Architecture Forum, Information & Cyber Security Forum
Global Technology Services Heads (Production Support, Infrastructure, etc)
Interface teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / Engineering or a related discipline, graduate degree preferred.
Lead Developer with 10 years’ experience.
AWS Certified Solutions Architect Associate will be an added advantage.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Proficient in Java 8+ (preferably 11+) with a good knowledge of its ecosystems.
Understanding of Object Orient Programming and Functional Programming paradigms.
Proficient MicroService based architecture and implementation of MicroServices in OCP and AWS platform.
Good knowledge of JavaScript, ReactJS and technologies around it.
Micro Frontend.
Cloud First Cloud Native, AWS.
CI/CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Understanding of code security and code quality.
IT Governance.
IT Systems Management.
Application Monitoring
Grafana, Prometheus, AppDynamics"
Lead Java Developer -- [22440742]. #UrgentHire #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"Lead, - Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF - (2200018251}*","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
"Analyst, Development (WSP).* #JobsThatMatter","Role Responsibilities
Our Technology & Innovation (T&I) function is at the heart of shaping the bank for the future and serving our clients digitally across the globe. We are responsible for the systems development and technology infrastructure of the Bank, defining, innovating, and implementing digital agendas across functions, especially in our client services. Our team helps unlock new banking experiences for clients, while improving our operational effectiveness and enhance existing offerings.
We are focused on building your digital skills and adaptability necessary to be future-ready. You’ll be exposed to a diverse portfolio of projects in your allocated domain will help to deliver efficiencies and automation, introduce global platforms, machine learning, and bring forth intelligent technology. You’ll be constantly learning and sharing with your peers:
• Creating and designing cutting edge tools and applications that will redefine the future of banking
• Work in a truly Agile environment, as part of scrum teams that are striving to solve customer challenges
• Play a critical role in client journeys that help us make faster decisions to enhance the end-to-end client experience and achieve outcomes that are most valuable to our clients
Our Ideal Candidate 
If you are passionate about technology and customer experience, and possess traits and experience most of the below, we’d love to hear from you:
• Adaptive to changing situations and enjoy collaborating with global teams in a diverse multi-cultural environment.
• Curious and open-minded.
• Strong foundational knowledge of Algorithms, Data Structures, OOPs concepts and frameworks
• Passionate for solving challenging problems and learning new skills, coding languages.
• Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to JavaScript (ReactJS, React-Redux, nodeJS), TypeScript, Python.
• Experience in working with either front end and/or back-end technologies and frameworks.
• Experience in one or more Cloud Technologies. "
Java Developer - (2200019786).'#UrgentHire,"Job Scope
The successful candidate will be a skilled software engineer who is excited about working with a world class team to analysing, designing, developing and delivering solutions built for FM business.
We are looking for forward-thinking, energetic and passionate individuals to be part of a new exciting journey! 
Development of large scale big data solutions to be used in a very large production environment.
Gather, analyse and maintain large data sets to provide answers to address hurdles and create innovative solutions in large-scale data infrastructures.
Interact with both business and technical stakeholders to deliver high quality products and services that meet business requirements and expectations while applying the latest available tools and technology.
Develop code and mentor junior developers to ensure deliverables are on time, within budget, and with good code quality.
Present technical solutions, capabilities, considerations, and features in business terms.
Effectively communicate status, issues, and risks in a precise and timely manner.
Our Ideal Candidate
Strong analytical and problem solving and creative skills.
Good communication skills in both written and oral English.
Ability to be organised and multi-task on different requirements across various stakeholders, and to work independently and under pressure.
Cultural sensitivity and awareness to work with a range of people from diverse background and geographies.
Mandatory Technical Skills
5+ years hands on experience with Java / J2EE development experience.
Demonstrated hands on experience building Big Data solutions.
Experience with Hadoop ecosystem: Hadoop, Spark, MapReduce, Hive, Yarn, HBase, etc.
Experience with RDBMS as well as NoSQL stacks (ElasticSearch, HBase, Cassandra).
 Hands on experience on devops technology.
Desirable Technical Skills – but not mandatory
Good grasp of statistical and scientific programming packages in Python is a plus.
Good grasp of data science concepts with emphasis on machine learning techniques is a plus.
Experience with Agile / Scrum development methodologies.
Software testing know-how, including black-box and white-box testing methodologies and both functional and non-functional testing.
Test driven development experience.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Big Data
JAVA
SQL / HIVE
SPARK
PYTHON
Communication
Problem solving
System Design
About Standard Chartered
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate--#JobsThatMatter #Worknow","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
"Senior Software Engineer, - Cloud Platform – Standard Chartered nexus - (2200018392) #Urgent","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it.
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Senior Software Engineer, Cloud Platform to define, implement and run the platforms and analytics for us. This will include choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate.
What will you be doing:
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured
Secure data at rest via encryption
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics
Use container technologies
Design and implement replication strategies for an active/active data centre layout
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy
Setting up API gateway and OIDC provider
What do you need to be successful in this role?
3+ years of experience with Cloud technology
Experience with deploying and maintaining microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Nice to have experience in distributed data processing, API gateway, OIDC
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Technical Competencies
Experience on Docker, Kubernetes, Helm
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB
About Standard Chartered nexus
Standard Chartered nexus is a white label plug-and-play banking solution powered by Standard Chartered Bank. We take pride in redefining how we bank customers globally by digitally marrying ecosystems to banks. Our Banking-as-a-Service (BaaS) solution is the gateway that enables convenient access to financial services. We believe in challenging the status quo and thinking outside the box to deliver innovative solutions. Let’s shape the future of banking together.
The Standard Chartered nexus family is made up of a bunch of fun, hardworking and results-oriented individuals. Most importantly, nexaurs value teamwork, and we champion a respectful, open and trusting work environment. If you are interested to be part of the team in re-wiring the DNA of banking, join us today. #YesWeCanLAH
Find out more about nexus and what we do at http://sc.com/scnexus"
"Software Engineer, Associate - Singapore #UrgentHire #WorkNow #JobsThatMatter","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 7 years of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
"Senior Backend Software Engineer, Monetization Technology #Worknow #UrgentHire #WorkNow","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
[About the Team]
As the Senior Backend Software Engineer with the Monetization Technology team, you would be responsible for the following:
Responsibilities
Engineering the infrastructure for advertisement quality control, case analysis and machine learning model training to enforce content integrity
Building products to enhance the trust between advertisers and TikTok, improve advertiser experience and enforce actor integrity
Design and build data-driven applications to help both local and global partners to unlock monetization opportunities
Work closely with operations and infrastructure to build and scale back-end services
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent with 3+ years of relevant experience
Solid programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style.
Familiarity with at least one of the programming languages: Go, Python or Java
Pragmatic understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and distributed system
Prior experience working with Internet Products or large scale platforms.
Working experience in advertisement technology or business integrity
- Experienced in engineering the infrastructure for advertisement quality control, case analysis and machine learning model training to enforce content integrity"
"#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - 22429912 #Seekbetter #Worknow","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Analyst – Singapore – AVP.#UrgentHire#Seekbetter,"Responsibilities
As a bank with a brain and a soul, Citi creates economic value that is systemically responsible and in our clients’ best interests. As a financial institution that touches every region of the world and every sector that shapes your daily life, our Enterprise Operations & Technology teams are charged with a mission that rivals any large tech company. Our technology solutions are the foundations of everything we do. We keep the bank safe and provide the technical tools our workers need to be successful. We design our digital architecture and ensure our platforms provide a first-class customer experience. Our operations teams manage risk, resources, and program management. We focus on enterprise resiliency and business continuity. We develop, coordinate, and execute strategic operational plans. Essentially, Enterprise Operations & Technology re-engineers client and partner processes to deliver excellence through secure, reliable, and controlled services.
Global Functions Technology is a diverse organization comprised of more than 15,000 talented professionals with some of the brightest minds – all working together to realize Citi’s Vision of growth and economic progress. As a group, we partner with the Finance, Risk, Compliance, and Human Resources teams to drive the delivery of innovative technology solutions using common data, analytics, and platforms. Our technology operates in real-time environments, capturing and managing market, transaction, and accounting data, as well as the data from millions of customers daily. Our solutions cover all products and geographies in which Citi does business. We are the backbone for reporting across the bank, satisfying our regulatory commitments, enabling our businesses to be nimbler and helping to safeguard customer assets through highly effective controls.
Our commitment to diversity includes a workforce that represents the clients we serve globally from all walks of life, backgrounds, and origins. We foster an environment where the best people want to work. We value and demand respect for others, promote individuals based on merit, and ensure opportunities for personal development are widely available to all. Ideal candidates are innovators with well-rounded backgrounds who bring their authentic selves to work and complement our culture of delivering results with pride. If you are a problem solver who seeks passion in your work, come join us. We’ll enable growth and progress together.
Apps Dev Sr. Programmer Anlyst
GFT is looking for a developer to work with business analysts and a group of seasoned technology professionals to deliver technology projects for Citi Funds Transfer Pricing application
Responsibilities:
Work with architects and create high level / low level design
Develop high-quality code and ensure it adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Identify ideas to improve system performance and impact availability
Coordinate with Senior developers, business analysts & users for requirements
Identify and analyze issues, make recommendations, and implement solutions
Provide continuous improvement through identifying best practices in technology products / processes / systems
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field
Minimum 8 years of total experience with background in Information Technology
Extensive experience in system analysis and development
Well versed in SDLC life cycle and project management documentations
Experience in Funds Transfer Pricing functionalities is a plus
Hands on experience in Hadoop, Web services, Java Spark, Oracle, Openshift, Hive, Java and UNIX shell scripting
Need to be self-driven, enthusiastic, quick learner, and have a problem-solving attitude with strong analytical skills
Fluent in written and spoken English
About Citi
Citi, the leading global bank, has approximately 200 million customer accounts and does business in more than 160 countries and jurisdictions. Citi provides consumers, corporations, governments, and institutions with a broad range of financial products and services, including consumer banking and credit, corporate and investment banking, securities brokerage, transaction services, and wealth management."
Technical Design & Delivery Lead - (2100011857). #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Failure Analysis Engineer | Up to $5500 + AWS + VB,"Primary Job Purpose:
Lead and perform Analyses of automotive electronics products.
Develop strategies and implement adequate methods in the Lab for Failure Analyses and Tear down
Standardize FA techniques to faster analysis.
Synergize FA activities by working with local and global teams as needed
Lead FA technicians on Elemental & Metallurgical Analyses (SEM< EDX, FTIR, Micro cross section etc.), Non-Destructive Analyses (CT Scan, SAM, Laser Confocal Microscope etc.), Thermal Analyses (DSE, TGA), Physical & Mechanical Analyses (Hardness, Texture, Contact Angle, CMM, Smart scope, Tensile tester etc.)
Improve FA lab capabilities in 4M aspects
Participate and demonstrate Failure Analysis capabilities to customers
Job Requirements:
Ph.D. in Material science / Master or Bachelor Degree in Electronics/Mechanical/Physics/Material Science.
5 to 7 years’ experience in a semiconductor or automotive electronics manufacturing environment is preferred.
Experience in application of Failure analysis tools / methodologies
Experience in handling Failure Analysis Lab.
Good interpersonal, leadership, analytical and communication skills.
*Only shortlisted candidates will be notified*"
"Senior Software Engineer, - DevOps –Standard Chartered nexus - (2200019763).*#Seekbetter","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
Software Engineer (ReactJS) - J39755,"We are looking for a Software Engineer to join a well-established software company.
5 days work week (Mon - Fri)
Attractive Remuneration Package 
Work in a dynamic engineering team in developing FinTech products.
Responsibilities
Develop, test, deploy, and maintain user interface components following React.js workflows
Provide vision, design and develop in keeping up to date and cutting-edge web technologies in building interactive web applications
Work closely with design team and API team to improve overall UI/UX experiences
Actively participate in all aspects of the software development process
Provide maintenance support to customers by investigating and rectifying reported systems shortcomings during/after working hours when necessary
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
Possess good experience developing web application, Web Forms and Enterprise Workflows
3+ years of experience in systems analysis, design, programming  
Familiar with Restful APIs, webpack, Angular and vue.js
Experience in React.js, HTML5, CSS3, Websocket
To apply, please send your updated resume to spml(at)scientecpersonnel.com by indicating Job ID J39755 to fasten the process.
Ng Kee Hung (Vickus) - R2091423
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd - 11C5781"
Application Developer - Real Time Payments (L3) [Job Details] - #UrgentHire,"Job Description
As an experienced professional in Software Engineering, you'll shape the technology solutions that drive Level 3 support and development initiatives across the region, Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll interact with colleagues in various lines of businesses to learn about challenges and opportunities, and translate that insight into high-quality solutions. In addition to working with the development team to create new solutions, you'll help optimize existing technology and identify new capabilities to ensure the applications run smoothly. While your role requires deep technological skills it also hinges on teamwork and leadership. You'll offer clear guidance and feedback to your Software Engineer colleagues, while promoting the values, culture, and brand of JPMorgan Chase & Co
Primary Responsibilities
Lead the Level 3 team during the US hours as well as support the EMEA and APAC evening during US hours
Drive the bug fixes and small enhancements
Drive the audit, hygine of the appliation and production deployments
Drive incident reviews with relevant stakeholders, ensure the action items are tracked to closure
Provide leadership within the support team and influence stakeholders in line with the our product and future strategy
Document the client requirements, changes in market behaviors and drive that through the core team for product enhancements
Manage the documentation review and approval process with the stakeholders
Take ownership of the bug fixes and small enhancement and associated artefacts
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the production management, project and product teams
Provide guidance and support to team members
Prepare and deliver training sessions to the business users and production management
Experience and Skills Required
You'll also play a crucial role in identifying, improving, and developing technology solutions that drive our strategic goals. This is a tremendous opportunity to learn about high-priority initiatives and collaborate with colleagues throughout the firm. Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills. No matter where your career ultimately takes you, you'll make a meaningful impact and lasting connections with outstanding colleagues and mentors.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors degree with minimum of 5 years in BFSI industry. Exposure to core banking, payments is a must have skill
Experience working on major global transformation initiatives, for example SWIFT GPI, ISO 20022, Real Time Payments etc
Proficiency in business applications, data usage, and management
Ability to liaison between lines of business and the development team, while working with a wide range of stakeholders and collaborating with your team
 Ability to work collaboratively in teams and develop meaningful relationships to achieve common goals
Experience obtaining requirements from business users and subject matter experts, reviewing business priorities, and/or analyzing options & risks
Ability to code in Java, Oracle, Microservices based architecture with experience in distributed cache and cloud computing
Experience in articualting functional system requirements specifications
Should be Detail-oriented, strong analytical and communication skills are a must
Ability to synthesize large amounts of information, and a curiosity to ask appropriate questions to fully develop business and functional requirements.
Pro-actively lead/participate in design/solution architecting of target state
Ability to interface directly with Senior Business Stakeholders and users with a view to influence and drive consensus.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Participate in creation of detailed functional specifications with AS-IS process flows and target state processes
Provide techincal support throughout the project lifecycle, from requirements/functional specs to reviewing SIT and UAT test cases, and supporting all the testing phases.
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst 22429912 #JobsThatMatter#',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Post-Trade Securities Processing, - Java Software Engineer #JPM #Urgent #UrgentHire #Immediate","Job Description
We look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Primary focus will be to manage the number of Post Trade Technology applications in APAC with target architecture and to implement new settlement & clearing capabilities so as to support business expansion and increased volumes.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Engineering
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices.
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture.
Experience in building/ designing high volume/ real time processing systems.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Java/ J2EE
Spring Framework / Hibernate
RDBMS (Oracle)
Unix / Shell scripting
Cloud knowledge
Understanding Business Requirements and Functional Specifications
Understanding existing program logic
Providing and/or agreeing estimates for required development
Creation/ update of Detailed Design Specifications, Program Specifications, and program Version Control documentation
Coding of new programs and changes to existing programs
Creation of Unit Test Plans, and execution of Unit Tests
Providing technical support for User Acceptance Testing
Creation of Implementation/ Back out Plans and Support Handover Documents
Providing technical support for Production Implementations, and post-implementation support during implementation warranty period
Requirements: 
Minimum 4 years hands-on programming 
Experience in working in Eclipse/IntelliJ / Maven environments.
Experience in managing various settlement systems in Post Trade Technology in APAC region.
Expertise in Core Java, TDD, BDD, spring framework, Messaging, SQL, Unix shell scripts.
“Can do” attitude, which can identify problems, take ownership, and provide solutions.
Drive the project progress for the deliverables. In our small agile team, developers talk directly to operational users and other BAs for requirements. You will be developing great communication and project management skills on top of the technical skills. 
Hand’s on experience in fine tuning application response / performance testing.
Experience of MQ / JMS (message transfer process), Kafka.
Experience using version control tool bitbucket.
Experience in code scanning tools like black duck and tools like Sonar etc
Experience of development of Settlement and clearing applications.
Familiarity with SWIFT (Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication) Message formats."
"Asst Manager, ASEAN Reg Capital Implementation - (2200011595). #Immediate #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategic Projects
Support the development of business requirements for regulatory capital platform to align with current and new regulatory requirements
Support operationalisation of Basel IV and FRTB requirements in Singapore and ASEAN region and provide comfort to senior management that business requirements have been appropriately captured in the capital platform
Change management for regulatory capital platform changes to handle new regulations, models, etc
Other critical responsibilities and adhoc deliverables assigned by Finance or Treasury leadership
Effective contribution to tactical and strategic projects that may be assigned
Governance & Risk Management
Perform periodic gap analysis against regulatory requirements to ensure full compliance
Develop remediation plans to strengthen compliance to capital rules
Support the implementation of appropriate controls that ensure critical data elements are subject to the right level of substantiation and escalations are made for downstream issues for resolution
Support BCBS 239 compliance efforts
Support adherence to all internal policies and external regulations and establish a robust governance process to evidence compliance.
Team Engagement & Conduct
Contribute to work climate that promotes team engagement, alignment with group/country strategic deliverables and compliance with Group code of conduct
Contribute to an agile and growth mindset within the team
Stakeholder Management
Effective collaboration with other teams (e.g. Risk, Finance, Compliance, Treasury) to meet common team objectives
Translate complex technical subjects into simple overviews for business and other stakeholder updates
Optimal outcomes from Internal and external audit engagements
Optimal outcomes from regulatory engagements
Key Stakeholders
Internal
Risk – model implementation, reporting and insights
Capital COE/GFS – establishing an effective reporting process. 
Compliance – regulatory compliance and interpretation
GIA – Internal audit engagement
Group Treasury Teams – Policy alignment and sharing of best practices
External
Statutory auditors - to ensure that audits are finalized smoothly
Ratings agency – S&P, Fitch, Moody’s
Others – regulatory requests
Our Ideal Candidate
5+ years of experience including experience in the financial services sector
Degree or professional qualification in the Financial Services sector with strong experience in Capital reporting
Should have knowledge on Capital and RWA per MAS rules and Basel standards.
Should possess basic knowledge of Financial markets products offered.
Should be conversant with MI tools and generating insights from large amounts of data
Should be a resilient, self starter with well developed communication & inter-personal skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Sound judgement is required in identifying implementation and systems issues and suggesting measures to plug them.
Judgement and complexity in the job arise when dealing with other stakeholders in the project team. Working with FOT, ITO, GFS and risk functions in a collaborative manner and implementing the appropriate solutions.
Judgement & complexity arises in interpretation of regulatory matters and how they translate into a computation, systems and reporting solution.
Development of the Capital and liquidity MIS and reporting
Development of regional stress testing capabilities
Development of recovery and resolution capabilities
Overall success of strategic projects or enhancements
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Lead Java Developer -- [22440742].#.#UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Programmer,"Roles & Responsibilities
We Looking for Programmers whi can write code for computer programs and mobile applications. They are also involved in maintaining, debugging and troubleshooting systems and software to ensure that systwm in company is running smoothly.
The programmers must be resourceful and fluent in at least 4 programming languages. One of them must be an app development platform (e.g. Xcode, Objective C) for the IOS.
Candiates must be familiar with parsers for html4/html5/ XML scrapping.
This post don’t need to possess a degree.
Candidates will be tested during the interview. So bring own laptop loaded with own preset own development platform. The interview process will require interviewee to produce a working piece software where we will give the requirement specs."
"Full Stack Developer, Cleared Derivatives Technology, Associate -#UrgentHire #Seekbetter","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Cleared Derivatives Technology team is hiring in Singapore. The team is responsible for developing and maintaining the Futures and Options (F&O) back office clearing application, P&L reporting process which scales across Finance, Treasury.
We are seeking a technically strong and disciplined developer. This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of software engineering experience
Minimum 2 years of banking experience
Experience in Java 8 is required
Experienced in Databases (Oracle/RDBMS) is required
Good to have experience in React/Angular/JavaScript
Good to have experience on Spring Boot with Microservices
Basics of cloud based applications is preferred
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base
Passionate about building an innovative culture, continuous learning in technical aptitude, business understanding and personal effectiveness
Understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment would be a plus
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Lead Java Developer - [22440742]. #JobsThatMatter#',"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, #Urgent #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13#. #Immediate #JobsThatMatter#,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Software Project Executive,"We are looking for a diligent individual who has the maturity to work with enterprise customers.
Computer-savvy and willing to learn to use company tool
Developing and managing relationships with customers (both technical and business stakeholders)
Working closely with customers to understand and capture requirements
Making recommendations on fulfilling customer’s requirements through use of company tools.
Conducting “live” demonstrations
Creating scripts/ delivering POC (proof-of-concept) project for clients to automate tasks using company tools.
Delivering commercial projects for clients to automate tasks using company tools.
Requirements:
1 Year or more of experience in software implementation projects (ok to be team-member)
Proficiency in Microsoft Office (such as Excel-Macros)
Knowledge of using any enterprise software system (ERP, CRM, HR software)
Any Science, Engineering, Accounting or other disciplines
Able to think logically to break processes down step by step, identify decision points, and be able to map out different scenarios of the process
Ability to present ideas logically
Able to hold conversations with customers and appreciate their concerns/ requirements
Proactive, resourceful and independent worker who can is passionate about self-learning
Willingness to work in a fast-paced startup culture with minimal hand-holding
Highly organized and able to multitask and oversee several projects simultaneously
Optional: Experience in delivering technology projects using the agile methodology
Optional: experience/ Internships/ part-time work in software/ IT positions will be added bonus"
Automation & Software Defined Network Engineer/Programmer AVP Hybrid.#Urgent' |#WorkNow,"Responsibilities
Automation and Software Defined Network Engineer/Programmer
This position is responsible to help enhance network operations capability in fault detection, troubleshooting and recovery of network incidents through automation and tools in our rapidly evolving network infrastructure. We are looking for skilled candidate with a passion for networking and aptitude for developing advance scripts and improving existing automation tools to boost the capability of the network operations team in pre-emptive fault findings and early prevention in network outages through automation. Developing best practices/standards and keeping our network automation tools/scripts are up to date. This role is at the forefront of a software-defined revolution that will change the way we build and operate our network services to ensure agility, improved capabilities and better economics. 
Responsibilities:
Write the tooling and generate code to make your own and other people's job easier.
Contribute in projects to improve the network infrastructure and network operations in support of enterprise need
Build APIs to collect and process system, application, network, and OS level events.
Data and System Events analytics; translating the vast network events and data into dynamic dashboards capable of providing useful insights and fault assessment.
Improving efficiency and effectiveness of existing network automation tools.
Bridging the gap between infrastructure network engineer & software defined network engineers.
Educational Qualification:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Engineering or other related fields of study
Experience:
5+ years of experience in software programming.
Dev/Ops Knowledge: can demonstrate knowledge and varying levels of experiences with one or more of the following: Ansible, JSON, YANG and Rest API, Python, Kafka, Grafana, Machine Learning - e.g. Hadoop and clustered big data, Kubernetes, Docker, Data Visualization.
Ability to parse data structures using python
Experience with coding/scripting/automation/orchestration platforms(Python, Ansible), including interfacing with APIs
Experience of managing code with GIT, Bitbucket branches
Experience with Visual Studio Code and integration to tests and git
Experience writing Ansible Playbooks in YAML
Experience of how to use regex within python code
Experience in Network monitoring tools (i.e., NetFlow Tracker, Elastic, and Splunk) is a plus
Experience in Software Defined Network is a plus
Basic level working knowledge of enterprise infrastructure networking.
Large financial institution working experience is a plus. 
Industry certifications includes; CCNA, ITIL, etc is a plus
Others:
IAC principles
Microservices architectures & reasons for developing in such a way
Data protection & classification for storage
Basic ML techniques a bonus
Professional Attributes:
Ability to work with a limited set of requirements. Desire to mentor colleagues, spearhead new architectures, and drive team efforts
Excellent communication and relationship skills, especially the ability to articulate advanced technical topics to both technical and non-technical staff
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills."
"Lead, Development - (2200019120)* #Urgent. #Worknow","Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for CEE Hive Delivery.
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team.
Provide Inputs / directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation.
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs / projects.
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives.
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals.
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across CEE Hive is remediated with no impact to stability.
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams.
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes.
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads.
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives.
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery.
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection.
Compliant to SDF / SIA / TDA / RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies.
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards.
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines, Data governance and policies.
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required.
Recognize talent and identify the training / coaching areas for employees.
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, areas of improvement, Addressing Bias, etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency / risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans.
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results.
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: [Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.] * 
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Exercise authorities delegated by the Board of Directors and act in accordance with Articles of Association.
Key Stakeholders
CEE Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit.
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB CEE Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
12 years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools and CI-CD methodology / Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location and managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance, etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Technical Competence
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on Data structure and Algorithms.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture.
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) and NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel / ActiveMQ / Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good knowledge in dependency injections like Spring DI / Blueprints and JSON libraries like Jackson / GSON.
Good Hands-on knowledge on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Strong understanding of Advanced JavaScript, HTML 5, and CSS 3.
Strong experienced in policy / rule engines like Oracle Policy Automation, Drools.
Good knowledge on Banking domain and experience in CLDM Life cycle and process guidelines.
Good knowledge on IMDG (Ignite or Hazelcast).
Having Knowledge in Python programming is added advantage.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g. Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ, etc.
Knowledge in DSE DataStax or Neo4j will be an added advantage.
Ability to work in quick paced, dynamic environment adapting agile methodologies.
Strong knowledge in Cloud engineering (SaaS, PaaS, IaaS).
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Unit testing and code coverage using JUnit / Mockito.
Strong experience and Knowledge on Data Analysis / Analytics and Profiling.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management and handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution.
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders.
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support and handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for CDD Risk, Credit Risk,Climate Risk scoring, Risk Entity Model, Client Due Diligence (CDD), Onboarding, FATCA and CRS.
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening.
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement / risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI and ML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine learning).
Membership in technical guilds / associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Java, J2EE, Spring Framework, API Design and Microservice Architecture.
PL / SQL Programming, Oracle, PostgreSQL.
Oracle Policy Automation (OPA), Drools, BRE.
Kafka, ActiveMQ, JMS Messaging.
Hazelcast, DSE Cassandra with High Availability.
ELK, AppDynamics, APM, SRE Concepts, Production Monitoring Tool.
Containerized platform OCP, Kubernetes, Docker.
Workflow Management tool, Camunda.
AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security principles and architecture.
Secure Design and ICS control."
"Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst, - 22429912. #WorkNow'","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank. Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Application Development Sr Manager #Urgent #WorkNow,"Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Identify opportunity for applying modern technologies, digital products and service Campaigns.
Manage Application on Tech Stack ( Java , Big Data , Digital Marketing , JMS, Micro Service , Cloud platforms )
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects.
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas.
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
8-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Hands on Technical Experience in Data Engineering , Apache Kafka, Solace, Java Tech stack ( Front End and Server side ), JMS, Micro Service , Oracle , Mongo DB, Redis , BPM Tools.
Hands on Experience in Marketing Tools , Adobe marketing platforms , Pega.
Experience in AWS , Google Analytics, Azure , Cloud computing , AI/ML is added advantage.
Facilitate development of Marketing Data Driven operating Model.
Experience in analyze marketing performance aligned to business strategy.
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Good Team player with team and peer management skills.
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Senior Java Analyst Developer (Hybrid).#Urgent#WorkNow,"Job Responsibilities / Role:
Senior development role on a critical application
Requirements capture, analysis and design on the ecommerce platform
Work with the GUI team to realize flow interaction, and communication interfaces
Testing and UA coordination
Liaison with the global business, support and development teams
Troubleshoot performance and scalability issues
Third line support of the platform during trading hours
Close interaction with the business product manager and other internal business users covering FX trading
Job Opportunities:
Will be able to acquire an excellent knowledge of the FX flow business domain
Gain knowledge of FX electronic trading
Use of latest java technologies
Basic Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science/Engineering or related field
Total and Relevant Experience:
Total technical experience requirements are 5+ Yrs
Server-side development
Technical Skills Required:
Very strong core java 8/11
Spring (Apache Camel is a plus)
Multi-threading
Solid understanding of OO principles
Unix/Linux experience
Relational database concepts and knowledge in SQL
Experience working with large complex applications
Nice to have: FIX protocol, Socket’s API, middleware’s such as Tibco EMS, Tibco RV, Solace, Gemfire, Couchbase
Non Technical Skills Required:
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Passion for technology, especially Java 
Self-motivated and a desire to progress your career
Flexible and adaptive, team player
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure, prioritize work and well organized
Comfortable in presenting suggestions for change and or improving work flow
Ability to pick up new concepts and apply the knowledge.
Understanding of financial concepts
Additional Information / Preferences:
Knowledge of FX is desirable
Experience of working with large financial software systems
Knowledge of etrading or ecommerce applications is desirable"
"Software Engineer, - Vice President #Worknow #URGENT #JobsThatMatter #Worknow'","Job Description
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 10 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #JobsThatMatter","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Tech Lead Analyst - Java. #Urgent,"Global FX and Local Markets (FXLM) is a dynamic and high-performing division of Citi’s Markets business. The Tech group within FXLM is a Sales-Product Management-Product Development division headquartered in London, and its development & support teams are located in Chennai. This team manages mission-critical applications that drive deal booking, risk management, eCommerce and analytical applications across multiple asset classes - Foreign Exchange (FX), Money Markets (MM), Fixed Incomes (FI) and Derivatives.  The team also provides production support for the various applications and the infrastructure that they run on. The unit in Chennai is led by the Business Head who reports to the Head of FXLM in London. The Heads of Development, Production Support, Infrastructure, Administration and Business Management report to the Business Head.
We work on business critical high availability application solutions for the FXLM business that are deployed across 80+ countries and power our global FX & Local Markets business. Our applications are considered amongst the best-in-class within the industry, with our eCommerce and analytical products continuing to win industry awards year after year.
As part of an expansion, the team is looking to hire top-performing technologists with proven track record at Team Lead level, reporting to the Development Project Manager.
Key Responsibilities:
Take ownership for delivering/maintaining front/back-office applications
Plan and coordinate end-to-end project within tight timelines and meeting the business expectation.
Own the entire lifecycle of the development project
Plan the project & Prepare the required documentations
Coordinate with business analysts & user communities to define requirements
Oversee technical design : Define the product scope, product functionality, look, feel and performance, deliver what the clients need while adhering to overall product architecture & organisation standards
Guide the developers and the team in ensuring quality deliverables.
Coordinate functionality & performance testing and provide continuously improved product experience
Actively assist Business Analysts and Support team in rolling out the product to our global user community
Manage the interfaces with various external groups – e.g. upstream & downstream applications, data centre & related services and various process/control functions.
Play a hands-on role during all phases of the lifecycle including plan, code reviews, testing and support
Motivate, mentor and lead technical teams, evaluate their delivery, guide the members to deliver quality output with responsible delegation and build a high performance team
Together with the partner teams, user community, business analysts and Tech management contribute to innovative & best-in-class solutions for our business
Development Value:
This position gives an excellent opportunity for the selected candidate to play a significant role in an exciting and critical business within Citi. As a member of our highly acclaimed Technology team, this role provides the opportunity to participate in and shape the expansion and pre-eminence of our Business working together with our team of highly skilled technologists. The opportunity to work in back-office application space spanning multiple asset classes in a high-velocity & high availability environment is, of itself, an exciting proposition. We believe it is even more special to do this as part of Citi, a premier financial institution that is one of the biggest and best in the market, and as a part of our team that has a high visibility for our work both inside our larger organisation as well as in the global Capital Markets world. The position will enable you to leverage Citi’s incomparable geographical reach, product richness, and engineering expertise and to translate these into a successful and top-of-the-class product offering for our customers.
Knowledge/Experience:
12+ years hands on experience
Strong Knowledge in one of the project management methodologies
Experience in designing and implementing Multi-tier applications
Excellent analytic & problem solving skills
Excellent knowledge in troubleshooting, performance tuning and best practices
Experience in Messaging, failover designing and recovery planning
Experience in delivering high quality applications
Experience in project risk identification techniques, mitigation and escalation
Familiar with all phases of the systems lifecycle, from analysis, design and development through to support
Experience in developing performance sensitive multi-tier Java/JEE applications
Knowledge of the FX/MM/FI market and products is very desirable
Skills:
Strong interpersonal and articulation skills (spoken and written)
Excellent persuasive, influencing and negotiation skills
Outstanding analytic and problem solving skills; innovative and solutions oriented
Technical
Essential:
Excellent knowledge in Java (JDK 1.7 or more) Excellent knowledge experience with JMS, JEE, Jsp, Servlets, Struts 2.0 and SQL/PLSQL Basics
Java performance tuning, Threads, Collections
Knowledge of any application server
Desirable
Any Project Management Tool
Messaging middlewares
Spring, SWING
Oracle11g
Weblogic server/App server administration
H5
Beneficial:           
MQ/Tibco
Flexcube, Flex PP etc.
Qualifications:
Graduation/Post Graduation qualifications in Computer Engineering (preferable) or any Engineering stream with a very good academic record throughout.  
A high degree of Analytical ability and Quantitative skills is desirable
Competencies:
Innovative and Positive ‘Can Do’ attitude
Ability to make effective judgements on available data / knowledge
Planning and Organising – Ability to identify the steps to be taken to achieve objectives
Resilience – Used to working towards tight deadlines, under pressure and using appropriate coping methods to stay focused
Accountability –self start on goals and achieve targets
Strong team orientation and commitment to overall team success; willing to go above and beyond to ensure team success; intense customer focus and commitment to driving quality"
Apps Development Senior Manager#',"Function Overview:
Citi’s Treasury and Trade Solutions group is built on the power of our network. Citi Treasury and Trade Solutions (TTS), provides integrated cash management and trade finance services to multinational corporations, financial institutions and public sector organizations across the globe. With a full range of digital and mobile enabled platforms, tools and analytics, TTS continues to lead the way in delivering innovative and tailored solutions to its clients. TTS offers the industry’s most comprehensive suite of treasury and trade solutions including cash management, payments, receivables, liquidity management and investment services, working capital solutions, commercial card programs, trade finance and services.
TTS counts 80% of Global Fortune 500, over 1,100 public sector entities and thousands of financial institutions amongst its diverse client base
Doing business In 160 countries and jurisdictions, and transacting in over 140 currencies, TTS processes some USD 4.0 trillion of client payments everyday
Collaborates with clients to deliver next-generation financial solutions using TTS Innovation Labs
Application / Team Overview:
Citibank® Commercial Cards offers card-based payment solutions to large corporations and federal and state governments for the procurement of goods and services as well as travel, entertainment, and fleet related expenses. Commercial Cards' strategic objective is to compete and differentiate on the basis of global capability and customized solutions for high-value customers.
Role Description:
We are seeking a Senior Application Development Manager for Commercial Card’s Credit Management and Corporate Reporting Systems. The successful candidate will interact with development, testing, and production support teams, as well as other departments within Citigroup (such as the System Administrators, Database Administrators, Data Centre Operations, and Change Control groups) for TTS commercial cards Visionplus platform.
He/she requires exceptional communication skills across both technology and the business and will have a high degree of visibility. The candidate will be a rigorous technical lead with a strong understanding of how to build scalable, enterprise level global applications. This candidate would be responsible for the development, and maintenance of Commercial cards ECMS and ACRS applications which are key components of Visionplus platform.
The ideal candidate will be dependable and resourceful software professional who can comfortably work in a large development team in a globally distributed, dynamic work environment that fosters diversity, teamwork and collaboration. The ability to work in high pressured environment is essential.
Qualifications:
BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
10+ years of experience working on application development manager/technical lead, production support, project manager and architect specifically in ECS+ Cards domain.
Good technical depth of Commercial Cards product and process.
Hands on experience in Vision plus development and implementation will be an added advantage
Project management, interpersonal, and communication skills, with high attention to minute details.
Technical / Functional Proficiency:
Vision PLUS application support and/or development experience with knowledge of COBOL, CICS and IBM mainframes platform.
Experience in working with ECMS/ACRS system is a must.
Strong technical mainframe skills related to COBOL, JCL, CICS, MVS, DB2, ZOS Connect, ZIP, CKDS
Hands on experience in handling ECS+ changes including planning, code retrofits, unit testing, parallel runs, UAT and production implementation across APAC, EMEA and LATAM countries
Knowledge of at least one or more of Vision PLUS systems like Authorization, Issuing, Settlement, Association Compliance, Embossing and IVR is required.
Advanced knowledge and experience of Agile SDLC.
Build and deliver technical development projects along with the team as per release schedule. Provide progress and overall project status, including risk management plans, issue resolution approach, and overall actions and decisions needed by the stakeholders
Manage and monitor the clocking of time by different teams working on the project throughout the life cycle of the project.
Review and approve change requests raised in ServiceNow, to ensure necessary due diligence has been performed. This includes adhoc patches/fixes raised by production support team.
Raise technology requests such as functional id access, file transfer via NDM node, key requests, etc. in a timely manner to ensure no delay to project delivery.
Understand Citi's processes and raise necessary forms for cross border data clearance, risk acceptance, management of information security issues and corrective action plans, etc.
Address queries/requests from regulators, auditors, or any of Citi's internal governance body.
Leadership Skills:
A good understanding of the credit card industry and functions of Cards and different types of credit management and corporate reporting platforms across APAC, EMEA and LATAM.
Requires Strong Stakeholder Management experience to drive discussions between Business, Solutions, Operations and Application development teams.
Ability to build a comprehensive understanding of project stakeholders, subject matter, and priorities
Ability to lead a team with ability to plan and manage development and delivery capacity
Flexible to work across different Time zones supporting stakeholders across LATAM, EMEA and ASPAC regions.
Strong customer service focuses with the ability to communicate with highly technical management teams.
Possess excellent verbal and written communication skills, both technical and functional.
Demonstrate excellent leadership, interpersonal, and team building skills.
Managing time and changing priorities in a dynamic environment
Ability to provide quick turnaround to software issues and management requests
Ability to assimilate key issues and concepts and come up to speed quickly"
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13 - #JobsThatMatter #Worknow#'.,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst #Immediate#""","Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst - #Urgent#',"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
ServiceNow Developer - (2200010556) #Urgent.,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Metadata SME, - Data Governance. #Immediate","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Business Metadata management:
Determining the properties of Business Metadata
Harvesting the Business Metadata for Source and Target Data topics
Capture Mapping between Source to Target business Metadata
Publishing Harvested Metadata & Mapping into Metadata management tool
Metadata Quality Validation
Operational Metadata management - to define:
Exceptions, Load Metrics, Notifications, Control gates &
Fact sheet
Unified Metadata: Work with technology team on unified repository for Business & Operational Metadata together with Technical Metadata.
Co-ordinate in producing Data profiling Report
Defining rules and process for Asset Type classification
Information Delivery
Our Ideal Candidate
6+ years IT experience.
Degree in computer science or related field.
Experience in Metadata management & Lineage in Data ingestion process
Experience in Metadata driven data quality management
Experience in Metadata management tools
RDBMS & ETL\ELT experience
Knowledge on Information delivery is an advantage
Experienced in engaging and managing stake holders.
Banking domain knowledge would be advantageous
Role Specific Technical Competencies   
Metadata Governance
RDBMS knowledge
Metadata management tools
Data profiling knowledge
Information delivery - API"
#Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst -- 22429912 #Immediate',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
"Full Stack Developer, Cleared Derivatives Technology, Associate -#Immediate #UrgentHire #Immediate","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Cleared Derivatives Technology team is hiring in Singapore. The team is responsible for developing and maintaining the Futures and Options (F&O) back office clearing application, P&L reporting process which scales across Finance, Treasury.
We are seeking a technically strong and disciplined developer. This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Minimum 5 years of software engineering experience
Minimum 2 years of banking experience
Experience in Java 8 is required
Experienced in Databases (Oracle/RDBMS) is required
Good to have experience in React/Angular/JavaScript
Good to have experience on Spring Boot with Microservices
Basics of cloud based applications is preferred
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base
Passionate about building an innovative culture, continuous learning in technical aptitude, business understanding and personal effectiveness
Understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment would be a plus
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Java Developer - (2200019786)'. #WorkNow,"Job Scope
The successful candidate will be a skilled software engineer who is excited about working with a world class team to analysing, designing, developing and delivering solutions built for FM business.
We are looking for forward-thinking, energetic and passionate individuals to be part of a new exciting journey! 
Development of large scale big data solutions to be used in a very large production environment.
Gather, analyse and maintain large data sets to provide answers to address hurdles and create innovative solutions in large-scale data infrastructures.
Interact with both business and technical stakeholders to deliver high quality products and services that meet business requirements and expectations while applying the latest available tools and technology.
Develop code and mentor junior developers to ensure deliverables are on time, within budget, and with good code quality.
Present technical solutions, capabilities, considerations, and features in business terms.
Effectively communicate status, issues, and risks in a precise and timely manner.
Our Ideal Candidate
Strong analytical and problem solving and creative skills.
Good communication skills in both written and oral English.
Ability to be organised and multi-task on different requirements across various stakeholders, and to work independently and under pressure.
Cultural sensitivity and awareness to work with a range of people from diverse background and geographies.
Mandatory Technical Skills
5+ years hands on experience with Java / J2EE development experience.
Demonstrated hands on experience building Big Data solutions.
Experience with Hadoop ecosystem: Hadoop, Spark, MapReduce, Hive, Yarn, HBase, etc.
Experience with RDBMS as well as NoSQL stacks (ElasticSearch, HBase, Cassandra).
 Hands on experience on devops technology.
Desirable Technical Skills – but not mandatory
Good grasp of statistical and scientific programming packages in Python is a plus.
Good grasp of data science concepts with emphasis on machine learning techniques is a plus.
Experience with Agile / Scrum development methodologies.
Software testing know-how, including black-box and white-box testing methodologies and both functional and non-functional testing.
Test driven development experience.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Big Data
JAVA
SQL / HIVE
SPARK
PYTHON
Communication
Problem solving
System Design
About Standard Chartered
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Technical Lead / (2200017771).'. #JobsThatMatter,"The Role Responsibilities
Focus on developing and delivering the technology roadmap for product
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive the technology strategy implementation within the team on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Stakeholders
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks and obsolescence so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Our Ideal Candidate
13 Years of experience in application development using Java and Advance Technologies tool.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles and coding standards.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology, plus adherence to VX principles
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Able to identify and drive compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Good experience in setting up and managing the delivery team in various location
Very good presentation and documentation skills.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, that also includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching etc.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Understanding of deploying microservices/API, cloud solutions and experience in integrating public cloud into traditional hosting/delivery models with a specific focus on AWS
Understanding and experience on core Java (Java 8 or higher), core Spring frameworks and experience in using design patterns
Understanding and experience on React, Redux, JavaScript MVC patterns / frameworks and CSS strategies
Understanding and experience on developing cloud native microservices using frameworks such as Spring boot, Spring cloud
Understanding and experience in working on Relation and non-Relation DBs (Progress, Oracle, Cassandra, MongoDB)
Understanding and knowledge on Implementing automated testing platforms, unit tests, and CICD
Understanding and knowledge on code versioning tools, such as Git, Bitbucket
Understanding of container platform, such as Docker and Kubernetes, in particular similar offerings by cloud providers such as AWS
Familiar and working experience with Ansible, Jenkins, Terraform
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Mobile Engineer,"Department Overview
The Digital Technology Department in OSIM works together as a team to ensure that the final product is programmed to meet the needs and wants of the consumer, whilst, incorporating the latest and most desirable technology to remain competitive in the market. This department comprises of the Product Owners, UI/UX, Mobile Application, IOT as well as the Digital QA group. If you are forward-looking, able to think out of the box and always hungry to learn about the newest technology, we want you in our team!
Job Description
Being part of OSIM’s Digital Technology team, you will be responsible to design, develop, troubleshoot, maintain and support iOS/Android Mobile applications that work together with OSIM’s Health and Wellness products. You will work closely with other functional teams (Product Design, Project, UI/UX, Backend and Marketing) and vendors to integrate new ideas and technology into products’ Mobile application while exemplifying utmost attention to quality and timely delivery. This role will report directly to Digital Technology Director and belong to Mobile Engineer Group.
Job Responsibilities
Design and develop new projects using Flutter
Troubleshoot, maintain and support existing native iOS or Android projects and Flutter projects
Job Requirements
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science / Software Engineering / Computer Engineering or its equivalent
At least 1-2 years of working experience in Flutter development
Experience with Flutter plugin and using native SDK via Flutter
Experience with mobile app deployment and optimization
Familiarity with RESTful APIs
Experience with version control such as Git
Able to work in an agile environment
(Plus Point) Knowledge in native development(iOS or Android) is a HUGE plus
(Plus Point) Knowledge in Wi-Fi / Bluetooth Low Energy products is a plus
(Plus Point) Knowledge in CI/CD is a plus"
AIOps Algorithm Engineer - Applications Performance Management #JobsThatMatter*#.#JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The APM (application performance management) team is responsible for optimizing user experience for our products. In order to provide the best user experience, we build large-scale platforms to analyze, monitor the user experience and solve the user experience problems of our products. The system handles more than 900 billion records per day and process 20 million QPS at the peak period. Joining our team, you will have the chance to handle very challenging technical problems with very structured training plan, moreover we offer the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We embrace a culture of diversity and we have global offices around the world. We are looking for candidates to join our team who will:
Responsibilities:
Build intelligent AIOps platforms by applying Machine Learning technology
Explore, understand, and apply most recent AIOps related algorithms, including time series anomaly detection, log analysis, data mining, root cause analysis, alarm correlation and aggregation etc.
Build data platform on observational data to manage ML models and ML training data sets
Build auto remediation platform to automate fault detection and self-remediation, reduce MTTR and human effort.
Qualifications
Solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in algorithms, data structures, design patterns, and software design principles.
Proficiency in at least one server-side programming language such as Golang, Java, Python
Experience with distributed version control (e.g. Gitlab or GitHub).
Deep knowledge in: Application of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence in IT operations.
Software engineering principles (preferably Agile/Scrum) and their application to the creation of self-healing infrastructure and applications.
Cloud infrastructure operations and automation technologies.
Preferred Qualifications:
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g., R, Python and Data Science notebooks (e.g., Jupyter).
Experience with open source Machine Learning Platforms and Toolkits
Experience in APM or AIOps area
Micro-service experience with golang/python"
Post-Trade Technology - Software Engineer - VP--#JobsThatMatter #Worknow #UrgentHire,"Job Description
We look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Primary focus will be to manage the number of Post Trade Technology applications in APAC with target architecture and to implement new settlement & clearing capabilities so as to support business expansion and increased volumes. 
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Sciences 
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems.
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices.
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture.
Experience in building/ designing high volume/ real time processing systems.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Java/ J2EE
Spring Framework / Hibernate
RDBMS (Oracle)
Unix / Shell scripting
Cloud knowledge
Understanding Business Requirements and Functional Specifications
Understanding existing program logic
Providing and/or agreeing estimates for required development
Creation/ update of Detailed Design Specifications, Program Specifications, and program Version Control documentation
Coding of new programs and changes to existing programs
Creation of Unit Test Plans, and execution of Unit Tests
Providing technical support for User Acceptance Testing
Creation of Implementation/ Back out Plans and Support Handover Documents
Providing technical support for Production Implementations, and post-implementation support during implementation warranty period
Requirements: 
5 years relevant hands-on development work.
Experience in working in Eclipse/IntelliJ / Maven environments.
Experience in managing various settlement systems in Post Trade Technology in APAC region.
Expertise in Core Java, TDD, BDD, spring framework, Messaging, SQL, Unix shell scripts.
“Can do” attitude, which can identify problems, take ownership, and provide solutions.
Drive the project progress for the deliverables. In our small agile team, developers talk directly to operational users and other BAs for requirements. You will be developing great communication and project management skills on top of the technical skills.
Hand’s on experience in fine tuning application response / performance testing.
Experience of MQ / JMS (message transfer process), Kafka.
Experience using version control tool bitbucket.
Understanding of banking risk and compliance policies.
Experience in code scanning tools like black duck and tools like Sonar etc.
Experience of development of Settlement and clearing applications.
Familiarity with SWIFT (Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication) Message formats.
Knowledge on markets such as Australia, Singapore and Japan is good."
Software Engineer - Recommendation Architecture #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
About The Team
Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.
Responsibilities - What You'll Do:
Build and maintain high performance online services for recommendation system；
Build extremely efficient and reliable data pipelines for candidates generation, profile generation, training examples generation, realtime online training, etc;
Build globalized large-scale recommendation system;
Design and develop high performance computing frameworks and storage systems
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields,
Experience building scalable system;
Experience programming in at least one of the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang;
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive;
Experience in at least one area of the following areas: personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks is a plus.
At least 3 years of relevant experience
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too"
Software Engineer (Mobile App/ReactNative) - J39756,"We are looking for a Mobile Application Software Engineer to join a Fintech Company.
5 days work week (Mon - Fri)
Attractive Remuneration Package
Work in a dynamic team in developing FinTech applications
Responsibilities
Develop, test, deploy, and maintain mobile application based on ReactNative
Provide vision, design and develop in keeping up to date and cutting-edge technologies 
Actively participate in all aspects of the full SDLC process
Provide maintenance support to customers by investigating and rectifying reported systems shortcomings 
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
3+ years of experience in mobile application development with ReactNative
Proficient in object-oriented methodologies, design patterns, data structures and quality codes
To apply, please send your updated resume to spml(at)scientecpersonnel.com by indicating Job ID J39756 to fasten the process
Ng Kee Hung (Vickus) - R2091423
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd - 11C5781"
"Analyst, - Fintech (WSP) - (2200019495).","Role Responsibilities
Our Technology & Innovation (T&I) function is at the heart of shaping the bank for the future and serving our clients digitally across the globe.
We are responsible for the systems development and technology infrastructure of the Bank, defining, innovating, and implementing digital agendas across functions, especially in our client services.
Our team helps unlock new banking experiences for clients, while improving our operational effectiveness and enhance existing offerings.
We are focused on building your digital skills and adaptability necessary to be future-ready.
You’ll be exposed to a diverse portfolio of projects in your allocated domain will help to deliver efficiencies and automation, introduce global platforms, machine learning, and bring forth intelligent technology.
You’ll be constantly learning and sharing with your peers:
Creating and designing cutting edge tools and applications that will redefine the future of banking
Work in a truly Agile environment, as part of scrum teams that are striving to solve customer challenges
Play a critical role in client journeys that help us make faster decisions to enhance the end-to-end client experience and achieve outcomes that are most valuable to our clients
Our Ideal Candidate 
If you are passionate about technology and customer experience, and possess traits and experience most of the below, we’d love to hear from you:
Adaptive to changing situations and enjoy collaborating with global teams in a diverse multi-cultural environment.
Curious and open-minded.
Strong foundational knowledge of Algorithms, Data Structures, OOPs concepts and frameworks
Passionate for solving challenging problems and learning new skills, coding languages.
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to JavaScript (ReactJS, React-Redux, nodeJS), TypeScript, Python.
Experience in working with either front end and/or back-end technologies and frameworks.
Experience in one or more Cloud Technologies. 
About Standard Chartered  
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning 
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Business Analysis Sr. Manager - Singapore (22479156).- #Immediate#.#UrgentHire,"As a bank with a brain and a soul, Citi creates economic value that is systemically responsible and in our clients’ best interests. As a financial institution that touches every region of the world and every sector that shapes your daily life, our Enterprise Operations & Technology teams are charged with a mission that rivals any large tech company. Our technology solutions are the foundations of everything we do. We keep the bank safe and provide the technical tools our workers need to be successful. We design our digital architecture and ensure our platforms provide a first-class customer experience. Our operations teams manage risk, resources, and program management. We focus on enterprise resiliency and business continuity. We develop, coordinate, and execute strategic operational plans. Essentially, Enterprise Operations & Technology re-engineers client and partner processes to deliver excellence through secure, reliable, and controlled services.
Global Functions Technology is a diverse organization comprised of more than 15,000 talented professionals with some of the brightest minds – all working together to realize Citi’s Vision of growth and economic progress. As a group, we partner with the Finance, Risk, Compliance, and Human Resources teams to drive the delivery of innovative technology solutions using common data, analytics, and platforms. Our technology operates in real-time environments, capturing and managing market, transaction, and accounting data, as well as the data from millions of customers daily. Our solutions cover all products and geographies in which Citi does business. We are the backbone for reporting across the bank, satisfying our regulatory commitments, enabling our businesses to be nimbler and helping to safeguard customer assets through highly effective controls.
Our commitment to diversity includes a workforce that represents the clients we serve globally from all walks of life, backgrounds, and origins. We foster an environment where the best people want to work. We value and demand respect for others, promote individuals based on merit, and ensure opportunities for personal development are widely available to all. Ideal candidates are innovators with well-rounded backgrounds who bring their authentic selves to work and complement our culture of delivering results with pride. If you are a problem solver who seeks passion in your work, come join us. We’ll enable growth and progress together.
Business Analysis Sr. Manager
GFT is looking for a Business Analyst Lead to work with Treasury users and a group of seasoned technology professionals to deliver technology projects for the business.
Responsibilities:
Interact with the business teams and be responsible for collating and analyzing the business requirements and be the liaison between technology and business teams.
Produce Business Requirement Documents and obtain stakeholder sign off; be disciplined in managing changing requirements
Translate the business requirements into functional and technical requirements for the technology team consumption
Liaise with Program management, Development team and testing team to ensure that requirements are understood, and deliverables meet the business requirements
Proactively monitor potential speed bumps and notify stakeholders of any risks, bottlenecks, problems, issues, and concerns
Analyze data to ensure comprehensive coverage of use cases and testing methodology
Testing of deliverable functionalities
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree
Minimum 12 years of total experience with about 5 years as a BA in a financial domain
Knowledge on Transfer Pricing Concepts and Methodologies is a plus
Understanding of project SDLC
Hands on Experience with SQL queries
Good Analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong communication and interpersonal skills
Good presentation skills
Data analysis skills"
Business Analysis Sr. Manager - Singapore (22479156) #Immediate##Seekbetter,"As a bank with a brain and a soul, Citi creates economic value that is systemically responsible and in our clients’ best interests. As a financial institution that touches every region of the world and every sector that shapes your daily life, our Enterprise Operations & Technology teams are charged with a mission that rivals any large tech company. Our technology solutions are the foundations of everything we do. We keep the bank safe and provide the technical tools our workers need to be successful. We design our digital architecture and ensure our platforms provide a first-class customer experience. Our operations teams manage risk, resources, and program management. We focus on enterprise resiliency and business continuity. We develop, coordinate, and execute strategic operational plans. Essentially, Enterprise Operations & Technology re-engineers client and partner processes to deliver excellence through secure, reliable, and controlled services.
Global Functions Technology is a diverse organization comprised of more than 15,000 talented professionals with some of the brightest minds – all working together to realize Citi’s Vision of growth and economic progress. As a group, we partner with the Finance, Risk, Compliance, and Human Resources teams to drive the delivery of innovative technology solutions using common data, analytics, and platforms. Our technology operates in real-time environments, capturing and managing market, transaction, and accounting data, as well as the data from millions of customers daily. Our solutions cover all products and geographies in which Citi does business. We are the backbone for reporting across the bank, satisfying our regulatory commitments, enabling our businesses to be nimbler and helping to safeguard customer assets through highly effective controls.
Our commitment to diversity includes a workforce that represents the clients we serve globally from all walks of life, backgrounds, and origins. We foster an environment where the best people want to work. We value and demand respect for others, promote individuals based on merit, and ensure opportunities for personal development are widely available to all. Ideal candidates are innovators with well-rounded backgrounds who bring their authentic selves to work and complement our culture of delivering results with pride. If you are a problem solver who seeks passion in your work, come join us. We’ll enable growth and progress together.
Business Analysis Sr. Manager
GFT is looking for a Business Analyst Lead to work with Treasury users and a group of seasoned technology professionals to deliver technology projects for the business.
Responsibilities:
Interact with the business teams and be responsible for collating and analyzing the business requirements and be the liaison between technology and business teams.
Produce Business Requirement Documents and obtain stakeholder sign off; be disciplined in managing changing requirements
Translate the business requirements into functional and technical requirements for the technology team consumption
Liaise with Program management, Development team and testing team to ensure that requirements are understood, and deliverables meet the business requirements
Proactively monitor potential speed bumps and notify stakeholders of any risks, bottlenecks, problems, issues, and concerns
Analyze data to ensure comprehensive coverage of use cases and testing methodology
Testing of deliverable functionalities
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree
Minimum 12 years of total experience with about 5 years as a BA in a financial domain
Knowledge on Transfer Pricing Concepts and Methodologies is a plus
Understanding of project SDLC
Hands on Experience with SQL queries
Good Analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong communication and interpersonal skills
Good presentation skills
Data analysis skills"
Credit Application Development Lead (VP)# #Urgent #WorkNow #Immediate,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities. This position is primarily responsible for application development and management of Credit and Lending applications of Citi Wealth management business.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects in accordance to architectural guidelines
Responsible for reviewing the end-to-end process flows, Recommends and oversees process improvements and follow through technology implementation
Liaise with project sponsors and regional business leads on an ongoing basis to understand their needs and priorities as well as to pro-actively manage expectations, buy-in, feedback and resolution of issues.
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Deliver effective communication and report on initiatives to various levels including senior leadership. Identifying issues/risks and manage escalations.
Manage offshore development team through effective virtual management experience.
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Experience in developing large scale applications involving technologies such as – Java, Angular, Oracle, messaging layer, extensive Data processing.
Domain knowledge in Wealth management, investment, credit or reporting area will be advantageous
Experience in developing and modernizing application with cloud architecture will advantageous
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Loans Java Sr Developer. - #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #Urgent #Worknow,"Responsibilities
The IT Project Senior Analyst is a seasoned professional role. Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function. Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area. Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business. Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information. Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams. Involved in coaching and training of new recruits. Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc. by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization. Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Responsibilities:
Coordinates activities of the project team, identifies necessary resources and develops schedules to meet completion deadlines.
Verifies project team adherence to control and risk implementations as well as standards and process changes.
Determines scope and impact of project risks and issues; raises and resolves issues.
Applies good understanding of concepts and procedures within own IT project leadership area to resolve issues.
Demonstrates a comprehensive understanding of how areas of IT project leadership collectively integrate to contribute to achieving business goals.
Provides evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual information in complicated and unique situations.
Directly impacts the IT project leadership area through shared responsibility for delivery of end results and contribution to planning, budget management and formulation of procedures; influences resource planning.
Persuades and influences others through communication and diplomacy skills; may negotiate with external parties.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
7+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Experience with Loan IQ Platform or Loan IQ SDK development is desirable
Experience with REST, JMS, SOAP, Microservices
Experience with Spring Boot, Swagger, Tomcat and JSON and XML processing 
Very hands on role and associate should be able to write code on daily basis 
Experience with at least one of the Messaging Systems: Kafka, Tibco. IBM MQ, etc.
Good knowledge of SQL 
Familiarity with Windows and Linux operating systems and able to write shell & batch programs
Experience with Kubernetes and Docker
Knowledge of Threading, Collections, Exception Handling, JDBC, Java OOD/OOP Concepts, GoF Design Patterns, File I/O
Able to work with Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment tools 
Demonstrated Subject Matter Expert (SME) in area(s) of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated problem-solving and decision-making skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization #Urgent #Immediate","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Senior Java Developer - Rates Derivatives Structured Pricing - Hybrid.',"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Working experience in enterprise application development using JAVA and it's peripheral systems/frameworks/technologies.
Working experience in middleware/messaging technologies like Solace/Kafka
Experience in developing microservices, and know how in cloud native API development.
Knowledge in cloud technologies like Dockers, Kubernetes, Openshift etc.
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Software Engr. - (Time Series Database) - Cloud Infrastructure #JobsThatMatter #Urgent*,"TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Observerability Infrastructure Team is responsible for (1) in-house developed timeseries database, timeseries warehouse, distribution tracing system and logging system (2) one-stop observerbility platform including customized dashboard, intelligent alarm, issue diagnosis and remediation, tracing topology analysis, in order to guarantee production service stability, capacity management and service governance capabilities.
TimeSeries data warehouse team is committed to creating a high-performance enterprise warehouse product that empowers our users to make efficient data-driven decisions. You will be part of the talented team and build the next-generation, cloud-native, and high-performance data warehouse with challenges that are unique, exciting, and unprecedented.
Responsibilities
Participate in the design and implementation of timeseries data warehouse platforms and tools;
Deeply exploring business-oriented scenarios and providing practical solutions;
Build and develop batch and streaming data warehouses to support business growth;
Develop timeseries data warehouse platforms to serve multiple tenants.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or related fields;
Proven experience with Java/Go or other languages, network, multithreading, and high concurrent programming;
Possesses an understanding of the implementation principles of distributed systems;
Strong analytical thinking and exceptional attention to details;
Excellent communication and problem solving skills, ability to coordinate with different local and global teams.
Preferred Qualifications
At least 3 years of relevant experience;
Experience in the development or optimization of TSDB such as Open TSDB, Influxdb, M3, Prometheus or Karios;
Experience in data warehouse and have production experience in building data warehouse;
Experience in SQL and Hadoop eco-system (e.g. Hive, HDFS, Yarn, MapReduce);
Familiar with Storm/Spark/Flink is a plus;
Experience in the development of large-scale distributed systems."
"Software Engineer, Java - Payments Technology, #WorkNow #JPM #Immediate #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter","As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
You will be working for a global team with members in Singapore, India and North America. The team is responsible for building low value and real time payments systems for our corporate customers. As a full stack developer, you will be working on high throughput, low latency micro services. There is a huge opportunity to learn the payments domain.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent 
Minimum 3 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, MySQL and Cassandra
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of one or more IMDG technologies, e.g. Gemfire, Hazelcast
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude"
Senior Java Developer - Rates Derivatives Structured Pricing##Urgent,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Working experience in enterprise application development using JAVA and it's peripheral systems/frameworks/technologies.
Working experience in middleware/messaging technologies like Solace/Kafka
Experience in developing microservices, and know how in cloud native API development.
Knowledge in cloud technologies like Dockers, Kubernetes, Openshift etc.
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Software Engineer - (PSET-CPD-IDL) #WorkNow #UrgentHire #UrgentHire,"Position Overview 
An exciting career opportunity in the Identity and Entitlements Engineering team, in Autodesk Singapore that is critical to the Subscription business model transformation.
As a Software Engineer, you will design, develop and deliver business model workflows which aligned with the business goals and strategy. You will work with developers, architects, product owners and operations to collaboratively deliver various team requirements and goals to advance the platform for subscriptions and entitlements. You will proactively work to evaluate and adopt technology solutions that help with improving the quality of the platform as well as productivity of the team.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, test, debug, and document new and existing components to ensure that software meets business, quality and operational needs
Work on the development of business requirements closely with product owners and other stakeholders
Ensure that high quality code is delivered by following best practices like peer code reviews, code standards, unit testing and test-driven development
Drive and participate in code and document reviews, and share best practices
Work with business and technical product owners to interpret and translate business needs to technical requirements
Evaluate and recommend tools, technologies and processes to ensure the highest quality and performance is achieved
Monitor and troubleshoot code level problems quickly and efficiently
Apply technical expertise to resolve challenging programming and design problems
Focus on scalability, security and availability of all applications and processes
Contribute to technical road map and technical debt elimination, balancing time, resource, and quality constraints to achieve business and strategic goals and requirements
Minimum Qualifications 
Bachelor’s / Master’s Degree (in Computer Science or other engineering discipline.) or equivalent work experience 
Entry Level or with 1+ years hands-on experience developing scalable, distributed applications in the cloud
Experience with XML/JSON, designing and building REST/SOAP based web services
Excellent Programming skills in one of the programming paradigms… Object oriented or Functional programming.
Experience with building cloud-based API platforms or backend systems in a Unix environment
Possess good analytical skills with problem-solving abilities
Detail-oriented with respect to documentation and communication
Experience with AWS or other cloud-based service providers
Preferred Skills
Entry level with a hunger for technologies
Experience in Cloud service is a plus
Experience working with large scale distributed systems is a plus+
Hands on Experience with Docker based application development.
The Ideal Candidate
Passion for developing robust software and writing maintainable code 
Pragmatic and results oriented & ability to learn large software systems quickly 
Flexibility under changing conditions and ability to multi-task between projects, able to work well in a team to deliver on team goals 
Good verbal and written communication skills in English language 
Willingness to take initiative and committed to deliver on time 
Keen interest in new technologies
Ability to work inclusively and people with diverse background 
Ability to work with remote and international team members
About Autodesk
With Autodesk software, you have the power to Make Anything. The future of making is here, bringing with it radical changes in the way things are designed, made, and used. It’s disrupting every industry: architecture, engineering, construction, manufacturing, and media and entertainment. With the right knowledge and tools, this disruption is your opportunity.
Our software is used by everyone - from design professionals, engineers, and architects to digital artists, students, and hobbyists. We constantly explore new ways to integrate all dimensions of diversity across our employees, customers, partners, and communities. Our ultimate goal is to expand opportunities for anyone to imagine, design, and make a better world."
"Digital Technology –Full Stack Developer, Associate --- 210152908 #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Wealth Management business has been on a Digital transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a suite of self-service capabilities allowing them to transact with us in a manner and channel of their choice, and thereby remove friction from the various touchpoints. The Digital Technology team is partnering with our business to aggressively expand our digital offerings over both Web and Mobile by designing, building and rolling out world-class digital solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner and also embraces cutting-edge technologies and innovations.
The Digital Technology team in APAC is seeking a full stack developer to join us on this journey. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. Also, if you have a passion for bleeding edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Strong Web development skills with 6+ years of experience in Web and JavaScript technologies – HTML ,Angular, CSS in developing or maintaining Front end solutions
Strong Java Development skills with 6+ years of experience in solving business problems having exposure Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more database technologies –SQL Server, Sybase.
Experience in building REST APIs
Some exposure to Cloud (AWS / Cloud Foundry) and Kafka would be needed to succeed in the role
Experience in Agile development background and experience with TDD/BDD concepts and testing skills
Demonstrate an enthusiastic and proactive approach with a good team ethic
BS degree at least
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
J.P. Morgan Asset & Wealth Management delivers industry-leading investment management and private banking solutions with client assets of $4 trillion. Asset Management provides individuals, advisors and institutions with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes through our global network of investment professionals. Wealth Management helps individuals, families and foundations take a more intentional approach to their wealth or finances to better define, focus and realize their goals. 
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
"Digital Technology, – Full Stack Developer, Associate - [210152908] #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Wealth Management business has been on a Digital transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a suite of self-service capabilities allowing them to transact with us in a manner and channel of their choice, and thereby remove friction from the various touchpoints. The Digital Technology team is partnering with our business to aggressively expand our digital offerings over both Web and Mobile by designing, building and rolling out world-class digital solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner and also embraces cutting-edge technologies and innovations.
The Digital Technology team in APAC is seeking a full stack developer to join us on this journey. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. Also, if you have a passion for bleeding edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Strong Web development skills with 6+ years of experience in Web and JavaScript technologies – HTML ,Angular, CSS in developing or maintaining Front end solutions
Strong Java Development skills with 6+ years of experience in solving business problems having exposure Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more database technologies –SQL Server, Sybase.
Experience in building REST APIs
Some exposure to Cloud (AWS / Cloud Foundry) and Kafka would be needed to succeed in the role
Experience in Agile development background and experience with TDD/BDD concepts and testing skills
Demonstrate an enthusiastic and proactive approach with a good team ethic
BS degree at least
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
J.P. Morgan Asset & Wealth Management delivers industry-leading investment management and private banking solutions with client assets of $4 trillion. Asset Management provides individuals, advisors and institutions with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes through our global network of investment professionals. Wealth Management helps individuals, families and foundations take a more intentional approach to their wealth or finances to better define, focus and realize their goals. 
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
"Operations Analyst, (2200005289) #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities 
Perform day-to-day operations such as processing of client’s transactions for Structured products in accordance with bank operational menu, desk instructions, compliance and regulatory requirements
Instruct and monitors market settlement and cash funding between the bank and custodian and ensure these are processed accurately and timely
Follow up on unmatched/unsettled trades with dealer, broker counterparties
Ensure proper and timely escalation to business and/or management
Provide other administrative support for the department, updating KPI, filing etc
Handle ad hoc project as assigned
Provide settlement support on Public holiday
Key Stakeholders
Internal: Client Advisors, Client Service Managers, Platform Managers, CMPS(Dealers), In-Country Ops team, Compliance, Credit & Risk team
External: Brokers, Custodians
Our Ideal Candidate
Independent and willing to learn
Work well under stress and within tight dateline
Team player
Willing to work at Changi Business Park
2 years of experience in an operations role.
Banking background preferred.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Product Knowledge
Settlement experience
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997) - #UrgentHire,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
Senior Business Analyst Hybrid (WFH or Depot Close or Client Site),"Job Description:
Works collaboratively with clients and stakeholders - both external and internal to the company - to research and elicit, analyze, validate and document business requirements, and to ensure that those requirements clearly reflect true business needs, correctly representing all stakeholders. Translates business needs into system/ application requirements and project components to help determine solutions to business problems. Assists team members in producing functional requirements for tool development. Proactively identifies and manages changes to requirements and identify risks for the company’s clients. Effectively manages client’s expectations. Applies industry and information technology expertise to support proposals, feasibility studies, implementations and new business development.
Responsibilities:
Under minimal direction, formulate and define system scope and objectives based on both user needs and a good understanding of information technology, business processes, and industry requirements.
Act as a liaison between client and technical solutions/ support groups, using advanced communication skills to elicit, document, analyze and validate client requirements.
Apply extensive knowledge of the client's business and industry to develop requirements specifications.
Document requirements and translate into proper system requirements specifications using high-maturity methods, processes and tools.
Develop visualization, user experience and configuration elements of solution design.
Execute and coordinate requirements management and change management processes.
Develop and maintain internal and external relationships to support management of scope and expectations.
Participate in proposals, feasibility studies, implementations, and new business development.
Operates as a team member and as a team leader. Advise on methods to improve business processes.
Consider the business implications of the application of technology to the current and future business environment.
Develop and execute acceptance test plans and test cases.
May lead the training of clients and peers.
Education and Experience Required
Typically, a Bachelor’s degree in a technical or business discipline or equivalent experience
Minimum of 6 years of related experience or a Master’s degree and a minimum of 4 years’ experience.
Knowledge and Skills
Good verbal and written communication skill and is comfortable fronting client
Ability to work effectively in a team
Essential: requirements elicitation via interviewing; requirements determination using structured techniques for documentation, analysis, evaluation/ validation; decomposition ofhigh-level information into details; abstracting low-level information; distinguishing requests vs needs; distinguishing requirements vs. solutions; classifying/ prioritizing requirements; OO techniques using UML models; ambiguity analysis, ensuring consistent understanding across users, designers and testers; business process modeling of current state and desired/ future state processes; defining and managing scope and client expectations, requirements change management and traceability; identifying and mitigating risks; applying creativity to solving complex problems; building relationships and working collaboratively; effective verbal/ written communication; experience in an industry domain.
Specialized: Function Point counting; survey execution; statistical analysis; developing structured user manuals and training; visualization modeling; business rules modeling; develop and executing acceptance test plans.
Experience in performing integrated testing and managing UAT is required.
Experience in Public Sector implementation is an advantage.
Experience in Agile methodology is an advantage
We regret to inform that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
EA License No. 01C4394
REG No :R110526 (Ngiam Xinyi)
By sending us your personal data and curriculum vitae (CV), you are deemed to consent to PERSOLKELLY Singapore Pte Ltd and its affiliates to collect, use and disclose your personal data for the purposes set out in the Privacy Policy available at https://www.persolkelly.com.sg/policies. You acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree with the Privacy Policy."
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997) *#UrgentHire,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
Technical Design & Delivery Lead - (2100011857). #Urgent'.,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Technical Design & Delivery Lead - (2100011857).,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Software Engineer, Associate, Trade Surveillance, Singapore #JobsThatMatter #Worknow #UrgentHire'","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of BAU Sage Analytics and Surveillance system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities, and migrate the BAU alerts/reports to the new strategic platform.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Support the migration of the existing BAU Compliance Web trade surveillance system developed on FLEX/Java Script Web UI and Sybase SQL back-end, to the new strategic platform
Be part of the Global Surveillance Technology AD organization spread across of US and APAC to provide end to end design, build and delivery
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. / M.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
5 years of more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Ext-JS, D3.JS or Angular-JS
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Hudson, Jenkins or Gradle
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Scala or Python experience, SpotFire and Cloud Technology
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related echo systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflows
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our professionals in our Corporate Functions cover a diverse range of areas from finance and risk to human resources and marketing. Our corporate teams are an essential part of our company, ensuring that we’re setting our businesses, clients, customers and employees up for success."
"Frontend Engineer, - Autumn Venture - SC Ventures. **.","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Software Engineer (Performance Optimization), Data Platform -- #Immediate","About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.
About the team
TikTok and affiliates are developing the next-generation high-performance analytical database, with a mission to enable efficient and real-time data-driven decision-making on PB-level data sets. The initial product was forked from Clickhouse, after which large re-architecture had been taken place. The product now not only improves the efficiency of Clickhouse but also fits into the elastic cloud-native infrastructure with better scalability and resource utilization. With years of polishment in the internal EB-level scenarios, we are now ready to serve our business partners via various cloud vendors.
Responsibilities
Build cutting-edge data systems to handle huge amounts of data every day, to empower ByteDance's products.
Identify performance bottleneck and optimize ByteDance's next-generation distributed data processing architecture on our state-of-the-art hardware.
Be a part of these unprecedented projects, such as cloud-native analytical database, stream-processing engine, and distributed storage.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, related technical discipline, or equivalent practical experience.
At least 1 year of relevant experience
Seasoned software development skills in C/C++.
Able to create a proof-of-concept quickly, as well as writing code for real systems in production.
Familiar with Intel x86 architecture, Linux, and tools for performance profiling and analysis.
Good communication, strong analytical thinking, and exceptional attention to detail."
Technical Lead,"Roles & Responsibilities
We are looking for a passionate Technical Lead to lead a full stack team. Besides helping to develop test plans & cases, prepare technical & functional documents according to the adopted methodology, you will also provide post-implementation maintenance and support.
Why Monstar Lab?
Monstar Lab is one of the top digital product development company with 25 offices in 15 countries and most importantly with a team of 1200+ beautiful souls.
We build innovative digital products that includes mobile app, web apps, AR/VR products for our clients such as UOB, NTUC Income, Gardens by the Bay, Shake Shack, Resort World Sentosa and many stealth startups that we can’t talk about publicly.
Typically we are building new products from scratch. We are working with clients from ideation to development and product growth. We guide the client for the entire product development process and we work as a consultant. Through this experience, you will learn the entire product development life cycle. This is the reason many developers see Monstar Lab as a good training ground. Many ex-employees are now working with big tech giants or doing their own startups. If you want to learn and grow, this is the greatest opportunity.
We are encouraging developers to learn multiple programming languages. If you are keen on trying new languages, we support your study and we can provide the opportunity to try it for the production level product.
The Job
Lead a full stack team with both mobile app and backend developers
Design and build API's
Perform entire software development lifecycle, from conceptualization, design, development, testing, deployment, maintenance and support
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features
Optimize server side performance
Keep up-to-date with latest technologies, best practices and industry trends
Communicate with client for requirement gathering
Requirements
At least 8 years of experience working with PHP, NodeJS, Web Services
More than 3 years experience in leading squads or scrum teams in app development
Knowledge of server side technology (PHP and Node.js)
Knowledge in either IOS or Android development.
Database - MySQL and No SQL
Good knowledge of system architecture for performance and scalability.
Knowledge in AWS (Amazon Web Service)
Knowledge in Docker, Kubernetes, Openshift
Experience in writing unit test
Ability to convert application requirements into system design
Backend security which include encryption
At least a Bachelor Degree in Computer Science/IT or any related disciplines
What we provide
Opportunity to build and grow a product from scratch (B2C, B2B. B2B2C)
Great benefits and a balanced lifestyle (We currently work remotely).
Great company culture"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization #Immediate #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
API Tech Lead Analyst - 22452305 - #JobsThatMatter #Worknow#'.,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
Manager / Information Management - (2100032149) *,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
This is an exciting opportunity for a Full Stack Developer to support the Singapore Finance Team digitize their processes by working on existing applications as well as development of enhancements and new applications primarily using Microsoft SQL Server and various latest generation front-end technologies
As the successful candidate, you will be part of the Singapore Finance team as opposed to the Standard Chartered Technology function and you will have direct involvement with the business on a daily basis working in an agile fashion to progress solutions quickly from idea to prototype to delivery. It will require you to handle multiple support tasks as well as tactical project analysis and development.
Business
Work closely with the finance teams to drive process digitisation to deliver efficiency and enable new capabilities for MI and Insights to propel the function towards its strategic objectives.
Processes & Responsibilities
Manage DevOps related responsibilities to ensure the Finance servers continue to perform at peak capacity and availability
Full Stack Development responsibilities to build and maintain end to end applications to digitize finance processes across a multitude of Finance functions (e.g. Tax, Performance Management, Controls, Balance Sheet Management etc.)
Risk Management & Governance
Ensure adherence to all internal technology policies and regulations and establish a robust governance process covering the RAD solutions developed.
Continually enhance the control environment to maintain robust processes around security, data reconciliation, data quality and audit trails ensuring complete and accurate reporting across designed processes.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the SG Finance RAD team to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CFO Singapore and the Head of all the Finance functions reporting into the CFO
Other Responsibilities
Working with onshore/offshore teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Over 6 years of proven technical background with development and design experience in front-end and server-side
Strong in RESTful APIs, ASP.Net MVC, .Net Core/C#
Strong in SQL Server, SSRS/SSAS
Experience with Microsoft VBA stack of automation (Excel/Access) and knowledge in powerBI is advantageous
Strong in modern UI technologies - Javascript, VueJS Framework, NodeJS, HTML5, CSS
Experience with DevOps CI/CD tools and processes (Bitbucket/Git, Jenkins, Sourcetree) and Agile methodologies
Basic knowledge of UI/UX and prototype designing, testing frameworks (Junit)
Exposure to Selenium (or similar tool) for UI automation and testing
Understanding and some working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous
Provide solid and reliable documentation on work items such as code, concepts, logic and user documentation
Must have following soft skills:
Understand and deal well with rapid development cycles, remain flexible and calm in the face of ambiguity, drive clarity
Well spoken and Emotionally intelligent whilst working and collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals having diverse work cultures and skill sets
Good communication skills and ability to articulate technical details and challenges to business users
Team player who is self driven and proactive in learning new technologies and skills
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Java Full Stack Developer, - Associate #Seekbetter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including: 
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
2 or more years of experience with full stack Java application development and distribution, including frameworks like Spring, JPA, Java 11 features, REST services
Experience with SQL based databases like MySql/Oracle
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Exposure to Cloud based application development platform such as Cloud Foundry/AWS or container based such as Kubernetes
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Additional Preferred Skills: 
Understanding and knowledge of Data Engineering/Analytics and Machine Learning
Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Jest"
"Lead, Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF. #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
"*Lead Java Developer, - 22440742. #WorkNow","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Application Development - Sr Manager (VP). #Urgent',"Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects in accordance to the architectural guidelines
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Lead, track and drive the progress of the project deliverables (requirements, development, testing, operational readiness, data readiness etc.) to ensure timely delivery
Support as SME for Design, code, test, document and implement application release projects as part of development team.
Partner with various teams – Investment Finance, Risk, Operations and Technology teams for solution planning and integration
Proactively notify program manager for risks, bottlenecks, problems, issues, and concerns. Identify and manage project dependencies and critical path
Compliance with Citi's System Development Lifecycle and Information Security requirements
Manage offshore development team through effective virtual management experience.
Provide leadership and guidance to team members. Promotes teamwork and builds strong relationships within and across global teams
Ability to push an agenda in a matrix environment through influencing and collaboration
Deliver effective communication and report on initiatives to various levels including senior leadership.
Flexibility to handle multiple complex projects and changing priorities
Promotes continuous process improvement especially in code quality, testability & reliability
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Software development and minimum 5 years of experience in leading globally distributed development teams successfully
Experience in developing large scale applications involving technologies such as – Java, Angular, Oracle DB, JMS/MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue, App Server like WAS, Weblogic and Tomcat.
Experience in developing application with cloud architecture – using Java, Spring Boot, APIs, Distributed Cache, Messaging architectures, micro-services is preferred.
Strong knowledge on Agile, SDLC process, UAT and Business Analysis process.
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Domain knowledge in Credit Risk Lending, Wealth management area will be advantageous
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills and project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Strong analytical, algorithmic, and problem-solving skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Backend Software Engineer (Node.JS / PHP),"Roles & Responsibilities
We are Monstarlab! We have 25 global offices with a talent pool of 1200+ Monstars!
You may think of us as a Startup Incubator & Accelerator for Enterprise. We help Large corporations & businesses to transform digitally by creating New Innovative Products from scratch. We take them through a similar journey that a typical startup takes:
Step 1: Find a Problem/Opportunity
Step 2: Ideate a Feasible Solution
Step 3: Test the Solution
Step 4: Build the first MVP
Step 5: Get Product Market Fit
Step 6: Keep Testing, Keep Building, Keep Iterating
Step 7: Rinse & Repeat
Through this experience, you will learn the entire product development life cycle. This is the reason many developers see Monstar Lab as a good training ground. Many ex-employees are now working with big tech giants or doing their own startups. If you want to learn and grow, this is the greatest opportunity.
We are encouraging developers to learn multiple programming languages. If you are keen on trying new languages, we support your study and we can provide the opportunity to try it for the production level product.
Our Singapore office is looking for an experienced dynamic and energetic Backend Software Engineer (Node.JS/ PHP).
Responsibilities
Develop and maintain highly reliable, efficient, secure, and scalable web applications / API.
Assist with various stages of the Web application/API development lifecycle such as requirements gathering, user interface design and usability testing.
Ability to both collaborate effectively with your team and solve problems proactively.
Facilitate the detection, troubleshooting and resolution of pre and post production issues.
Keep abreast of the latest in web/api technology and conduct research and prototyping using such technologies.
Create and execute unit tests on your code, to ensure its robustness, including edge cases, usability, and general reliability
Requirements
Possess a degree in Computer Science or related fields
At least 4 years of hands-on experience developing web applications or API using Node.JS & ExpressJS/ Laravel & PHP.
Must be a strong coder, with a good understanding of data structure and algorithm.
Knowledge of testing frameworks and benchmarking/optimization methods.
Experience in working with small to medium development teams using Agile methodologies.
Experience working with microservices architectures
Experience deploying and architecting websites on AWS
Understanding of Serverless Architecture
Experience as Full Stack Developer and possess knowledge in Cloud Services (e.g. AWS, Azure or GCP) and in setting up CICD & DevOPS is preferred.
Has a passion for programming
What we provide
Opportunity to build and grow a product from scratch (B2C, B2B. B2B2C)
Great benefits and a balanced lifestyle (We currently work remotely).
Great company culture"
FullStack Developer- Wealth Management- Associate #Seekbetter #JobsThatMatter',"The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering
Minimum 3 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
"Cyber Security Analytics Content Developer, - VP (Hybrid) #Immediate#' | #Seekbetter","Responsibilities:
Identify opportunities to automate and standardize information security controls and for the supported groups
Resolve any vulnerabilities or issues detected in an application or infrastructure
Analyze source code to mitigate identified weaknesses and vulnerabilities within the system
Review and validate automated testing results and prioritize actions that resolve issues based on overall risk
Scan and analyze applications with automated tools, and perform manual testing if necessary
Reduce risk by analyzing the root cause of issues, their impact, and required corrective actions
Direct the development and delivery of secure solutions by coordinating with business and technical contacts
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience
Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Office tools and software
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Proven influencing and relationship management skills
Proven analytical skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate - #Seekbetterrknow'","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst#WorkNow #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
#Program Trading Senior Developer |Citibank --#JobsThatMatter #Worknow#,"The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with Program Trading Technology Team on application development/enhancements
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Core Java, Unix/scripting
Preferably knowledge of FIX protocol
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Senior Software Engineer, - nexus.* - #Immediate #Worknow","What you will be doing:
In this role, you will be creating green field Banking as a Service platform from ground up. Your day to day will involve leading multi-shore engineering team and working closely with product owners to deliver features incrementally including:
aligning on the centralized design standards, frameworks & tools to accelerate deliverables
Design, Develop, test, deploy and run on Kubernetes
Work with Java to create the platform on cloud native stack.
Simplify the business requirements and propose clean design with help of UML.
Mentor and coach junior developers
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Good design for given business domain and occasional implementation of POCs
Provide unit testing and load testing
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
What you need to be successful in this role:
“Write code for others, not for yourself” – your code will be visible to thousands of developers
Hands-on on Java Spring boot, microservices, REST, GRPC APIs
Ability to mentor, coach and communication clearly on deliverables and trouble shooting.
8+ years Java server-side development experience with decent understanding of core design patterns.
knowledge of GIT, branching strategies, build and deployment pipelines
Experience with SQL and NoSQL databases
Knowledge of software best practices, like Continuous Integration (CI) & Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Hands-on on consuming and providing REST APIs
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
We are also looking for:
Experience with microservices, Container Orchestration and Containerisation technologies
Experience of dealing with scalability & performance issues on a distributed system
Experience of GO, SCALA & SPARK is a plus
Knowledge of CASSANDRA, KAFKA is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP/terraform)
Retail banking experience is a plus"
Software / Firmware Engineer,"Roles & Responsibilities
Responsibilities:
Factory Automation system (both software and hardware) implementations for the high-tech manufacturing industry including semiconductor, automotive and precision engineering
Understand project life cycle of Requirement Study, Design and Development and System Implementation
Provide consultancy on system diagnosis, troubleshooting and professional advices
Design and Develop automation programs for end-users according to system design and specifications
Senior Engineer will lead the integration team
Required Skills:
Computer programming by using C++, .NET C#, or Visual Basic
Database: Oracle, MySQL, MS SQL or MS Access
SECS/GEM communication protocol, experience to perform equipment characterization will be an added advantage
Web Application programming by using React, Javascript, JSP, Servlets, Java (J2SE, J2EE), PHP/Perl, HTML, XML or AJAX will be added advantage
Knowledge and experience in machine learning and artificial intelligence (AI), as well as predictive maintenance analytic will be an advantage.
Requirements:
Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma and/or Professional Degree in either Computer Science/Information Technology, Electronics Engineering or equivalent
Minimum 1 – 3 years of experience in IT/Computer Software Engineering or equivalent, and domain knowledge in Semiconductor manufacturing sectors are preferred
Entry level applicants are encouraged to apply.
Good verbal and written communication skills with positive attitude and patience
Designation will commensurate with relevant experiences"
Technical Design / Delivery Lead - (2100011857)'. #Urgent,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
AIOps Algorithm Engr. - Applications Performance Management #JobsThatMatter #Urgent*##Worknow,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The APM (application performance management) team is responsible for optimizing user experience for our products. In order to provide the best user experience, we build large-scale platforms to analyze, monitor the user experience and solve the user experience problems of our products. The system handles more than 900 billion records per day and process 20 million QPS at the peak period. Joining our team, you will have the chance to handle very challenging technical problems with very structured training plan, moreover we offer the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We embrace a culture of diversity and we have global offices around the world. We are looking for candidates to join our team who will:
Responsibilities:
Build intelligent AIOps platforms by applying Machine Learning technology
Explore, understand, and apply most recent AIOps related algorithms, including time series anomaly detection, log analysis, data mining, root cause analysis, alarm correlation and aggregation etc.
Build data platform on observational data to manage ML models and ML training data sets
Build auto remediation platform to automate fault detection and self-remediation, reduce MTTR and human effort.
Qualifications
Solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in algorithms, data structures, design patterns, and software design principles.
Proficiency in at least one server-side programming language such as Golang, Java, Python
Experience with distributed version control (e.g. Gitlab or GitHub).
Deep knowledge in: Application of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence in IT operations.
Software engineering principles (preferably Agile/Scrum) and their application to the creation of self-healing infrastructure and applications.
Cloud infrastructure operations and automation technologies.
Preferred Qualifications:
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g., R, Python and Data Science notebooks (e.g., Jupyter).
Experience with open source Machine Learning Platforms and Toolkits
Experience in APM or AIOps area
Micro-service experience with golang/python"
"Technical Lead, - (2200017771). #Urgent #WorkNow'.","The Role Responsibilities
Focus on developing and delivering the technology roadmap for product
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive the technology strategy implementation within the team on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Stakeholders
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks and obsolescence so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Our Ideal Candidate
13 Years of experience in application development using Java and Advance Technologies tool.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles and coding standards.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology, plus adherence to VX principles
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Able to identify and drive compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Good experience in setting up and managing the delivery team in various location
Very good presentation and documentation skills.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, that also includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching etc.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Understanding of deploying microservices/API, cloud solutions and experience in integrating public cloud into traditional hosting/delivery models with a specific focus on AWS
Understanding and experience on core Java (Java 8 or higher), core Spring frameworks and experience in using design patterns
Understanding and experience on React, Redux, JavaScript MVC patterns / frameworks and CSS strategies
Understanding and experience on developing cloud native microservices using frameworks such as Spring boot, Spring cloud
Understanding and experience in working on Relation and non-Relation DBs (Progress, Oracle, Cassandra, MongoDB)
Understanding and knowledge on Implementing automated testing platforms, unit tests, and CICD
Understanding and knowledge on code versioning tools, such as Git, Bitbucket
Understanding of container platform, such as Docker and Kubernetes, in particular similar offerings by cloud providers such as AWS
Familiar and working experience with Ansible, Jenkins, Terraform
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential."
Lead Backend Engineer,"Ailytics is a leading video analytics solution provider that helps enterprises create a safe and productive workspace to minimize risk and improve productivity across all of their facility footprints.
We believe that workplace safety is non-negotiable, and productivity is uncompromisable, both of which can be easily improved by the adoption of the right technology.
Using the latest breakthroughs in AI, we empower the workplace to have 24/7 monitoring of their operations, receive real-time violation notifications and optimize their operational bottlenecks, resulting in up to 25% improvement in operational efficiency.
We are seeking to expand our team in Singapore and looking for someone with an entrepreneurial spirit to take a key position in leading the team in developing and deploying cutting-edge scalable backend solutions that help solve some of our customers’ toughest business challenges.
Responsibilities
Take ownership of the features: Analyze, design, and deploy high-quality maintainable and scalable software based on business need. As one of our founding employees, you will get the chance to take complete end-to-end ownership of projects and have creative control over the direction to take.
Develop and deploy highly scalable and available backend solutions on cloud infrastructure, using advanced DevOps and automation tools.
Collaborate very closely with, and incorporate feedback from engineering, operations and business teams to develop solutions as per the product roadmap, in collaboration with the subject matter experts, to ensure maximal efficiency of the solution.
Technical Abilities
Bachelors, Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or related fields, or equivalent experience.
Minimum 3+ years of working experience in best practice for the entire SDLC.
Evidence of exposure to architectural patterns of high-scale web applications on cloud. (e.g. well-designed APIs, high volume data pipelines, service-meshes, message queues, distributed caching, efficient algorithms).
Familiar with container-based applications and orchestration tools (Docker and Kubernetes) for coding and debugging.
Experience with writing unit & integration tests, monitoring code coverage etc.
Experience delivering a high-quality product as an individual (or open-source) contributor as part of a high-performing team in a fast-paced, continuously changing environment.
DevOps mindset for monitoring and deploying code with versioning tools and CI/CD.
Ability to drive projects and work both independently and in a team.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with “can do” attitude seeking to make a difference. Must be willing to work with an internationally distributed team.
Tech Stack
Python, ReactJS, Typescript for programming languages.
Experience working with web frameworks (Django, Flask)
Databases (PostgreSQL for RDBMS, MongoDB for NoSQL)
Docker, Kubernetes for orchestration tools.
Amazon Web Services (AWS) for cloud services, with experience working with S3, EKS, IAM etc.
Experience with message queuing (Kafka or RabbitMQ)
Git for version control.
Preferred
Background in the construction domain
Knowledge of BIM related software
Fluent in 1 other language apart from English
What we offer
Experience working in a fast-paced start-up, with a team of people who are passionate about AI and IoT, using the latest technologies.
Flexibility on work location, hours, and time off.
Employee stock options.
Play a key role in the day-to-day efficiency of our operations and overall growth of the company from day one itself!"
Software Engineer - (PSET-CPD-IDL) #WorkNow #UrgentHire #Worknow,"Position Overview 
An exciting career opportunity in the Identity and Entitlements Engineering team, in Autodesk Singapore that is critical to the Subscription business model transformation.
As a Software Engineer, you will design, develop and deliver business model workflows which aligned with the business goals and strategy. You will work with developers, architects, product owners and operations to collaboratively deliver various team requirements and goals to advance the platform for subscriptions and entitlements. You will proactively work to evaluate and adopt technology solutions that help with improving the quality of the platform as well as productivity of the team.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, test, debug, and document new and existing components to ensure that software meets business, quality and operational needs
Work on the development of business requirements closely with product owners and other stakeholders
Ensure that high quality code is delivered by following best practices like peer code reviews, code standards, unit testing and test-driven development
Drive and participate in code and document reviews, and share best practices
Work with business and technical product owners to interpret and translate business needs to technical requirements
Evaluate and recommend tools, technologies and processes to ensure the highest quality and performance is achieved
Monitor and troubleshoot code level problems quickly and efficiently
Apply technical expertise to resolve challenging programming and design problems
Focus on scalability, security and availability of all applications and processes
Contribute to technical road map and technical debt elimination, balancing time, resource, and quality constraints to achieve business and strategic goals and requirements
Minimum Qualifications 
Bachelor’s / Master’s Degree (in Computer Science or other engineering discipline.) or equivalent work experience 
Entry Level or with 1+ years hands-on experience developing scalable, distributed applications in the cloud
Experience with XML/JSON, designing and building REST/SOAP based web services
Excellent Programming skills in one of the programming paradigms… Object oriented or Functional programming.
Experience with building cloud-based API platforms or backend systems in a Unix environment
Possess good analytical skills with problem-solving abilities
Detail-oriented with respect to documentation and communication
Experience with AWS or other cloud-based service providers
Preferred Skills
Entry level with a hunger for technologies
Experience in Cloud service is a plus
Experience working with large scale distributed systems is a plus+
Hands on Experience with Docker based application development.
The Ideal Candidate
Passion for developing robust software and writing maintainable code 
Pragmatic and results oriented & ability to learn large software systems quickly 
Flexibility under changing conditions and ability to multi-task between projects, able to work well in a team to deliver on team goals 
Good verbal and written communication skills in English language 
Willingness to take initiative and committed to deliver on time 
Keen interest in new technologies
Ability to work inclusively and people with diverse background 
Ability to work with remote and international team members
About Autodesk
With Autodesk software, you have the power to Make Anything. The future of making is here, bringing with it radical changes in the way things are designed, made, and used. It’s disrupting every industry: architecture, engineering, construction, manufacturing, and media and entertainment. With the right knowledge and tools, this disruption is your opportunity.
Our software is used by everyone - from design professionals, engineers, and architects to digital artists, students, and hobbyists. We constantly explore new ways to integrate all dimensions of diversity across our employees, customers, partners, and communities. Our ultimate goal is to expand opportunities for anyone to imagine, design, and make a better world."
"Software Engineer, (R&D System) - Cloud Infrastructure* #UrgentHire","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The R&D system team is responsible for the engineering efficiency of TikTok and its affiliates, and is committed to building an advanced and standardized R&D infrastructure, accelerating R&D efficiency and improving the quality of our engineer team. Our products include R&D collaboration platform, continuous integration/continuous release system, Cloud IDE, etc.
Responsibilities
Build advanced and standardized R&D tools and platforms to accelerate R&D efficiency, improving the efficiency and quality of our engineer team;
Be responsible for high-quality design, coding, and tackling highly challenging and technical problems;
Cooperate with product manager, participate in product requirement discussion, function definition, etc.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above in computer science, software engineering, or a related field (or equivalent practical experience);
Good taste and passion for coding, and the ability to design and write high-quality codes;
Proficiency with development technologies such as Go/Python, protocol, architecture, storage, cache, etc., and familiarity with web security;
Have good product awareness, and use product effects as the most important driving factor;
Experience in code management, CI/CD, DevOps, and other related fields is preferred.
Preferred Qualifications
At least 3 years of relevant experience."
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997) *. #WorkNow,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
"Backend Tech Lead, TikTok Live (Fund Safety) #Urgent*#UrgentHire","Responsibilities
Key Responsibilities:
Set up a new engineering team from scratch and support it on career development.
Provide technical support for engineers in team.
Align with product and org objectives, coordinate with cross functional teams on delivering key results.
Define long term technical roadmap for team.
Contribute to technical decisions on projects among the product.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
5+ years experience developing highly scalable backend services and systems using at least one of Java/Golang/Python/Scala/C++.
2+ years on managing or tech-leading a software engineer team.
Strong software programming capabilities, exhibits good code design and coding style.
Deep understanding of data structure, algorithm design and analysis, networking, data security and highly scalable systems design.
In depth knowledge of common databases and messaging frameworks like MySQL/Redis/Kafka etc.
Experience in payment or transaction systems is a plus
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Ability to lead independent research to solve complex technical problems.
Empathetic and results oriented leader and mentor.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment.
Professional level proficiency in written and spoken English."
"Full Stack Developer, VP-Infrastructure Development--#JobsThatMatter #Worknow #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a Full stack Development professional, your knowledge in system design, application development, and testing will help your team deliver high-quality products in Data Domain.
As a member of our Infrastructure Development team, you'll dive right into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to developing and deploying large-scale infrastructure solutions that support JPMorgan Chase & Co.’s diverse and critical businesses. You'll be using the latest technologies, data management, and security practices in all aspect of software development. Critical thinking, clear communication, and collaboration are key to successful product delivery.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information technology, or related field
Provide technical expertise in Java, Springbok throughout the software lifecycle including design, implementation and delivery.
Exposure to Software development experience in one or more general purpose programming languages: Java, Spring Boot & Angular UI/UX.
Must have 10 years' experience as strong Java, Spring & UI/UX developer with very good understanding of framework architecture and Best Practices.
Good knowledge on Data products, Data pipelines, Data Engineering – Kafka would be required.
Working experience in framework technologies: REST Standards, JavaScript Frameworks, ES6 Standards.
Experience working with two or more from the following: database, Unix/Linux environments, distributed and parallel systems, information retrieval, networking, large scale software development, security software development
Understanding or have experience with agile and lean philosophies
Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills with clear communication
Ability to collaborate with different roles to achieve common goals
Development practices such test driven development. Well versed with API Swagger
Complete understanding of Source code branching with Bit Bucket, CI/CD Release Pipeline with Jenkins & Deployment tool."
"Software Engineer - Currencies and Emerging Markets, Associate [210132839] #Worknow #Urgent#Seekbetter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Athena is J.P. Morgan's cross-market risk management and trading system that provides functionality for traders, salespeople, operations and product control staff globally. It is used in our foreign exchange, fixed income, credit and commodities businesses. Athena includes a globally replicated object-oriented database, a powerful dependency graph and a fully integrated stack across pricing, risk and trading tools. The code is a combination of Python and C++: C++ for speed, and Python for flexibility and rapid but controlled releases. Athena is designed to provide a continuous deployment environment, and pull developers close to the business to help increase revenues, while improving operational processes and controls to reduce costs.
The Currencies and Emerging Markets (CEM) Athena team delivers business critical trade capture, risk management, transaction processing and trader tools to the CEM business globally.
The CEM Athena roles require technically strong and disciplined python developers. A record of delivering high quality, well-tested solutions in a mature controlled environment is a prerequisite. The roles require an ability to attain clear understanding of Athena environment and of the unique design considerations that come into play in a diverse and highly interdependent systems environment. A high level of interaction with the business is required as the applications involved are revenue generating and directly used by the businesses globally.
This is a unique opportunity for delivery-minded individuals to take ownership of the full software development lifecycle, partnering with the CEM business to understand and improve business workflows. The successful candidate will be empowered to build relationships with the Singapore front-office and quantitative research teams in order to deliver local requirements, provide business face-off and technical support, enhancements and fixes to the local users, as well as to own the delivery of Asia Pacific requirements on large-scale, global re-engineering initiatives
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree with at least 4 years of software engineering experience in Financial Services sector
Proficiency in Python programming language
Experience in developing and supporting complex systems used for intraday risk management
Deep understanding of risk management concepts and product knowledge in the Fixed Income space
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability.
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base.
Ability to manage multiple tasks concurrently in an efficient and effective manner with minimal supervision.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to present complex issues to non-technical users and to influence change.
Good problem solving skills with an ability to find creative, out of the box solutions to complex problems.
Good understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment and beyond.
Focus on testing through the entire development cycle to produce reliable and maintainable software"
"Deputy/Assistant Director, Automation Engineering #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter","The successful applicant will be part of the team in IT Operation Division and is expected to perform the following roles:
Automate the IT Operations processes and reduce manual toil.
Strong knowledge of solution architectures and integration patterns. Experience in integrating multiple disparate infrastructure and application systems in a robust and scalable manner.
Ability to develop solutions to solve complex business problems.
Strong proficiency in at least one or more languages such as C/C++, C#, Python.
Strong proficient in front-end frameworks such as React.js, Javascript.
Strong knowledge in Database & SQL.
Experience with Agile methodologies and using tools such as JIRA.
Experience in automated testing methodologies and tools, e.g. unit testing, integration testing, end-to-end testing, Selenium.
You will be working in a fast-paced environment that would require the ability to manage multiple priorities and needs of stakeholders, as well as the agility to respond to changes and developments.
Job Requirements:
Experience with implementing and maintaining end-to-end DevSecOps platforms.
Good knowledge of analytics tools such as ELK stack and Grafana.
Good knowledge of infrastructure products such as VMware, ELK stack, Ansible, Docker, CyberArk.
Deep technical skill in infrastructure, software architecture and cloud Security.
Able to assess new cloud Security needs and control framework for cloud onboarding.
Certification / qualification from relevant Cloud/Security Service Providers will be an advantage.
Good understanding of Service/Security /compliance Management process including change, incident, problem on cloud platform
Knowledge of government policies and architectures (e.g., IM8, AIAS) will be an advantage.
Good communication and writing skills.
Good ability to engage various stakeholders.
Able to manage a team of developers and engineers to deliver business outcomes.
As part of the shortlisting process for this role, you may be required to complete a medical declaration and/or undergo further assessment.
All applicants will be notified on whether they are shortlisted or not within 4 weeks of the closing date of this job posting."
"Lead, - Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF - (2200018251)'. #Urgent","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
Assistant Lead (Digital Solutions),"Job Description
The Business Solutions Team interfaces with business users/departments for the purpose of IT specific business initiatives.
Serves as subject matter expert for Financial and Distribution functions.
Provide operational support to users in query and assist to resolve issues encountered in use of application.
Works closely with business users in gathering and analyzing business requirements.
Responsible to define optimal and scalable solution designs.
Responsible for the configuration of applications to meet business requirements, and the maintenance and support of applications.
Documentation of functional requirements, design specifications, system configurations, customizations and interfaces
Responsible for producing test scripts and coordinate and support testing activities
Manage and Conduct User Acceptance test for enhancements
Provide training to users on application usage and Use of new functionalities
Job Requirements
Degree in IT, Engineering, Computer Science or related
At least 8 years of practical functional experience in supporting and implementation
Good ability to understand business requirements and able to translate into optimal solutions
Have taken charge of implementation for at least one module
Strong communication, analytical and interpersonal skills"
Technology Analyst.,"Responsibilities
The IT Business Senior Analyst is an intermediate-level position responsible for liaising between business users and technologists to exchange information in a concise, logical and understandable way in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to continuous iterative exploration and investigation of business performance and other measures to gain insight and drive business planning.
Responsibilities:
Formulate and define systems scope and objectives for complex projects and foster communication between business leaders and IT
Consult with users and clients to solve complex system issues/problems through in-depth evaluation of business processes, systems and industry standards and recommends solutions
Support system change processes from requirements through implementation and provide input based on analysis of information
Consult with business clients to determine system functional specifications and provides user and operational support
Identify and communicate risks and impacts, considering business implications of the application of technology to the current business environment
Act as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts and work as a team to achieve business objectives, performing other duties and functions as assigned
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in data analysis with intermediate/advanced Microsoft Office Suite skills
Proven interpersonal, data analysis, diplomatic, management and prioritization skills
Consistently demonstrate clear and concise written and verbal communication
Proven ability to manage multiple activities and build/develop working relationships
Proven self-motivation to take initiative and master new tasks quickly
Demonstrated ability to work under pressure to meet tight deadlines and approach work methodically with attention to detail
Education:
Bachelor's degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742 #Immediate#',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
"*Lead Java Developer, - 22440742. #Seekbetter","Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
ReactJS Developer (J39761),"Permanent Career Opportunity to work with a well established software company:
Basic up to $6,000 + AWS + VB
Permanent position with great working environment
Focus on front end development by using React.js
React.js Developer
Working hours: Monday to Friday 10 am to 7 pm
Working Location: Tanjong Pagar
Responsibilities:
Involve in full SDLC of web application development process
Responsible in deployment of the application & maintenance support
Collaborate with business analysts and software architects to plan, design, develop, test, and maintain the APP
Analyze and resolve technical and application problems
Requirements:
Min Diploma / Degree in Computer Science or relevant courses.
Min 3years experiences in React.js
If you are excited with this opportunity and enjoy making things happen, do apply now!
OR
Email your updated resume to: speytu(at)scientecpersonnel.com by quoting ""J39761"" in your email subject for faster processing.
By submitting any application or resume to us, you will be deemed to have agreed & consented to us collecting, using, retaining & disclosing your personal information to prospective employers for their consideration. Please refer to ScienTec’s Privacy Policy https://www.scientecconsulting.com/privacy-policy for full details. If you wish to withdraw your consent, please write to us at dpo(at)scientecconsulting.com.
(Note: Any resumes of job applications sent to this mailbox will not be attended as it is solely for the purpose of personal data protection related matters.)
Elane Yap Theng Yu- R1989397
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd - 11C5781"
Software Engineering - Singapore #JPM #UrgentHire #Immediate #UrgentHire,"Role description
The Wealth Management business has been on a transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a best in class experience. The Active advisory Technology team is partnering with our business in building and rolling out world-class solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner to build cutting edge technology solutions
The Active advisory team in APAC is specifically seeking a senior Web/Application Technology Lead to join us on this journey. As a Technology lead, you will be responsible for driving and managing the technical delivery of key projects that are owned and driven by APAC, but delivering for the business globally. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners globally, as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. As a technical lead, the role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building Web applications for desktop and/or native mobile platforms. Ability to manage and steer a team of developers towards successful deliveries is a must. Also, if you have a passion for cutting edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
Responsibilities
Work with business and technology product owner on Product backlog prioritization
Work with business and technology product owner to drive program roadmap
Own overall application technical architecture and design
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services and DB
Manage and oversee the contributions of team members
Face off to and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including front-office business, product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Active involvement in supporting the platform across all environments, including production in a Devops model
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
Bachelor's degree or above
10 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
3 or more years of experience in managing team
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Strong leadership skills
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
API Tech Lead Analyst# #WorkNow #Urgent.,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
"Active Advisory Full stack Developer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #JPM #Immediate #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire#JobsThatMatter'","The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment — one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have:
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace"
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742 #UrgentHire #Urgent.,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
AIOps Algorithm Engr. - Applications Performance Management #JobsThatMatter * #Worknow,"Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The APM (application performance management) team is responsible for optimizing user experience for our products. In order to provide the best user experience, we build large-scale platforms to analyze, monitor the user experience and solve the user experience problems of our products. The system handles more than 900 billion records per day and process 20 million QPS at the peak period. Joining our team, you will have the chance to handle very challenging technical problems with very structured training plan, moreover we offer the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We embrace a culture of diversity and we have global offices around the world. We are looking for candidates to join our team who will:
Responsibilities:
Build intelligent AIOps platforms by applying Machine Learning technology
Explore, understand, and apply most recent AIOps related algorithms, including time series anomaly detection, log analysis, data mining, root cause analysis, alarm correlation and aggregation etc.
Build data platform on observational data to manage ML models and ML training data sets
Build auto remediation platform to automate fault detection and self-remediation, reduce MTTR and human effort.
Qualifications
Solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in algorithms, data structures, design patterns, and software design principles.
Proficiency in at least one server-side programming language such as Golang, Java, Python
Experience with distributed version control (e.g. Gitlab or GitHub).
Deep knowledge in: Application of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence in IT operations.
Software engineering principles (preferably Agile/Scrum) and their application to the creation of self-healing infrastructure and applications.
Cloud infrastructure operations and automation technologies.
Preferred Qualifications:
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g., R, Python and Data Science notebooks (e.g., Jupyter).
Experience with open source Machine Learning Platforms and Toolkits
Experience in APM or AIOps area
Micro-service experience with golang/python"
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547].*.","The Role Responsibilities
 Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
Delta 1 Index and ETF Trading Senior Application Developer #Immediate #Worknow,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Role / Position Overview
This role is a Senior developer within the Equity ETF Market making team in Singapore to work closely with Delta 1 Index and ETF trading desks in APAC region. The person will be working on Market making and Index algorithmic trading strategies development, pre and post analysis of trades done by strategies, contribute to the enhancement of the core framework used for building the trading algorithms. The development effort will focus on enhancing and building new functionality in newly developed application built in Java Chronicles.
Key Responsibilities:
Design, Develop and test functionality built on ETF market making platform.
Liaise with regional and global technology teams to ensure the project needs are addressed.
Discuss requirements, facilitate User Acceptance Testing with Business.
Participate in design discussions, present ideas to improve development processes.
Provide 2nd line support in business hours (and occasionally out of hours)
Development Value:
Exposure to high frequency market making technology.
Participation in latest technology & functional enhancements within the team.
Exposure to Equity business.
Skills/Experience:
7-10 years working in Core Java
Excellent knowledge of Java with strong OOP and OOAD skills
Multi-Threading/Asynchronous Techniques
Experience in developing Real Time distributed applications.
Good data structure and architectural design skills
Good knowledge of design patterns
Strong written and oral communication skills
Excellent problem solving skills
Ability to work with globally distributed teams
Experience in Front Office trading applications: Cash/ ETF/Equity Options market making.
Experience in KDB/Python/C#/Linux/Oracle would be a plus
Excellent oral and written communication skills in English
Competencies:
Good written and oral communication skills
Ability to work individually and in regional/global team-based environment.
Pro-active and dynamic individual who is able to perform under pressure in a front-office trading environment
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer science or related fields.
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
RPA Developer,"(1)   RESPONSIBILITIES:
Location will be in a customer site (Pasir Panjang)
Responsible for developing and maintaining Robotic Process Automation (RPA) scripts.
Responsible for all aspects of RPA including, discovery, solution design/scope, development, testing, implementation and monitoring in production/support.
Responsible for monitoring RPA scripts, improving performance of such scripts through programming changes or configuration. Also ensure business operations remain smooth and documents processes.
Provide technical support, maintenance, application configuration as a result in change of workflow related to the RPA process, quality improvement, user support, and implementation.
Work with development team and business support team for operation and implementation.
(2)   REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or Engineering related field
At least 3~5 years of RPA bot development with any of leading Automation Tool such us UiPath, AA, Blueprism
At least 3 years of hands-on experience using Scripting Tools Python, VBscript/Macro and JavaScript
At least 3 year of experience in Project Development and operation support
Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Word and Power point.
Excellent understanding of IT solution design, development methodologies, good to have programming languages like Java/C#, MY SQL.
Strong analytics skills to understand the business process, troubleshooting, log analysis.  
Strong verbal and written communication skills; Able to liaise with different team
Good time management and ability to prioritize tasks and work within deadlines
Able to work independently with minimum supervision"
Software Engineer (Enterprise) Data Platform - #UrgentHire #WorkNow* #JobsThatMatter,"Responsibilities
About TikTok
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.
About the team
TikTok and affiliate are developing the next-generation high-performance analytical database, with a mission to enable efficient and real-time data-driven decision-making on PB-level data sets. The initial product was forked from Clickhouse, after which large re-architecture had been taken place. The product now not only improves the efficiency of Clickhouse but also fits into the elastic cloud-native infrastructure with better scalability and resource utilization. With years of polishment in the internal EB-level scenarios, we are now ready to serve our business partners via various cloud vendors.
The product will:
Enable users to manage large scale data assets in the underlying data engine securely and effortlessly
Improve the overall system observability, helping our users gain more transparency in the healthiness, resource utilization of the system
What you will be doing:
Be responsible for the building core functionalities around ByteHouse, especially focusing on the enterprise-level features.
Drive technical design, implementation, and delivery of robust system administration services, including health metrics, resource management auditing, etc.
Continuously work with the product team to drive the shape of the product
Apply industrial best practices in microservice architecture and governance
Ensures service quality through the whole software development lifecycle
Qualifications
What you should have:
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science is required, Postgrads degree in computer science is preferred
At least 2 years of backend experience. Experience with enterprise software solutions is a plus
Good programming experience with at least one of the following languages: Go, Java, or C#.
Hands-on experiences in building and maintaining mission-critical, large-scale backend systems
Good knowledge of server-side technologies, such as MQ, Cache, Config server, Connection Pool, DB sharding, etc
Strong knowledge of containerization technologies, including Docker, Kubernetes.
Expertise in automation tools like Ansible, Bash Scripting, etc. is a plus
Familiar with Unix/Linux operating systems
Hands-on experiences on any big data system like Flink, Spark, Impala, Presto, Clickhouse, Hudi, etc. is a plus
Knowledge of RESTful or RPC-based microservices architecture"
"Principal Software Engineer, Web SDK #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #UrgentHire","Position Overview
Autodesk is looking for a Principal Software Engineer to join a data team within Data Platform & Services (DPS). You will be working with Autodesk Data Platform Product Analytics (ADPPA), Product Data Capture team. This is a great opportunity to join a team that delivers both internal and customer facing applications and services that provide the data collection needs of all data scientists, data analysts and data engineers throughout the organization. You will have the opportunity to understand the entire data platform from product instrumentation through to business analytics, machine learning, and data-driven products.
As a Principal Engineer, you will be joining an incredibly talented and seasoned engineering team.
You will have the opportunity to work with many new and exciting technologies and frameworks used in our data platform.
We are looking for people who are as excited about data technology as we are. You can be part of improving quality of our products across all aspects of our core data platform and see your work drive the business.
Responsibilities
Break down a large problem into smaller components and provide a clear solution for each piece
Recommend appropriate technologies to be used to achieve productivity and efficiency
Design and build reusable components, libraries, and tools for web to instrument and ingest product data effectively
Collaborate with Product Manager, Engineering Manager, and other stakeholders to deliver features according to agreed scope and schedule
Collaborate with QA engineers to define software testing strategy
Ensure the quality, performance, and compatibility of the product using test automation
Promote and accelerate the usage and integration of our component by conducting training sessions, providing support, writing clear product documentation, and troubleshooting issues
Provide guides and direction to other engineers on development processes and product architecture
Review source codes contributed by other engineers
Minimum Qualifications
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skill
Extensive knowledge and understanding of JavaScript
Experience in writing JavaScript library modules with cross-browser compatibility
Solid understanding in HTML & CSS
Proficient in writing automated tests with any testing framework
Proficient with distributed version control system (preferably git)
Team player who is willing to help and collaborate well with other team members
Excellent communication skills (written and spoken)
Ability to work with minimal supervision and to guide other team members to achieve goals
Familiar with non-functional testing such as load, performance and resiliency testing
Good command of English (Speaking, Writing and Reading)
Degree in computer science or related field
Preferred Qualifications
Experience writing NodeJs library module
Knowledge in any of other programming language (Java/Ruby/Python)
Experience working with product analytics services (Google Analytics, Amplitude, Mixpanel, etc)
Good understanding of data architecture fundamentals
Proficiency in writing SQL queries
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Software Engineer - (Graph Neural Network System), Cloud Infrastructure #Seekbetter #Urgent #WorkNow","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Cloud Infrastructure team, based in Singapore, supports many of our star products and core business lines, serving hundreds of millions of users every day. We actively embrace open source and innovative software/hardware architecture, building a series of infrastructure to ensure the best R&D practices and enable the overall development of the company.
The Infrastructure NoSQL team faces all mid-platform and business lines in TikTok and its affiliates, operating across tens of thousands of servers and dealing with data far beyond the PB level. We have self-developed distributed kv/caching systems, global distributed tables storage systems and massive graph database products. Combined with the industry's new hardware and software stack technology, we strive for the continuous evolution of the next generation of products.
Joining this team, you can look forward to a very structured training plan, as well as the opportunity to undertake a larger scope whilst giving enough space to grow and develop. We look forward to your application!
Responsibilities
Participate in the design and development of our self-developed distributed Graph Neural Network (GNN) training/inference systems over a large-scale graph dataset;
Serving and applying Graph Embedding/GNN into real-world application scenarios, including but not limited to risk control, etc.
Qualifications
Familiar with C++, Python development in Linux environment, familiar with multi-threading, network programming, cloud native K8S and other technologies;
Familiar with Tensorflow, Pytorch, Ray framework;
Possess good communication skills and ability to work well in a team.
Preferred Qualifications
Familiar with existing industry open source GE/GNN systems (e.g., DGL, PYG, Euler, GraphLearn, BigGraph, etc)."
MS CRM/ Dot Net Developer #WorkNow #UrgentHire #Immediate,"Roles and Responsibilities :
Analyzing business requirements and functional specifications, performing gap analysis between existing and required solution and to develop the solution within the bank’s software development framework and policies.
Work with project manager, Business Analyst and test managers to ensure efficiency of system integration test cycles and propose improvements required if defects are found.
In addition to unit testing code, this includes supporting all testing cycles (System Integration Testing, User Acceptance Testing) ensuring all deliverables are aligned with technology development governance.
Work with Technology Infrastructure and Technology Application teams to ensure through adequate system design and testing that Technology operations risks can be minimized and that application data is appropriately structured, controlled and utilized within the business.
Provide technical support and expertise advice throughout all technical stages of projects, Change Request and third level support.
Requirements :
At least 5 years of experience developing with Microsoft technologies such as .NET, C#, VB.NET SQL, ASP.NET, Web Development (MVC) using IIS.
Experience in implementing MS CRM ( 2015 ) application and familiar with relational database concepts and SQL is a must.
Strong skills in SQL Server 2012 / 2014 , SSIS , SSRS including physical data model design, stored procedures, functions, indexes, performance tuning and understanding execution plans."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13- #Immediate#'UrgentHire,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Senior Software Engineer (RoR),"The Software Engineer will be responsible for designing, developing and implementing software solutions to address complex business issues, and providing technical leadership within the IT department.
Perform design & implementation of software system projects that define the architecture, components, interface & other characteristics of an application.
Design, develop, and deploy reliable enterprise solutions utilizing AWS, RoR, ReactJS and other open source technologies
Take ownership on assigned projects, develop and post production monitoring to ensure the success.
Understand the business, Innovate and lead using the latest technologies to provide the best solutions for business and improve overall company effectiveness
Ensure robustness, security, efficiency and continuous improvement.
Requirements:
Excellent programming skills with at least 5 years of working experience in Ruby on Rails, ReactJS, postgreSQL , HTML, CSS, Javascript, REST, Docker and MYSQL
Knowledge of REACT tools including React.js, Webpack, Enzyme, Redux, and Flux.
API development experience
Git/Gitlab and source control management
Familiarity with testing tools
Experience in Continuous integration tools
Developing and implementing highly responsive user interface components using react concepts
Strong knowledge of best coding practices, centralised repository version contract and deployment procedures
Able to multi-task in a demanding, fast paced environment and work with minimal supervision to meet deadlines
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Good interpersonal skills
Positive attitude and willingness to learn"
Automation and Software Defined Network Engineer/Programmer AVP Hybrid.#Urgent' |#WorkNow,"Responsibilities
Automation and Software Defined Network Engineer/Programmer
This position is responsible to help enhance network operations capability in fault detection, troubleshooting and recovery of network incidents through automation and tools in our rapidly evolving network infrastructure. We are looking for skilled candidate with a passion for networking and aptitude for developing advance scripts and improving existing automation tools to boost the capability of the network operations team in pre-emptive fault findings and early prevention in network outages through automation. Developing best practices/standards and keeping our network automation tools/scripts are up to date. This role is at the forefront of a software-defined revolution that will change the way we build and operate our network services to ensure agility, improved capabilities and better economics. 
Responsibilities:
Write the tooling and generate code to make your own and other people's job easier.
Contribute in projects to improve the network infrastructure and network operations in support of enterprise need
Build APIs to collect and process system, application, network, and OS level events.
Data and System Events analytics; translating the vast network events and data into dynamic dashboards capable of providing useful insights and fault assessment.
Improving efficiency and effectiveness of existing network automation tools.
Bridging the gap between infrastructure network engineer & software defined network engineers.
Educational Qualification:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Engineering or other related fields of study
Experience:
5+ years of experience in software programming.
Dev/Ops Knowledge: can demonstrate knowledge and varying levels of experiences with one or more of the following: Ansible, JSON, YANG and Rest API, Python, Kafka, Grafana, Machine Learning - e.g. Hadoop and clustered big data, Kubernetes, Docker, Data Visualization.
Ability to parse data structures using python
Experience with coding/scripting/automation/orchestration platforms(Python, Ansible), including interfacing with APIs
Experience of managing code with GIT, Bitbucket branches
Experience with Visual Studio Code and integration to tests and git
Experience writing Ansible Playbooks in YAML
Experience of how to use regex within python code
Experience in Network monitoring tools (i.e., NetFlow Tracker, Elastic, and Splunk) is a plus
Experience in Software Defined Network is a plus
Basic level working knowledge of enterprise infrastructure networking.
Large financial institution working experience is a plus. 
Industry certifications includes; CCNA, ITIL, etc is a plus
Others:
IAC principles
Microservices architectures & reasons for developing in such a way
Data protection & classification for storage
Basic ML techniques a bonus
Professional Attributes:
Ability to work with a limited set of requirements. Desire to mentor colleagues, spearhead new architectures, and drive team efforts
Excellent communication and relationship skills, especially the ability to articulate advanced technical topics to both technical and non-technical staff
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills."
Service Delivery Management M/F` #Seekbetter #UrgentHire,"Job description
Our next technology can start with You!
Each of our technologies starts with passion, commitment, and dedication that together are the force behind our world- and life-changing work. We trust in the synergy of our talents to think, create, and develop solutions for the world in which they would like to live.
STMicroelectronics is inviting aspiring individuals to start a rewarding career with us.
In this group, you will be par of the CAM team focusing on the maintenance of legacy
Workstream Open and liaising with fab user communities in order to sustain and
enhance the current data model.
This is a pivotal role allowing you to be at the forefront of the digital transformation in
order to optimize the interaction of our end-users with the digital solutions managing
the semiconductor manufacturing process flow
Main objectives of this activity is to maintain the robustness of the data model, to
secure the processing flow of the wafers and to improve the factory operator
productivity.
You will be also required:
To maintain and enhance robustness and high availability of all solutions
To provide training to end-users for the available features or new solutions
To equip 24x7 helpdesk team with comprehensive materials and knowledge for 1st
level of support
To provide 24x7 level 2 support to ensure timely resolution of issues
Profile
Bachelor's degree in computer science/Computer Engineering /Information Technology
At least 2-3 years working experiences in software development
Experience in Unix, Linux and Windows environment
Experience in web-based applications
Strong in application development with MySQL/Oracle and performance optimization
Strong in PL/SQL, Java, JavaScript, HTML, CSS, web services, C/C++ and perl/shell
or python scripting
Preferable with experience in wafer fab or manufacturing
Ability to adapt quickly to new technology and in-house application"
Senior Software Engineer - nexus- #Immediate.,"What you will be doing:
In this role, you will be creating green field Banking as a Service platform from ground up. Your day to day will involve leading multi-shore engineering team and working closely with product owners to deliver features incrementally including:
aligning on the centralized design standards, frameworks & tools to accelerate deliverables
Design, Develop, test, deploy and run on Kubernetes
Work with Java to create the platform on cloud native stack.
Simplify the business requirements and propose clean design with help of UML.
Mentor and coach junior developers
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Good design for given business domain and occasional implementation of POCs
Provide unit testing and load testing
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
What you need to be successful in this role:
“Write code for others, not for yourself” – your code will be visible to thousands of developers
Hands-on on Java Spring boot, microservices, REST, GRPC APIs
Ability to mentor, coach and communication clearly on deliverables and trouble shooting.
8+ years Java server-side development experience with decent understanding of core design patterns.
knowledge of GIT, branching strategies, build and deployment pipelines
Experience with SQL and NoSQL databases
Knowledge of software best practices, like Continuous Integration (CI) & Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Hands-on on consuming and providing REST APIs
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
We are also looking for:
Experience with microservices, Container Orchestration and Containerisation technologies
Experience of dealing with scalability & performance issues on a distributed system
Experience of GO, SCALA & SPARK is a plus
Knowledge of CASSANDRA, KAFKA is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP/terraform)
Retail banking experience is a plus"
*.Scrum Master.' ** #Immediate' #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Facilitates Agile ceremonies, including Daily Team Stand-up, Sprint Retrospective and Sprint Planning.
Removes obstacles or impediments to the team’s progress, escalates to Delivery Owner and/ or Head as required.
Coaches & mentors team members in adopting Agile practices and a truly Agile mindset including ownership, self-organisation & continuous improvement.
Creates a collaborative environment by coaching the team to employ Agile best practices, ensures all tools and methods in place for teams’ success.
Contributes in Scrum of Scrums to resolve blockers, propose improvements & discuss lessons learnt.
Protecting the team from outside distractions and interferences.
Ensuring a good relationship between the team and product owner as well as others outside the team
Business
Regulatory reporting knowledge – G20 Regulations (Dodd-Frank, EMIR, HKMA, etc), MiFID II, SFTR, SEC
Financial Markets products knowledge
Processes
Be able to comprehend and map complicated interdependencies between application and infrastructure components.
Be able to think laterally across multiple technology types and define patterns of usage.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Regulatory Reporting Delivery Squads to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Other Responsibilities
A plus if have strong knowledge and previous experience in end-to-end design, and subsequent support of large-scale data processing systems
Familiarity and confidence working in an “agile” development environment.
Who can drive / facilitate the requirements and development effort with the business.
Our Ideal Candidate
12+ years of management experience.
Certifications - Scaled Agile Framework / Certified Scrum Master / PMI-ACP
Knowledge of agile methodology and frameworks like Scrum, Kanban, etc.
Tools - JIRA, Confluence, Sharepoint, Teamsite, Clarity
Known to Bank Processes, Teams, Tools.
Known to Software Development Life Cycle Processes related to Agile methodology and Classic Methodology.
Known to the Processes involved in Onboarding the infrastructure.
Known to the Change, Release processes
Team management - Estimation, Metrics reporting, anticipating risks, issues and providing early warnings
Experience of working in an environment with heavy usage of automated testing and DevOps tooling.
Good skills to coach team how to follow agile scrum, which really works.
Ability to take and understand commitment to deliver the product on time.
Know about the value of metrics and incremental delivery.
Knowledge about tasks, backlog tracking, burndown metrics, velocity, user stories etc.
Good knowledge of PowerPoint and Visio.
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. "
Technical Design / Delivery Lead - (2100011857) #Immediate,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Active Advisory Fullstack Developer - Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #Immediate #JPM #Worknow #Immediate #Worknow,"The role is in a critical front office facing application which is across many asset classes including Fixed Income, Hedge Funds, Mutual Funds and Equities etc. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities
Will be part of high-caliber development team that works closely with business stakeholders in wealth management side to deliver end to end solutions
Able to work individually or as part of co-located team/globally distributed team to achieve on time delivery of projects
Will be responsible for full software development life cycle –Requirement gathering, design, coding, deployment management, production issue management
Adhere to best development standards e.g. TDD/BDD, CICD
Deliver high quality code including 90%+ Code coverage
Build cloud native applications using private, public, hybrid cloud technologies
Willingness to learn and adopt to new technology and tool sets
Learn finance domain to work closely with business stakeholders
Requirements
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent practical experience
5 or more years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably Angular or React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, Sybase and ArangoDB
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Good to have
Experience in Wealth Management domain
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on building Micro services
Experience with distributed caches like GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk, Dynatrace
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs."
"Lead, Development, - (2200019120). -- #UrgentHire","Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for CEE Hive Delivery.
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team.
Provide Inputs / directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation.
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs / projects.
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives.
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals.
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across CEE Hive is remediated with no impact to stability.
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams.
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes.
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads.
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives.
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery.
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection.
Compliant to SDF / SIA / TDA / RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies.
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards.
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines, Data governance and policies.
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required.
Recognize talent and identify the training / coaching areas for employees.
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, areas of improvement, Addressing Bias, etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency / risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans.
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results.
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: [Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.] * 
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Exercise authorities delegated by the Board of Directors and act in accordance with Articles of Association.
Key Stakeholders
CEE Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit.
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB CEE Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
12 years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools and CI-CD methodology / Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location and managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance, etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Technical Competence
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on Data structure and Algorithms.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture.
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) and NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel / ActiveMQ / Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good knowledge in dependency injections like Spring DI / Blueprints and JSON libraries like Jackson / GSON.
Good Hands-on knowledge on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Strong understanding of Advanced JavaScript, HTML 5, and CSS 3.
Strong experienced in policy / rule engines like Oracle Policy Automation, Drools.
Good knowledge on Banking domain and experience in CLDM Life cycle and process guidelines.
Good knowledge on IMDG (Ignite or Hazelcast).
Having Knowledge in Python programming is added advantage.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g. Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ, etc.
Knowledge in DSE DataStax or Neo4j will be an added advantage.
Ability to work in quick paced, dynamic environment adapting agile methodologies.
Strong knowledge in Cloud engineering (SaaS, PaaS, IaaS).
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Unit testing and code coverage using JUnit / Mockito.
Strong experience and Knowledge on Data Analysis / Analytics and Profiling.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management and handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution.
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders.
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support and handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for CDD Risk, Credit Risk,Climate Risk scoring, Risk Entity Model, Client Due Diligence (CDD), Onboarding, FATCA and CRS.
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening.
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement / risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI and ML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine learning).
Membership in technical guilds / associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Java, J2EE, Spring Framework, API Design and Microservice Architecture.
PL / SQL Programming, Oracle, PostgreSQL.
Oracle Policy Automation (OPA), Drools, BRE.
Kafka, ActiveMQ, JMS Messaging.
Hazelcast, DSE Cassandra with High Availability.
ELK, AppDynamics, APM, SRE Concepts, Production Monitoring Tool.
Containerized platform OCP, Kubernetes, Docker.
Workflow Management tool, Camunda.
AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security principles and architecture.
Secure Design and ICS control."
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742# #Urgent..,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Quantitative Developer,"Develop analytical libraries and tools leveraging both open source and proprietary numerical software packages.
Integrate with cloud infrastructure vendors to evaluate and compute challenges across large datasets and parallel computations.
Design and develop elegant software solutions for signal generation of systematic trading.
Partner with team members to bring forth custom software solutions, and enhance the investment process.
Build automated ETL pipelines to support rapid but controlled transition from research to live trading."
Software Developer_SD02 #WorkNow #UrgentHire #Immediate,"Roles and Responsibilities :
You will create REST/GraphQL based web services and APIs for consumption by mobile and web for distributed B2B platform.
You will code, test and operate Nodejs based services.
You will implement new features in a highly collaborative environment with product managers, UI/UX experts, and fellow engineers.
You will contribute to a future-ready, high quality, and performance code base.
You will share your technical solutions and product ideas with the team.
Requirements :
You have experience in backend development, using languages like Node.JS and Golang
You have used TypeScript extensions
You are familiar with NoSQL databases such as MongoDB or CouchDB, Web services, SOA patterns
You have good working knowledge of design patterns, building and deploying microservices on the cloud
You have hands on experience with REST APIs or GraphQL
You have experience with Test Driven Development and know when to apply it
You have knowledge of web libraries and frameworks such as ReactJS/VueJS, AngularJS, and Clojure
You have experience working on AWS or other cloud stacks and Docker"
"Software Engineer, Associate, Singapore -- #UrgentHire #Worknow'","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 7 years of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
"Senior Officer, - RPA Developer, Group Technology #Seekbetter","About UOB United Overseas Bank Limited (UOB) is a leading bank in Asia with a global network of more than 500 branches and offices in 19 countries and territories in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. In Asia, we operate through our head office in Singapore and banking subsidiaries in China, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand, as well as branches and offices.Our history spans more than 80 . Over this time, we have been guided by our values — Honorable, Enterprising, United and Committed. This means we always strive to do what is right, build for the future, work as one team and pursue long-term success. It is how we work, consistently, be it towards the company, our colleagues or our customers.
About the Department The Technology and Operations function is comprised of five teams of specialists with distinct capabilities: business partnership, technology, operations, risk governance and planning support and services. We work closely together to harness the power of technology to support our and digital banking services and operations. This includes developing, centralising and standardising technology systems as well as banking operations in Singapore and overseas branches.
Job Responsibilities
Supporting existing RPA processes and implementing change requirements as part of change control process
Problem and issue manment for timely responses to support day to day running of processes in operation
Creating and documenting test procedures and scenarios in RPA Integration Testing
Configuring new Blue Prism processes using core workflow principles that are well structured, maintainable and simple
Participate and drive design build activities from discovery to implementation
Guide junior members in development activities
Development of Powerll and VB scripts in .Net application, when required
Job Requirements
Strong knowledge in RPA Blue Prism tool with at least 5 - 7 of development experience, with min. 2 in L3 support tasks
Ability to work independently in end to end process from Design to Rollout with experience in more than 10 RPA processes
Should have exposure to setting up RPA Environment on process rollout
Person with good exposure to software development experience along with understanding of .Net SQL is preferred.
Experience in Powerll scripting, Office Development and Ctrl-M will be advantous. 
Ability to learn new skills and tools is important along with good communication skills a positive attitude.

Be a part of UOB Family UOB is an equal opportunity employer. UOB does not discriminate on the basis of a candidate's , race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, or mental disability, or other non-merit factors. All employment decisions at UOB are based on business needs, job requirements and qualifications. If you require any assistance or accommodations to be made for the recruitment process, please inform us when you submit your online application.  Apply now and make a difference."
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization, #JobsThatMatter - #WorkNow #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President, Singapore+ - #Worknow #UrgentHire #Worknow'","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President, Singapore+ #Seekbetter -#UrgentHire #Immediate","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
EFX/Commodities Application Support - #Seekbetter #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #Worknow,"Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13 #Immediate#UrgentHire,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Java Full Stack Developer, - Associate #Seekbetter #Worknow","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including: 
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
2 or more years of experience with full stack Java application development and distribution, including frameworks like Spring, JPA, Java 11 features, REST services
Experience with SQL based databases like MySql/Oracle
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Exposure to Cloud based application development platform such as Cloud Foundry/AWS or container based such as Kubernetes
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Additional Preferred Skills: 
Understanding and knowledge of Data Engineering/Analytics and Machine Learning
Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Jest"
"Post Trade Technology, - Software Engineer #Urgent","We look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Primary focus will be to manage the number of Post Trade Technology applications in APAC with target architecture and to implement new settlement & clearing capabilities so as to support business expansion and increased volumes.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors degree in Computer science, information technology
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices.
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture.
Experience in building/ designing high volume/ real time processing systems.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages:
Java/ J2EE
Spring Framework / Hibernate
RDBMS (Oracle)
Unix / Shell scripting
Cloud knowledge
Understanding Business Requirements and Functional Specifications
Understanding existing program logic
Providing and/or agreeing estimates for required development
Creation/ update of Detailed Design Specifications, Program Specifications, and program Version Control documentation
Coding of new programs and changes to existing programs
Creation of Unit Test Plans, and execution of Unit Tests
Providing technical support for User Acceptance Testing
Creation of Implementation/ Back out Plans and Support Handover Documents
Providing technical support for Production Implementations, and post-implementation support during implementation warranty period
Requirements: 
4 years' working in hands-on application development 
Experience in working in Eclipse/IntelliJ / Maven environments.
Experience in managing various settlement systems in Post Trade Technology in APAC region.
Expertise in Core Java, TDD, BDD, spring framework, Messaging, SQL, Unix shell scripts.
“Can do” attitude, which can identify problems, take ownership, and provide solutions.
Drive the project progress for the deliverables. In our small agile team, developers talk directly to operational users and other BAs for requirements. You will be developing great communication and project management skills on top of the technical skills. 
Hand’s on experience in fine tuning application response / performance testing.
Experience of MQ / JMS (message transfer process), Kafka.
Experience using version control tool bitbucket.
Experience in code scanning tools like black duck and tools like Sonar etc.
Experience of development of Settlement and clearing applications.
Familiarity with SWIFT (Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication) Message formats."
Technical Design & Delivery Lead - (2100011857).'* #Immediate. #Urgent,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Python - Software Engineer, - Commodities, - VP #worknow #Immediate","Job Description
As an experienced member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
You will be working in the Commodities Technology team in Singapore. This is a global team that develops systems responsible in Athena for trading, price calculation, risk management, P& L reporting and trade booking covering majority global derivative markets and commodities products (Futures, Options, and Swap etc.). You will be part of the team who is responsible for transforming the commodities technology landscape over the next few years.
Athena is J.P. Morgan's cross-market risk management and trading system that provides functionality for traders, salespeople and operations staff globally. It is used in our foreign exchange, fixed income & credit and commodities businesses. Athena includes a globally replicated object-oriented database, a powerful dependency graph and a fully integrated stack across pricing, risk and trading tools. The code is a combination of Python and C++: C++ for speed, and Python for flexibility and rapid but controlled releases. Athena is designed to provide a continuous deployment environment, and pull developers close to the business to help increase revenues, while improving operational processes and controls to reduce costs.
We are seeking a technically strong and disciplined developer. The role will require an ability to attain clear understanding of Athena environment and of the unique design considerations that come into play in a diverse and highly interdependent systems environment. 
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent experience
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Advanced knowledge of architecture and design across all systems
Minimum 6 years of experience in one or more object oriented languages with at least 2 years in Python
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Strong understanding of Trade management and Risk management principles in Commodities is a must
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Good communication skills and ability to collaborate with and influence other technology teams to deliver end to end solutions to the business in a constantly changing environment
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base

About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.

About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13 #WorkNow #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Lead Java Developer - [22440742]. #Urgent #WorkNow',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Backend Java Software Engineer - Payment Technology - Associate #Urgent #Immediate',"About Team
J.P. Morgan Payment Technology is looking for a Backend Java Software Developer to join our global team for a Greenfield development project. You will be part of the pioneer team in Singapore as we build our payment digital capabilities in the region.
In this role, you will be working with state of the art technologies to design and develop a cloud based platform for external and internal development teams to integrate efficiently with the Payments API Ecosystem
Primary Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable, well thought and defect free solutions.
Participate in Agile ceremonies - standups, retrospective, sprint planning and backlog refinement.
Write enterprise grade code with production stability and resiliency in mind.
Develop deep technical understanding of all the interfaces and communication protocol in the platform.
Build and maintain automated monitoring tools.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Manage hygiene of the application (code smells, vulnerabilities, code coverage).
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the project and product teams.
Experience and Skills Required
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related disciplines.
Minimum 3 years of Java development expertise is a must.
Hands-on with Relational Databases, Spring Boot, REST APIs, Junit, Mockito, JPA
Experience working on large enterprise applications with micro service based architecture. Cloud knowledge and Kubernetes is preferred.
Past understanding of working in and managing production environment is preferred.
Should be detail-oriented, strong analytical and good communication skills are a must.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams across the globe.
Pro-actively participate in designing/solution of the feature/platform
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
Senior Software Engineer - Web Fullstack Engineer,"Roles & Responsibilities
At The Economist Group, we champion progress, by helping people understand and tackle the critical challenges facing the world. Join us, to engineer innovative products that bring insight and analysis to global leaders in business and government. Whether ideating mobile apps that deliver personalised content, or evolving our flagship website, economist.com, you will help transform how we acquire, convert, engage and retain our 1.2 million subscribers.
We are looking for a senior Web Fullstack Engineer to join our Partner Engineering team. Your primary focus will be to design, develop, ship and maintain our partnership suite and ensure. You’ll work with our collaborative team, where your knowledge and advice about application architecture and the latest mobile technologies will be highly appreciated.
The role will suit either an existing senior or a mid-level native Web Fullstack Engineer ready for their next challenge, but with at least some experience mentoring a high performing team. You should enjoy working with autonomy in a creative and entrepreneurial environment, and have a strong commitment to producing high quality code. We offer flexible working and have recently shifted to a 'remote first' working policy with a minimum expectation of coming to the office two days a month, however you can come in more often if you wish to.
How you will contribute:
Design, develop, ship and maintain web platform capabilities.
Develop reusable, testable, maintainable and modular code on a web platform.
Develop and collaborate with the engineering team to design and implement clean mobile architecture.
Collaborate with cross functional teams to define, design and ship new features.
Implement new user interfaces and features together with automated unit and integration tests, from specification to production.
What you’ll need to be successful:
5+ years of professional experience with web development, proficiency with some of the following programming languages: Javascript/Typescript, Go, Python, Java.
Professional experience with React.
Professional experience with test automation and methodologies.
Deep understanding of UI development in React.
Professional experience with web performance metrics and analytics.
Professional experience with web performance & load testing.
You’ll value well-thought-out and straightforward solutions to problems.
Mentorship experience - you’ll have been seen as a go-to person in your last role.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Strong ownership, scrappy and biassed for action.
Plus:
Professional working experience with enterprise software integration.
Our culture
We all play a part in building our culture. Whether it's through welcoming new colleagues, team building activities, joining colleague events, celebrations or affinity groups there’s an opportunity for you to get involved. Continuous development is central to our working culture and we encourage teams to pair up or mob on tasks. From our 10% a week learning time policy, to our learning and development platform, Degreed, with unlimited access to Udemy courses, as well as a host of other world-class content providers - there are many ways to develop your skills and career with us.
The Economist Group values diversity. We are committed to equal opportunities and creating an inclusive environment for all our employees. We welcome applicants regardless of ethnic origin, national origin, gender, gender identity, race, colour, religious beliefs, disability, sexual orientation, age or marital status."
"Software Engineer,. - Direct Custody Technology #Immediate,'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
DCC Technology team is part of broader Custody technologies under Securities Services BU. We offer technology solutions for direct market connectivity to our clients for settlements and asset servicing. The technology stack is a good mix of in house and vendor platforms using open source technologies which gives a diverse exposure in terms of solution design and delivery management.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Required Skills/Experience
Bachelor's degree in Computer science, information technology
5 years of Software development hands on experience.
Advance knowledge of core Java code writing using the latest open source frameworks – i.e. Spring framework, Hibernate framework, MVC Framework
Understanding of technology architecture and ability to understand the complex system flows
Java/J2EE, JMS based messaging, Multi-threaded programming, JavaScript, JSP, AJAX, CSS.
Debugging skills – Java, web app and SQL debugging
Good knowledge of Oracle Database and SQL writing
Apache, Tomcat, Maven
Web Services
SQL performance tuning, web application performance analysis and tuning, analyzing performance metrics
Hands on experience on shell scripts
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Ability to conduct business analysis and comprehend functional requirements
Preferred Skills/Experience
Prior domain experience in settlements and asset servicing functions
Ability to articulate and present to business audience
Agile development experience.
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Software Engineer - Currencies and Emerging Markets, Associate ( 210132839)#JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Urgent'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Athena is J.P. Morgan's cross-market risk management and trading system that provides functionality for traders, salespeople, operations and product control staff globally. It is used in our foreign exchange, fixed income, credit and commodities businesses. Athena includes a globally replicated object-oriented database, a powerful dependency graph and a fully integrated stack across pricing, risk and trading tools. The code is a combination of Python and C++: C++ for speed, and Python for flexibility and rapid but controlled releases. Athena is designed to provide a continuous deployment environment, and pull developers close to the business to help increase revenues, while improving operational processes and controls to reduce costs.
The Currencies and Emerging Markets (CEM) Athena team delivers business critical trade capture, risk management, transaction processing and trader tools to the CEM business globally.
The CEM Athena roles require technically strong and disciplined python developers. A record of delivering high quality, well-tested solutions in a mature controlled environment is a prerequisite. The roles require an ability to attain clear understanding of Athena environment and of the unique design considerations that come into play in a diverse and highly interdependent systems environment. A high level of interaction with the business is required as the applications involved are revenue generating and directly used by the businesses globally.
This is a unique opportunity for delivery-minded individuals to take ownership of the full software development lifecycle, partnering with the CEM business to understand and improve business workflows. The successful candidate will be empowered to build relationships with the Singapore front-office and quantitative research teams in order to deliver local requirements, provide business face-off and technical support, enhancements and fixes to the local users, as well as to own the delivery of Asia Pacific requirements on large-scale, global re-engineering initiatives
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree with at least 4 years of software engineering experience in Financial Services sector
Proficiency in Python programming language
Experience in developing and supporting complex systems used for intraday risk management
Deep understanding of risk management concepts and product knowledge in the Fixed Income space
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability.
Eager to take ownership of work, have real business impact, overcome obstacles and take it through to completion, working as part of this team and collaborating with a much bigger community of developers sharing the technology and code base.
Ability to manage multiple tasks concurrently in an efficient and effective manner with minimal supervision.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to present complex issues to non-technical users and to influence change.
Good problem solving skills with an ability to find creative, out of the box solutions to complex problems.
Good understanding of Agile development methodologies, responsible for elucidating and agreeing requirements, building relationships with business users, and taking ownership of deliverables all the way to the production environment and beyond.
Focus on testing through the entire development cycle to produce reliable and maintainable software"
"Senior Software Engineer, - DevOps –Standard Chartered nexus - (2200019763). #Immediate","What will you be doing:
You will be responsible for running 70% and building 30% of a plug and play bank.
Get Infra, database installed
Deploy services in Kubernetes
Monitor systems: dashboarding, alerting
Configure and respond to alerts: resolution / escalation
Automate resolutions
Maintain a knowledge base of resolution
Writing application in Java, Golang, Python
Work in AWS to build solutions
What do you need to be successful in this role?
4+ years of experience
Development experience: GIT, java spring, golang
Automation experience: Ansible, Puppet, Chef
Monitoring Experience with Kibana, Grafana, Elasticsearch
Experience with microservice based architectures
Experience of Unix / Linux environments and bash scripting
Experience with setting up and running databases
Experience on Kubernetes is a plus
Experience of Agile / Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS / GCP) – (Kubernetes / Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team"
"Digital Technology, –Full Stack Developer, Associate --- 210152908 #Immediate #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Wealth Management business has been on a Digital transformation journey, as we look to provide our clients with a suite of self-service capabilities allowing them to transact with us in a manner and channel of their choice, and thereby remove friction from the various touchpoints. The Digital Technology team is partnering with our business to aggressively expand our digital offerings over both Web and Mobile by designing, building and rolling out world-class digital solutions. We are a global technology team that executes in a highly agile manner and also embraces cutting-edge technologies and innovations.
The Digital Technology team in APAC is seeking a full stack developer to join us on this journey. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. Also, if you have a passion for bleeding edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Strong Web development skills with 6+ years of experience in Web and JavaScript technologies – HTML ,Angular, CSS in developing or maintaining Front end solutions
Strong Java Development skills with 6+ years of experience in solving business problems having exposure Java tech stack - Java 8 or higher, Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more database technologies –SQL Server, Sybase.
Experience in building REST APIs
Some exposure to Cloud (AWS / Cloud Foundry) and Kafka would be needed to succeed in the role
Experience in Agile development background and experience with TDD/BDD concepts and testing skills
Demonstrate an enthusiastic and proactive approach with a good team ethic
BS degree at least
Expertise in application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Passionate about building an innovative culture
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
J.P. Morgan Asset & Wealth Management delivers industry-leading investment management and private banking solutions with client assets of $4 trillion. Asset Management provides individuals, advisors and institutions with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes through our global network of investment professionals. Wealth Management helps individuals, families and foundations take a more intentional approach to their wealth or finances to better define, focus and realize their goals. 
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
Senior Application Developer - 22495002#. #Urgent #Worknow |,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Senior Manager is a senior management level position responsible for accomplishing results through the management of a team or department in an effort to establish and implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Manage one or more Applications Development teams in an effort to accomplish established goals as well as conduct personnel duties for team (e.g. performance evaluations, hiring and disciplinary actions)
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience as Applications Development Manager
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Stakeholder and people management experience
Demonstrated leadership skills
Proven project management skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Operations Analyst, - (2200005422).#UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities 
Perform day-to-day operations such as processing of client’s transactions for Structured products in accordance with bank operational menu, desk instructions, compliance and regulatory requirements
Instruct and monitors market settlement and cash funding between the bank and custodian and ensure these are processed accurately and timely
Follow up on unmatched/unsettled trades with dealer, broker counterparties
Ensure proper and timely escalation to business and/or management
Provide other administrative support for the department, updating KPI, mailing etc
Handle ad hoc project as assigned
Provide settlement support on Public holiday
Key Stakeholders
Internal: Client Advisors, Client Service Managers, Platform Managers, CMPS(Dealers), In-Country Ops team, Compliance, Credit & Risk team
External: Brokers, Custodians
Our Ideal Candidate
Independent and willing to learn
Work well under stress and within tight dateline
Team player
Willing to work at Changi Business Park
Backing Background preferred
2 years of experience in an operations role.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Product Knowledge
Settlement experience
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Operations Analyst, (2200005289) - #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities 
Perform day-to-day operations such as processing of client’s transactions for Structured products in accordance with bank operational menu, desk instructions, compliance and regulatory requirements
Instruct and monitors market settlement and cash funding between the bank and custodian and ensure these are processed accurately and timely
Follow up on unmatched/unsettled trades with dealer, broker counterparties
Ensure proper and timely escalation to business and/or management
Provide other administrative support for the department, updating KPI, filing etc
Handle ad hoc project as assigned
Provide settlement support on Public holiday
Key Stakeholders
Internal: Client Advisors, Client Service Managers, Platform Managers, CMPS(Dealers), In-Country Ops team, Compliance, Credit & Risk team
External: Brokers, Custodians
Our Ideal Candidate
Independent and willing to learn
Work well under stress and within tight dateline
Team player
Willing to work at Changi Business Park
2 years of experience in an operations role.
Banking background preferred.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Product Knowledge
Settlement experience
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Manager, Policy Framework and Governance, CPBB, - (2200018796) #Urgent'","Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Develop, design and implement control measures and monitoring plans for compliance to policies and regulations.
Implement automation to improve operations efficiency through usage of SAS logics and ensure programs are up to date with credit policies and regulatory guidelines.
Business.
Processes
Review the CST / LKCSA / RRA and improve end to end control procedures to effectively review the credit risk management processes.
Ensure Regulatory and Group gap analysis complete within timelines. Coordinate discussion with process owners to implement action plan.
Follow-up with relevant stakeholders on the gap analysis action plan and dispensation approval.
Support and comply Group Operation Risk Process Standard including Control Design Assessment (CDA) Refresh, Business Continue Plan (BCP), Outsourcing Standard, Host register, Record Management, etc.
Adherence to Operational Risk Framework in the process of identification, control monitoring and management of risks. Timely escalation identified/potential operational risks at the relevant forums and record in EORP.
Prepare dashboard reports on daily / weekly / monthly to be shared with the relevant stakeholders
Update senior management on CPBB Credit Risk issues by coordinating monthly QAOR meeting forum. 
Coordinate for internal and external audit and ensure timely follow-up of audit action points.
Coordinate the requirement from regulatory and response to the request timely and accurately.
People and Talent
Engagement and work closely with stakeholders to deliver bank objective.
Provide guidance and training to peers and team members including CAA hub and RRS team.
Risk Management
Ensuring consistent application and enforcement of risk policies, processes, and controls, in compliance with Group standards.
Compliance with group policies and standards, local regulatory guidelines.
Governance
Ensure operational risks and controls are being managed appropriately at the business unit level in a proactive, risk based and disciplined manner to meet external, internal and regulatory requirements.
Ensure Credit operational risk management from an end-to-end basis based on CPBB Process Governance structure.
Ensure that Units adhere with process standards and incorporate appropriate controls within processes, carry out periodic monitoring activities and ensure timely identification and resolution of risk issues.
Ensure adequate governance oversight on unit’s outsourced activities, enough onboarding and ongoing due diligence of external / internal service providers, effective service level management and unit’s compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
Ensure satisfactory results with no significant issue of all the internal reviews / external audits and timely follow-up of audit action points.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Key Stakeholders
Internal Relationships
Country Credit Head
Country Operational Risk
Legal and Compliance
Credit Initiation Team
Business Product Tam
Operation Team
Collection Team
Fraud Team
Policy teams
CAA Hub
RRS team
Technology teams
Group Internal Auditors
External Relationships
Regulators (MAS / PRA)
External auditors
Other Responsibilities
Recommend and implement actions and solutions to mitigate credit and operational risks. To enhance compliance at the business unit level.
Our Ideal Candidate
Preferably Tertiary Education or relevant professional qualification with 3+ years’ experience in policy framework, or governance or risk management or quality assurance related role
Ability to plan, organize, lead, and make spontaneous and rational judgments and decisions.
Knowledge on CPBB products (mortgages / cards / personal loans / SME / Wealth) is an added advantage.
Strong analytical skills in resolving operational and systems issues.
Good communication and interpersonal skills.
Sound knowledge of banking practices, relevant legislation, and Statutory and Regulatory requirements.
Strong presentation and negotiation skills.
Role Specific technical Competencies
Market Knowledge
Substantial experience at the highest level in the banking industry, including demonstrated success in a similar role.
Risk Management and Control
Demonstrated track record in successful management and ability to manage risk in geographically dispersed and highly varied product base. Expertise in process design and control.
Regulatory Framework and Requirement
Awareness and understanding of the regulatory framework in which the firm operates and the regulatory requirements and expectations relevant to the role.
Ability to priorities multiple deliverables with demonstrable organizational, project management and time management skills.
Well versed with various principle and other risk types, its implication of individual and business lending and for overall function.
Problem Management Process.
Non-technical Skills
Effective collaborative skills that contribute to positive working relationships with both internal and external stakeholders including regulators and rating agencies."
"Full Stack Developer - F&O GEMM, Analyst #JPM - #Urgent #Immediate","Job Description
In launching your career in our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You will be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Required education in Bachelor of Science (Information Systems)
1 year of experience in the banking/financial domain
Experience of working with Springboot, Junit, React
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
In touch with industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals and passionate about building an innovative culture
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Willingness to learn different technologies and toolsets required for F&O GEMM."
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997) *#JobsThatMatter,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
Python Developer_D01 #UrgentHire #Worknow,"Roles and Responsibilities :
Gather requirements for any enhancements.
Bugs and Issue Tracking.
Involved in prioritization and development of both front end and backend.
Create automated tests and perform manual testing if applicable.
Deployment of code to SIT/UAT and PROD environments
Configuration of environment and maintenance
Requirements :
Candidate should be well versed with agile web development and object oriented programming paradigms.
Experienced in Python/Django as a full stack web developer projects.
Experience in – Frontend development: HTML (Bootstrap Responsive Design), JavaScript (JQuery), CSS (LESS/SCSS).
Backend development: Python/Django.
OS skills: Linux/Unix with Shell Scripting.
Database skills: MS-SQL / Oracle. (Design, Query using SQL, Optimize Queries). Django ORM Simplifies this, but candidate should have
background to be able to optimize queries.
Preferred skills: Hybrid Mobile App Development framework (like IONIC) and working with REST API’s, Python/Django, Shell, SQL, bootstrap, mongodb, REstAPI, Jquery
DISCLAIMER: Please note that the details of personal information submitted by you in response to this job advertisement and any further communications thereof with us pursuant to this advertisement will constitute your informed / explicit consent to Quess Singapore for the collection, use and/or disclosure of your personal data by Quess Singapore for the purpose of carrying out its business, in compliance with the relevant provisions of the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 and any addendum or amendments thereof from time to time."
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547). *#Seekbetter","The Role Responsibilities
 Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture, - SC Ventures..","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Web Application Developer #Urgent,"Responsibilities:
Develop, maintain, enhance web applications.
Create and maintain software documentations.
Able to understand requirement and turning them into working solutions.
Able to suggest workaround, provide ideas for solving problems.
Ensure applications are not vulnerable to security threats such as OWASP Top 10.
Requirements:
Able to work independently as well as with the team.
Able to multi-task.
Good problem-solving skills.
Write well-commented codes.
Best development practices.
Well versed in PHP Laravel, nodeJS, MySQL/mariaDB, VueJS
Familiar with AWS
Experienced in Tailwind CSS is a bonus.
Able to work from home
Singaporean preferred"
*Lead Java Developer - 22440742 #Immediate',"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
Lead Java Developer -- [22440742]' #Immediate,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
FullStack Engineer* #Urgent',"We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Continually ideate, scope, develop, deliver, test and iterate features for the constantly evolving API Platform.
Ensure appropriate levels of automation are adopted (build, deploy, configure, validate, monitor).
Business
Lead planning, design and implementation of technical solutions for global internal and external customers.
Represent the bank technically at industry, regulatory API forums and workshops with external partners.
Processes
Liaise with other global technology, data, operations, compliance teams to execute.
Follow a structured approach to software delivery within the team
Advocate best practice release and change management protocols for developments consisting of multiple streams.
People and Talent
Take ownership and accountability of squad's deliverables.
Be a positive contributor to team culture and constructive feedback to peers and partner teams
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Our Ideal Candidate
Experience of 2+ years in IT industry
Proficient in Java 8+ with a good knowledge of its ecosystems
Good knowledge of Java, JS, Spring, SpringBoot, SpringBatch, and technologies around it.
Good knowledge of frameworks such as ReactJS and EmberJS, RESTful APIs, HTML and CSS.
Proficient understanding of code versioning and CICD tools like Git or Bitbucket, Jenkins, Ansible, Maven, Gradle
Knowledge and experience in Container Infrastructure such as Openshift (OCP), Kubernetes, Helm, AWS, Terraform.
Monitoring and Tracing using tools such as Sysdig, AppDynamics or Elastic stack
Experienced working in an Agile environment with globally distributed teams.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
RESTful APIs, SpringBoot, Java 8+
CICD tools like Git or Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Openshift (OCP), Kubernetes, AWS, Terraform.
JS, ReactJS or EmberJS or similar"
"Lead, - DevOps..* #Immediate.*","The Role Responsibilities
Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shiftleft(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Understanding and translating Product roadmaps to the team
Define and improve the WoW for the product.
Engage different stakeholders to support and sync inorder to deliver the product.
Own the BAU and enhancement of the platform.
Our Ideal Candidate:
10+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 8 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Highly skilled in breaking down work and resource allocation.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation.
Skilled in translating the leader vision statement into Product Features and Controls.
Highly effective in creating Product Roadmaps in sync with Stakeholder teams.
Strong problem-solving skills and Self-Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation
About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Frontend Software Engineer, TikTok e-Commerce #WorkNow #UrgentHire","The e-Commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-Commerce experience to our users. Our product engineering team is responsible for building an e-Commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join us as we drive the future of e-Commerce here at TikTok.
You will:
Architect and develop efficient and highly reusable front-end systems that drive complex web applications for e-Commerce products.
Code optimisation to improve scalability, reliability, security and performance of web applications.
Collaborate with product design, product management and software engineering teams to deliver best in class user experience.
Qualifications
B. Sc or higher degree in Computer Science or related fields from accredited and reputable institutions.
Experience in frontend engineering experience, with demonstrable experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS, React/Vue/Angular and packaging frameworks like Webpack/Rollup/BaBel/AST/Gulp.
Familiar with key concepts like functional and asynchronous programming, closures and types, layouts, specificity, animation, cross browser compatibility, data security and accessibility.
Good understanding of multi-tier application architecture and protocols, familiarity with product and software development lifecycle process.
Ideal Candidate
Agile, quick self learner, highly self-motivated with strong sense of product ownership and creative problem solver.
Deeply passionate about software coding/development and building great mobile/web applications.
Good collaborator and team player, comfortable working in a fast moving, culturally diverse and globally distributed team environment."
Senior Firmware/Firmware Engineer (Embedded System),"Responsibilities:
Design, development, testing and support of firmware/embedded software applications for microcontroller based wireless systems.
Develop software communication protocols for wireless communication systems
Drive technology/development projects in all phrases from specification to release.
Read or understand electronics schematic and system design.
Work closely with cross functional teams to ensure project delivery on time.
Define and create product software specification including software architecture, feature descriptions and applications notes of the system
Research technical issues and/or opportunities and provide recommendations.
Participate in ad hoc software projects and assignments as required
Requirement:
Degree in Electronic/Electrical/Computer Engineering/Computer Science, Software Engineering or related fields.
Minimum 5 years of experience in real time embedded systems
Must process strong knowledge of C/C++ language
Experience with wireless systems is an advantage
Experience with microcontrollers is preferred
Strong Knowledge of the communication transport protocol like I2C, SPI, USB and generic wireless transport protocols will be an advantage
Excellent teamwork skills, flexibility, and ability to handle multiple tasks.
Able to manage one's own time efficiently
 Must be Singaporean Only"
"Machine Learning Engr., TikTok Ads Vertical Solutions #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire*","Responsibilities
We are growing our TikTok Ads Vertical Solutions team. On this team, you have opportunities to help people discover products, content, and services that bring joy to their lives and support all kinds of businesses to thrive on TikTok. We work with advertisers from all verticals, such as E-commerce, Retail, Auto, Travel, Financial Service, Entertainment, Local Business, and Gaming. Our goal is to make TikTok an irreplaceable growth channel for businesses of all sizes and a favourite destination for consumers to discover and purchase products, content, and services.
TikTok Ads Vertical Solutions team has a strong user focus and a dedication to technical excellence. We aim to meet our users' needs with reliable and high-performing platforms and services. We are looking for strong Machine Learning Engineers who are excited to grow their business understanding, build highly scalable and reliable software, and partner across disciplines with global teams in pursuit of excellence.
What You'll Do:
Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques optimize advertisers' marketing strategies.
Connect with businesses directly to understand and develop solutions for their Jobs-to-be-done.
Collaborate with Product Managers, Designers, and other disciplines to explore the next generation of shopping experiences on TikTok.
Capitalize on the organic shopping behaviours on TikTok today and facilitate retentive behaviours to provide more people value and business value.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications:
Solid programming skills, proficient in C/C++.
Familiarity with at least one mainstream deep learning programming framework (TensorFlow/Caffe/MXNet) and its architecture and implementation mechanism.
Familiarity with deep learning algorithms (CNN/RNN/LSTM, etc.).
Team-player with strong communication skills who can also work independently.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiarity with main components for Ads systems, including bidding, ranking, and auction."
API Tech Lead Analyst#.'#Immediate,"Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Extensive Knowledge of Consumer Banking Domain (especially Wealth), APIs, Customer Experience on Digital Platforms. Good knowledge on designing API for Mutual Funds , Equities , FX features.
Exposure of latest digital banking experiences in Industry and strong hold / eagerness to learn system architecture, data flows and message orchestrations.
Expertise in Requirement Gathering, converting requirements into Customer Journeys knitted with APIs, tech design documents, API specification - functional and tech documents.
Strong expertise and understanding of Consumer Banking Customer Journeys on Digital Platforms, APIs Integration with UI.
Expertise in deriving test scope for the requirements and acceptance criteria of user stories / Requirements.
Strong understanding of Agile practices, User Story creations, SDLC.
High level understanding of Micro services – overview / Open Banking / Oauth2
Hands-on experience of tools such as Bitbucket, Jira, Swagger Editor, Confluence, MS Office (Visio/Excel/PPTs).
Expertise in understanding functional issues and guiding the team for resolution.
Advanced communication skills, team player with willingness to learn and innovate with forward thinking Organization.
Ability to inspire team to enhance their skillsets, manage team and review tech solutions and provide feedbacks on regular Intervals
Strong understanding of API design practices across Industry and ensure systemic way of design compliance.
Strong understanding of XML, Restful JSON, SOA concepts, Web Services."
"Lead, Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF, - (2200018251).*#UrgentHire #Immediate","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
Sr. Application Developer -- [21361752] #Immediate#Seekbetter,"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family Group:
Technology
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family:
Applications Development
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type:
------------------------------------------------------
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi."
Lead Java Developer -- [22440742].#'#Worknow,"Responsibilities
The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
10+ years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Work as part of Global Capital Markets development team in Singapore and collaborate with teams in other locations.
Work on a Global Trading system for Fixed Income Trading Technology.
Develop event based Microservices using Java, Docker and OpenShift/Kubernetes.
Focused on Unit testing and Integration testing along with day to day development changes.
Participate in code reviews.
Participate in system/component design & implementation activities.
Idea of DevOps tooling is good to have.
Translates functional requirement or specifications into technical solutions and implement the solutions with plans and executions.
Responsible for continuous improvement, by implementing best practices to software architecture, software development process and new technologies etc.
Communicates with business and other project teams to deliver the project per agreed schedule."
#Java/J2EE/Oracle/Shell Scripting - Implementation Engineer - (21405806) #WorkNow #Immediate',"Job Description
The Applications Support Manager provides full leadership and supervisory responsibility. Provides operational/service leadership and direction to team(s). Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge through provision of value-added perspectives or advisory services. May contribute to the development of new techniques, models and plans within area of expertise. Strong communication and diplomacy skills are required. Generally has responsibility for volume, quality, timeliness of end results and shared responsibility for planning and budgets. Work affects an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family. Full supervisory responsibility, ensuring motivation and development of team through professional leadership to include duties such as performance evaluation, compensation, hiring, disciplinary and terminations as well as direction of daily tasks and responsibilities.
Java Application Support role with responsibilities of implementing & managing Java/Java2EE application.
Exp on architect & implementation and support role with Java/J2EE, spring, Spring Boot, JMS/IBM MQ/Messaging Queues
Hands on experience on Elastic Search, Distributed Cache, IBM MQ, Kakfa Messaging Queue.
Hands on exp on App & web server (JBOSS, Weblogic and Webspehere) and debugging
Strong experience on implementation and support of Resilient, stable and robust application
Strong experience on memory management & performance tuning in Java and DB
Profound insight of core Java and JEE internals (Classloading, Memory Management, Transaction management, etc.) will be added advantage
Excellent debugging skills, Strong problem-solving skills
Experience with shell scripting and Linux/Unix commands
Experience with Version Control Systems like GIT, Bit Bucket.
Hands on knowledge of Dev ops processes and tools
Exposure to development/implementation of microservices based components using the Java stack
Preferred to have experience / exposure to Docker / OpenShift based container deployment
Experience in Agile / Scrum based development methodology
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs
Qualifications:
8-14 years experience in an Apps Support role with commensurate people management experience.
Experience with real-time monitoring systems
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
Must show confidence in all communications so that key stake holders are not doubtful of the information being communicated
Effective prioritization skills and high energy.
Good interpersonal and communication skills, great teammate
Issue tracking and reporting using tools
Effectively share information with other support team members and with other technology teams
Ability to plan and organize workload
Ability to communicate appropriately to relevant stakeholders
Education:
Bachelor’s/University degree or equivalent experience
Additional Job Description
Responsibilities:
Support responsibilities include implementing and supporting Java Enterprise application developed by Vendor / inhouse.
Responsible for implementing large scale payment product across countries with defined solution on both hardware & software.
Project Implementation support on lower env, plan for production releases and support production release checkouts
Responsible for the supporting monitoring issues for the application and act on any type of Server and Maintenance issues.
Troubleshooting and support of environment issues
Provide L3 support for issue and handle L3 production tickets for initial investigation and RCA.
Analyzes and resolves incidents, problems or known errors related to failures in application and supporting software components.
work on Incident, Change and Problem Management
Process improvement tools in support activities
Flexible for weekend support for release/deployments and support critical issues.
Automating various manual flows via shell script and jobs"
"Software Engineer, Senior Associate #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #UrgentHire'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 6 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"Senior Developer, Commodities Technology - (2200018769)'","Role Responsibilities
This is a role for a highly experienced and highly motivated full-stack software developer delivering software solutions for the Commodities trading desk.
The main responsibilities include analysis, design, development and delivery of features in a challenging and ever-changing environment for front-office users across all functional groups of Financial Markets Commodities division.
Key Roles and Responsibilities
Working as part of the Commodities Technology team, which develops the technology solutions for supporting the Commodities sales and trading businesses at Standard Chartered.
Dependable experienced developer able to take ownership and leadership of tasks and drive them personally to successful delivery.
Innovator and intellectual leader.
Problem solver taking passion in resolving complicated problems.
Driven individual motivated by delivering successful solutions to users and using any means and technologies necessary to do so.
Work with an Agile team to develop, test and maintain applications.
Assist in the collection and documentation of user’s requirements, development of user stories and estimates.
Work with databases, software algorithms and design patterns.
Design, develop and test applications in accordance with established standards.
Participate in peer-reviews of solution designs and related code.
Develop, refine and tune integrations between applications.
Track and maintain code coverage, system performance and system security.
Work with a mature DevOps software delivery process.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Key Stakeholders
Commodities Front Office users including Sales, Trading, Structuring. Control functions including product control, market risk, credit risk, regulatory operations, regulatory technology, operations, application development teams.
Our Ideal Candidate
8 years’ experience working as a Front office developer in investment banking / FI.
Skilled in pattern design and analytical thinking.
Strong domain knowledge of Agile and its processes.
Experience in developing robust, distributed, scalable, high production quality applications.
Experience with picking and applying good software practices like test driven development, continuous integration, and continuous delivery.
Ability to work in a variety of client settings and in a team orientated collaborative environment.
High competency in software development using Java, React and relational databases such as Oracle or PostgreSQL.
Experience with developing micro services, test driven development and DevOps.
Agile Scrum Master
Desirable but not Essential
Familiarity with Commodities trading business, risk management.
Scrum Master and Product Owner certification.
Prior experience in retail banking, private banking and wealth management.
Others
Knowledge and previous experience in maintaining and supporting Development tools.
Familiarity and confidence working in an “agile” development environment.
Self-starter who can “own” the toolset and provide a first-class service to stakeholders.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Java
React, Angular or other UI
Relational Databases: Oracle or PostgreSQL
Micro-services architecture
Software testing, including test automation
DevOps
Messaging middleware: Solace, JMS or others"
Frontend Game Engineer,"■OVERVIEW
One of our clients is opening a new position!
Singapore-based Game Studio specializes in HTML5 Games
■RESPONSIBILITIES
● Working on an upcoming title, by participating in creating the game experience.
● Participate in the entire game development lifecycle, focusing on solution design, coding, deployment and debugging.
● To work closely with product owners, key users, artists and the quality assurance team to ensure deliverables are as per expectation.
● Translate business/game requirements into technical specifications.
● Design and implement game mechanics and UI according to design specifications.
● Establish effective strategies and development pipeline.
● Design, build and maintain efficient scalable, and reliable code.
● Ensure the best performance, quality, and responsiveness of applications and games.
● Create technical design document.
● Verify implementations according to specifications.
■REQUIREMENTS
● Minimally 3 years of game development experience across the full development lifecycle.
● Diploma or Degree in Software/Computer Science/Computing/Computer Engineering/IT discipline or equivalent
● Experience in scripting, textures, animation, GUI styles and shaders.
● Constantly learn and stay updated to the evolving game standards.
● Proficient knowledge of code versioning tools. (Such as Git, SVN, and Mercurial)
● Driven and self-motivated, proactive, and work well as a team player.
● Ensure the best performance, quality, and responsiveness of applications and games.
● Create technical design document.
● Verify implementations according to specifications.
■PREFERRED SKILLS
● Good understanding of eithers NoSQL or SQL (preferably Mongo, Redis, MySQL)
● Experience in integrating with API gateways.
● Experience in building games in Cocos Creator or UNITY.
● Domain knowledge of the game industry from game development to actual game operation.
● Passion in building games"
Java Software Engineer - Payments L3 - Associate #UrgentHire #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Candidate should possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma or Professional Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Application Development Senior Programmer Analyst#.#UrgentHire #WorkNow#UrgentHire,"Job Description
The Applications Development Senior Programmer Analyst is an intermediate level position responsible for participation in the establishment and implementation of new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to contribute to applications systems analysis, design and lead technical delivery activities across Data Reporting and Analytics applications, Analytics Platform and O&T programs for Citi Private Bank.
Responsibilities:
Conduct tasks related to feasibility studies, time and cost estimates, IT planning, risk technology, applications development, model development, and establish and implement new or revised applications systems and programs to meet specific business needs or user areas
Monitor and control all phases of development process and analysis, design, construction, testing, and implementation as well as provide user and operational support on applications to business users
Utilize in-depth specialty knowledge of applications development to analyze complex problems/issues, provide evaluation of business process, system process, and industry standards, and make evaluative judgement
Evaluates and tests potential IT architecture solutions to ensure they meet user needs and requirements.
Creates and produces moderately complex IT architecture designs to translate user requirements to solutions.
Researches future industry trends / new technologies, and produces standards documents.
Translates complex business problems into sound technical solutions.
Recommend and develop security measures in post implementation analysis of business usage to ensure successful system design and functionality
Consult with users/clients and other technology groups on issues, recommend advanced programming solutions, and install and assist customer exposure systems
Ensure essential procedures are followed and help define operating standards and processes
Serve as advisor or coach to new or lower level analysts
Has the ability to operate with a limited level of direct supervision.
Can exercise independence of judgement and autonomy.
Acts as SME to senior stakeholders and /or other team members.
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
5-8 years of relevant experience in Business Intelligence and Analytics projects, with multi-national organization or an entity with similar global reach and complexity
3-4 years of hands-on experience in architecting and solutioning of Analytics Projects primarily covering Tableau and Big Data tech stacks (HIVE). Experience in Python and Tableau Prep is a plus.
Experience in systems analysis and programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Working knowledge of consulting/project management techniques/methods
Ability to work under pressure and manage deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proactive, self-starter, autonomous Self-motivated, multi-tasking, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills, solution oriented with proven results
Strong communication and interpersonal skills – demonstrate ability and proven track record in building partnerships and relationship management skills including collaboration with geographically dispersed teams to achieve deliverables
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience"
Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer - Vice President #UrgentHire #JPM #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire,"Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
Technical Design / Delivery Lead - (2100011857) #WorkNow',"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Technical Design / Delivery Lead - (2100011857) *.,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Technical Design / Delivery Lead - (2100011857),"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
URGENT / Firmware Engineer (C / C++ / Linux / MCU/Embedded),"RESPONSIBILITIES
Design, develop and perform system/software verification & validation on embedded systems
Maintain and improve the performance of existing software
Develop system on gateways and embedded controllers system communicating over wire and
wireless channels
Conduct design review, bug fix and update/create design documentation
Work with other teams to implement and test on various devices for interconnectivity.
REQUIREMENTS
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology,
Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic) or equivalent.
At least 3 year(s) of working experience in firmware development
Extensive experience in Embedded Programming using C/C++ in Embedded Linux and MCU
Good experience with various communication interface (peripherals) and protocols (especially SPI, I2C, UART, MODBUS TCP/IP and RS232/RS485)
Experience in wireless communication system/protocols eg. Bluetooth, Zigbee, Wi-Fi, Lora will be an advantage
Ability to work independently and multi-task effectively
Flexible and willing to accept a change in priorities as necessary
Good interpersonal communication and documentation/presentation skills
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please click on “Apply Now”.
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd    
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448"
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997)*.'. #JobsThatMatter,"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, - Payments, Associate #Immediate,'","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
"Post -Trade Securities, Software Engineer -- #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter","Job Description
We look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Primary focus will be to manage the number of Post Trade Technology applications in APAC with target architecture and to implement new settlement & clearing capabilities so as to support business expansion and increased volumes. 
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Sciences 
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems.
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets.
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices.
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture.
Experience in building/ designing high volume/ real time processing systems.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages
Java/ J2EE
Spring Framework / Hibernate
RDBMS (Oracle)
Unix / Shell scripting
Cloud knowledge
Understanding Business Requirements and Functional Specifications
Understanding existing program logic
Providing and/or agreeing estimates for required development
Creation/ update of Detailed Design Specifications, Program Specifications, and program Version Control documentation
Coding of new programs and changes to existing programs
Creation of Unit Test Plans, and execution of Unit Tests
Providing technical support for User Acceptance Testing
Creation of Implementation/ Back out Plans and Support Handover Documents
Providing technical support for Production Implementations, and post-implementation support during implementation warranty period
Requirements: 
Minimum 5 years with relevant hands-on development work.
Experience in working in Eclipse/IntelliJ / Maven environments.
Experience in managing various settlement systems in Post Trade Technology in APAC region.
Expertise in Core Java, TDD, BDD, spring framework, Messaging, SQL, Unix shell scripts.
“Can do” attitude, which can identify problems, take ownership, and provide solutions.
Drive the project progress for the deliverables. In our small agile team, developers talk directly to operational users and other BAs for requirements. You will be developing great communication and project management skills on top of the technical skills.
Hand’s on experience in fine tuning application response / performance testing.
Experience of MQ / JMS (message transfer process), Kafka.
Experience using version control tool bitbucket.
Understanding of banking risk and compliance policies.
Experience in code scanning tools like black duck and tools like Sonar etc
Experience of development of Settlement and clearing applications.
Familiarity with SWIFT (Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication) Message formats.
Knowledge on markets such as Australia, Singapore and Japan is good."
Research Fellow (Computer Hardware) - R00012469,"The School of Computer Science and Engineering (SCSE) invites applications for the position of Research Fellow. The contract will be for up to 6 months.
Key Responsibilities: 
The Research Fellow is going to work on the broad area of design automation and embedded systems, including but not limited to the following topics:
Work with the research associates and senior research fellow on software/hardware co-design for machine-learning applications.
Design hardware-friendly machine-learning models with lightweight operators and algorithms with fewer operations and parameters while keeping high accuracy.
Design new hardware, including high-performance Network-on-Chip architectures and machine-learning accelerators. And propose on-chip communication protocols such as routing algorithms taking advantage of new hardware technologies.
Co-optimize the hardware and software and propose efficient data mapping and scheduling algorithms for high performance and efficiency.
Conduct hardware-related performance evaluation such as chip area and power consumption analysis and system-level evaluation such as latency, throughput, and energy efficiency analysis.
Research on low-power and thermal-aware processor architecture.
Research on different deep-learning and machine-learning-based algorithms and applications
Implement the algorithms and experiments for the application level
Analyze the complexity of different algorithms and evaluate different application-level metrics.
Collaborate with other team member(s) for more efficient outcome delivery.
Perform administrative works assigned by the PI to ensure the smoothness of the project
Job Requirements: 
Doctor's degree in computer engineering
Experience in deep learning, machine learning, design automation, embedded systems, real-time systems, computer architecture, computer-aided design, etc. or related fields
Good spoken and written English
Entry level applicants are welcome to apply. Experienced applicants are preferred.
We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Hiring Institution: NTUIn line with Singapore’s nationwide Vaccination-Differentiated Safe Management Measures (VDS), employees must be fully vaccinated to return to the workplace, unless certified to be medically ineligible. For Information on VDS, please click here."
Technical Design & Delivery Lead - (2100011857).'* #Immediate #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Identifying/Gathering/ Questioning and challenging when necessary/ documenting the FR (Functional Requirements) and NFR (Non-functional Requirements) and interface specific requirements front to back
Provide solution design and lead the delivery working with onsite/offshore team members
Feasibility study, tools identification and completing the PoCs when required
Business
Identifying golden sources of data in Standard Chartered Banks
Analysis of coverage hierarchies, model and map to functional and data entitlements
Collaborate with PO/BA and Developments leads in the team in identifying and developing common components
Processes
Study existing engineering processes and contribute to improvements to drive up efficiencies
Collaborate with teams globally to deliver, present ideas and innovate
Model behaviours that facilitate Agile delivery
Exhibit passion for client experience with a user-first mindset
People and Talent
Self-development as per technology changes.
Risk Management
Avoid security and operational risks in the project deliverables.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CCIB product owners, PSS, technology services teams, EA teams
Other Responsibilities
T&I deliverables as per squad backlog by product owners
Our Ideal Candidate
Technical
Strong analytical and problem solving
15+ years of experience in development, architecture and solution design
Hands-on in JSE & JEE specifications
Hands on experience in Design Patterns
Experience in Service Oriented, Microservices and Cloud native architecture implementations
Hands on experience with No SQL, Graph Database.
Exhibit hands-on on various NFRs-NonFunctionalRequirements implementation
Strong experience in common and reusable components/services development
Data Modelling, tuning of queries, Performance and Throughput measures
Integration using ESB/MOM/WS based technologies, data formats, payload and performance measures
Security Essentials, application vulnerabilities and remediation
Cloud computing technologies
AI/ML, Data visualization, Data Science
Oracle or SQL Server PL/SQL development and designing data model.
Web services, API design, Defining Specification using swagger/RAML.
Experience working with query plans and performance tuning of SQLs
Knowledge of microservices architecture
Good to have experience in containerization technologies - Docker, Kubernetes
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Software / IT Engineer (Database) - CIM / Oracle PL/SQL / Java / Semicon,"Responsibilities:
Develop and maintain the ERD and schema of CIM databases
Design, develop, implement and maintain CIM database applications and scripts
Design, develop, implement and maintain database processes and workflow
Monitor data integrity and performance of CIM database and interfaces
Develop and coordinate reporting structures and interfaces to support reporting requirements
Provide support to maintain 24x7 uptime for CIM applications and databases
Provide 24x7 support for operations
Work closely with System Administrators and DBAs to ensure system availability, stability and performance
Work with other IT sections and cross-functional groups to meet departmental goals and objectives
To participate in global and cross-site projects and implementations
Requirement:
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related fields with at least 3 years of working experience in CIM related fields
Good Knowledge of Oracle PL/SQL
Good knowledge in UNIX/LINUX scripting
Experience with MES, TIB/RV and shop floor automation is a plus
JAVA development experience is a plus
Experience in high technology manufacturing environment is an advantage
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants, kindly send your resume in MS WORD format to ref10(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or please click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Hooi Wai Man (Samantha)
EA Personnel Reg No: R21100062"
"Staff Software Engineer, Data, - Standard Chartered nexus..*'","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
"Full Stack Java Developer, - Associate #JPM #Immediate,''","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Key Responsibilities:
Review epics and user stories provided by the business, product owners or business analysts,  translate those into technical designs and develop a solution.
Define a design and architecture for all solutions built with particular focus on developing a sustainable DevOps model.
Individual development contribution across various components of the system, including web front-end and back-end services
Work closely with program manager/product owner on grooming user stories, backlog prioritization, tracking and communicating progress.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and Test Driven Development (TDD)
Create Automated Unit Tests using Flexible/Open Source Frameworks
Apply latest DevOps standards to continuously improve and transform platform into a highly available, highly maintainable platform - including but not limited to code, policy processes, behaviors, tools.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
8 or more years of software engineering experience.
Expertise in application development and handling large volume data sets.
Experience with full-stack Web application development, including REST Web services in Java 7/8, SpringBoot and modern Javascript technologies such as ReactJS and/or Angular.
Strong expertise and knowledge of HTML5 and CSS.
Working experience in the AWS platform and services like EC2, S3, Amazon EBS.
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle.
Experience developing with testing frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Puppeteer, Selenium or Cucumber.
Knowledge and experience of SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven.
Must have work experience and solid understanding on microservices design and development, including API and cloud-based platforms and technologies.
Domain Driven Design (DDD) knowledge and experience is a plus.
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, etc is a plus.
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra and/or MongoDB is a plus.
Experience in Big Data Technologies including - Spark, Kafka, Hadoop, Hbase, and Impala is a plus
Good understanding of containerization such as Dockers and Kubernetes is a plus.
AWS certification is a plus."
"Software Engineer, Analyst, Trade Surveillance, Singapore, -- #Urgent #WorkNow","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
"Software Engineer, Associate, Singapore -- #UrgentHire #Worknow #Immediate","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 7 years of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
ServiceNow Developer - (2200010556).,"About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"ServiceNow Developer, (2200010556)'.","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"ServiceNow Developer, - (2200010556).'.","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Collaborate in an agile, multi-disciplinary team
Operate in a DevOps delivery model
Business
Translate requirements into workable systems, using best practice solutions
Processes
Build and unit test the required functionality
Participate in end-to-end testing of the functionality
Create relevant documentation
Support and maintain the built solution
People and Talent
Actively listens, respecting others point of view and takes ownership of contributing the required input whilst demonstrating strong communication skills (written, interpersonal and presentational) appropriate for both a Business and Technical audience, clarifying own understanding and that of others
Interact with stakeholders to understand and develop the high-level approach and goals
Work with stakeholders to design an appropriate data architecture and technical process flow
Risk Management
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters
Governance
Perform day to day administration of the ServiceNow tool
Maintain the integrity of the ServiceNow tool across production and non-production environments, including:
Manage systems changes through established change request process &provide status reports to the relevant parties.
Respond promptly to incident, investigate & provide temporary &/or permanent resolution of incidents escalated. Provide timely status updates to relevant parties.
Conduct root cause analysis & implement pro-active measures. Monitor effectiveness of implemented measures.
Monitor & measure the performance & availability of systems proactively; implement corrective actions identified to improve performance & availability.
Assisting in troubleshooting patch / release management issues
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Enterprise Technology (ET) ServiceNow COE to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate, and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Global – ITSM/ITOM; GRC; Finance; Legal; HR
Our Ideal Candidate
1 year of experience in scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering. Major in Software Development/Engineering
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Obtained Any of the Following Training:
Degree in Computer Science/Engineering . Major in Software Development/Engineering
Preferred Skills: 
Software Development Lifecycle
Scripting/programming skills
Eager to learn new products and technology
Good communication skills: written and spoken
Role Specific Technical Competencies    
Good understanding of Software Development Lifecyle (SDLC)
Understanding of Agile Methodology
Good scripting skills (JavaScript, Phyton, SQL, HTML, XML)
Understanding of ITIL (optional)
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
.Lead Developer.' ** #UrgentHire,"Role Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain code that meets requirements, is high quality, efficient, reusable and performs efficiently and effectively to provide a great customer experience.
Incorporate standards and best practices, including performance, security, scalability, testability and maintainability.
Candidates will be responsible for automating parts of the development process in a way that tightens the development feedback loop. They should also be able to identify opportunities for automation during the development process.
Participate in code reviews to spot issues around architecture, performance, security, and more.
Translate application storyboards and use cases into functional applications.
Help maintain code quality, organization, and automatization.
Contribute to design patterns and coding standards while being mentored.
Troubleshooting interface software and debugging application codes.
Designing and implementing microservices for various functionalities and service interfaces.
Designing and implementing front-end architecture to support user interface concepts and experience in Micro Frontend.
Experience with design, development and deployment of Cloud First / Cloud Native applications and services.
Hands on experience in CI / CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Monitoring and improving application performance – Grafana, Prometheus, App Dynamics.
Documenting application changes and developing updates.
Use continuous delivery to ship incremental improvements many times per month.
Business
Manage business partner expectations. Ensure delivery to business meeting time, cost, budget and with high quality.
Drive an ecosystem of innovation and enabling business through technology.
Processes
Responsible for business initiatives delivery aligning to SCB defined technology, Agile principles and project management processes and frameworks.
Support Transformation agenda, Business Operating Models, Standards, Finance, Risk Controls and compliance with regulations.
Inculcate the Group’s values and code of conduct in the CCIB Technology Team to ensure adherence to the highest standards of ethics and compliance to relevant policies and processes.
Ensure compliance to the highest standards of business conduct, regulatory requirements and practices defined by internal and external requirements. This includes compliance with local banking laws and anti-money laundering stipulations.
People and Talent
Employ, engage and retain high quality talent to ensure CCIB Client Onboarding T&I is adequately staffed and skilled to deliver on business commitments. 
Lead through example and build appropriate culture and values. Set appropriate tone and expectations for the team and work in collaboration with risk and control partners.
Foster a culture of innovation, transparency and accountability in CCIB Client Onboarding T&I while promoting a “client-first” mentality at all levels.
Ensure role, job descriptions and expectations are clearly set, and periodic feedback provided to the entire team.
Develop and maintain a plan that provides for succession and continuity in the most critical IT management positions.
Risk Management
Identifying and owning architectural, technical and deployment risk, escalating to Product Managers and service owners (as appropriate) with strategies to mitigate that risk.
Be proactive in ensuring regular assurance that the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I Team is performing to acceptable risk levels and control standards.
Act quickly and decisively when any risk and control weakness become apparent and ensure those are addressed within quick / prescribed timeframes and escalated through the relevant committees.
Balance business delivery on time, quality and cost constraints with risks and controls to ensure that they do not materially threaten the Group’s ability to remain within acceptable risk levels.
Ensure business continuity and disaster recovery planning for the entire technology portfolio.
Governance
Responsible to deliver in accordance to T&I policies and ensure governance of the team’s adherence to the same.
Adheres to all governance controls.
Regulatory and Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the CCIB Client Onboarding T&I to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Client Onboarding Portal Product Owners and Country IMO.
Tech Architecture Forum, Information & Cyber Security Forum
Global Technology Services Heads (Production Support, Infrastructure, etc)
Interface teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science / Engineering or a related discipline, graduate degree preferred.
Lead Developer with 10 years’ experience.
AWS Certified Solutions Architect Associate will be an added advantage.
Role Specific Technical Competencies
Proficient in Java 8+ (preferably 11+) with a good knowledge of its ecosystems.
Understanding of Object Orient Programming and Functional Programming paradigms.
Proficient MicroService based architecture and implementation of MicroServices in OCP and AWS platform.
Good knowledge of JavaScript, ReactJS and technologies around it.
Micro Frontend.
Cloud First Cloud Native, AWS.
CI/CD process – Docker and Containerization.
Understanding of code security and code quality.
IT Governance.
IT Systems Management.
Application Monitoring
Grafana, Prometheus, AppDynamics"
Sr. Application Developer -- [21361752] #Immediate#'#Seekbetter,"The Applications Developer is a senior position responsible for accomplishing results through an effort to implement new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to drive applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Utilize in-depth knowledge and skills across multiple Applications Development areas to provide technical oversight across systems and applications
Review and analyze proposed technical solutions for projects
Contribute to formulation of strategies for applications development and other functional areas
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide evaluative judgment based on analysis of factual data in complicated and unique situations
Impact the Applications Development area through monitoring delivery of end results, participate in budget management, and handling day-to-day staff management issues, including resource management and allocation of work within the team/project
Ensure essential procedures are followed and contribute to defining standards negotiating with external parties when necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency, as well as effectively supervise the activity of others and create accountability with those who fail to maintain these standards.
Qualifications:
10 plus years of relevant application development experience in the Financial Service industry
Experience in low latency application development
Experience in No SQL databases
5 plus years of Couchbase Administration experience
Experience in Kafka integration
Experience as senior level in an Applications Development role
Demonstrated leadership skills
Basic knowledge of industry practices and standards
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family Group:
Technology
-------------------------------------------------
Job Family:
Applications Development
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type:
------------------------------------------------------
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi."
"EFX/Commodities Application Support #Immediate, #urgent #Seekbetter","Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
Software Test Engineer (Entry & Senior Roles Available),"The Digital Technology Department in OSIM works together as a team to ensure that the final product is programmed to meet the needs and wants of the consumer, whilst, incorporating the latest and most desirable technology to remain competitive in the market. This department comprises of the Product Owners, UI/UX, Mobile Application, IOT as well as the Digital QA group. If you are forward-looking, able to think out of the box and always hungry to learn about the newest technology, we want you in our team!

Responsibilities:
Work closely with product owners, frontend and backend developers, UX/UI engineers in a scrum team.
Understand functions and features of products from end user’s perspective. Identify and escalate issues of immature design and incomplete understanding.
Plan test activities and derive test cases for new features and impacted features.
Perform manual and automation testing, report bugs and create test reports. Access the readiness of new releases.
Handle user feedbacks, do issues analysis and troubleshooting to optimise test cases and improve app quality.
Prepare mobile Apps documents, e.g. troubleshooting document, user manual, etc.
Be able to work on multiple projects with clear sense of priority and meet project schedule.
Requirements:
At least a Degree with at least 2 - 5 years of working experience
Passionate about quality with QA ownership and user driven mindset.
Hands-on experience in Mobile apps/web/APIs testing etc.
Working experience to JIRA or related tools in an Agile environment.
Able to understand and explain requirements/techinical issues in both English and Mandarin.
Good Communication and interpersonal skills.
Coding experience with automation framework and automation tools will be advantegeous"
"Lead, Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF - (2200018251) #LetsGetToWork. #JobsThatMatter","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
Senior BE Engineer (NodeJS),"About The Team
At Rida, technology is the backbone of our business and the team is passionate and responsible for building a reliable, scaleable and compatible product. We are seeking for an enthusiastic engineer with a strong technical skill set who can work closely with a diverse team and work in a fast environment!
Roles & Responsibility
Maintain and optimize existing systems for scalability, extensibility and performance.
Developing and maintaining all server-side network component, ensuring optimal performance of the database.
Have a strong technical kill sets, participate in the entire backend application lifecycle, focusing on coding and debugging.
Good in code best practices, code reading, code documentation.
Engage cutting-edge technologies to improve applications performance and reliability.
Keeping informed of advancements in the field of Node.js development.
Review code and improve code standard.
Execution of technical project plans, ensuring on-time delivery and ensure the project quality and code quality.
Collaborate with Product Owner, UIUX designer, Mobile engineer and Test Engineer on project.
Assist in the operation of the cloud service, e.g. monitoring, alerting, logging and troubleshooting.
Skills & Requirements
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information science, or similar.
At least 4 years experiences in BE development.
At least 3 years in working with NodeJs, experiences with at least one of cloud computing services GCP or AWS.
Exceptional analytical and problem-solving aptitude.
Knowledge of other technologies such as CI/CD, Docker.
Clean code & architecture capability.
Proactive and accurate communication skill and team work.
Creative thinking & strong sense of responsibility.
Availability to resolve urgent application issue outside of business hours. - Used to develop a multiple countries’s system a plus."
"EFX/Commodities Application Support #urgent #Immediate #JobsThatMatter,","Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
Senior Java Full Stack Developer - Payment Technology - Associate #JobsThatMatter #Immediate,"About Team
J.P. Morgan Payment Technology is looking for a Senior Java Full Stack Software Developer to join our global team for a Greenfield development project. You will be part of the pioneer team in Singapore as we build our payment digital capabilities in the region.
In this role you will be working with state of the art technologies to design and develop a cloud based platform for external and internal development teams to integrate efficiently with the Payments API Ecosystem.
Primary Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable, well thought and defect free solutions.
Participate in Agile ceremonies - standups, retrospective, sprint planning and backlog refinement.
Write enterprise grade code with production stability and resiliency in mind.
Develop deep technical understanding of all the interfaces and communication protocol in the platform.
Build and maintain automated monitoring tools.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Manage hygiene of the application (code smells, vulnerabilities, code coverage).
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the project and product teams.
Experience and Skills Required
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related fields.
Minimum 3 years of experience in backend and frontend technologies (Java, Node, JavaScript, etc.)
Desirable skillset (React, Next.js, Spring Boot, HTML, CSS, Node.js)
Knowledge on architecture and design of enterprise systems will be highly advantageous.
Past understanding of working in and managing production environment is preferred.
Should be detail-oriented, strong analytical and good communication skills are a must.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams across the globe.
Pro-actively participate in designing/solution of the feature/platform
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
"Vice President ,- Software Engineer - Client Connectivity #Immediate #UrgentHire","About the team :
J P Morgan's Equities F&O Application development team is a highly skilled team of technologists responsible for maintaining our cutting-edge Client connectivity and Trading platform applications. The platform provides services ranging from client and sessions management, client connectivity and onboarding, market data, reference data, session and recovery management, routing and back-office system feeds for Global markets.
Working within a team of experienced technologists, the role will participate in all aspects of e-trading development from design and build to deployment with a focus on infrastructure, administrative, operational tasks as detailed in key responsibilities.
The successful candidate must be comfortable working as a front-office specialist in a high pressure, challenging environment and solving business and development tasks via technology in a fast pace: time to market is critical, but without compromising on quality or performance.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including: 
Self-motivated and innovative thinking.
Ability to work in a distributed team environment and partner with other contiguous development and support teams globally.
Strong business focus and a clear understanding that technology is the means to achieving business goals.
Ability to learn and assimilate proprietary systems quickly.
Strong communication skills.
Effective partnership skills to work with the business to ensure requirements are captured correctly.
Ability to lead projects independently and provide guidance to other members of the team.
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment where time to delivery and/or resolution is critical to protect/increase revenue stream.
Requirements :
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Finance.
10+ years of progressive experience in systems and technology, preferably with exposure to financial systems.
Proficiency in Computer science fundamentals - object oriented design, data structures, algorithm, problem solving, complexity analysis.
Server-side development experience with Core Java & multi-threading
Scripting – Shell/Python or Perl
Operating Systems – comfortable with Linux.
Knowledge of software engineering practices for SDLC including coding standards, code reviews, build processes & operations
Development processes (Agile)
Knowledge of FIX protocol – front office messages.
Knowledge or AWS or other cloud offering and technologies would be considered a plus.
Good to have skills :
Experience with REST API and high-performance java libraries and data structure.
Sound understanding of JVM behaviors.
Experience with Messaging broker – Kafka/others
Experience with RDBMS/No-SQL
Knowledge of AWS or other cloud platform"
Full Stack Developer,"Job details
Salary
$7,000 - $12,000 a month
Job Type
Full-time
Permanent
Benefits
Additional leave
Health insurance
Work from home
Full Job Description
< C O D I N G T H E W O R L D >
ZENIKA SINGAPORE IS HIRING!
In Zenika, we are hiring Full Stack Developers
with 3+ years of experience devising and styling responsive web applications.
As a Full Stack developer, you monitor the release of the latest versions of Node.js, Angular, Vue.js, or React. Besides, you can't wait to test them and why not write an article about it?
Coding is good ... Clean coding is better! This is why you apply yourself to develop while respecting good Craft practices!
Moreover, beyond the code, the methodology is also important. Agility, DevOps ... Everything interests you!
Keeping up with the trend; Github, StackOverflow, or even Twitter are part of your daily tools
Concerned and aware of the impact of IT on ecology, you feel concerned by Green IT
You like to share and learn from your peers through internal events that we call Speed Training, technoZaure, RemoteClazz ...,
You don't take yourself too seriously, and you like to work in a fun and friendly environment
You may be a fit if:
You have strong experience writing web apps using popular JS/TS frameworks and libraries such as NodeJS and ReactJS (it is a plus if you know Vue.js, Angular, ExpressJS, RxJS, Redux...).
You are also skilled in using front-end programming tools such as NPM, Webpack, Gulp, Grunt...
You have a strong knowledge of the best UI coding practices (CSS in JS, styled-components, custom hooks, state machines) and architecture patterns (MVC, MVVM, reducer patterns, Flux…).
You are aware that business constraints can lead you to start with NoSQL databases (MongoDB, Neo4j ...
You are familiar with REST, Microservices, and Containerization architecture.
You have a good knowledge of back-end middlewares, such as databases or messaging platforms, and you know how to interact with them.
You have a fundamental knowledge of design and architecture patterns.
You have experience in designing solutions with a focus on performance, security, maintainability and scalability.
Who are we?
Originally, Zenika was first and foremost the idea of a man: a developer, a consultant, passionate about IT.
Carl Azoury, founder and CEO of Zenika, wanted to create a company where he envisioned himself as a developer, in accordance with his values. A company where the consultant would be at the heart of the model.
How? 'Or' What?
By having time to train, working on open source projects or keeping watch. By establishing a double technical and commercial monitoring of proximity.
By being transparent and really taking into account your expectations and your constraints on your next missions.
Our project: Coding the world
Since 2006, Zenika has above all been a company built into a community of expert consultants in Open Source technologies, in a Craftsmanship spirit.
Anticipating changes is the heart of our business, and understanding the needs of the ecosystem of tomorrow is done today.
Technophiles at heart, our consultants play a real role in providing expertise and advice to our clients.
You will understand, Zenika is a company created by techs, for techs!
While joining Zenika Singapore you will get:
Attractive salary package with bonuses
Attractive benefits (Eg: High health insurance coverage, transport allowances, work from home, 20 days annual leave)
Career progression and upskilling opportunities
Internal learning sessions and events
Monthly and yearly internal social events
Integration in our international developers' community (Singapore - France - Canada)
When you join Zenika you join
A highly qualified team of international professionals
In an outstanding people-first culture
Based on sharing, transparency, and fun
Do you like challenges? Do you like freedom?
So, join our passionate team and actively contribute to ""Coding the World"".
Explore open-source technologies & the most innovative methods in the IT world with Zenika today!"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #Immediate #Worknow","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Java Full Stack Developer, - Associate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including: 
Bachelor's degree or equivalent
2 or more years of experience with full stack Java application development and distribution, including frameworks like Spring, JPA, Java 11 features, REST services
Experience with SQL based databases like MySql/Oracle
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Exposure to Cloud based application development platform such as Cloud Foundry/AWS or container based such as Kubernetes
Working proficiency in developmental toolsets
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
Additional Preferred Skills: 
Understanding and knowledge of Data Engineering/Analytics and Machine Learning
Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito, Jest"
"Asst Manager, ASEAN Reg Capital Implementation - (2200011595). #JobsThatMatter","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategic Projects
Support the development of business requirements for regulatory capital platform to align with current and new regulatory requirements
Support operationalisation of Basel IV and FRTB requirements in Singapore and ASEAN region and provide comfort to senior management that business requirements have been appropriately captured in the capital platform
Change management for regulatory capital platform changes to handle new regulations, models, etc
Other critical responsibilities and adhoc deliverables assigned by Finance or Treasury leadership
Effective contribution to tactical and strategic projects that may be assigned
Governance & Risk Management
Perform periodic gap analysis against regulatory requirements to ensure full compliance
Develop remediation plans to strengthen compliance to capital rules
Support the implementation of appropriate controls that ensure critical data elements are subject to the right level of substantiation and escalations are made for downstream issues for resolution
Support BCBS 239 compliance efforts
Support adherence to all internal policies and external regulations and establish a robust governance process to evidence compliance.
Team Engagement & Conduct
Contribute to work climate that promotes team engagement, alignment with group/country strategic deliverables and compliance with Group code of conduct
Contribute to an agile and growth mindset within the team
Stakeholder Management
Effective collaboration with other teams (e.g. Risk, Finance, Compliance, Treasury) to meet common team objectives
Translate complex technical subjects into simple overviews for business and other stakeholder updates
Optimal outcomes from Internal and external audit engagements
Optimal outcomes from regulatory engagements
Key Stakeholders
Internal
Risk – model implementation, reporting and insights
Capital COE/GFS – establishing an effective reporting process. 
Compliance – regulatory compliance and interpretation
GIA – Internal audit engagement
Group Treasury Teams – Policy alignment and sharing of best practices
External
Statutory auditors - to ensure that audits are finalized smoothly
Ratings agency – S&P, Fitch, Moody’s
Others – regulatory requests
Our Ideal Candidate
5+ years of experience including experience in the financial services sector
Degree or professional qualification in the Financial Services sector with strong experience in Capital reporting
Should have knowledge on Capital and RWA per MAS rules and Basel standards.
Should possess basic knowledge of Financial markets products offered.
Should be conversant with MI tools and generating insights from large amounts of data
Should be a resilient, self starter with well developed communication & inter-personal skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Sound judgement is required in identifying implementation and systems issues and suggesting measures to plug them.
Judgement and complexity in the job arise when dealing with other stakeholders in the project team. Working with FOT, ITO, GFS and risk functions in a collaborative manner and implementing the appropriate solutions.
Judgement & complexity arises in interpretation of regulatory matters and how they translate into a computation, systems and reporting solution.
Development of the Capital and liquidity MIS and reporting
Development of regional stress testing capabilities
Development of recovery and resolution capabilities
Overall success of strategic projects or enhancements
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Asst Manager, ASEAN Reg Capital Implementation, - (2200011595) #Immediate","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategic Projects
Support the development of business requirements for regulatory capital platform to align with current and new regulatory requirements
Support operationalisation of Basel IV and FRTB requirements in Singapore and ASEAN region and provide comfort to senior management that business requirements have been appropriately captured in the capital platform
Change management for regulatory capital platform changes to handle new regulations, models, etc
Other critical responsibilities and adhoc deliverables assigned by Finance or Treasury leadership
Effective contribution to tactical and strategic projects that may be assigned
Governance & Risk Management
Perform periodic gap analysis against regulatory requirements to ensure full compliance
Develop remediation plans to strengthen compliance to capital rules
Support the implementation of appropriate controls that ensure critical data elements are subject to the right level of substantiation and escalations are made for downstream issues for resolution
Support BCBS 239 compliance efforts
Support adherence to all internal policies and external regulations and establish a robust governance process to evidence compliance.
Team Engagement & Conduct
Contribute to work climate that promotes team engagement, alignment with group/country strategic deliverables and compliance with Group code of conduct
Contribute to an agile and growth mindset within the team
Stakeholder Management
Effective collaboration with other teams (e.g. Risk, Finance, Compliance, Treasury) to meet common team objectives
Translate complex technical subjects into simple overviews for business and other stakeholder updates
Optimal outcomes from Internal and external audit engagements
Optimal outcomes from regulatory engagements
Key Stakeholders
Internal
Risk – model implementation, reporting and insights
Capital COE/GFS – establishing an effective reporting process. 
Compliance – regulatory compliance and interpretation
GIA – Internal audit engagement
Group Treasury Teams – Policy alignment and sharing of best practices
External
Statutory auditors - to ensure that audits are finalized smoothly
Ratings agency – S&P, Fitch, Moody’s
Others – regulatory requests
Our Ideal Candidate
5+ years of experience including experience in the financial services sector
Degree or professional qualification in the Financial Services sector with strong experience in Capital reporting
Should have knowledge on Capital and RWA per MAS rules and Basel standards.
Should possess basic knowledge of Financial markets products offered.
Should be conversant with MI tools and generating insights from large amounts of data
Should be a resilient, self starter with well developed communication & inter-personal skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Sound judgement is required in identifying implementation and systems issues and suggesting measures to plug them.
Judgement and complexity in the job arise when dealing with other stakeholders in the project team. Working with FOT, ITO, GFS and risk functions in a collaborative manner and implementing the appropriate solutions.
Judgement & complexity arises in interpretation of regulatory matters and how they translate into a computation, systems and reporting solution.
Development of the Capital and liquidity MIS and reporting
Development of regional stress testing capabilities
Development of recovery and resolution capabilities
Overall success of strategic projects or enhancements
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Software Engineer J39744,"Software application development opportunity with Singapore Software Solutioning company using ReactJS technologies:
Salary package up to $8,200 + AWS + VB
Exploring advanced technologies such as Web 3.0 / Blockchain / Crypto 
Coding in a team and harmonious working environment
5 days work week with flexible arrangement (work from home arrangement)
Office located nearby MRT station (walking distance)
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test, deploy and maintain web application according to clients' requirement
Actively participate in all aspects of the software development process
Partner with other software engineers, business analyst, and software architects to plan, design, develop, test and maintain web application
Deploy systems to production and provide post-implementation support
Participate in peer-reviews of solution designs & related code
Analyze & resolve technical & application problems
Involve in full Agile development cycle
Requirements:
min. Degree in Computer Science / Information Technology / any relevant discipline
min. 3 years & above of coding experience using ReactJS
Skills in JavaScript, HTML, CSS
Familiar with React framework
To apply, please send your updated resume to spvn(at)scientecpersonnel.com by indicating Job ID J39744 to fasten the process.
Ng Kee Hung (Vickus) - R2091423
ScienTec Consulting Pte Ltd – 11C5781"
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization --- #Urgent #WorkNow #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Software Engineer, Analyst, Trade Surveillance - Singapore #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire #Worknow'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
Application Developer - Real Time Payments (L3) #Seekbetter #WorkNow #Urgent #Immediate,"As an experienced professional in Software Engineering, you'll shape the technology solutions that drive Level 3 support and development initiatives across the region, Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll interact with colleagues in various lines of businesses to learn about challenges and opportunities, and translate that insight into high-quality solutions. In addition to working with the development team to create new solutions, you'll help optimize existing technology and identify new capabilities to ensure the applications run smoothly. While your role requires deep technological skills it also hinges on teamwork and leadership. You'll offer clear guidance and feedback to your Software Engineer colleagues, while promoting the values, culture, and brand of JPMorgan Chase & Co
Primary Responsibilities
Lead the Level 3 team during the US hours as well as support the EMEA and APAC evening during US hours
Drive the bug fixes and small enhancements
Drive the audit, hygine of the application and production deployments
Drive incident reviews with relevant stakeholders, ensure the action items are tracked to closure
Provide leadership within the support team and influence stakeholders in line with the our product and future strategy
Document the client requirements, changes in market behaviors and drive that through the core team for product enhancements
Manage the documentation review and approval process with the stakeholders
Take ownership of the bug fixes and small enhancement and associated artefacts
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the production management, project and product teams
Provide guidance and support to team members
Prepare and deliver training sessions to the business users and production management
Experience and Skills Required
You'll also play a crucial role in identifying, improving, and developing technology solutions that drive our strategic goals. This is a tremendous opportunity to learn about high-priority initiatives and collaborate with colleagues throughout the firm. Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills. No matter where your career ultimately takes you, you'll make a meaningful impact and lasting connections with outstanding colleagues and mentors.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelors degree in Engineering, computer sciences or equivalent. with minimum of 1 year in BFSI industry. Exposure to core banking, payments is a must have skill
Experience working on major global transformation initiatives, for example SWIFT GPI, ISO 20022, Real Time Payments etc
Proficiency in business applications, data usage, and management
Ability to liaison between lines of business and the development team, while working with a wide range of stakeholders and collaborating with your team
Ability to work collaboratively in teams and develop meaningful relationships to achieve common goals
Experience obtaining requirements from business users and subject matter experts, reviewing business priorities, and/or analyzing options & risks
Ability to code in Java, Oracle, Microservices based architecture with experience in distributed cache and cloud computing
Experience in articulating functional system requirements specifications
Should be Detail-oriented, strong analytical and communication skills are a must
Ability to synthesize large amounts of information, and a curiosity to ask appropriate questions to fully develop business and functional requirements.
Pro-actively lead/participate in design/solution architecting of target state
Ability to interface directly with Senior Business Stakeholders and users with a view to influence and drive consensus.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Participate in creation of detailed functional specifications with AS-IS process flows and target state processes
Provide technical support throughout the project lifecycle, from requirements/functional specs to reviewing SIT and UAT test cases, and supporting all the testing phases.
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
"IT System Analyst (Java) - Permanent, MNC","The incumbent will be part of the delivery team to improve efficiency and reliability of the current platform. He/She will responsible for project design, development and implementation as well as liaising with stakeholders.
Client Details
We are partnering with a well-established leading MNC organisation in the logistics industry, headquartered in Singapore with a strong presence of over 50 locations in the world.
Description
Job responsibilities:
Gathering user requirements and analyse comprehensively by working closely with the team
Conduct systems testing based on requirement gathered to ensure bug-free programs
Assist Project Manager to prepare project timeline and documentations
Able to perform operations support to ensure smooth running of the systems
Resolution to problems and handling critical/urgent issues involving decision making
Able to provide training to new employees
Profile
Job requirements:
Degree/Diploma in Computer Engineering, Computer Science or related field
Posses good technical analysis and problem-solving skills
Good communication skills to liaise with both internal and external stakeholders
Experience in Java8, SpringBoot, Angular will be an advantage
No experience are welcome to apply
Job Offer
Permanent role
Well established organisation in the logistics industry
Attractive remuneration and benefits package
To apply online please click the 'Apply' button below. For a confidential discussion about this role please contact Cheryl Ang on +65 6416 9884"
Principal Software Engineer - Web SDK - #Urgent #Immediate,"Position Overview
Autodesk is looking for a Principal Software Engineer to join a data team within Data Platform & Services (DPS). You will be working with Autodesk Data Platform Product Analytics (ADPPA), Product Data Capture team. This is a great opportunity to join a team that delivers both internal and customer facing applications and services that provide the data collection needs of all data scientists, data analysts and data engineers throughout the organization. You will have the opportunity to understand the entire data platform from product instrumentation through to business analytics, machine learning, and data-driven products.
As a Principal Engineer, you will be joining an incredibly talented and seasoned engineering team. You will have the opportunity to work with many new and exciting technologies and frameworks used in our data platform.
We are looking for people who are as excited about data technology as we are. You can be part of improving quality of our products across all aspects of our core data platform and see your work drive the business.
Responsibilities
Break down a large problem into smaller components and provide a clear solution for each piece
Recommend appropriate technologies to be used to achieve productivity and efficiency
Design and build reusable components, libraries, and tools for web to instrument and ingest product data effectively
Collaborate with Product Manager, Engineering Manager, and other stakeholders to deliver features according to agreed scope and schedule
Collaborate with QA engineers to define software testing strategy
Ensure the quality, performance, and compatibility of the product using test automation
Promote and accelerate the usage and integration of our component by conducting training sessions, providing support, writing clear product documentation, and troubleshooting issues
Provide guides and direction to other engineers on development processes and product architecture
Review source codes contributed by other engineers
Minimum Qualifications
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skill
Extensive knowledge and understanding of JavaScript
Experience in writing JavaScript library modules with cross-browser compatibility
Solid understanding in HTML & CSS
Proficient in writing automated tests with any testing framework
Proficient with distributed version control system (preferably git)
Team player who is willing to help and collaborate well with other team members
Excellent communication skills (written and spoken)
Ability to work with minimal supervision and to guide other team members to achieve goals
Familiar with non-functional testing such as load, performance and resiliency testing
Good command of English (Speaking, Writing and Reading)
Degree in computer science or related field
Preferred Qualifications
Experience writing NodeJs library module
Knowledge in any of other programming language (Java/Ruby/Python)
Experience working with product analytics services (Google Analytics, Amplitude, Mixpanel, etc)
Good understanding of data architecture fundamentals
Proficiency in writing SQL queries
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Software Engineer, Trade Surveillance, Associate--#JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of BAU Sage Analytics and Surveillance system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities, and migrate the BAU alerts/reports to the new strategic platform.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Support the migration of the existing BAU Compliance Web trade surveillance system developed on FLEX/Java Script Web UI and Sybase SQL back-end, to the new strategic platform
Be part of the Global Surveillance Technology AD organization spread across of US and APAC to provide end to end design, build and delivery
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
4 years of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Ext-JS, D3.JS or Angular-JS
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Hudson, Jenkins or Gradle
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Scala or Python experience, SpotFire and Cloud Technology
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related echo systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflows"
Mobile Application Developer(Android/iOS),"JOB DESCRIPTION
Bachelors degree in technology or related field required OR equitable experience
3years in native Mobile applications development on Android OS
At least 1 year in native Mobile applications development on iOS with good knowledge of the architecture of iOS and how to best utilize it
Strong knowledge of Kotlin, Kotlin core aspects, exception handing, understanding of how Kotlin converts to Java
Very good knowledge of the architecture of Android and how to best utilize it
Good understanding of MVVM architecture design
Strong knowledge of hybrid mobile design principles, patterns, and best practices
Strong expertise in web services, and enterprise architectures, application development in Java and distributed system's engineering
Experience in implementing security in mobile apps
Experience in performance optimization of mobile apps
Experience in consuming RESTful services, JSON, and HTTP
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills"
"Tech Lead, Recommendation Architecture #Immediate #UrgentHire #WorkNow* #JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
Our Recommendation Architecture Team is responsible for building up and optimizing the architecture for our recommendation system to provide the most stable and best experience for our TikTok users.
Lead a small team of software engineers working on recommendation system;
Build and maintain high performance online services for TikTok recommendation system；
Build extremely efficient and reliable data pipelines for candidates generation, profile generation, training examples generation, realtime online training, etc;
Build globalized large-scale recommendation system;
Design and develop high performance computing frameworks and storage systems.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or above, majoring in Computer Science, or related fields, with 3+ years of experience building scalable system;
Experience in programming, included but not limited to, the following programming languages: C, C++, Java or Golang;
Effective communication skills and a sense of ownership and drive;
Experienced in at least one area of the following areas: personalized recommendations, search engine, machine learning, distributed storage system, big data frameworks is a plus.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Asst Manager, ASEAN Reg Capital Implementation, - (2200011595) #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion. Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategic Projects
Support the development of business requirements for regulatory capital platform to align with current and new regulatory requirements
Support operationalisation of Basel IV and FRTB requirements in Singapore and ASEAN region and provide comfort to senior management that business requirements have been appropriately captured in the capital platform
Change management for regulatory capital platform changes to handle new regulations, models, etc
Other critical responsibilities and adhoc deliverables assigned by Finance or Treasury leadership
Effective contribution to tactical and strategic projects that may be assigned
Governance & Risk Management
Perform periodic gap analysis against regulatory requirements to ensure full compliance
Develop remediation plans to strengthen compliance to capital rules
Support the implementation of appropriate controls that ensure critical data elements are subject to the right level of substantiation and escalations are made for downstream issues for resolution
Support BCBS 239 compliance efforts
Support adherence to all internal policies and external regulations and establish a robust governance process to evidence compliance.
Team Engagement & Conduct
Contribute to work climate that promotes team engagement, alignment with group/country strategic deliverables and compliance with Group code of conduct
Contribute to an agile and growth mindset within the team
Stakeholder Management
Effective collaboration with other teams (e.g. Risk, Finance, Compliance, Treasury) to meet common team objectives
Translate complex technical subjects into simple overviews for business and other stakeholder updates
Optimal outcomes from Internal and external audit engagements
Optimal outcomes from regulatory engagements
Key Stakeholders
Internal
Risk – model implementation, reporting and insights
Capital COE/GFS – establishing an effective reporting process. 
Compliance – regulatory compliance and interpretation
GIA – Internal audit engagement
Group Treasury Teams – Policy alignment and sharing of best practices
External
Statutory auditors - to ensure that audits are finalized smoothly
Ratings agency – S&P, Fitch, Moody’s
Others – regulatory requests
Our Ideal Candidate
5+ years of experience including experience in the financial services sector
Degree or professional qualification in the Financial Services sector with strong experience in Capital reporting
Should have knowledge on Capital and RWA per MAS rules and Basel standards.
Should possess basic knowledge of Financial markets products offered.
Should be conversant with MI tools and generating insights from large amounts of data
Should be a resilient, self starter with well developed communication & inter-personal skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Sound judgement is required in identifying implementation and systems issues and suggesting measures to plug them.
Judgement and complexity in the job arise when dealing with other stakeholders in the project team. Working with FOT, ITO, GFS and risk functions in a collaborative manner and implementing the appropriate solutions.
Judgement & complexity arises in interpretation of regulatory matters and how they translate into a computation, systems and reporting solution.
Development of the Capital and liquidity MIS and reporting
Development of regional stress testing capabilities
Development of recovery and resolution capabilities
Overall success of strategic projects or enhancements
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
Solutions Consultant,"Solutions Consultant
This position is responsible for providing consulting and technical expertise to customers in implementation and application of ABP Solution’s business software solutions. The customer base consists of public and private sector agencies and businesses employing diverse information management technologies.
Responsibilities:
Implementation of the company’s solutions for customers:
User requirements and workflow reviews
Data definition
Data migration
Development and implementation of custom and integration requirements
Development of User Acceptance test requirements
System installation and configuration
User acceptance tests
Conduct User training
Project documentation
Support System roll-out
Provide customer support
Assist in pre-Sales activities:
Product demonstrations
Preparation of technical proposals
Requirements:
university degree or Diploma in Information Systems/Computer Science or related field
Candidates with related experience in implementing and supporting enterprise business solutions will be preferred
Possess excellent analytical, organizational, and problem-solving aptitude
Excellent written and oral communications skills
Effective presentation skills
Good interpersonal skills and high level of personal integrity
Good knowledge of:
Application design, development, and implementation of database projects
Data management technologies and standards
Project management and SDLC
Good knowledge of (at least 2) of the following:
Java
Microsoft .NET, ASP
Python
C; C++
Database design and development with Microsoft SQL Server DBMS
WEB application development
Spatial Data management technologies
Business/Systems analysis
Company & Office Adress
ABP Solutions Pte Ltd,
2 Venture Drive #06-11, Vision Exchange, Singapore 608526
(Opposite Jurong East MRT)
5 Day work week with 14 days annual leave"
"Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting -- Vice President #Worknow","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As an Senior Java Developer, you play a key role in designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE , Cloud , & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
BS/BA degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Software Engineer, Speech & Audio","Founded in 2012, ByteDance's mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. With a suite of more than a dozen products, including TikTok, Helo, and Resso, as well as platforms specific to the China market, including Toutiao, Douyin, and Xigua, ByteDance has made it easier and more fun for people to connect with, consume, and create content.
About The Team
Our team provides industry-leading ML algorithm capabilities and complete voice product solutions for all business lines, including toB business as well. We empower businesses in the fields of audio understanding, audio creation, music retrieval and generation, song synthesis, ML education, etc., and solve basic problems such as human-computer voice interaction, audio and video content understanding and creation, and education intelligence.
Responsibilities
Architect, design and implement large scale distributed system
Serve ML/Deep Learning models as online services
Work with internal/external customers to design and implement elegant APIs
Deploy, monitor and troubleshoot production systems
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or equivalent practical experience
Proficient in at least one programming languages (C/C++/Go/Python/Java)
Experience in large scale databases including both SQL and NoSQL
Knowledge of Linux/Networks administration and troubleshooting
Solid knowledge in distributed systems, algorithms, and networks
Track record in ACM/NOI/IOI/TopCoder is a plus
ByteDance is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At ByteDance, our mission is to inspire creativity and enrich life. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
"Software Engr. - Central Product Platform, - #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. TikTok has global offices including Los Angeles, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul and Tokyo.
The Central Product Platform team provides centralised platforms and services for our products. We are building end-to-end solutions that highly impact the core components of the product, including but not limited to: Identity & Access Platform, Notification Platform, Geolocation Platform, Social Platform, Middle Platform Infrastructure. All platforms need to handle information at a massive scale and extend well beyond business scenes.
We are building large-scale general shared technology platforms, supporting various products with the capability to do rapid iteration and quick exploration. At the same time, we are also working on engineering challenges across scalability, reliability, security and system performance, as well as a wide variety of business challenges.
On this team, you will be a big-picture thinker and strategic team-player with a passion for doing what is right.
Responsibilities:
Design, test, deploy and maintain backend services and core components of distributed systems.
Conduct system designs and code reviews.
Collaborate with other engineering teams to elevate technology and consistently apply best practices.
Constantly evaluate and improve efficiency, scalability, and stability of our systems.
Qualifications
BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related areas.
3+ years experience in one or more programming languages such as Go, Java, C++, Python etc.
Abilities to quickly ramp up on new technologies, tools and domain knowledge.
Experience in backend server development and database solutions.
Good problem-solving, analytical thinking capabilities and exceptional attention to details.
Good communication and collaboration skills.
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We believe individuals shouldn't be disadvantaged because of their background or identity, but instead should be considered based on their strengths and experience. We are passionate about this and hope you are too."
Software Engineer - Vice President #URGENT #JobsThatMatter #Worknow #UrgentHire #Immediate,"Job Description
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 10 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"Analyst, - Development (WSP) - #UrgentHire","Role Responsibilities
Our Technology & Innovation (T&I) function is at the heart of shaping the bank for the future and serving our clients digitally across the globe. We are responsible for the systems development and technology infrastructure of the Bank, defining, innovating, and implementing digital agendas across functions, especially in our client services. Our team helps unlock new banking experiences for clients, while improving our operational effectiveness and enhance existing offerings.
We are focused on building your digital skills and adaptability necessary to be future-ready. You’ll be exposed to a diverse portfolio of projects in your allocated domain will help to deliver efficiencies and automation, introduce global platforms, machine learning, and bring forth intelligent technology.
You’ll be constantly learning and sharing with your peers:
Creating and designing cutting edge tools and applications that will redefine the future of banking
Work in a truly Agile environment, as part of scrum teams that are striving to solve customer challenges
Play a critical role in client journeys that help us make faster decisions to enhance the end-to-end client experience and achieve outcomes that are most valuable to our clients
Our Ideal Candidate 
If you are passionate about technology and customer experience, and possess traits and experience most of the below, we’d love to hear from you:
Adaptive to changing situations and enjoy collaborating with global teams in a diverse multi-cultural environment.
Curious and open-minded.
Strong foundational knowledge of Algorithms, Data Structures, OOPs concepts and frameworks
Passionate for solving challenging problems and learning new skills, coding languages.
Experience with one or more general purpose programming languages including but not limited to JavaScript (ReactJS, React-Redux, nodeJS), TypeScript, Python.
Experience in working with either front end and/or back-end technologies and frameworks.
Experience in one or more Cloud Technologies. "
"Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer - Vice President #Urgent #Immediate, #Worknow","Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
Software Engineer - Liquidity Technology -- #WorkNow,"As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products.
You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
This role is for a Software Engineer responsible for the development of Global Liquidity applications. A key part of the liquidity management program is the delivery of a technology solution to perform cash management and treasury functions in the firm. Technical challenges in the technology space include constantly increasing level of Straight Through Processing (STP) with low latency/high volume data feeds, multi-dimensional aggregation & presentation, strong transaction management for absolute data integrity, and effective fault-tolerance for maximum availability.
The candidate will be expected to perform both the technical analysis & design and the development of end user applications and data feeds within the Cash & Payment Services Architecture. Development will be predominantly in Java, as well as SQL and HTML/JavaScript, adhering to Lean & Agile delivery methodologies. Development will take place in a continuous integration environment leveraging tools and processes to ultimately increase the control, quality and business value of the development team products.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree or equivalent experience
Minimum 8+ years of Software Development work experience
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems 
Working proficiency in developmental tool sets
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Proficiency in one or more general purpose programming languages  Java, JavaScript, SQL
Knowledge of Spring Framework, Java 8 features, REST, AngularJS, UNIX shell scripting will be an added advantage
Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing techniques
A broad range of exposure to distributed messaging systems such as Kafka, will be an added advantage
Exposure to Lean & Agile Software Methodologies
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g. subversion, git), build automation (e.g. Maven), continuous integration (e.g. Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g. cucumber, FitNesse), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Scrum Master. #UrgentHire,"About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Facilitates Agile ceremonies, including Daily Team Stand-up, Sprint Retrospective and Sprint Planning.
Removes obstacles or impediments to the team’s progress, escalates to Delivery Owner and/ or Head as required.
Coaches & mentors team members in adopting Agile practices and a truly Agile mindset including ownership, self-organisation & continuous improvement.
Creates a collaborative environment by coaching the team to employ Agile best practices, ensures all tools and methods in place for teams’ success.
Contributes in Scrum of Scrums to resolve blockers, propose improvements & discuss lessons learnt.
Protecting the team from outside distractions and interferences.
Ensuring a good relationship between the team and product owner as well as others outside the team
Business
Regulatory reporting knowledge – G20 Regulations (Dodd-Frank, EMIR, HKMA, etc), MiFID II, SFTR, SEC
Financial Markets products knowledge
Processes
Be able to comprehend and map complicated interdependencies between application and infrastructure components.
Be able to think laterally across multiple technology types and define patterns of usage.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Regulatory Reporting Delivery Squads to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Other Responsibilities
A plus if have strong knowledge and previous experience in end-to-end design, and subsequent support of large-scale data processing systems
Familiarity and confidence working in an “agile” development environment.
Who can drive / facilitate the requirements and development effort with the business.
Our Ideal Candidate
12+ years of management experience.
Certifications - Scaled Agile Framework / Certified Scrum Master / PMI-ACP
Knowledge of agile methodology and frameworks like Scrum, Kanban, etc.
Tools - JIRA, Confluence, Sharepoint, Teamsite, Clarity
Known to Bank Processes, Teams, Tools.
Known to Software Development Life Cycle Processes related to Agile methodology and Classic Methodology.
Known to the Processes involved in Onboarding the infrastructure.
Known to the Change, Release processes
Team management - Estimation, Metrics reporting, anticipating risks, issues and providing early warnings
Experience of working in an environment with heavy usage of automated testing and DevOps tooling.
Good skills to coach team how to follow agile scrum, which really works.
Ability to take and understand commitment to deliver the product on time.
Know about the value of metrics and incremental delivery.
Knowledge about tasks, backlog tracking, burndown metrics, velocity, user stories etc.
Good knowledge of PowerPoint and Visio.
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. "
"Senior Software Engineer, Localization #Urgent #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire#WorkNow #UrgentHire","Position Overview
The Senior Software Engineer will be responsible for the improvement and optimization of the internationalization for the Autodesk web/mobile applications and cloud services through a close collaboration with the products software development teams. The Senior Software Engineer will also be responsible for development and maintenance of tools, processes and data required for localization to enable scalable and efficient production of localized Autodesk products.
The successful candidate is well versed in web and mobile development, process automation and technology and is capable to provide engineering support to external vendor teams. This role requires an individual with excellent analytical and problem-solving skills as well as strong interpersonal and communication skills.
Responsibilities
Creates and maintains tools, automated processes and documentation needed for effective, scalable software localization and testing
Keeps current with latest trends and technologies to anticipate future development needs and requirements
Drives and contributes actively to the design, development and deployment of new and alternative ways to deliver translated products to the customers
Analyzes and evaluates products for international readiness with a strong focus on web/mobile applications and cloud services. Provides recommendations on areas to be addressed and can contribute to the development efforts required
Takes an active part in advising and influencing development teams on how to increase the level of globalization targeting an exceptional international user experience as well as stability and cost effectiveness of the localization process
Provides second level technical support to the localization vendor engineering teams
Minimum Qualifications
B.S. or M.S. in Computer Science
5+ years of web and mobile development experience
Experience with software development frameworks, programming and scripting languages, with some or all of the following: Scala, Java, Akka, Slick, Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, C#, QT, Perl
Experience with Micro Services architecture, development and monitoring (eg: Grafana)
Advanced knowledge of internationalization good practices and experience with internationalization of web and mobile applications
Knowledge of databases SQL (MySQL) and NoSQL, Content Management Systems, localization tools
Experience in cloud services development with Amazon Web Services, Windows Azure or equivalent cloud technologies is desirable
Process automation experience
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with the ability to develop creative solutions
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience collaborating in a multicultural dispersed team to deliver projects, sometimes responsible for leading initiatives
Experience in AI or ML is a plus
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law."
"Vice President, - Software Engineer - Client Connectivity #Seekbetter","About the team :
J P Morgan's Equities F&O Application development team is a highly skilled team of technologists responsible for maintaining our cutting-edge Client connectivity and Trading platform applications. The platform provides services ranging from client and sessions management, client connectivity and onboarding, market data, reference data, session and recovery management, routing and back-office system feeds for Global markets.
Working within a team of experienced technologists, the role will participate in all aspects of e-trading development from design and build to deployment with a focus on infrastructure, administrative, operational tasks as detailed in key responsibilities.
The successful candidate must be comfortable working as a front-office specialist in a high pressure, challenging environment and solving business and development tasks via technology in a fast pace: time to market is critical, but without compromising on quality or performance.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including: 
Self-motivated and innovative thinking.
Ability to work in a distributed team environment and partner with other contiguous development and support teams globally.
Strong business focus and a clear understanding that technology is the means to achieving business goals.
Ability to learn and assimilate proprietary systems quickly.
Strong communication skills.
Effective partnership skills to work with the business to ensure requirements are captured correctly.
Ability to lead projects independently and provide guidance to other members of the team.
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment where time to delivery and/or resolution is critical to protect/increase revenue stream.
Requirements :
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Finance.
10+ years of progressive experience in systems and technology, preferably with exposure to financial systems.
Proficiency in Computer science fundamentals - object oriented design, data structures, algorithm, problem solving, complexity analysis.
Server-side development experience with Core Java & multi-threading
Scripting – Shell/Python or Perl
Operating Systems – comfortable with Linux.
Knowledge of software engineering practices for SDLC including coding standards, code reviews, build processes & operations
Development processes (Agile)
Knowledge of FIX protocol – front office messages.
Knowledge or AWS or other cloud offering and technologies would be considered a plus.
Good to have skills :
Experience with REST API and high-performance java libraries and data structure.
Sound understanding of JVM behaviors.
Experience with Messaging broker – Kafka/others
Experience with RDBMS/No-SQL
Knowledge of AWS or other cloud platform"
"Regulatory Technology, - Database Application Developer #JobsThatMatter #Urgent #UrgentHire #Immediate #UrgentHire","About J.P. Morgan Corporate& Investment Bank:  
J.P. Morgan's Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) is a global leader across Banking, Markets and Investor Services. The world's most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. Managing $18 trillion of assets under custody and $393 billion in deposits, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world.
The Team:
The CIB Regulatory Technology team has responsibility for providing strategic technology leadership, application development and production support to CIB wide regulatory agenda. The team has a large book of work with key objective of Simplifying Technology Architecture & Operating Model, Providing Scalable solutions & Resilient Infrastructure, and Improving Data Quality and Management to support Business Growth and new/changing Regulatory Requirements.
Role Description:
Over last few years Regulatory team has built or taken over multiple applications. This role is to work on an in-house developed regulatory reporting platform in Investment Banking Technology as a Senior Application Developer. This role is based in Singapore and is a part of a global regulatory reporting team which is spread across Asia, EMEA and North America. Candidate will be expected to have strong technical skills, designing skills, expert level technical knowledge, possess excellent inter-personal skills
Key Responsibilities:
Design and develop applications in Regulatory reporting space.
Translate business requirements to a high-level technical design and implementation
Articulate use cases and create in-depth analysis to support business & product
Develop, Deploy and support large-scale distributed applications in a mission-critical production environment
Key Skills:
3 years of  building medium to large scale Database applications and enterprise Data platforms handling critical data.
Knowledge in RDBMS - Oracle 11, Oracle 12c.
Inclination and knowledge in Query Performance Tuning techniques.
Working experience in UNIX Shell Scripting.
Interface with production support teams for issues if any reported.
Strong track records in Designing scalable solutions. Hands-on with latest development trends in IT Industry.
Knowledge of modern development lifecycles, such as Agile and iterative development.
Desirable (but not essential):
Good to have knowledge on Big Data & Cloud Technologies.
Good to have knowledge on Kubernetes and Continuous Integration Servers (e.g., Jenkins, TeamCity)
Qualifications:
The successful candidate should also possess the following attributes:
Bachelors degree in Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Information Systems
Strong work ethic, self-starter who is creative with a ‘can-do’ attitude
·Ability to contribute or handle multiple projects independently, while maintaining a high degree of communication and escalation
Team player, comfortable working in a fast-paced environment
Excellent problem solving skills and ability to work with tight deadlines
Strong Organization skills, be able to prioritize task based on priority level
Excellent communications skills."
Cloud Server Specialist - VP - Hybrid - 22525437,"Responsibilities
The Engineering Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for leading a variety of engineering activities including the design, acquisition and deployment of hardware, software and network infrastructure in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead efforts to ensure quality standards are being met within existing and planned framework.
Responsibilities:
Serve as a technology subject matter expert for internal and external stakeholders and provide direction for all firm mandated controls and compliance initiatives, all projects within the group and in creating a technology domain roadmap
Ensure that all integration of functions meet business goals
Define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process enhancements
Recommend product customization for system integration
Identify problem causality, business impact and root causes
Exhibit knowledge of how own specialty area contributes to the business and apply knowledge of competitors, products and services
Advise or mentor junior team members
Impact the engineering function by influencing decisions through advice, counsel or facilitating services
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
8-10 years of relevant experience in an Engineering role
Experience working in Financial Services or a large complex and/or global environment
Project Management experience
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Comprehensive knowledge of design metrics, analytics tools, benchmarking activities and related reporting to identify best practices
Demonstrated analytic/diagnostic skills
Ability to work in a matrix environment and partner with virtual teams
Ability to work independently, multi-task, and take ownership of various parts of a project or initiative
Ability to work under pressure and manage to tight deadlines or unexpected changes in expectations or requirements
Proven track record of operational process change and improvement
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
Cloud platform SME for DBaaS (Database as a Service) . Primarily responsible for DBaaS Cloud platform operations for OraaS (Oracle as a Service),MaaS (MongoDB as a Service), MSaaS (MS-SQL as a Service).
The responsibility includes
Install, configure and manage UNIX and WINTEL servers on cloud platform
Experience in Windows Administration , Configuration Management , Continuous Integration and Continuous Deployment (CI/CD) and Cloud Implementations
Experience in VM, AWS EC2 instance, OpenStack instance, Azure Instance Installing and Configuring Servers based on requirements from client.
Experience in patching, Package Installation and configuration on RedHat LINUX and WINDOWS servers.
Experience on OS upgrade on both LINUX and WINDOWS
Experience in Automation using Ansible, Autoban, Chef, Python, PowerShell Script.
Monitoring and troubleshooting performance related activities           
Intimate Knowledge of the WINDOWS/Unix Operating System and system administration best practices
Understanding of Oracle RAC and MSSQL Server database installation and design
Strong knowledge of File system/ASM storage
Knowledge in system monitoring such as TIVOLI, SCOM, BMC etc
Strong knowledge in configurations management and security product’s
A solid understanding and working experience in LDAP and Active Directory
Must possess knowledge of networking concepts like TCP/IP, OSI model, IP addressing and subnetting, Firewalls, etc.,
Skilled in performing detailed RCA, Performance analysis and fine tuning.
Experience in overseeing patch and security compliance of UNIX servers and WIDOWS
Adequate exposure to any public cloud deployments (IaaS and PaaS), preferably Microsoft Azure, AWS
Experience supporting in HP or equivalent Intel/AMD based servers
A solid understanding of networking/distributed computing environment concepts; understands
Strong experience WINDOWS/Unix/LINUX Operating System and system administration best practices
8-10 Years of Oracle RAC and MSSQL Server database installation and design
Strong knowledge of File system/ASM storage
Strong Knowledge in system monitoring such as TIVOLI, SCOM, BMC etc
Strong Knowledge in automation tools such as Ansible, Chef, DMA etc.
Strong knowledge in OpenShift, ECS, PCF
Knowledge in private , public and hybrid cloud operations, Deployment of EC2 instances."
"Software Engineer, Senior Associate #JobsThaMatter","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 6 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
"Finance Technology – Regulatory Reporting Software Engineer, - Associate #JPM #Immediate'","Job Description:
The Finance Risk Data and Controls (FRDC) Technology organization is seeking strong engineer who wants to join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products in Regulatory Reporting Technology function.
The ideal candidate enjoys building, supporting, and the evolution of software applications, and has a strong understanding of designing and building applications in a variety of technologies as well as manage communication with stakeholders.
In this role, a successful candidate will:
Manage and support a portfolio of production applications which includes vendor, in-house, on premise, and SaaS applications
Make sound architectural decisions around Regulatory Reporting application components
Identify gaps and weaknesses in existing applications and design and implement remediation of these gaps
Work to improve the stability of applications in the production environment
Ensure changes to the applications follow a disciplined change management processes including all documentation, reviews, and approval steps
Ensure adherence to design and coding standards
Define and execute test cases for quality of deliverables
Liaise with stakeholders from various teams which includes Finance, Corporate Controllers, Product Controllers within the region as well as global for all cycles (development, testing, implementation, post release)
Qualifications:
BS/BA Degree in Computer Science/Finance or equivalent
Application architecture analysis and design
3 years or more of experience in SQL, preferable in Oracle PL/SQL
2 years or more in Python or Java or equivalent development experience
Hands on experience in writing complex SQL queries and defining DB objects.
Good Knowledge on Stored Procedures/Packages, Functions and Triggers
Applicant must have strong English and Mandarin written to be able to communicate with clients and oral communication skills to effectively liaise with our stakeholders
Strong Unix and Shell scripting knowledge
Strong analytical & problem-solving skills
Familiar with Agile methodology
Able to work under pressure and tight timeline
Strong Excel knowledge
Windows OS
Source control tools, preferably Subversion"
Principal Software Development Engineer - #URGENT #UrgentHire #UrgentHire,"Job Requisition ID #22WD62280
Position Overview
Imagine, Design and Create a Better World is our vision at Autodesk. Our flagship product, AutoCAD software, has become synonymous with CAD and is a fixture in design shops worldwide. We have industry-leading 3D solutions for industrial design and manufacturing; architecture, engineering and construction; as well as media and entertainment. Over 10 million professionals in 185 countries are using Autodesk products to save time and money, gain competitive advantage, and change the way ideas are brought to life.
Autodesk products are switching to a subscription-based business model. The team critical to this business transformation is looking for a Principal Software Engineer. You will be designing and delivering APIs that help improve existing backend platform and subscriptions APIs. You will work with developers, architects, product owners, and operations to collaboratively deliver various team requirements and goals to advance the platform for subscriptions, order processing and entitlements. You will proactively work to evaluate and adopt technology solutions that help with improving the quality of the APIs as well as productivity of the team.
Technology Stack
JavaScript, NodeJS, Java, GraphQL
Serverless Cloud Architecture on AWS
Infrastructure as Code using Terraform and AWS CloudFormation
Other tools: Serverless Framework, Express, Jest, Jenkins
Responsibilities
Architect, design, code, test, debug, and document new and existing components to ensure that software meets business, quality and operational needs
Technically lead and guide the team in delivery, research and development of business requirements
Championing the development and implementation of innovative concepts in the areas of API development, DevOps, automation, and testing
Ensure that high quality code is delivered by the team following best practices like peer code reviews, code standards, unit testing and test driven development
Drive and participate in code and document reviews, mentoring team in best practices
Collaborate with peer organizations, DevOps, support organizations on technical issues and provide guidance
Work with business and technical product owners to interpret and translate business needs to technical requirements and provide technical breakdown of work with estimations
Evaluate and recommend tools, technologies and processes to ensure the highest quality and performance is achieved
Work with team to troubleshoot code level problems quickly and efficiently
Apply deep technical expertise to resolve challenging programming and design problems
Focus on scalability, security and availability of all applications and processes.
Champion security requirements and secure coding practices and perform various security reviews with Autodesk wide security teams
Design and architect solutions to enable secure, scalable and maintainable software
Contribute to risk identification and risk mitigation strategies associated with the architecture
Contribute to technical roadmap and technical debt elimination, balancing time, resource, and quality constraints to achieve business and strategic goals and requirements
Minimum Qualifications
BS/MS in Computer Science or equivalent work experience
10+ years hands-on experience developing scalable, distributed applications
Experience with JSON/XML, designing and building REST/SOAP based web services
Strong development proficiency in one or more backend languages Node.js, Java, Ruby, python, Go, C#, etc
Strong experience with building cloud based API platforms or backend systems in a Unix environment
Possess strong verbal and written communication skills
Possess strong analytical skills with excellent problem solving abilities.
Must be extremely detail-oriented with respect to documentation and communication
Experience with AWS or other cloud based service providers
Experience in designing and deploying distributed microservices architecture
Preferred Qualifications 
Experience with Agile development, preferably Scrum
Experience with code management using Git & build using Maven
Experience with Jenkins for Continuous Integration/Continuous Deployment
The Ideal Candidate
You enjoy making highly scalable and highly available distributed systems
You write clean, testable, and effective code
You hold yourself and others to high technical standards (design, architecture and implementation)
You have a deep understanding of object-oriented design and at least one modern backend framework
You enjoy shipping features following agile methods
You are a talented Software Engineer who is passionate about code quality, usability, and technology
You excel at working with multidisciplinary teams to deliver great user experiences
You are a power user of infrastructure, keeping yourself up-to-date with the latest trends and breakthroughs in platform development technology
You have a strong record of project execution and completion and have experience with Scrum and agile development practices
You love working with smart people and want to be part of a team
You are excited by the challenge of pushing the limits of the infrastructure to deliver disruptive, innovative solutions to the world that will delight your customers
#LI-POST
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.

Are you an existing contractor or consultant with Autodesk? Please search for open jobs and apply internally (not on this external site). If you have any questions or require support, contact Autodesk Careers."
Senior Mobile Engineer,"Department Overview
The Digital Technology Department in OSIM works together as a team to ensure that the final product is programmed to meet the needs and wants of the consumer, whilst, incorporating the latest and most desirable technology to remain competitive in the market. This department comprises of the Product Owners, UI/UX, Mobile Application, IOT as well as the Digital QA group. If you are forward-looking, able to think out of the box and always hungry to learn about the newest technology, we want you in our team!
Job Description
Being part of OSIM’s Digital Technology team, you will be responsible to design, develop, troubleshoot, maintain and support iOS/Android Mobile applications that work together with OSIM’s Health and Wellness products. You will work closely with other functional teams (Product Design, Project, UI/UX, Backend and Marketing) and vendors to integrate new ideas and technology into products’ Mobile application while exemplifying utmost attention to quality and timely delivery. This role will report directly to Digital Technology Director and belong to Mobile Engineer Group.
Job Responsibilities
Design and develop new projects using Flutter
Troubleshoot, maintain and support existing native iOS or Android projects and Flutter projects
Job Requirements
Diploma/Degree in Computer Science / Software Engineering / Computer Engineering or its equivalent
At least 3-6 years of working experience in Flutter development
Experience with Flutter plugin and using native SDK via Flutter
Experience with mobile app deployment and optimization
Familiarity with RESTful APIs
Experience with version control such as Git
Able to work in an agile environment
(Plus Point) Knowledge in native development(iOS or Android) is a HUGE plus
(Plus Point) Knowledge in Wi-Fi / Bluetooth Low Energy products is a plus
(Plus Point) Knowledge in CI/CD is a plus"
Cyber Security Analytics Content Developer - VP (Hybrid) #Seekbetter,"Responsibilities:
Identify opportunities to automate and standardize information security controls and for the supported groups
Resolve any vulnerabilities or issues detected in an application or infrastructure
Analyze source code to mitigate identified weaknesses and vulnerabilities within the system
Review and validate automated testing results and prioritize actions that resolve issues based on overall risk
Scan and analyze applications with automated tools, and perform manual testing if necessary
Reduce risk by analyzing the root cause of issues, their impact, and required corrective actions
Direct the development and delivery of secure solutions by coordinating with business and technical contacts
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience
Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Office tools and software
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Proven influencing and relationship management skills
Proven analytical skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"Frontend Engineer, Autumn Venture- SC Ventures.'.","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Senior Network Site Reliability Engineer, Vice President #Urgent #JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure, and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
You’ll be a member of a global support team that operates from United States, Singapore and India. In this role, you will undertake a Tier 3 position that will involve day to day incident and problem management of major impacting data issues globally and proactive infrastructure management. You will be attending bridge calls, address tickets, and work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
8 or more years of experience in supporting large scale global network infrastructure running mission critical applications and services.
Forward thinkers who always seek ways to operate more efficiently by developing automation and self service capabilities to eliminate manual tasks.
Strong problem solvers who is able to demonstrate quick and critical thinking especially during troubleshooting.
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals.
Ability to articulate complex technical findings in a clear, concise, and easy to understand terms to the line of business clients and stakeholders.
Understand operations best practices and policies at top of mind.
Proficiency in one or more of the following: Python, Ansible, Go, shell scripting, C, C++, Java, or Perl.
Experience in managing large-scale enterprise network infrastructure including LAN, WAN, WLAN, firewalls, WAF, SDN. Examples: Cisco routers (ASR) and switches (ACI, Nexus), Arista switches, Cisco WLAN controllers and access points, Checkpoint and Fortinet firewalls, F5 load balancers and web application firewalls, Bluecoat proxies, Ciena packet-optical platforms, etc. Certifications in these areas are preferred.
Experience in packet capture, broker and analysis tools such as Riverbed ARX, Netprofilers, Wireshark, cPacket, BigSwitch etc.
Experience in other infrastructure areas such as: server, linux, windows, database, public cloud, storage, etc."
"EFX/Commodities Application Support, - #urgent #Immediate #JobsThatMatter #UrgentHire","Job Description
Roles and Responsibilities 
The candidate will be a part of APAC team providing support for JP Morgan’s eFX trading plant. The team is responsible for providing day to day technology support to Sales & Trading users along with other essential functions related to upkeep and maintenance of the systems. The ideal candidate should possess a deep technical understanding of low latency trading platforms and sound knowledge of the underlying product class (FX – Cash & Derivatives). Knowledge of Commodities product class will be an added advantage. Hands on support, Strong team player and quick learning ability are essential to be successful in this role.
Roles and Responsibilities
Quick learner and excellent troubleshooting issues in a high pressured and time sensitive trading env
Establishes working relationships with –
eSales and Trading users and management in the region.
Application Developers working across the eFX space.
Fellow technology partner teams – Infrastructure etc
Candidate is expected to develop a deep subject matter experience of JP Morgan’s eFX plant in its entirety including both technical and business aspects.
Incident and Problem management
Contributes in service improvement programs with particular focus on preventive measures, root cause analysis and root cause analysis.
Develops and utilizes appropriate tools to reduce toil and an automation first mindset
Capacity and Resiliency
Plan, manage, monitor and optimize the production related infrastructure (Linux hosts, Distributed computing, IBM MQ, Database systems, Network etc.) related capacity and resiliency management
Weekend Support – The role requires weekend work on a rotational basis, typically once every 5/6 weeks
Qualifications
Skills Required
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in engineering, computer science or information systems
Minimum 5 years of experience doing application development and/or production support in finance domain.
Strong Knowledge of Commodities and/or FX trading esp. in e-Trading environment
Technically hands-on working with Linux, scripting (Shell, Python and/or Perl) and database systems.
Quick thinker, problem solver (even under pressure) and a fast learner under constantly changing environment.
Very good communication skills, be able to communicate effectively to both traders and technology partners.
Ability to automate and build tools for improved productivity, or eagerness to learn it.
Ability to understand incredibly demanding nature of the trade floor, or eagerness to experience it
Knowledge and experience of FIX protocol
Skills Desired
Experience of supporting external / internet facing applications.
All round UNIX / Linux skills. Able to read and interpret / diagnose scripts in the event of failure.
Experience of using databases such as Oracle for queries
Python (Highly desirable)
Exposure to 29West / Informatica ULLTRA low latency messaging
What do we do?
The eCCEM Production Management team is a SRE modelled application support team responsible for the support of latency sensitive electronic trading channels for FX and Commodities trading. We are a truly global team of 30+ members with the presence in AMER, EMEA and Asia and use follow-the-Sun model.
In Singapore, we interact directly with the Front Office traders, Middle office users as well as with our Application Development (AD) and Global Infrastructure partners. This job requires a good mix of business and technology expertise and provides a great learning opportunity in both areas for everyone.
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you’re not just working at world’s largest global financial institution - you’re an integral part of one of the world’s biggest technology companies. In 15 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $11B annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that are transforming the financial services industry.
J.P. Morgan is a place for talented people from all backgrounds and perspectives because our clients come from all backgrounds and perspectives. We encourage a culture of inclusion, where everyone's opinion counts and all employees have the freedom to deliver their absolute best. This is why we work hard and invest in attracting and developing a diverse workforce. Learn more about our Business Resource Groups in how they help our employees build successful careers and reach their greatest potential.
About J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
J.P. Morgan’s Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets and investor services. The world’s most important corporations, governments and institutions entrust us with their business in more than 100 countries. With nearly $20 trillion of assets under custody, the Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world. Working in CIB Technology
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM) is a leading global financial services firm with assets of $2.5 trillion and operations worldwide. The firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services for consumers and small business, commercial banking, financial transaction processing, and asset management. A component of the Dow Jones Industrial Average, JPMorgan Chase & Co. serves millions of consumers in the United States and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under its J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Information about JPMorgan Chase & Co. is available at www.jpmorganchase.com."
URGENT !! / Software Engineer / System Analyst (Java / SQL),"5 Days / MNC
Great career progression
Great remuneration and benefits
Job Description
Design, develop, maintain and continuous improvements of assigned Computer Integrated Manufacturing (CIM) applications and components
Provide 24/7 Level 2 & 3 support for the proper operation of Production lines
Gather requirements, design, develop and deploy new versions of CIM applications especially Equipment Manager automation solutions
Responsible for documentation of requirements and coordination of enhancements in the assigned area
Plan, coordinate, and conduct training for assigned applications
Work with the other IT teams to achieve the common goal of better system response time and system availability
Work with other departments for productivity enhancements, error or cost reductions and other improvement projects
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related fields
Diploma in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent fields with minimum 2 years of working experience in Equipment Manager automation solutions would be considered
Experience in Java development, SEMI Equipment Communication Standard (SECS), Oracle SQL and/or Tibco is an added advantage
Successful candidate will have opportunity to work in our new facility and to be trained and worked overseas for a periods
HOW TO APPLY:
Interested applicants please send your latest resume to ref27(at)trustrecruit.com.sg or click on “Apply Now” and provide the below details in your resume.
 Current salary (breakdown)
Expected salary
Notice period
Reason of leaving
We regret only shortlisted candidates will be notified.
Important Note: Trust Recruit Pte Ltd is committed to safeguarding your personal data in accordance with the Personal Data Protection Act (PDPA).
Please read our privacy statement on our corporate website www.trustrecruit.com.sg.
Trust Recruit Pte Ltd    
EA License No: 19C9950
EA Personnel: Tan Yee Chean (Chester)
EA Personnel Reg No: R22110448"
"Software Engineer, Vice President #Seekbetter #Worknow","Job Description
Our Cloud Services Group is teeming with passionate innovators like you who are rapidly designing, building and deploying groundbreaking internal and public cloud platforms. By putting your technological know-how to work on creating best-in-class cloud-aware applications, your efforts will help us work faster and smarter, not to mention reinforce our position as a global leader in fintech cloud services. As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Responsibilities:
You'll be developing cloud native products to be used by engineers across the firm.
You'll be developing products that help test and measure the resiliency and availability of products and services.
You'll be developing products that help solve the problems associated with micro services orchestration.
You'll be part of a small and highly focused product team which is responsible for developing and running the product end to end.
You'll contribute in making architecture decisions and make suggestions to improve the current architecture of the product.
Requirements:
BS/BA degree or equivalent 
Minimum 10 years of experience required
Passionate about new technologies and building a culture of innovation, continuous learning and improvement.
Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages. Java, python or Go is preferred.
Exposure to building frameworks and tooling for large scale engineering operations, resiliency patterns like circuit breakers, bulkheads, backpressure, etc.
Exposure to authentication and authorization protocols and solutions.
Experience developing cloud native applications on platforms like CloudFoundry, Kubernetes, Heroku, AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.
Exposure to effective operational patterns like SLOs, metrics, health checks, error budgets, distributed tracing, etc."
Specialist Product Engineer - DevSecOps - (2200014997)',"The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Business
Able to get things done in a quick-paced environment. Be transparent and open around what doesn’t work and what does.
Processes
Strong knowledge of Agile SDLC and automated deployments
Strong communication skills - oral, written and presentation
Strong technical reporting writing across various types of target audiences
People and Talent
Prior experience in working in a scrum team in at least 2 large scale projects
Self-motivation and ability to stay focused in the middle of distraction
Strong sense of personal ownership and responsibility in accomplishing the organisation’s goal. Exudes confidence and will roll-up his/her sleeves to drive success
Risk Management
SCRUM / Project management risk management Knowledge extending to organizational risk appetite and risk strategy awareness.
Governance
Banking industry specific knowledge or experience in risk frameworks adopted across Industry in delivery preferred.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Privilege Identity Management, Service Head and Domain Head
Global Head, Security Technology Services
Head of Information and Cyber Security
Other Responsibilities
Responsible for engineering the Hashicorp Vault capabilities and integrate of SCB business applications for dynamic secret management. The role partners & will work with other technical teams and architects.
Understand the cloud and containerization implementation in SCB and assist business applications hosted on public cloud (AWS, Azure) to enable them to adopt Hashicorp Vault seamlessly.
Coordinate solution implementation, advisory, problem management, change control and incident response.
Excellent collaborator with business teams, infra teams, security operations and offers technical guidance
Ability to research understand and influence the adoption of Secrets Management in emerging areas.
Broad exposure to security areas including Identity and Access Management, Application Security (Secure SDLC, DevSecOps, and Automation)
Engineering / deploying / configuring Hashicorp Vault deployments using secure pipelines via Jenkins and Terraform
Perform necessary risk assessments to identify & document potential control gaps.
Strong presentation skills with an excellent standard of English
Strong problem solving and analytical skills with a troubleshooting mindset
Must be articulate and composed when delivering difficult messages to stakeholders
Our Ideal Candidate
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
8+ years of expereince with hands-on in Microservice Architecture, Infrastructure As A Code, Public Cloud (AWS, Azure), Secrets Management.
Strong working knowledge of Hashicorp suite of products (Vault, Terraform etc.)
Hands-on experience in using DevOps tools (GIT, Jenkins, JIRA)
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with AWS / Azure.
Candidate should be familiar with Microservice Architecture principles and developing / deploying microservices in Containers
Experience working with Java, Spring Boot, API, API security.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Capability to identify technical risks, articulate the associated costs and business impacts, and proposing options for solution
Ability to work well within a multi-disciplinary team structure, but also independently
Selects appropriately from applicable Security Standards, methods, tools and applications defined in the Bank
Demonstrates analytical and systematic approach to problem solving.
Good working knowledge of software application: JIRA, Confluence, Outlook (advance), Word (advance), PowerPoint (advance), Excel (advance)
Eager for learning new things
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Automated Agile software deployment CI/CD 
Python or Linux scripting knowledge.
Deploying application in Virtualised environment and public cloud infrastructure (AWS, Azure)
Hands-on experience with Hashicorp tools (Vault, Terraform).
Experience working with Container Technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Hands-on experience with Java, Spring Boot, API, API Security.
Strong knowledge of micro-service architecture principles.
Knowledge of Golang (Google Language) is an advantage.
Experience working with front-end technologies – HTML, CSS, Javascript, React is preferred.
Knowledge of configuration management tools and multi tenancy environment
Knowledge of Privileged Identity and access management is an advantage.
JIRA and Confluence Tool Skills"
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13. - #Worknow #JobsThatMatter#',"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13-#JobsThatMatter.#.#Worknow,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13-#JobsThatMatter.#'#Worknow,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
Apps Dev Tech Lead Analyst - C13- #Immediate#'#Worknow,"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.
Responsibilities:
Working as a delivery lead for projects in Onboarding platform
Leading a distributed team of employees and vendors
Managing business stakeholders
Building Elegant Architectural solutions
Designing RESTful services and APIs
Developing functional databases, applications, and servers to support websites on the back end
Designing , developing, testing and maintaining robust, resilient, scalable, high quality software
Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages
Ensuring that non-functional requirements such as security, performance, maintainability, scalability, usability, and reliability are being considered when architecting solutions.
Staying current and provide insight on cutting edge software approaches, architectures, and vendors
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Knowledge/Technical Experience:
Proven experience as a Deliver manager or a similar role
Comfortable around both front-end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries
Hands on experience on Core Java, Spring, Spring boot
Hands on experience with RESTful services using frameworks like Spring, Jersey
Knowledge on Micro services (Service discovery, API Gateway, config server) will have added advantage
Familiarity with databases like Oracle and MongoDB
Knowledge on UI frameworks such as Angular, Angular JS, React (optional)
Desirable Skills (Not Necessary):
UI Unit test frameworks (Jasmine, Karma, Protractor)
Java Junit testing using Junits, Mockito, TestNG
Experience on Hibernate, JPA is a plus
ELK
Knowledge of continuous integration tools like Jenkins/Team city
Knowledge of version control tool such as GIT
Should have worked in Agile Environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience in Apps Development or systems analysis role
Extensive experience system analysis and in programming of software applications
Experience in managing and implementing successful projects
Subject Matter Expert (SME) in at least one area of Applications Development
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred
This job description provides a high-level review of the types of work performed. Other job-related duties may be assigned as required."
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President, Singapore+ #Immediate #Seekbetter #Immediate","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
Backend Java Software Engineer - Payment Technology - Associate #Immediate #Seekbetter,"About Team
J.P. Morgan Payment Technology is looking for a Backend Java Software Developer to join our global team for a Greenfield development project. You will be part of the pioneer team in Singapore as we build our payment digital capabilities in the region.
In this role, you will be working with state of the art technologies to design and develop a cloud based platform for external and internal development teams to integrate efficiently with the Payments API Ecosystem
Primary Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable, well thought and defect free solutions.
Participate in Agile ceremonies - standups, retrospective, sprint planning and backlog refinement.
Write enterprise grade code with production stability and resiliency in mind.
Develop deep technical understanding of all the interfaces and communication protocol in the platform.
Build and maintain automated monitoring tools.
Create detailed features, stories and keeping the documentation up-to-date
Manage hygiene of the application (code smells, vulnerabilities, code coverage).
Build and maintain strong working relationships with the project and product teams.
Experience and Skills Required
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related disciplines.
Minimum 3 years of Java development expertise is a must.
Hands-on with Relational Databases, Spring Boot, REST APIs, Junit, Mockito, JPA
Experience working on large enterprise applications with micro service based architecture. Cloud knowledge and Kubernetes is preferred.
Past understanding of working in and managing production environment is preferred.
Should be detail-oriented, strong analytical and good communication skills are a must.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams across the globe.
Pro-actively participate in designing/solution of the feature/platform
Knowledge of software development life cycle in agile methodology"
"Principal Software Engineer, {21WD49809} - #JobsThatMatter #URGENT #Immediate #UrgentHire","Position Overview
Autodesk is seeking a highly motivated Senior Software Engineer to join our agile development team! As a member of a team responsible for building foundational services, you will have the opportunity to contribute to the development of Autodesk’ next generation of Customer Identity Access Management Platform that is leveraged by 150+ Autodesk desktop, mobile , web applications and cloud services as well as a growing third party developer ecosystem for managing user authentication, authorization, profile and entitlements. The service is one of the key business enablers serving millions of customers every day. You will be working on cutting edge AWS technologies as you build the next generation of the Autodesk’s Identity Platform.
Responsibilities
Work effectively as a member of self-organized agile team that builds, owns and runs the service
Contribute to all aspects of service development including front-end, back-end, DevOps and quality
Assist in the operation of the service, e.g. monitoring, alerting, metrics, logging and troubleshooting
Work closely with architect and product management to understand requirements and translate them to elegant implementations
Use the current system behaviour to identify opportunities for continuous improvement of the scalability, reliability, usability and security of the system
Excellent troubleshooting skills, able to debug complex technical issues involving multiple system components
Be an advocate for the service within the org to help the product teams to integrate
Minimum Qualification
BS or MS in Computer Science or related technical field
Problem solver, smart, innovative, adaptable, inclusive, impactful, humble, courageous, accountable, pragmatic
More than 10 years of experience building cloud native restful web services and applications
Expert level experience with programming languages such as Go-lang/C#/Java
Strong experience with relational and non-relational data stores
Expert level experience in building services with high performance, high availability at internet scale
Solid understanding of software design and architectural patterns
Committed to quality, including security and performance
Possess strong verbal and written communication skills
Demonstrated ability to pick up new languages, tools and design patterns as needed
Experience with OIDC, OAuth2 and related API Authorization protocols would be a definite plus
Experience with agile methodologies
Experience with AWS stack and containers is a plus
UI Development experience with HTML 5, CSS 3, JavaScript"
"Senior Full Stack Java & Cloud Developer, Payments, Associate--#JobsThatMatter #Seekbetter #UrgentHire #JobsThatMatter'","Job Description
You will work in the Corporate and Investment Bank Technology (Tax Engine) group as a hands-on full stack developer who is passionate about solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. Candidate will be focused on projects that are aimed at building out Asia strategic digitization initiatives and will have an opportunity to work with multiple business lines and multiple technical teams in order to develop the firm’s strategic technical roadmap. The candidate should have a proven track record of application development with skills in Java, distributed technology and building scalable robust resilient systems. The candidate will be required to apply the depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of software development lifecycle, understand agile principles and adopt agility in development.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems or related disciplines
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience in developing and delivery enterprise software.
Advanced knowledge of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines.
Understanding of architecture and design across all systems
Experience in one or more of the following technologies:
Experience in Full-Stack Java Application development and distribution, including Spring Framework, Java 8/11 features, REST web services.
Experience in Cloud based application development, container-based micro service architecture, container orchestration platforms (such as Kubernetes)
Hands-on experience in SQL database Oracle and/or NoSQL database Cassandra.
Proficiency in modern web development (ReactJS).
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka etc. and exposure to event driven design patterns.
Proven experience in SCM and CI tools such as Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven & Unix shell scripting.
Strong focus on automated testing with good knowledge of TDD, BDD and Unit testing. Hands-on experience in frameworks such as Junit, Mockito & Cucumber.
Exposure to distributed caching mechanism will be added advantage.
Experience in Agile software methodologies.
Demonstrate keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
Ability to work collaboratively in a distributed team, promote culture of inclusiveness and diversity.
Excellent communication skills and ability to build strong partnership with stakeholders across business and technology teams."
2022 Software Engineer Program - Full Time Analyst - (Singapore) #JPM #Immediate',"Be a part of a dynamic and diverse team that engineers large-scale, complex and resilient technology solutions that drive our global business. You'll help build and optimize digital applications and systems that support millions of customers, clients and employees worldwide.
 When you work at JPMorgan Chase, you're not just working at a global financial institution. You're an integral part of one of the world's biggest tech companies. In 16 strategic technology locations worldwide, our team of more than 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning and cloud development. As a firm, we're partnering with FinTech and Silicon Valley tech firms to deliver cutting-edge solutions to our clients and customers. Our $10.8 billion annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that will not only transform the financial services industry, but also change the world. 
WHAT YOU CAN EXPECT
Launching your career in our Software Engineer Program means you will:
Start with an in-depth induction program that teaches you about our businesses, builds on your knowledge of development methodologies, and sharpens your professional skills.
Dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that make a difference for our customers, clients and employees.
Create and improve the design, analytics, coding and testing for high-quality software and new products.
Own projects end-to-end, keeping teams and stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what's being developed.
Work and share ideas, information and innovation with our team of technologists from all over the world.
Develop through on-going training, mentorship and access to senior leaders.
Participate in our agile Force for Good teams to develop real-world technology solutions for non-profit organizations through a series of ""side"" projects over several months.
Join an inspiring and curious team of technologists who will support you in developing new skills, experiencing new projects and businesses, and taking your career where you want to go.
ABOUT YOU
If you're ready to put your passion for technology to work in a way that makes a real difference, you'll find your place in our Software Engineer Program.
Key skills include:
Computer Science and/or Engineering majors are preferred, while other majors may be considered
Pursuing a degree qualification with solid academic background
Relevant internship experience and leadership in school or community organization
Foundational knowledge of programming languages (e.g., Python, Javascript, Java, C++, C#), databases, data structures, and algorithms
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, collaborative environment
Exceptional problem solving ability
Relocation assistance for flight and accommodation will not be provided
Application Dateline:
October 31, 2021 (23:59 SGT)
JOIN US
At JPMorgan Chase, we are creating positive change for the diverse communities we serve. We do this by championing your innovative ideas through a supportive culture that helps you every step of the way as you build your career. If you are passionate, curious and ready to make an impact, we are looking for you.
What’s next?
Help us learn about you by submitting a complete and thoughtful application, which includes your resume. Your application and resume is a way for us to initially get to know you, so it’s important to complete all relevant application questions so we have as much information about you as possible. 
To start the application, you will be prompted to enter your email address.  Your email address will be used to create and maintain your profile so make sure it is one you will have long term access to.  Do not use an email address with “.edu” extension as doing so could result in delays receiving updates regarding your candidacy.
After you confirm your application, we will review it to determine whether you meet certain required qualifications. 
If you are advanced to the next step of the process, you’ll receive an email invitation to complete a series of 12 games through the pymetrics platform. pymetrics will allow you to showcase your potential beyond what you tell us in your resume and application form. It’s an additional data point that helps us gain a better understanding of who you are as an individual. It should take no longer than 25-35 minutes to complete. If you have already completed the pymetrics games, you will have the opportunity to submit your gameplay results for this specific application without having to replay the games.
Following completion of pymetrics, you’ll receive another email invitation to complete a video interview, powered by HireVue. This is your opportunity to further bring your resume to life and showcase your experience for our recruiting team and hiring managers.
Both pymetrics and HireVue are required, and your application will not be considered for further review until you have completed them. We strongly encourage that you apply and complete these required elements as soon as possible, since programs will close as positions are filled. 
JPMorgan Chase is committed to creating an inclusive work environment that respects all people for their unique skills, backgrounds and professional experiences. We strive to hire qualified, diverse candidates, and we will provide reasonable accommodations for known disabilities.
Reasonable Adjustments
J.P. Morgan is an inclusive employer of choice. If you require any adjustments to enable you to perform the essential functions of your job, please do not hesitate to contact your recruiter. If you would prefer to discuss this confidentially, please contact your respective recruiter.
©2021 JPMorgan Chase & Co. JPMorgan Chase is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer Disability/Veteran"
"Software Engineer, Analyst, - Singapore #Seekbetter #JPM'","Candidate will be part of GTI CRS Application Dev/SRE Team and drive automation by establishing developer skills in IT Infrastructure resources. The goal is to build a community of talented technologists across the hub that can grow the culture of continuous learning, with skill building as a priority.
You'll work on agile teams with peers and experienced Software Engineers/Infrastructure Developers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world, as well as gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events and peer-mentorship programs. You could help develop innovative solutions that impact the day-to-day lives of customers, clients and businesses around the world. No matter your role, you’ll have the opportunity to learn new coding languages, introduce new products for our clients and work with innovative new technology. You’ll develop the skills and acumen to take your career in any direction and make a genuine contribution to our businesses from the start.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree or above
Minimum 1 year of experience in both Systems Engineering and Software Development
Advanced knowledge of architecture, design across all systems
Strong understanding of development concepts, SDLC methodologies, OOP concepts, enterprise design patterns, industry best practices
Experience in designing and building REST web services using Python
Strong experience with Python for implementing web technologies
Experience with HTML5,JavaScript/Typescript, AJAX, JSON, jQuery
Strong experience with JavaScript frameworks like Angular/React
Experience designing and developing large scale enterprise applications
Understanding of Domain Driven Design, Microservices patterns and architectures
SCM / DevOps / CI/CD tools & process (GIT/Bitbucket,Sonar)
Familiar with modern infrastructure technology and architecture (Cloud, virtualization, object stores, etc.)
Agile development experience or equivalent in fast-paced development environment
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, including ability to negotiate compromise and demonstrate diplomacy in sensitive situations and to interact effectively with peers and management"
"Operations Analyst, - (2200005422) #UrgentHire","About Standard Chartered 
We're an international bank, nimble enough to act, big enough for impact. For more than 160 years, we've worked to make a positive difference for our clients, communities, and each other. We question the status quo, love a challenge and enjoy finding new opportunities to grow and do better than before. If you're looking for a career with purpose and you want to work for a bank making a difference, we want to hear from you. You can count on us to celebrate your unique talents. And we can't wait to see the talents you can bring us.
Our purpose, to drive commerce and prosperity through our unique diversity, together with our brand promise, to be here for good are achieved by how we each live our valued behaviours. When you work with us, you'll see how we value difference and advocate inclusion.
Together we:
Do the right thing and are assertive, challenge one another, and live with integrity, while putting the client at the heart of what we do
Never settle, continuously striving to improve and innovate, keeping things simple and learning from doing well, and not so well
Be better together, we can be ourselves, be inclusive, see more good in others, and work collectively to build for the long term
In line with our Fair Pay Charter, we offer a competitive salary and benefits to support your mental, physical, financial and social wellbeing.
Core bank funding for retirement savings, medical and life insurance, with flexible and voluntary benefits available in some locations
Time-off including annual, parental/maternity (20 weeks), sabbatical (12 weeks maximum) and volunteering leave (3 days), along with with minimum global standards for annual and public holiday, which is combined to 30 days minimum
Flexible working options based around home and office locations, with flexible working patterns
Proactive wellbeing support through Unmind, a market-leading digital wellbeing platform, development courses for resilience and other human skills, global Employee Assistance Programme, sick leave, mental health first-aiders and all sorts of self-help toolkits
A continuous learning culture to support your growth, with opportunities to reskill and upskill and access to physical, virtual and digital learning
Being part of an inclusive and values driven organisation, one that embraces and celebrates our unique diversity, across our teams, business functions and geographies - everyone feels respected and can realise their full potential.
Recruitment assessments - some of our roles use assessments to help us understand how suitable you are for the role you've applied to. If you are invited to take an assessment, this is great news. It means your application has progressed to an important stage of our recruitment process.
The Role Responsibilities 
Perform day-to-day operations such as processing of client’s transactions for Structured products in accordance with bank operational menu, desk instructions, compliance and regulatory requirements
Instruct and monitors market settlement and cash funding between the bank and custodian and ensure these are processed accurately and timely
Follow up on unmatched/unsettled trades with dealer, broker counterparties
Ensure proper and timely escalation to business and/or management
Provide other administrative support for the department, updating KPI, mailing etc
Handle ad hoc project as assigned
Provide settlement support on Public holiday
Key Stakeholders
Internal: Client Advisors, Client Service Managers, Platform Managers, CMPS(Dealers), In-Country Ops team, Compliance, Credit & Risk team
External: Brokers, Custodians
Our Ideal Candidate
Independent and willing to learn
Work well under stress and within tight dateline
Team player
Willing to work at Changi Business Park
Backing Background preferred
2 years of experience in an operations role.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Product Knowledge
Settlement experience
Visit our careers website www.sc.com/careers"
"Manager, Information Management, - (2100032149). * #Immediate'.","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
This is an exciting opportunity for a Full Stack Developer to support the Singapore Finance Team digitize their processes by working on existing applications as well as development of enhancements and new applications primarily using Microsoft SQL Server and various latest generation front-end technologies
As the successful candidate, you will be part of the Singapore Finance team as opposed to the Standard Chartered Technology function and you will have direct involvement with the business on a daily basis working in an agile fashion to progress solutions quickly from idea to prototype to delivery. It will require you to handle multiple support tasks as well as tactical project analysis and development.
Business
Work closely with the finance teams to drive process digitisation to deliver efficiency and enable new capabilities for MI and Insights to propel the function towards its strategic objectives.
Processes & Responsibilities
Manage DevOps related responsibilities to ensure the Finance servers continue to perform at peak capacity and availability
Full Stack Development responsibilities to build and maintain end to end applications to digitize finance processes across a multitude of Finance functions (e.g. Tax, Performance Management, Controls, Balance Sheet Management etc.)
Risk Management & Governance
Ensure adherence to all internal technology policies and regulations and establish a robust governance process covering the RAD solutions developed.
Continually enhance the control environment to maintain robust processes around security, data reconciliation, data quality and audit trails ensuring complete and accurate reporting across designed processes.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the SG Finance RAD team to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
CFO Singapore and the Head of all the Finance functions reporting into the CFO
Other Responsibilities
Working with onshore/offshore teams
Our Ideal Candidate
Over 6 years of proven technical background with development and design experience in front-end and server-side
Strong in RESTful APIs, ASP.Net MVC, .Net Core/C#
Strong in SQL Server, SSRS/SSAS
Experience with Microsoft VBA stack of automation (Excel/Access) and knowledge in powerBI is advantageous
Strong in modern UI technologies - Javascript, VueJS Framework, NodeJS, HTML5, CSS
Experience with DevOps CI/CD tools and processes (Bitbucket/Git, Jenkins, Sourcetree) and Agile methodologies
Basic knowledge of UI/UX and prototype designing, testing frameworks (Junit)
Exposure to Selenium (or similar tool) for UI automation and testing
Understanding and some working experience with Cloud, AI Automation, Big Data technologies would be advantageous
Provide solid and reliable documentation on work items such as code, concepts, logic and user documentation
Must have following soft skills:
Understand and deal well with rapid development cycles, remain flexible and calm in the face of ambiguity, drive clarity
Well spoken and Emotionally intelligent whilst working and collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals having diverse work cultures and skill sets
Good communication skills and ability to articulate technical details and challenges to business users
Team player who is self driven and proactive in learning new technologies and skills
Apply now to join the Bank for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
"Network Reliability Engineer, - Vice President, Singapore #Immediate#Urgent'","As a Network Reliability Engineer (NRE), you'll help build a meaningful engineering discipline, combining software, Infrastructure, and systems to develop creative engineering solutions to operations problems. Much of our support and software development focuses on optimizing existing systems, building infrastructure and reducing work through automation. You’ll join a team of curious problem solvers with a diverse set of perspectives who are thinking big and taking risks. In this environment, you’ll take the lead on relevant projects, supported by an organization that provides the support and mentorship you need to learn and grow. As an NRE, you’ll be focused on running better production applications and systems.
This role prefers a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Polytechnic Diploma
Minimum 7 years of experience in information technology with a focus on routing and switching or security networking. (CCNP to CCIE) Strong background in Packet Capture tools and analysis. (Niksun, ARX/AIX, Endace, and cPacket)
Ability to articulate and share clear, concise complex technical findings to management in understandable terms
Maintains proficiency in these key areas:
Hardware Architecture (performance testing, monitoring, operations)
Hardware Benchmarking (Agile, program managements, network management)
Design (compliance, security)
Network Engineering (planning, provision)
Proficiency in more than one specific infrastructure technology
Ability to execute with understanding of best practices and JPMC policies top of mind
Ability to collaborate with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals using SCRUM practices.
Proficient in large scale software development in one or more of the programming languages (C, C++, perl, python,java, C#,.net)
Proficient in the following Infrastructure automation technologies - Ansible, Puppet, Chef in addition to building APIs and services using REST, SOAP, etc.
Experience diagnosing performance issues in complex distributed applications leveraging infrastructure and application telemetry.
Experience managing various large-scale enterprise network topologies including LAN, WAN, Wireless, Network Security. Examples include Routers (Cisco – ASR/GSR/Nexus/Juniper) Switches (Cisco), Wireless (Cisco), Transport (Cisco/Ciena). Firewall (Check Point and Cisco), Load Balancers (Cisco and F5), Proxy (Blue Coat), Etc. Certifications in these areas preferred
This NRE position will involve day to day focus on Availability & Latency with focus on Reliability and failure testing. Working with our Product Owner teams to develop scalability & performance via SLI/SLO/Error budget development and adherence. Developing efficiency via automation utilizing ansible. Work hand in hand with the GNS Tier 4/PE organizations on items such as bug fixes, design changes, and code upgrades.
Able to identify manual operational tasks and develop automation to solve problems in a modern SRE support model."
"Frontend Engineer, - Autumn Venture - SC Ventures. ** #Immediate'.","About Standard Chartered 
We are a leading international bank focused on helping people and companies prosper across Asia, Africa and the Middle East.  
To us, good performance is about much more than turning a profit. It's about showing how you embody our valued behaviours - do the right thing, better together and never settle - as well as our brand promise, Here for good. 
We're committed to promoting equality in the workplace and creating an inclusive and flexible culture - one where everyone can realise their full potential and make a positive contribution to our organisation. This in turn helps us to provide better support to our broad client base.
About SC Ventures
SC Ventures (“SCV”) was established in 2018 with the purpose of “Rewiring the DNA in Banking” by bringing three distinct areas together:
The eXellerator Lab, enabling innovation at large in the Bank by supporting intrapreneurs and their ideas, collaborating with fintech’s through the SCV Fintech Bridge and engaging with clients and co-creation ideas.
The Investment Fund (“Fund”), tasked to acquire minority stakes in fintech companies (“fintechs”) whose technology has been successfully validated in the Group.
Venture building, with the objective of exploring new business models (“ventures”), in the way it engages existing new customers and markets
There are c.65 team members (excluding individual ventures), including dedicated colleagues from the Group’s support functions, based in Singapore, Hong Kong, Shanghai, Nairobi, London and San Francisco.
Autumn Venture – SC Ventures
Autumn Life is a digital wealth, health and lifestyle solution. As an independent and bank agnostic platform, Autumn offers customers the best-in-class products in the marketplace. Our vision is to make a meaningful retirement accessible to more people. We harness the power of technology to integrate wellness with wealth management, making it easier for everyone to achieve their life goals.
Key Roles & Responsibilities
Experience with Frontend Technologies viz. React Native, Typescript is a must
Experience in libraries, and bootstrap templates preferred
Experience with Backend Technologies viz. C#, .Net Core preferred
Experience in ASPNET Zero is preferred
Experience in designing Database with code-first approach preferred
Experience in writing complex SQL queries and Stored Procedures preferred
Hands-on coding, develop high quality code while meeting deadlines
Design and occasional implementation of POCs
Working in highly collaborative, fun loving team using Agile methodology
Creating attractive, responsive fast performing Mobile App from ground-up
“Write code for others, not for yourself” –code will be reviewed by peer developers
Knowledge and Qualifications
5+ years professional working experience in software development.
Degree in Computing or Technology
Hands-on React Native and/or Android/iOS Native mobile app development experience
Knowledge and experience in C#, ASP.NET Core, LINQ Queries, Web APIs preferred
Proficiency in mobile app technology stack eg. React Native, Typescript
Working familiarity and understanding of the back end, i.e. REST APIs, SQL/NoSQL Databases or similar experience with remote data via RESTful APIs and JSON.
Implement CI/CD framework and automated testing
Understanding distributed application environments
Knowledge of software best practices, like Behaviour-Driven-Development (BDD), Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Expected to be familiar with Cucumber, Karma, Protractor, Jasmine
Knowledge of web servers and development environments
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus
Knowledge of asynchronous messaging middleware is a plus
Knowledge of financial products and dashboards is a plus
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker)
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team
Apply now for those with big career ambitions. 
To view information on our benefits including our flexible working please visit our career pages. We welcome conversations on flexible working."
Java Software Engineer - Payments L3 - Associate #Immediate #Seekbetteratter #UrgentHire,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Candidate should possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma or Professional Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
"Java Software Engineer, - Payments L3 - Associate #Immediate #Seekbetteratter #UrgentHire","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
Core Transaction Services (CTS) is a technology organization responsible for transaction processing platforms globally for the Treasury Services business, with primary focus on payments and receivables. A key agenda over the next few years is the build-out of the strategic payments platform to replace the current regional payments systems and external clearing integration. The APAC delivery team covers the rollout of the new platform to the APAC branches.
The candidate will be part of the Feature Team within Core Transaction Services (CTS) organization responsible for providing L3 support (recovery, mitigation, and root cause analysis) and implementing fixes / enhancements, platform improvement projects and run the bank projects.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Candidate should possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Post Graduate Diploma or Professional Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 3 years of experience in Java enterprise application development, preferably delivering high-performance, mission critical applications
Proficiency in one or more of the following technologies:
Java 8+
Spring Framework , Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle
Experience with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra
Experience with messaging and pub-sub platforms such as IBM MQ and Kafka
Experience with SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins, Maven
Knowledge in developing microservices and RESTful APIs
Familiar with UNIX operating system and scripting
Team player who works well individually and in teams, shares information and collaborates with colleagues during execution of the project.
Enthusiastic, self-motivated, strong interest in learning, effective under pressure and willing to take personal responsibility / accountability
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication skills
Functional Knowledge:
Knowledge of Payments processing (life cycle), Good understanding of payments data models; familiarity with the ISO20022 standard is an advantage
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions that help the bank provide strategic advice, raise capital, manage risk, and extend liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world."
Sr. Java Software Engineer - Wealth Management - Associate #UrgentHire #Seekbetter,"Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
Key Responsibilities:
Review of epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts and turning those into technical designs and development
Utilize Agile methodology and adhere to coding standards, procedures and techniques while contributing to the technical code documentation
Provide high quality technology solutions that address business needs developing applications within mature technology environments
Design, develop, code, test, debug and document code, build, deploy, and support app environments
Review design and functional specification prepared by other team members
Coordinate with end users during User Acceptance Testing
Analyze and document problems, recommend solutions, and initiate corrective action
Support production rollouts of the functionality on-site by partnering closely with the Operate team
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering
5 years of Software Development experience
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Proficiency in multiple modern architectures based on micro services, REST APIs, and event-based architecture will be key.
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as MQ, JMS, Kafka, Apache Flink etc.
Knowledge of CI/CD, DevOps tool chain, and a test-driven approach to agile delivery is expected.
Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Experience with JavaScript libraries (ReactJS, React-Redux, BackboneJS/ Angular)
Experience with full-stack Web application development, including REST Web services in Java 7/8, Spring Boot
Experience with SQL databases such as Oracle or Sybase
Solid understanding of development tools: source code control software (e.g., subversion, git), build automation (e.g., Maven), continuous integration (e.g., Hudson/Jenkins), automated testing (e.g., cucumber), JIRA/Green Hopper task tracking
Self-motivated team player. Must possess the ability to research and resolve issues independently while working across teams to acquire needed information
Ability to organize/manage multiple priorities and projects coupled with the flexibility to adapt to changes in a fast-paced environment"
"Senior Software Engineer, Java, Payments Technology #urgent#Seekbetter #Immediate","As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
You will be working for a global team with members in Singapore, India and North America. The team is responsible for building low value and real time payments systems for our corporate customers. As a full stack developer, you will be working on high throughput, low latency micro services. There is a huge opportunity to learn the payments domain.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 5 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, MySQL and Cassandra
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of one or more IMDG technologies, e.g. Gemfire, Hazelcast
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Working experience on devops methodology
Strong technical leadership
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT"
"AWM Software Engineer, Associate #Immediate,","Job Description
As an experienced member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
The Wealth Management Global Operations Technology team in APAC is specifically seeking a senior development team member for building a new tax platform. As a technologist, you will be responsible for developing functionality for key projects that are owned and driven by APAC, but delivering for the business globally. You will be part of a dynamic team that will work closely with product owners as well as interact globally with business stakeholders, product owners and other application developers at all levels of the organization. As a full-stack technologist, the role requires you to have sound technical skills and experience building applications with expertise on modern development practices. If you have a passion for bleeding edge technology and a drive for excellence in delivery, you will feel right at home in this organization.
Key Responsibilities:
Turning epics and stories provided by business, product owners or business analysts into technical designs and development
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including web front-end, back-end services.
Responsible for executing clean code for complex designs that are in line with the architectural direction
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global technology team.
Active involvement in supporting the global platform across all environments, including production in a devops model
Have a keen focus on development modernization by embracing latest technologies and practices and taking initiative to research and learn.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
BS/BA degree
Experience with full-stack Java application development, including REST Web services, SpringBoot with minimum 7 years of experience in software development.
Micro service design patterns and exposure to Cloud based application development.
Exposure to AWS and/or Pivotal Cloud Foundry would be an added advantage.
Experience with SQL databases such as Sybase or Oracle and with NoSQL databases such as Cassandra and/or MongoDB
Experience with middleware/messaging technologies such as Kafka,MQ, JMS, etc. and exposure to event-driven design patterns.
Experience with distributed caches such as GemFire, ehCache, Hazelcast, etc.
Experience developing with testing frameworks such as Junit,Fitnesse, Mockito, Cucumber and Selenium
Knowledge of Model driven development
Knowledge and experience of SCM and CI tools such Bitbucket, Jenkins and Maven.
Knowledge of industry-wide technology trends such as NoSQL and Design Pattern and best practices
Ability to work in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals
About Us
J.P. Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world’s most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors. Our first-class business in a first-class way approach to serving clients drives everything we do. We strive to build trusted, long-term partnerships to help our clients achieve their business objectives.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants’ and employees’ religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
About the Team
J.P. Morgan Asset & Wealth Management delivers industry-leading investment management and private banking solutions with client assets of $4 trillion. Asset Management provides individuals, advisors and institutions with strategies and expertise that span the full spectrum of asset classes through our global network of investment professionals. Wealth Management helps individuals, families and foundations take a more intentional approach to their wealth or finances to better define, focus and realize their goals. 
Our Asset and Wealth Management division is driven by innovators like you who are driven to create technology solutions that make us work more efficiently and help our businesses grow. It’s our mission to efficiently take care of our clients’ wealth, helping them get, and remain properly invested. Our team of agile technologists thrive in a cloud-native environment that values continuous learning using a data-centric approach in developing innovative technology solutions."
Apps Dev Technical Specialist - VP - 22559362,"Responsibilities
As a bank with a brain and a soul, Citi creates economic value that is systemically responsible and in our clients’ best interests.
As a financial institution that touches every region of the world and every sector that shapes your daily life, our Enterprise Operations & Technology teams are charged with a mission that rivals any large tech company.
Our technology solutions are the foundations of everything we do.
We keep the bank safe and provide the technical tools our workers need to be successful.
We design our digital architecture and ensure our platforms provide a first-class customer experience. Our operations teams manage risk, resources, and program management.
We focus on enterprise resiliency and business continuity. We develop, coordinate, and execute strategic operational plans. Essentially, Enterprise Operations & Technology re-engineers client and partner processes to deliver excellence through secure, reliable, and controlled services.
Global Functions Technology is a diverse organization comprised of more than 15,000 talented professionals with some of the brightest minds – all working together to realize Citi’s Vision of growth and economic progress. As a group, we partner with the Finance, Risk, Compliance, and Human Resources teams to drive the delivery of innovative technology solutions using common data, analytics, and platforms. Our technology operates in real-time environments, capturing and managing market, transaction, and accounting data, as well as the data from millions of customers daily. Our solutions cover all products and geographies in which Citi does business. We are the backbone for reporting across the bank, satisfying our regulatory commitments, enabling our businesses to be nimbler and helping to safeguard customer assets through highly effective controls.
Our commitment to diversity includes a workforce that represents the clients we serve globally from all walks of life, backgrounds, and origins. We foster an environment where the best people want to work. We value and demand respect for others, promote individuals based on merit, and ensure opportunities for personal development are widely available to all. Ideal candidates are innovators with well-rounded backgrounds who bring their authentic selves to work and complement our culture of delivering results with pride. If you are a problem solver who seeks passion in your work, come join us. We’ll enable growth and progress together.
Apps Dev Technical Specialist
GFT is looking for a senior technical specialist to work with business analysts and a group of seasoned technology professionals to deliver technology projects for Citi Funds Transfer Pricing application
Responsibilities:
Work with architects and create high level / low level design
Develop high-quality code and ensure it adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Identify ideas to improve system performance and impact availability
Partner with Treasury, Finance, Operations and Technology teams for solution planning and integration
Identify and analyze issues, make recommendations, and implement solutions
Provide continuous improvement through identifying best practices in technology products / processes / systems
Provide leadership and guidance to team members.
Ability to push an agenda in a matrix environment through influencing and collaboration
Lead, track and drive the progress of the deliverables
Identify and manage project dependencies and critical path
Qualifications:
Bachelor or Master Degree in Computer Science
12+ years of total experience with background in Information Technology
Experience in Funds Transfer Pricing Functionalities is a must
Hands on experience in Bigdata technologies (Hadoop, Java Spark, Hive) and Web services, Microservices, Oracle, Openshift, Java and UNIX shell scripting is a must
Experience in Agile methodology is a must
Experience in Streams processing using Kafka and RabbitMQ
Experience in CyberArk, Autosys, SFTP, NDM, AppDynamics, ELK (Elasticsearch, Logstash, Kibana), Jenkins, RLM (Release Lifecycle Management tool), Junit, Selenium
Experience in Tableau and Inquiry Framework reporting tools
Experience across a wide range of Application-Development Tech Stack
Extensive experience in system analysis and development
Well versed in SDLC life cycle and project management documentations
Need to be self-driven, enthusiastic, quick learner, and have a problem-solving attitude with strong analytical skills
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Exceptional problem-solving skills and ability to work under pressure
Very Confident, innovative, self-motivated, aggressive and results oriented
Fluent in written and spoken English"
"Software Engineer, Analyst, - Trade Surveillance, Singapore #UrgentHire #Immediate #UrgentHire'","Job Description
As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
"Lead, - Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF, - (2200018251).* #Immediate #UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
"Lead, Development IT Projects CCIB CCCF, - (2200018251).*#UrgentHire","The Role Responsibilities
Strategy
Strategize the Technology roadmap for ESG Hive Delivery
Foster engineering mindset among the people and develop talent within the team
Provide Inputs/ directions for strategic programs across Solutions, Design and Approach to implementation
Adopt the bank’s cloud strategy and drive within our programs/ projects
Independently drive CCIB strategy on Design, API, Microservices, Cloud Adoption, Transformation (White Panda) led initiatives
Guide new ideas through the ideation and design process to ensure they are sufficiently defined to address and meet strategic goals
Build strong relationship with production support teams and SRE and proactively manage production service ticket and issues.
Ensure that production defects are not only resolved, but also true root cause is understood to bring insight and actions plans to engineer for improving quality and resilience.
Ensure tech Obsolescence across ESG Hive is remediated with no impact to stability
Business
Manage good relationship with our stakeholders in COO, PSS, Technology Services and Architecture teams
Work with Biz teams to define the outcomes and business benefits around Technology changes
Work with Business teams in articulating key technology risks so that its better understood. Work towards addressing these across our squads 
Take part in Technology evaluation around Products / Services on new initiatives
Processes
Adhere to VX principles and guidelines on all Program delivery
Compliance on ICS guidelines, Security and Data protection
Compliant to SDF/SIA/TDA/RAT process and drive bank towards automating process areas removing redundancies
Compliant SCB Group code of conduct and standards
Compliance on CCIB Design and architecture guidelines , Data governance and policies
People and Talent
Train, retain and motivate teams under you providing leadership where required
Recognize talent and identify the training/coaching areas for employees
Manage the expectations. Provide timely feedback on Performance, Training, Areas of improvement, Addressing Bias etc
Identify top talent, succession planning, key person dependency/risk and constantly work to address them with the appropriate plans
Be the face of the bank to your teams and communicate on things happening in department, bank, locale to drive the best results
Risk Management
Anticipate and handle all the delivery challenges and risks and adhere to Group compliance requirements based on business criticality levels.
Handle team capacity and manage workloads.
Manage the team and raise upfront on the people onboarding requirements as early as possible.
Governance
Must be aware of the Group’s regulatory framework and is expected to adhere based on the role.
Must understand the oversight and controls related to Business Unit, Job Function and deliver.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead the Singapore / CCIB CLDM ITO / Application Development, Support & Engineering to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
ESG Hive ITO, CLDM Business, Vendors related to CLDM, Interfacing systems CCIB Business Unit
Other Responsibilities
Manage and handle all CCIB ESG Objectives.
Our Ideal Candidate
15 Years of experience in application development using Java, J2EE, Spring Boot/Framework and Advance Technologies.
Good understanding of fundamental architecture and design principles, object-orientation principles, and coding standards.
Ability to build extensible and scalable solutions.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in DevOps tools & CI-CD methodology/Implementation.
Good experience in setting up the Delivery team in various location & managing the large size team.
Experience in presenting solutions to architecture forums and follow the principles and standards in implementation.
Good experience in Application Delivery, which includes Release Management and Production Support.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies and frameworks.
Experienced in Agile methodology, handling scrum of scrums, and Waterfall models.
Understanding on source control, versioning, branching, SCM tool and compliance etc.
Recommend future technology capabilities and architecture design considering business objectives, technology strategy, trends and regulatory requirements.
A highly motivated person that is passionate about collaborating with others to drive results, has a team first attitude and can motivate others to do the same to improve the organization.
Development Manager Competency
Good experience in People Management & handling Delivery Teams from various locations.
Good experience in understanding the business requirement, defining project Scope, Effort Estimation and providing the plan for delivering the product.
Good experience in delivering the applications including Sprint, SIT, UAT and Performance Testing support.
Good experience in working with Business stakeholders and Senior Technical leaders for delivering the strategy solution
Good teamwork skills for building the strong relationship with Developers and senior Stakeholders
Experience in evaluating the performance of team members, provide feedbacks and prepare appraisals.
Experience in application management on defining project objectives, resource planning, allocation, and support for projects.
Experience in handling the issues relating to application resource utilization.
Good experience in application support & handling the critical Production issue with PSS support team.
Maintaining good technical knowledge to provide direction to the development process.
Manage cost and quality improvement activities by implementing new effective processes.
Good knowledge in the application release Management and code promotion to higher environment using DevOps.
Good to Have
Experience in application development for ESG, ESRA, Climate Risk, Client Due Diligence (CDD), On-boarding, FATCA & CRS
Good knowledge on Cloud native application development, and knowledge of Cloud computing services.
CDD process awareness including AML, KYC and Screening
Should be able to review and remediate observed requirement/risk related gaps.
Experience and good knowledge on AI & ML (Artificial Intelligence & Machine learning)
Membership in technical guilds/ associations like ASP (Association of Software Professionals), IWA (International Web Association), etc.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Good knowledge in Design Patterns and Principles, Microservices Architecture.
Strong hands-on experience on CI-CD pattern with good knowledge on related tools like GIT, Bitbucket, Jenkins, JIRA, OpenShift, Kubernetes, Docker, and automation test tool like JMeter, SoapUI.
Good hands-on experience in AWS Service, ELK, RDS, AWS Security Principles and architecture.
Good knowledge in Enterprise Application Integration patterns (synchronous, asynchronous).
Good knowledge and experience on API building with micro service architecture
Experience in building large scale applications using opensource and, Java, J2EE technologies.
Expertise in RDBMS solutions (Oracle, PostgreSQL) & NoSQL offerings (Cassandra, MongoDB, etc)
Strong experience in open-source frameworks like Spring, Hibernate, Transaction Management and Apache Libraries (Camel/ActiveMQ/Commons).
Good knowledge on multi-threading and multi-processing implementations.
Good Hands-on experience on containerized platforms like Kubernetes, OpenShift.
Good Understanding code quality tools like SonarQube, AppScan, XRAY.
Experience in distributed technologies e.g., Kafka, Apache MQ, RabbitMQ , JMS Messaging.
Good Experience in APM Agent configuration, Application Performance metrics analysis, SRE concepts and Production Monitoring tool implementation.
Good knowledge in Linux Operating System (Preferably RHEL).
Strong experience on Workflow Management Tool, Camunda, Drools
Strong experience and Knowledge on ICS controls, Secure by Design principles.
Strong knowledge on testing methodologies like performance testing, smoke testing, stress testing, endurance testing, etc."
"Analyst, DevOps, - (2200014547).'.","The Role Responsibilities
 Building an E2E robust Automated Platform with the Vision of Shift left(Enhanced Developer Experience with Software). The Current focus areas being Building automations to address several Journeys for the Software Product. This includes automating capabilities like below
Lifecycle Management of Software Products
Controls Enforcement on Software Products
Security
Vulnerabilities
Penetration Testing
Signing and Certification
Licensing
Building Portables for Software Products
Declarative Installation of Software Products
Audit and Risk Management for Software Products
Authentication and Authorization for usage of Software Products
Customer Support for Software Products
BAU Delivery of Software Products
Strategy
Should be able to understand the Strategy from the Leader and able to convert it into actionable Roadmaps.
Business
Place business at the core and make sure the needs are addressed in time and ensure there is no disruption.
Processes
Understand and align with the processes at work that form the key for any new initiatives and make sure there aren’t any process violations. Able to define new processes that could govern and audit transformation initiatives.
People and Talent
Nurture people within the team and encourage talent that helps strengthen the team in turn. Create cohesive teams that could help achieve targets with ease.
Risk Management
Be aware of the Risk the initiatives could bring in and also timely declare any known risks inorder to avoid surprises. Always be handy with a contingency plan.
Governance
Define governance of initiatives and align with existing governance that is already in place in order to make sure there is due diligence in the offerings’ quality.
Regulatory & Business Conduct
Display exemplary conduct and live by the Group’s Values and Code of Conduct.
Take personal responsibility for embedding the highest standards of ethics, including regulatory and business conduct, across Standard Chartered Bank. This includes understanding and ensuring compliance with, in letter and spirit, all applicable laws, regulations, guidelines and the Group Code of Conduct.
Lead to achieve the outcomes set out in the Bank’s Conduct Principles: Fair Outcomes for Clients; Effective Financial Markets; Financial Crime Compliance; The Right Environment.
Effectively and collaboratively identify, escalate, mitigate and resolve risk, conduct and compliance matters.
Key Stakeholders
Developers, Cyber Security, Perimeter Security, Licensing Management, Product Managers, Vx
Other Responsibilities
Self-Motivated approach to problems at hand
Collaborate with teams to timely quality Closure of dependent Tasks
Knowledge Sharing Intra Team Collaboration
Ability to deescalate the situation and come up with timely solutions to the Customers
Ownership of the BAU and Roadmaps’ Technical Implementation
Our Ideal Candidate:
8+ years of experience in Software Delivery with 5 years of experience into Automation n Opensource.
Proven experience in synchronizing with the engineering teams for a E2E implementation
Highly effective in translating the product roadmaps into implementation.
Strong problem solving skills and Self Motivated approach towards the work at hand.
High cross functional team collaboration.
Extensive experience working with Scripting Tools to provide Automation.
Handson experience using all three major Operating Systems (Windows, Linux and Mac)
What you bring:
Extensive knowledge on Scripting – Shell, Powershell n Apple Scripts.
Strong experience in Automation tools – Ansible, Python and Groovy(Jenkins)
Experience in Certificate Management and Code Signing Capabilties
Good hands on experience in Building Open Source software from Source.
Role Specific Technical Competencies 
Linux Shell Scripting 
Powershell Scripting
Apple Scripting
Jenkins
Ansible
Python
API Development
OpenSource Software – Building from Source
Code Signing & Certificates
Automation"
"Software Engineer, - Java - Payments Technology #WorkNow #JPM #Seekbetter'","As a member of our Software Engineering Group you will dive head-first into creating innovative solutions that advance businesses and careers. You’ll join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products. You’ll be tasked with keeping the team and other key stakeholders up to speed on the progress of what’s being developed. Coming in with an understanding of the importance of end-to-end software development-such as Agile frameworks-is key. And best of all, you’ll be working with and sharing ideas, information and innovation with our global team of technologists from all over the world.
You will be working for a global team with members in Singapore, India and North America. The team is responsible for building low value and real time payments systems for our corporate customers. As a full stack developer, you will be working on high throughput, low latency micro services. There is a huge opportunity to learn the payments domain.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree or related technical field or equivalent 
Minimum 3 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit, Mockito
Experience with one or more UI technologies, preferably React
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle, MySQL and Cassandra
Experience in building REST APIs
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of one or more IMDG technologies, e.g. Gemfire, Hazelcast
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude"
"Vice President - Java Software Engineer, Regulatory Reporting #JPM #UrgentHire''","Job Description
The Regulatory Reporting team is building a state of the art cloud-native platform that aims to streamline global regulatory reporting requirements and handle massive data volumes for the firm. As a Technical Lead, you play a key role in leading, designing and building Banking Regulatory Platform. You will get the opportunity to work in a global cross-functional team consisting of developers, operations, site reliability engineering, delivery managers and data analysts.
Our key technology stack consists of Java/J2EE, Cloud, & Oracle. 
Responsibilities
Individual development contribution across some or all of the various components of the system, including back-end services and DB
This is an individual contributor but this role is required to manage developers functionally.
Partner with and manage business and technology stakeholders across the organization, including product owners, other technology teams and technology/business management.
Follow and promote Agile practices like Scrum and TDD/BDD
Ensure consistency with and synergy across the global platform by collaborating regularly with peers across the global team.
Own end to end delivery of the product and work with management to manage/mitigate any risk
Requirements
Bachelor degree in computer science, information systems, engineering or related disciplines
Minimum 10 years of software development experience using Java tech stack, including but not limited to: Core Java, Spring or Spring Boot, Junit
Experience in delivering applications from inception, design to production
Experience in application architecture and design
Experience with one or more database technologies, e.g. Oracle
Experience in building REST APIs and Microservices
Knowledge of test-driven development and testing frameworks
Knowledge of one or more cloud technologies like Cloud foundry, AWS
Knowledge of one or more messaging technologies, e.g. Kafka, IBM MQ
Knowledge of data formats like JSON, XML
Experience in Agile development methodologies
Strong leadership skills
Proactive self-starter who able to take initiative and roll up sleeves to get things done. Can lead cross functional teams to achieve complex deliveries.
Ability to innovate, High level of motivation to get things delivered
Strong interpersonal skills and team building attitude
Experience in version control tools like SVN, GIT
Good to have
Previous experience working in the financial sector with understanding of risk management and financial data along with a regulatory risk environment
Experience in Payments or Regulatory Reporting Domain
Experience in one or more areas - ETL/BI tools or Big data
Knowledge on container technologies like Kubernetes, Docker
Knowledge on monitoring tools like Splunk
Knowledge on scheduling tools like Autosys, Control-M"
"Senior Associate, Backend Developer, EASRE, Technology & Operations - (WD41538)'","Business Function
Group Technology and Operations (T&O) enables and empowers the bank with an efficient, nimble and resilient infrastructure through a strategic focus on productivity, quality & control, technology, people capability and innovation. In Group T&O, we manage the majority of the Bank's operational processes and inspire to delight our business partners through our multiple banking delivery channels.
Responsibilities
Develop complex systems and components for real time, distributed and highly secured environments.
Ensure code and designs are in compliance with bank’s policies, follow specifications, coding best practices, prepare and produce releases of software components.
Working with a CI/CD pipeline (Bitbucket, Jenkins, Nexus, SonarQube) and deployment tools such as Docker and OpenShift.
Working with highly collaborative teams and to build quality solutions.
Working with Agile teams using JIRA tool.
Requirements
Degree in Computer Science, a related technical field that involves programming, or combination of equivalent practical experience and education.
Minimum 1 – 3 years working experience in relevant role/s.
Proficiency in back end development using Python and Java (preferably with Spring Boot Framework).
Knowledgeable in ElasticSearch and understanding of SQL, relational database, data modeling and normalization.
Working knowledge of REST and SOAP protocols.
Background in design and implementation of scalable architecture and a good understanding of Algorithms, Data structures and design patterns.
Familiar in Bitbucket/Git for source code management.
Good to have in web development using ReactJS, JavaScript and jQuery.
Good to have experience working with DevOps tools (Git, Bitbucket, Jenkins, Nexus, SonarQube).
Possess good problem-solving skill and can adapt to changes in business requirements.
Effectively prioritise and execute tasks in a high-pressure, fast paced, global environment.
Strong organisational skills to manage assignments effectively and working within tight deadlines.
Strong communications skills to collaborate with developers, QA, project managers and other stakeholders.
Good to have experience working in Agile teams using JIRA tool.
Able to work independently and as part of a team.
Willing to learn new skills, existing and emerging technologies.
Apply Now
We offer a competitive salary and benefits package and the professional advantages of a dynamic environment that supports your development and recognises your achievements."
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President, Singapore+ -#UrgentHire #Worknow'","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
"Modern Software Engineer, Vice President, Singapore+ -#UrgentHire #Worknow","Job Description
Working in a cross-functional Agile team you will deliver business solutions by designing and developing robust, secure applications for Global Technology Infrastructure, which supplies platforms and solutions to the entire organization. You will be involved in the full development life-cycle from writing user stories, architecting solutions, coding, testing, and deployment. As a full-stack developer you will be working on all aspects of the application, including APIs, the user-interface, databases, automation scripts, and connectivity with external systems.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor’s degree
Minimum of 7 years’ experience in software development
Advanced knowledge of application, data, and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Expert in one or more modern programming languages (Java, JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, React, JQuery, SQL)
Strong knowledge on build (Maven), continuous integration (Jenkins), code quality analysis (SonarQube) and unit and integration testing (JUnit, Selenium)
Working experience in Object Oriented programming, REST, microservices, JavaScript, JPA, Hibernate, SpringBoot and cloud technologies such as Cloud Foundry and Kubernetes
Agile team member always looking to improve"
"Software Engineer, Analyst, - Trade Surveillance, Singapore #SeekbettertHire'","Job Description

As a member of our Software Engineering Group, we look first and foremost for people who are passionate around solving business problems through innovation and engineering practices. You'll be required to apply your depth of knowledge and expertise to all aspects of the software development lifecycle, as well as partner continuously with your many stakeholders on a daily basis to stay focused on common goals. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.
In this role, you will support the current suite of Surveillance and Analytics system providing the aforementioned trade surveillance detection pattern alerts/reports for multiple Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB) Markets trading products for critical regulatory mandates. You will also be participating in the design and build-out of a bank-wide strategic transactional surveillance and analytics platform employing complex data processing, transaction pattern detection, data analytics and suspicious activity investigation capabilities.
The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to the following:
Collaborating with high-performing teams and individuals throughout the firm to accomplish common goals
Be part of Global Surveillance Technology Application Development team to own the end to end architecture design, build and delivery.
Join one of our 5 Singapore based scrum teams, practice scrum ceremonies.  
Work directly with global based compliance users and closely partner with DevOps team. 
Follow established software engineering and SDLC best practices to ensure code quality, platform performance, stability and scalability
Assist in Level 3 production support.
Requirements:
B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related discipline
2 years or more of experience in Core Java and Java EE
Experience in application development of distributed mission-critical Trading or Transactional Analytics systems
Agile development methodology and test driven development. Familiarity with automated tools as such Maven, Jenkins and Cucumber
Experience in developing high-quality interactive UI and UX using Java WebUI technologies such as Angular-JS and Node-JS
Experience with database programming to design and build enterprise-scale and high-volume Oracle data processing applications using packages, procedures, triggers, PL/SQL, Java Stored Procedures
Ability to work under pressure and take ownership of issues. Sense of urgency to solve problems and propose solutions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Able to multi-task, proactive and attention to detail
Additional Preferred Requirements:
Application development experience in delivering complicated enterprise Investment Banking application for Market Surveillance, or Investment Banking Front-office Trading Systems or Analytics Systems in FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives domains
Experience in AWS Cloud, Kubernetes and Docker
Experience in Python, Scala, Spark
Experience in Kafka streaming
Experience in KDB, big data related systems
Financial Products knowledge of Futures & Options, FX, Commodities, Equities and Equities Derivatives, as well as trade lifecycles and/or order workflow
Experience in data engineering and data science, machine learning"
Cyber Security Analytics Content Developer - VP (Hybrid) - 22524907 #Worknow,"Responsibilities:
Identify opportunities to automate and standardize information security controls and for the supported groups
Resolve any vulnerabilities or issues detected in an application or infrastructure
Analyze source code to mitigate identified weaknesses and vulnerabilities within the system
Review and validate automated testing results and prioritize actions that resolve issues based on overall risk
Scan and analyze applications with automated tools, and perform manual testing if necessary
Reduce risk by analyzing the root cause of issues, their impact, and required corrective actions
Direct the development and delivery of secure solutions by coordinating with business and technical contacts
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience
Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Office tools and software
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Proven influencing and relationship management skills
Proven analytical skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
Cyber Security Analytics Content Developer - VP (Hybrid) #WorkNow #UrgentHire,"Responsibilities:
Identify opportunities to automate and standardize information security controls and for the supported groups
Resolve any vulnerabilities or issues detected in an application or infrastructure
Analyze source code to mitigate identified weaknesses and vulnerabilities within the system
Review and validate automated testing results and prioritize actions that resolve issues based on overall risk
Scan and analyze applications with automated tools, and perform manual testing if necessary
Reduce risk by analyzing the root cause of issues, their impact, and required corrective actions
Direct the development and delivery of secure solutions by coordinating with business and technical contacts
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.
Qualifications:
6-10 years of relevant experience
Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Office tools and software
Consistently demonstrates clear and concise written and verbal communication
Proven influencing and relationship management skills
Proven analytical skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree/University degree or equivalent experience
Master’s degree preferred"
"Software Engineer (Machine Learning Infrastructure), AML","Responsibilities
The mission of our AML team is to push next-generation machine learning algorithms and platform for the recommendation system, ads ranking and search ranking in our company. We also drive substantial impact for core businesses of the company. Currently we are looking for Software Engineer - Machine Learning Infrastructure to join our team to support and advance that mission.
What You'll Do
Responsible for the design and implementation of a global-scale machine learning system for feeds, ads and search ranking models.
Responsible for improving use-ability and flexibility of the machine learning infrastructure.
Responsible for improving the workflow of model training and serving, data pipelines and resource management for the multi-tenancy machine learning systems.
Qualifications
Proficient in C/C++/Python, and have solid programming skills.
Familiar with deep learning frameworks (TensorFlow/Pytorch).
Experience in developing and deploying large-scale systems.
Ability to work independently and complete projects from beginning to end and in a timely manner.
Good communication and teamwork skills to clearly communicate technical concepts with other teammates.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience contributing to an open sourced machine learning framework (TensorFlow/PyTorch).
Experience in big data frameworks (e.g., Spark/Hadoop/Flink), experience in resource management and task scheduling for large scale distributed systems.
Strong background in one of the following fields: Hardware-Software Co-Design, High Performance Computing, ML Hardware Acceleration (e.g., GPU/TPU/RDMA) or ML for Systems."
"Staff Software Engineer, - Data, - Standard Chartered nexus..*'.","Want to push the boundaries of traditional technology, finance and operations? At nexus, courage is a defining trait for all team members. Courage to challenge the status quo, to do better, to deliver against the grain and to achieve spectacular results in massive ambiguity. We want to change how ecosystems interact and only have the blueprint for the baby steps – come join us to build out the rest of it! The idea is to do amazing things and have a lot of fun while doing it. 
Standard Chartered nexus is looking for a Staff Software Engineer to define, implement and run the Data platforms and analytics for an online banking project. 
What will you be doing: 
Choosing the right technologies for our use cases, deploy and operate. 
Setting up Data stores structured, semi structured and non-structured. 
Secure data at rest via encryption 
Implement tool to access securely multiple data sources 
Implement solutions to run real-time analytics 
Use container technologies 
Design and implement replications strategies for an active/active data center layout 
Design and implement backup and recovery strategy 
What do you need to be successful in this role? 
3+ years of experience 
2+ years’ experience on distributed datastores and distributed computation 
Experience in a few of the followings: Elastic Search, Cassandra, Hadoop, Mongo DB 
Experience in either Scala or Java (Python is a plus) 
Experience in Spark and Presto or Trino 
Experience with microservice based architectures  
Experience on Kubernetes 
Experience with using NoSQL is a big plus 
Experience of Unix/Linux environments is plus 
Experience of Agile/Scrum development methodologies is a plus 
Knowledge of retail banking is a plus 
Cloud knowledge a big plus (AWS/GCP) – (Kubernetes/Docker) 
Be nice, respectful, able to work in a team 
Willingness to learn  "
Core Payments Application Support - Associate | #worknow #Urgent #Immediate #Worknow,"Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world’s important corporations, governments and institutions. You’ll develop solutions for a bank entrusted with holding $18 trillion of assets and $393 billion in deposits. CIB provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk, and extends liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world.
Working in Application Support means you'll use both creative and critical thinking skills to maintain application systems that are crucial to the daily operations of the firm. You'll work collaboratively in teams on a wide range of projects based on your primary area of focus: design or programming. While learning to fix application and data issues as they arise, you'll also gain exposure to software development, testing, deployment, maintenance and improvement, in addition to production lifecycle methodologies and risk guidelines. Finally, you'll have the opportunity to develop professionally —and to grow your career in any direction you choose.
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
Performs 2nd level support for application and platform incidents as needed
Brings a DevOps and SRE mindset to the entire software development life cycle, building, evolving and operating rapidly-changing resilient systems at scale
Ensures monitoring alerts and systems events are assessed, prioritized, and managed, and creates and maintain operational metrics
Drives continuous improvement of services and processes in order to increase platform stability and realize operational efficiencies
Participates in post incident reviews for client impacting incidents
Identifies post incident review action items and process improvement opportunities
Supports as needed Resiliency events (Disaster Recovery, Sustained Resiliency, etc.)
Automates routine tasks by scripting or by other programmatic means, and collaborates with technology and business partners to continuously identify proactive monitoring and health check opportunities
Ensures potential client impacting incidents are identified and remediated prior to client impact or remediated as soon as possible after issues arise
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Strong knowledge of Hadoop, Hive, HDFS, Cloudera, Impala
Strong application development experience or strong application support experience
Experience automating operational tasks with one or more of the following languages: Python, Linux shell scripting
Experience with relational databases (e.g. ORACLE, MY SQL)
Experience with application monitoring tools (Geneos, Dynatrace, or similar)
Experience with one or more of the following: Windows, Linux
Ability to work independently as a self-starter, and within a team environment
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent organizational and time management skills
Solid experience in documenting requirements and technical specifications
Unix (commands, scripting)
Education and experience requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or Information Technology
Minimum 3 years working in development or production support preferred
Knowledge of Information Technology Infrastructure Library (ITIL) production support best practices
Experience working in the financial industry and with core cash management systems is a plus
Understanding of Financial and Banking applications or related business experience is a plus"
"Finance Technology – Regulatory Reporting Software Engineer, Associate #Immediate #JPM #Immediate","Job Description
Job Description:
The Finance Risk Data and Controls (FRDC) Technology organization is seeking strong engineer who wants to join an inspiring and curious team of technologists dedicated to improving the design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming that goes into creating high quality software and new products in Regulatory Reporting Technology function.
The ideal candidate enjoys building, supporting, and the evolution of software applications, and has a strong understanding of designing and building applications in a variety of technologies as well as manage communication with stakeholders. In this role, a successful candidate will:
Manage and support a portfolio of production applications which includes vendor, in-house, on premise, and SaaS applications
Make sound architectural decisions around Regulatory Reporting application components
Identify gaps and weaknesses in existing applications and design and implement remediation of these gaps
Work to improve the stability of applications in the production environment
Ensure changes to the applications follow a disciplined change management processes including all documentation, reviews, and approval steps
Ensure adherence to design and coding standards
Define and execute test cases for quality of deliverables
Liaise with stakeholders from various teams which includes Finance, Corporate Controllers, Product Controllers within the region as well as global for all cycles (development, testing, implementation, post release)
Qualifications
BS/BA Degree in Computer Science/Finance or equivalent
Application architecture analysis and design
3 years or more of experience in SQL, preferable in Oracle PL/SQL
2 years or more in Python or Java or equivalent development experience
Hands on experience in writing complex SQL queries and defining DB objects.
Good Knowledge on Stored Procedures/Packages, Functions and Triggers
Applicant must have strong English and Mandarin written to be able to communicate with clients and oral communication skills to effectively liaise with our stakeholders
Strong Unix and Shell scripting knowledge
Strong analytical & problem-solving skills
Familiar with Agile methodology
Able to work under pressure and tight timeline
Strong Excel knowledge
Windows OS
Source control tools, preferably Subversion"
Full Stack Developer (React + PHP),"Job Description
We are looking for an experienced developer to join our DFS Global Technology team. This candidate will work under the direction of the Product Manager to design, develop and deliver quality applications to enable our product vision. Ideal candidates will possess multiple years of experience web application development using ReactJS, PHP Symphony framework, MQ, Redis, etc., and experiences on Scrum, CI/CD, and a balance of technical depth, business acumen, and communication skills. The role involves working collaboratively with different functions within various levels and departments of the organization to deliver on business strategy and outcomes. Candidate should be results-oriented, eager to learn and with a passion for technology. 
Responsibilities:
Analyze user requirements and provide system documentation, manage the technical details and the stories status on collaboration tools such as Confluence and JIRA
Assist in system, database and architectural design according to project requirements, as well as various testing and deployment of systems
Build efficient, testable, and reusable PHP modules with Symphony framework, MySQL, RESTful API, Kafka
Authoring projects that power responsive front-end interfaces using HTML, React, CSS, Javascript and other technologies, frameworks and libraries
Implement and administrate Source Code Management Tools and conduct the code review
Provide proactive maintenance and root cause analysis to the project team and production application in a timely and professional manner
Key Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Software Development or equivalent
3 - 5 years of experience
Proficient in HTML, PHP, CSS, ReactJS, javascript and MySQL is a must
Knowledge in PHP frameworks (like Symphony) implementation, integration with Kafka, MQ, Mulesoft/Apigee, CI/CD, DevOps is an advantage
Familiarity with Agile development methodologies
Experience using code management and collaboration tools e.g. Confluence, JIRA, Bitbucket
Excellent communications skills, positive attitude, and ability to interact confidently with business users, technical teams and vendors
Experience with Salesforce Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Marketing Cloud, Experience Cloud 
Knowledge in data streaming using Kafka, API gateway such as Apigee, Mulesoft
Able to work under pressure and meet tight deadlines
Provide deployment support outside the regular office hour is required
DFS is an equal opportunity employer. It is the Company’s policy and practice to employ, promote and treat all employees and applicants on the basis of merit, qualifications and competency and to provide all employees with a workplace that is free of discrimination. Employment decisions are based on qualifications such as education, work experience and talent, and are made without regard to race, color, gender, religion, age, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, disability or any other basis protected by law. "
